Pleiotrophin (PTN) and midkine (MK) mRNA expression in eutopic and ectopic endometrium in advanced stage endometriosis.Endometriosis is characterized by the ectopic implantation of endometrium on peritoneal surfaces. Angiogenic and growth factors may play a significant role in the pathogenesis of endometriosis. Midkine (MK) and pleiotrophin (PTN) are two related peptides associated with carcinogenesis and angiogenesis. To test the hypothesis that a higher expression of MK and PTN in ectopic and eutopic endometrium from women with endometriosis might favour increased angiogenesis and growth with subsequent ectopic implantation, we investigated PTN and MK expression by quantitative competitive PCR (QC-PCR) in endometrium from 30 women with severe, stages III and IV endometriosis and from 30 women without endometriosis. Total RNA was extracted and reverse transcribed into cDNA, and QC-PCR was performed to evaluate PTN and MK mRNA expression. Results were analysed by analysis of variance. Eutopic endometrium from endometriosis patients showed increased expression of MK and PTN mRNA compared with endometrium from normal women in the luteal phase (P < 0.05). MK and PTN mRNA expression in ectopic endometrium was significantly lower than that in eutopic endometrium from women with and without endometriosis (P < 0.05). Our results suggest increased MK and PTN expression may be related to the initiation of ectopic endometrial implants and peritoneal invasion.Prokineticin 1 mRNA expression in the endometrium of healthy women and in the eutopic endometrium of women with endometriosis.To examine prokineticin 1 (PROK1) mRNA expression in eutopic endometrial glands obtained from patients with or without endometriosis, to investigate the presence of additional endometrial abnormalities in women with endometriosis.Prospective laboratory study.University hospital.Twelve control women and 12 patients affected by endometriosis in the secretory phase of the menstrual cycle.Endometrial specimens were obtained from women affected (cases) or not (control group) by endometriosis. Endometrial glands were freshly isolated from endometrial biopsies.PROK1 mRNA expression levels by real-time polymerase chain reaction analysis.PROK1 mRNA was detectable in 4 of 12 (33%) samples obtained from women affected by endometriosis, whereas 10 of 12 (83%) samples obtained from normal women were positive for PROK1 detection by real-time polymerase chain reaction. Moreover, detectable PROK1 mRNA levels were 10 times lower in samples obtained from women with endometriosis than in samples obtained from control women.PROK1 is a newly discovered angiogenic factor implicated in the vascular function of peri-implantation endometrium and early pregnancy. An altered expression of PROK1 could be one of the several biochemical abnormalities characterizing eutopic endometrium in endometriosis.Differentially expressed genes in eutopic and ectopic endometrium of women with endometriosis.To elucidate the potential mechanisms involved in the physiopathology of endometriosis. We analyzed the differential gene expression profiles of eutopic and ectopic tissues from women with endometriosis.Prospective laboratory study.University hospital.Seventeen patients in whom endometriosis was diagnosed and 11 healthy fertile women.Endometrial biopsy specimens from the endometrium of healthy women without endometriosis and from the eutopic and ectopic endometrium tissues of patients with endometriosis were obtained in the early proliferative phase of the menstrual cycle.Six paired samples of eutopic and ectopic tissue were analyzed by subtractive hybridization. To evaluate the expression of genes found by rapid subtraction hybridization methods, we measured CTGF, SPARC, MYC, MMP, and IGFBP1 genes by real-time polymerase chain reaction in all samples.This study identified 291 deregulated genes in the endometriotic lesions. Significant expression differences were obtained for SPARC, MYC, and IGFBP1 in the peritoneal lesions and for MMP3 in the ovarian endometriomas. Additionally, significant differences were obtained for SPARC and IGFBP1 between the peritoneal and ovarian lesions. No significant differences were found for the studied genes between the control and the eutopic endometrium.This study identified 291 genes with differential expression in endometriotic lesions. The deregulation of the SPARC, MYC, MMP3, and IGFBPI genes may be responsible for the loss of cellular homeostasis in endometriotic lesions.Reduced expression of HOXA10 in the midluteal endometrium from infertile women with minimal endometriosis.Recent human and animal studies have suggested that reduced HOXA10 expression in the implantation window of eutopic endometrium may contribute to infertility in women with endometriosis. Therefore, we examined the HOXA10 transcript, protein and HOXA10 promoter methylation levels in midluteal eutopic endometrium from 17 infertile women with minimal endometriosis and 15 healthy fertile women from a Polish cohort. Real-time quantitative PCR (RQ-PCR) and western blotting analysis revealed significantly lower levels of HOXA10 transcript (P=0.019) and protein (P=0.048) levels in eutopic endometrium from infertile women with endometriosis as compared to healthy fertile women. Moreover, sodium bisulfite sequencing of three HOXA10 CpG islands showed significantly higher methylation levels of genomic DNA from midluteal eutopic endometrium from infertile women with endometriosis as compared to healthy fertile women (P=0.006). We confirmed that DNA hypermethylation can be one of the potential molecular mechanisms silencing HOXA10 expression in the midluteal endometrium associated with infertility in women with endometriosis.Evidence for an increased release of proteolytic activity by the eutopic endometrial tissue in women with endometriosis and for involvement of matrix metalloproteinase-9.For the implantation of endometrium in ectopic locations, remodelling of the extracellular matrix (ECM) is necessary. Many studies have shown an increased expression of various proteases in the ectopic endometrium of women with endometriosis. Few, however, have addressed possible changes in protease expression in the eutopic endometrium.Herein, we reveal an increased release of proteolytic activity by the eutopic endometrium of women with endometriosis compared with normal women (P < 0.01). Using zymography and western blotting, we identified matrix metalloproteinase (MMP)-2 and MMP-9 in the culture medium, and further found that MMP-9 secretion, as assessed by zymography and enzyme-linked immunosorbent assay (ELISA), was elevated in women with endometriosis compared with normal women (P < 0.05). No statistically significant difference in MMP-2 secretion between women with and without endometriosis was noted. However, a significant difference in the levels of the tissue inhibitor of metalloproteinases (TIMP)-1, a known MMP-9 inhibitor, was found (P < 0.05).The endometriosis-associated increase in proteolysis and imbalance between the secretion of MMP-9 and that of its natural inhibitor, TIMP-1, revealed in the culture medium of endometrial tissue may reflect in vivo the enhanced capacity of this tissue to break down the ECM in host tissues, thereby favouring its ectopic implantation and development.Tumor-associated glycoprotein (TAG-72) in endometriotic implants.Tumor-associated glycoprotein (TAG-72) is an antigen detected by the monoclonal antibody B72.3 that is expressed by a wide variety of human malignancies and in normal secretory endometrium. Serum TAG-72 may be elevated in women with endometriosis, but the distribution of TAG-72 in this disorder has not been well studied. Accordingly, TAG-72 was assayed by immunohistochemical staining in 26 endometriotic implants collected at various times of the menstrual cycle and compared to that in 56 samples of normal endometrium, in 8 cases from the same patient. TAG-72 expression was markedly discordant between normal and ectopic endometrium. Unlike proliferative phase endometrial samples, which were uniformly negative, endometriotic implants were TAG-72 positive in 50% of the cases. Like normal endometrium, all except very early secretory phase endometriosis was positive. Based on our current understanding of TAG-72 expression, this unique estrogen-repressed glycoprotein may be a useful probe to study the basis for phenotypic alterations noted in endometriosis, some of which probably contribute to the infertility associated with this disease. Moreover, the presence of B72.3 in nonmalignant tissues puts in question it usefulness in screening for malignancies.Eutopic endometrium and peritoneal, ovarian and bowel endometriotic tissues express a different profile of matrix metalloproteinases-2, -3 and -11, and of tissue inhibitor metalloproteinases-1 and -2.Endometriosis is subsequent to the ability of endometrial glands to invade normal tissues. Matrix metalloproteinases (MMPs)--enzymes that mediate normal tissue turnover, including endometrial breakdown during menstruation-appear to be involved in this invasive process. Here, we examined the immunohistochemical expression of MMP-2, MMP-3, MMP-11, tissue inhibitor metalloproteinase (TIMP)-1 and TIMP-2 in endometrium from women with (n=9) or without endometriosis (n=18) in comparison with peritoneal (n=20), ovarian (n=20) and colorectal endometriosis (n=20). Women with endometriosis showed decreased endometrial MMP-2 expression compared with women without endometriosis (mean+/-SD positive cells: 24.3+/-28.3% and 69.3+/-12.1%), together with loss of MMP-3 expression (0 versus 17.5%+/-20.2). MMP-11, TIMP-1 and TIMP-2 expression was similar in the two groups. Endometrial MMP-2, -3 and -11 expression and TIMP-1 and -2 expression were similar in women with endometriosis and in those with peritoneal endometriosis. MMP-2, -3 and -11 expression was higher in colorectal endometriosis than in ovarian and peritoneal endometriosis. TIMP-2 expression was lower in colorectal endometriosis (P=0.0002) and ovarian endometriotic cysts (P=0.003) than in peritoneal endometriosis. TIMP-1 expression did not vary according to the location of endometriotic lesions. These results suggest that MMP-2 and -3 and TIMP-2 may be involved in the pathogenesis of endometriosis. Interestingly, MMP-2 and -3 overexpression was related to the infiltrative nature of endometriotic lesions, with possible sequential expression from peritoneal to colorectal endometriosis.Immunohistochemical characterization of proliferation, oestrogen receptor and progesterone receptor expression in endometriosis: comparison of eutopic and ectopic endometrium with normal cycling endometrium.Recent studies examining oestrogen and progesterone receptor status and the proliferative activity of endometriotic lesions have produced conflicting reports. This study aimed to clarify the receptor status and proliferative activity of eutopic and ectopic endometrium from women with endometriosis and endometrium from normal women. Progesterone and oestrogen receptor expression and proliferative activity were studied in eutopic and ectopic endometrium from 30 women with endometriosis and in endometrium from 30 normal cycling women using microwave-pretreated paraffin-embedded sections stained with an avidin-biotin peroxidase technique. Progesterone and oestrogen receptor expression in the control endometrium did not differ from that of eutopic endometrium from women with endometriosis. Oestrogen receptor expression in ectopic endometrium increased from the proliferative to the late secretory phase. Epithelial progesterone receptor expression decreased during the cycle. Oestrogen receptor expression in both epithelium and stroma of ectopic endometrium was significantly higher than in eutopic endometrium throughout the cycle. In contrast, stromal progesterone receptor expression tended to be reduced in ectopic endometrium compared with eutopic tissue. Epithelial progesterone receptor expression was increased in ectopic endometrium but only in the late secretory phase. Although proliferative activity in the epithelium of control and eutopic endometrium was reduced from the proliferative to the late secretory phase, stromal activity did not vary. The proliferative activity in ectopic endometrium remained low and constant throughout the cycle. In the proliferative and early secretory phases, the proliferative activity of eutopic endometrium was increased compared with ectopic endometrium, but in the late secretory phase, levels were comparable. These findings challenge previous reports which have suggested that oestrogen receptors are reduced in ectopic tissue. This may have clinical implications for the development of novel treatments for endometriosis.Cyclooxygenase-2 expression in deep endometriosis and matched eutopic endometrium.To identify any relationship between cyclooxygenase-2 expression and the intensity of severe, endometriosis-related dysmenorrhea.Prospective study.University hospital.Patients with deep endometriosis.During surgery, paired samples of tissue representing deep endometriosis and eutopic endometrium were obtained from 46 patients. Control endometrial tissue samples were obtained from 34 fertile women who underwent laparoscopic tubal ligation or reversal of tubal sterilization. Pain assessment for dysmenorrhea was done with a 10-point linear analogue scale.The percentage of surface immunostained for Cox-2 was determined by an immunohistochemical technique. Relationships between pain score for dysmenorrhea and Cox-2 expression were analyzed.Cox-2 expression was significantly higher in eutopic endometrial stromal cells from patients with deep endometriosis than in stroma from controls during the early, mid, and late secretory phases. In endometriosis patients, Cox-2 expression in eutopic endometrial stromal cells was significantly higher in women with more severe dysmenorrhea (pain score > or =7 vs. <7) during early and mid secretory phases.Elevated Cox-2 expression in stromal cells in eutopic endometrium from patients with deep endometriosis may play a role in severe, endometriosis-related dysmenorrhea.Augmented epithelial multidrug resistance-associated protein 4 expression in peritoneal endometriosis: regulation by lipoxin A(4).To compare the expression of the prostaglandin (PG) E(2) transporter multidrug resistance-associated protein 4 (MRP4) in eutopic and ectopic endometrial tissue from endometriosis patients with that of control subjects and to examine whether MRP4 is regulated by the antiinflammatory lipid lipoxin A(4) (LXA(4)) in endometriotic epithelial cells.Molecular analysis in human samples and a cell line.Two university hospitals and a private clinic.A total of 59 endometriosis patients and 32 age- and body mass index-matched control subjects undergoing laparoscopy or hysterectomy.Normal, eutopic, and ectopic endometrial biopsies as well as peritoneal fluid were obtained during surgery performed during the proliferative phase of the menstrual cycle. 12Z endometriotic epithelial cells were used for in vitro mechanistic studies.Tissue MRP4 mRNA levels were quantified by quantitative reverse-transcription polymerase chain reaction (qRT-PCR), and localization was analyzed with the use of immunohistochemistry. Cellular MRP4 mRNA and protein were quantified by qRT-PCR and Western blot, respectively. PGE(2) was measured in peritoneal fluid and cell supernatants using an enzyme immunoassay (EIA).MRP4 was expressed in eutopic and ectopic endometrium, where it was overexpressed in peritoneal lesions and localized in the cytoplasm of glandular epithelial cells. LXA(4) attenuated MRP4 mRNA and protein levels in endometriotic epithelial cells in a dose-dependent manner, while not affecting the expression of enzymes involved in PGE(2) metabolism. Investigations employing receptor antagonists and small interfering RNA revealed that this occurred through estrogen receptor α. Accordingly, LXA(4) treatment inhibited extracellular PGE(2) release.We report for the first time that MRP4 is expressed in human endometrium, elevated in peritoneal endometriosis, and modulated by LXA(4) in endometriotic epithelial cells.Sustained replication in endometrium of women with endometriosis occurs without evoking a DNA damage response.To test our hypothesis that eutopic secretory phase endometrium from women with endometriosis is similar to proliferative phase endometrium from fertile women without endometriosis, we explored the expression of regulators of cell fate across the menstrual cycle.Endometrial biopsies were taken from 73 women, comprising 38 women with surgically diagnosed active peritoneal endometriosis (Group 1) and 35 fertile women without endometriosis (Group 2). Nucleolin, proliferating cell nuclear antigen (PCNA), telomerase and histone gamma-H2AX expression was evaluated by immunohistochemistry and mean telomere length (TL) by quantitative PCR.We have immunolocalized nucleolin and gamma-H2AX in the benign premenopausal endometrium for the first time. All markers were present in the proliferative phase endometrium of all women. In Group 2, during the secretory phase, proliferative markers declined with a paradoxical increase in stromal gamma-H2AX. Women in Group 1, however, showed a persistent immunoreactivity for the proliferative markers, while the staining for gamma-H2AX decreased in secretory endometrium (P < 0.05). This difference between groups was significant in both stroma and glands for nucleolin (P < 0.0001), PCNA (P < 0.01) and gamma-H2AX (P < 0.05) in the secretory phase. We showed a positive correlation between mean TL and nucleolin expression (glandular r = 0.37, P = 0.002; stromal r = 0.4, P = 0.001), telomerase immunoreactivity (glandular r = 0.33, P = 0.009; stromal r = 0.4, P = 0.001) and glandular PCNA (r = 0.35, P = 0.004), whereas a negative correlation was seen between mean TL and gamma-H2AX (r = -0.28, P = 0.04).These findings demonstrate that the state of replication seen in secretory phase endometrium from women with active peritoneal endometriosis is not a simple extension of the proliferative phase.Global gene analysis of late secretory phase, eutopic endometrium does not provide the basis for a minimally invasive test of endometriosis.Endometriosis occurs in 10% of women and is currently diagnosed by invasive laparoscopic testing. We tested the hypothesis that endometrial gene expression in late secretory phase endometrium differs between patients with and without endometriosis.Ten patients with laparoscopically proven endometriosis (minimal/mild n = 5 and moderate/severe n = 5) and six controls, underwent endometrial biopsy in the late secretory phase (Day 23 onwards). Microarray interrogation of eutopic endometrial gene expression was performed.Microarray data were obtained for all control samples and eight samples from the endometriosis patients (n = 4 minimal/mild, n = 4 moderate/severe disease). Eight genes were identified as up-regulated and one gene was down-regulated in all endometriotic samples (more than 1.75-fold, P < 0.01). Real-time PCR analysis of protocadherin-17 (PCDH17), protein tyrosine phosphatase, receptor type, R (PTPRR) and interleukin-6 signal transducer (IL6ST) expression validated the microarray findings.Expression of very few transcripts differs, in late secretory eutopic endometrium, between controls and patients with endometriosis. The median fold changes of these genes are small. No transcripts were identified that could discriminate between minimal/mild and moderate/severe endometriosis. Therefore, interrogation of the late secretory endometrial transcriptome is not likely to form the basis of a minimally invasive diagnostic test for endometriosis.Estrogen and progesterone receptor expression in macrophages and regulation of hepatocyte growth factor by ovarian steroids in women with endometriosis.Information regarding macrophage-mediated regulation of hepatocyte growth factor (HGF) by ovarian steroid hormones in women with endometriosis is limited. Therefore, we investigated the regulation of HGF by steroid hormones in isolated macrophages and stromal cells derived from women with or without endometriosis.We isolated CD68 immunoreactive adherent macrophages in vitro from 46 women with endometriosis and 30 women without endometriosis. Estrogen receptor (ER) and progesterone receptor (PR) expression in macrophages was demonstrated by immunohistochemistry and RT-PCR. Production of HGF in the culture media of basal and ovarian steroid-stimulated macrophages was examined by enzyme-linked immunosorbent assay. Expression of mRNA for HGF and its receptor, c-Met in macrophages and stromal cells in response to ovarian steroid was investigated by RT-PCR. The single and combined effect of HGF and estrogen on the growth of macrophages and stromal cells was analysed by bromodeoxyuridine (BrdU) incorporation.ER and PR were expressed in isolated macrophages and intact tissue at the protein and mRNA levels. Macrophages derived from women with endometriosis produced significantly higher concentration of HGF (352.2 +/- 4.9 pg/ml) in conditioned media after treatment with estradiol (10(-8) mol/l) than that of basal macrophages (221.5 +/- 32.8 pg/ml, P<0.05) or women without endometriosis (170.6 +/- 2.6 pg/ml, P<0.05). These effects were less evident after treatment with progesterone. Treatment with tamoxifen (10(-6) mol/l) reversed the production of HGF and other macromolecules. Secretion of HGF in response to ovarian steroids was further enhanced after activation with lipopolysaccharide. The mRNA expressions of HGF and its receptor, c-Met, were also detected in macrophages and stroma in response to estrogen, suggesting an autocrine regulation. HGF mRNA expression was higher in cells of women with endometriosis than non-endometriosis women. Bromodeoxyuridine incorporation indicated that exogenous stimulation with HGF and estrogen, either alone or in combination, significantly increased the cell proliferation of both endometrial stroma and macrophages compared to that of non-endometriosis or non-treated cells.These results suggest that besides other inflammatory mediators, ovarian steroids also participate in the production of HGF by peritoneal macrophages which may be involved in the growth of endometriosis either alone or in combination with estrogen.Altered expression of a cell-cycle suppressor gene, Tob-1, in endometriotic cells by cDNA array analyses.Interleukin (IL)-1beta, a product of activated peritoneal macrophages, is a central cytokine coordinating neovascularization and monocyte chemotaxis in endometriotic implants. To evaluate the effects of this cytokine on normal endometrial stromal cells and endometriotic stromal cells we performed cDNA expression array analyses before and after exposure to IL-1beta.Nested case-control study of women with and without laparoscopic evidence of endometriosis.Reproductive endocrinology clinic at a university hospital.Endometriosis and normal endometrial biopsies from eight patients were used to prepare stromal cell cultures from which mRNA was extracted.None.Commercially available expression arrays (Atlas Human cDNA Expression Array, Clontech, representing 597 individual genes) were used to screen for mRNAs whose expression was affected by 12 hours of exposure to IL-1beta (10 ng/mL). Northern blotting and subsequent quantitative densitometric evaluation was done to confirm steady-state levels of Tob-1 mRNA transcripts.Array analyses revealed a cell-cycle regulatory gene, Tob-1, which was differentially expressed by the two cell types after incubation with IL-1beta. Tob-1 was reduced 48% in endometriotic stromal cells exposed to IL-1beta, but there was only a 16% reduction in normal endometrial stromal cells. Replicate Northern analyses (n = 4) showed that exposure to IL-1beta for 12 hours resulted in a 25% +/- 5% diminution of Tob-1 mRNA in endometriotic stromal cells. In contrast, no significant decrease (<3%) was observed in IL-1beta exposed normal endometrial stromal cells.Tob-1, a cell-cycle inhibitor gene is differentially responsive to IL-1beta in endometriotic stromal cells compared to normal endometrial stromal cells. IL-1beta down-regulated Tob-1 in endometriotic stromal cells, but had no significant effect on normal endometrial stromal cells. Our results suggest that IL-1beta promotes growth of endometriotic lesions through inhibition of Tob-1. These findings are the first to associate IL-1beta with an alteration of cell-cycle gene expression in cells derived from endometriotic implants.Relationship between apoptosis and the number of macrophages in eutopic endometrium from women with and without endometriosis.To investigate the relationship between apoptotic cells and macrophages in the eutopic endometrium of women with and without endometriosis.Retrospective analysis of archival uterine endometrial biopsy specimens.Institute for the Study and Treatment of Endometriosis, and university-based pathology and research laboratories.Fifty-one women with endometriosis and 24 healthy control subjects without endometriosis.None.The number of TUNEL+ (terminal deoxynucleotide transferase [TdT]-mediated deoxyuridine triphospate [dUTP] nick end-labeling-positive) (apoptotic) cells and CD68+ (CD68 positive) (macrophages).Apoptotic cells and macrophage numbers were positively correlated in the eutopic endometrium of women with and without endometriosis. However, the number of apoptotic cells and the macrophage content in the endometrium of women with endometriosis was significantly reduced compared with that of healthy control subjects without endometriosis. Differences between apoptosis and macrophage numbers between the two populations were observed predominantly during the early proliferative phase of the menstrual cycle.The reduction in apoptosis described for endometrial cells in women with endometriosis may be related to reduced macrophage trafficking into the eutopic endomtrium during the early-proliferative phase of the menstrual cycle.Aromatase P450 messenger RNA expression in eutopic endometrium is not a specific marker for pelvic endometriosis.To determine whether expression of aromatase P450 mRNA in eutopic endometrium is predictive of the presence of pelvic endometriosis.A prospective, multicenter, observational study.Four tertiary centers for reproductive medicine.Sixty subjects of reproductive age undergoing laparoscopy for subfertility exploration, pain assessment, or sterilization.Endometrial biopsy at time of laparoscopy.The expression of aromatase P450 mRNA in endometrial specimens was determined by single-tube reverse transcription-polymerase chain reaction (RT-PCR). Glyceraldehyde-3-phosphate dehydrogenase (GAPDH) mRNA was amplified in parallel to exclude amplification failure.The RT-PCR amplification was successful in 56 of the 60 biopsies (93%). Pelvic endometriosis was diagnosed in 34 patients (61%) and was strongly associated with aromatase P450 mRNA expression in eutopic endometrium. As a diagnostic marker for endometriosis, aromatase P450 mRNA expression yielded a sensitivity of 82%, a specificity of 59%, a positive predictive value of 76%, and a negative predictive value of 67%. If additional uterine pathology was taken in account, the sensitivity increased to 84%, the specificity to 72%, the positive predictive value to 87%, but the negative predictive value remained unchanged (67%).Although endometrial aromatase P450 gene expression is highly predictive of the presence of pelvic disease, the relative high incidence of false-negative results and lack of specificity is likely to impair clinical application.Involvement of catalase in the endometrium of patients with endometriosis and adenomyosis.To determine the distribution of catalase in eutopic and ectopic endometria in patients with endometriosis or adenomyosis.Retrospective randomized study.Department of obstetrics and gynecology in a university hospital.Thirty-three patients with endometriosis, 36 with adenomyosis, and 47 fertile controls (total, 116 women).Semiquantitative immunostaining of endometrial cells obtained by biopsy sampling, followed by calculation of an evaluation nomogram score.The score of catalase in the glandular epithelium of controls group fluctuated during the menstrual cycle; it was lowest in the early proliferative phase and peaked in the late secretory phase. In patients with endometriosis, catalase scores did not fluctuate during the cycle, and scores were high compared with controls throughout the menstrual cycle. Catalase scores did not vary in patients with adenomyosis, and scores in this group were consistently higher than those in patients with endometriosis throughout the cycle.Abnormal expression of catalase in the eutopic and ectopic endometrium strongly suggests pathologic involvement of free radicals in endometriosis and adenomyosis.Alterations in expression of endometrial endothelial nitric oxide synthase and alpha(v)beta(3) integrin in women with endometriosis.To determine the expression of endometrial endothelial nitric oxide synthase (eNOS) protein and alpha(v)beta(3) integrin in patients with and without endometriosis.Case-control cohort study.University-based tertiary care center.Endometrial biopsy samples were obtained from 9 fertile women with regular cycles and 30 infertile women with varying severity of endometriosis. Peritoneal fluid levels of nitric oxide were determined in 13 infertile women with a normal pelvis and 12 infertile women with endometriosis.Expression of eNOS and alpha(v)beta(3) integrin protein in the endometrium and peritoneal fluid levels of nitric oxide.In patients with endometriosis, expression of eNOS was significantly increased in the glandular and luminal epithelium, with no significant changes in the stroma. Peritoneal fluid levels of nitric oxide were unchanged, and expression of alpha(v)beta(3) integrin expression in glandular and luminal epithelium was significantly decreased compared with controls. A significant negative correlation was observed between luminal expression of eNOS and alpha(v)beta(3) integrin and between glandular expression of eNOS and luminal expression of alpha(v)beta(3) integrin.The nitric oxide pathway may play a role in the pathogenesis of endometriosis.Expression of aromatase and estrogen sulfotransferase in eutopic and ectopic endometrium: evidence for unbalanced estradiol production in endometriosis.Endometriosis is an estrogen-dependent gynecological disease causing pelvic pain and infertility. Impaired estrogen metabolism is thought to play a pivotal role in the pathogenesis of the disease. While there is some information on factors involved in the synthesis of E2, information on E2-deactivating enzymes is still very limited. To elucidate the intracrinology of endometriotic tissues, the authors analyze the expression of aromatase and E2-inactivating estrogen sulfotransferase (EST) in paired biopsies obtained simultaneously from the endometrium and from endometrial lesions of each of 35 patients with peritoneal or ovarian endometriosis and in cycling endometria from 33 women without endometriosis. Protein localization was demonstrated by immunohistochemistry. Aromatase expression was found in endometriotic glands in 32 of 35 cases and was elevated in comparison to corresponding uterine endometria (25 of 35 cases, P = .021, chi(2) test). The difference was even more pronounced when uterine endometria from endometriosis patients were compared with that of healthy controls (8 of 33 cases, P < .001, chi(2) test). The EST levels were essentially unchanged. The elevated expression of aromatase in eutopic and ectopic endometrium from patients with endometriosis in the presence of comparable EST provides further evidence for unopposed local biosynthesis of estrogens in endometriosis.Different basic fibroblast growth factor and fibroblast growth factor-antisense expression in eutopic endometrial stromal cells derived from women with and without endometriosis.In all species studied, the basic fibroblast growth factor (bFGF) gene is transcribed into multiple mRNAs, one of which is an antisense RNA (1B FGF-AS) probably involved in regulating the stability of the sense transcript. In this study we investigated whether the regulatory mechanisms of bFGF expression might be altered in endometrial stromal cells derived from women with endometriosis. bFGF and 1B FGF-AS mRNA levels were quantified in primary cultures of eutopic endometrial stromal cells derived from 29 women without endometriosis and 24 patients affected by the disease. When the data were analyzed according to the phase of the menstrual cycle, endometrial stromal cells derived from patients in the late proliferative phase showed significantly higher bFGF mRNA values and significantly lower 1B FGF-AS mRNA levels compared with control samples. Furthermore, the mean bFGF/1B FGF-AS mRNA ratio was significantly higher in endometrial stromal cells derived from patients compared with that in controls (mean +/- SEM, 2.31 +/- 0,55 and 0.77 +/- 0.14, respectively; P = 0.009). Moreover, for bFGF expression the differences existing at the mRNA level were maintained at the protein level. These findings support the hypothesis that 1B FGF-AS mRNA could regulate the expression of the sense transcript and suggest that in endometrial cells derived from patients, the presence of higher bFGF levels could improve their ability to proliferate at the ectopic site.Vascular endothelial growth factor A and C gene expression in endometriosis.Angiogenesis is essential for the pathogenesis of endometriosis. Gene expression levels of vascular endothelial growth factor (VEGF) A and C in 10 eutopic endometrial, 23 normal peritoneal, and 62 endometriotic tissues surgically obtained from 47 women with endometriosis (group 2) were compared with those in 12 control eutopic endometrial and 9 normal peritoneal tissues from 15 women without endometriosis (group 1). VEGF-A mRNA expression levels in eutopic endometrium of group 2 were higher than those of group 1 throughout the menstrual cycle (P <0.01) and increased in the secretory phase. VEGF-A gene expression in peritoneal endometriotic lesion was statistically higher than that in normal peritoneum (P <0.01) and similar to that in eutopic endometrium of group 2. In contrast, gene expression levels of VEGF-C were relatively lower than those of VEGF-A in each lesion, and no cyclic variation was found. VEGF-A and C mRNA expression levels were significantly higher in ovarian endometriomas >6 cm in size than in those <6 cm in size. Immunohistochemical expression of VEGF-A and C was detected in the cytoplasm of glandular epithelial and stromal cells of ovarian endometrioma. These results suggest that endometriosis may arise from eutopic endometrium with higher levels of angiogenic activity possibly induced by VEGF-A in women with endometriosis. Moreover, VEGF-C as well as VEGF-A may be involved in the pathogenesis of ovarian endometrioma.[Application of two dimensional electrophoresis,western blot and mass spectrum to screen markers of endometriosis].To find out markers of endometriosis.The two dimensional gel images of proteins extracted from eutopic endometrium from endometriosis patients and controls were analyzed by software Phoretix 2D,and the proteins expressed differently were identified primarily by query of data base. The proteins extracted from ectopic endometrium of ovarian endometriosis were transferred from two dimensional gel onto nitrocellulose membranes, followed by incubation with sera from women with and without endometriosis. Analyzed by MALDI-TOF-MS, the proteins hybridized differently were identified through their Peptide Mass Footprints.Having compared the reproducible two dimensional gel images of proteins from eutopic endometrium of women with and without endometriosis,we obtained 11 proteins expressed differently. Through Western Blot technique,we found three proteins hybridized differently which were identified as vimentin, beta-actin and ATP synthase beta subunit respectively.The protein expression spectra of eutopic endometrium from patients with endometriosis are significantly different from those of the controls, and the anti-endometrial autoantibodies against vimentin, beta-actin and ATP synthase beta subunit may be induced.In vitro effects of a small-molecule antagonist of the Tcf/ß-catenin complex on endometrial and endometriotic cells of patients with endometriosis.Our previous studies suggested that aberrant activation of Wnt/ß-catenin signaling might be involved in the pathophysiology of endometriosis. We hypothesized that inhibition of Wnt/ß-catenin signaling might result in inhibition of cell proliferation, migration, and/or invasion of endometrial and endometriotic epithelial and stromal cells of patients with endometriosis.The aim of the present study was to evaluate the effects of a small-molecule antagonist of the Tcf/ß-catenin complex (PKF 115-584) on cell proliferation, migration, and invasion of endometrial and endometriotic epithelial and stromal cells.One hundred twenty-six patients (78 with and 48 without endometriosis) with normal menstrual cycles were recruited. In vitro effects of PKF 115-584 on cell proliferation, migration, and invasion and on the Tcf/ß-catenin target genes were evaluated in endometrial epithelial and stromal cells of patients with and without endometriosis, and in endometrial and endometriotic epithelial and stromal cells of the same patients.The inhibitory effects of PKF 115-584 on cell migration and invasion in endometrial epithelial and stromal cells of patients with endometriosis prepared from the menstrual phase were significantly higher than those of patients without endometriosis. Levels of total and active forms of MMP-9 were significantly higher in epithelial and stromal cells prepared from menstrual endometrium in patients with endometriosis compared to patients without endometriosis. Treatment with PKF 115-584 inhibited MMP-9 activity to undetectable levels in both menstrual endometrial epithelial and stromal cells of patients with endometriosis. The number of invasive cells was significantly higher in epithelial and stromal cells of endometriotic tissue compared with matched eutopic endometrium of the same patients. Treatment with PKF 115-584 decreased the number of invasive endometriotic epithelial cells by 73% and stromal cells by 75%.The present findings demonstrated that cellular mechanisms known to be involved in endometriotic lesion development are inhibited by targeting the Wnt/β-catenin pathway.Expression of the epidermal growth factor system in eutopic endometrium from women with endometriosis differs from that in endometrium from healthy women.The epidermal growth factor (EGF) system comprises four receptors, HER1-4, and several ligands, and is cyclically expressed in endometrium from healthy fertile women. Our aim is to identify differences in expression of the EGF system between endometriotic and normal endometrium.We previously examined the EGF system in endometrial samples from healthy women (n = 14). Here we examine samples from endometrium (n = 23), endometriomas (n = 10) and peritoneal endometriosis (n = 9) from women with endometriosis (n = 23). mRNA expression of receptors and ligands from the EGF system was analyzed by real-time PCR, and proteins were localized by immunohistochemistry.Endometrial mRNA for HER1-3 was high compared with our previous findings in healthy endometrium, whereas HER4 and the ligands were unchanged. Endometriomas show lower expression of HER1-3 and no HER4 expression. Significant differences were demonstrated in late secretory phase for HER1 and HER2 and in the proliferative phase for HER3 compared to healthy women. Immunohistochemically, HER2 was identified in all samples, predominately in glands and surface epithelium. In a few glands, HER2 was in both cytoplasm and cell membrane.We report quantitative and qualitative differences in the EGF system in endometriotic eutopic endometrium compared to endometrium from healthy individuals.Expression of cyclooxygenase-2 in eutopic endometrium and ovarian endometriotic tissue in women with severe endometriosis.The purpose of this study is to evaluate the level and pattern of cyclooxygenase-2 (Cox-2) expression in endometriosis and to investigate the correlation between the expression of Cox-2 and several clinicosurgical parameters.Twenty-six patients with endometriosis and 21 patients with other benign gynecological conditions were enrolled. The eutopic endometrium was sampled by pipelle, and fragments of ovarian endometrioma and non-endometriotic ovarian cysts were sampled during surgery. Total RNA isolation and semiquantitative reverse transcriptase polymerase chain reaction was performed.The expression of Cox-2 mRNA (mean +/- SEM) in eutopic endometrium and ovarian endometriotic tissue significantly increased in patients with endometriosis compared with the controls. The expression of Cox-2 increased significantly in the proliferative phase in eutopic endometrium and in the secretory phase in ovarian endometriotic tissue of patients with endometriosis compared with the controls. Cox-2 mRNA expression in the endometrium and ovarian lesions significantly correlated with serum CA-125 and the diameter of the endometrioma.Cox-2 expression increased in the eutopic endometrium and ovarian endometriotic tissue of the patients with endometriosis. These findings indicate that Cox-2 may be involved in the pathogenesis and progression of endometriosis.MicroRNA23a and microRNA23b deregulation derepresses SF-1 and upregulates estrogen signaling in ovarian endometriosis.Steroidogenic factor (SF)-1 and its downstream target genes involved in estrogen signaling are aberrantly expressed in ovarian endometriosis.Our objective was to explore the microRNA-mediated mechanism controlling aberrant SF-1 expression in ovarian endometriosis.Bioinformatics analysis predicted that microRNA23a and microRNA23b (miR23a/b) target the NR5A1 3'-untranslated region. We investigated the relative expression and spatial distribution of miR23a/b and analyzed the relationship between miR23a/b and SF-1 expression in endometriotic tissues.The study was conducted at the Department of Gynecology and Obstetrics, West China Second University Hospital of Sichuan University.We enrolled 23 women with American Fertility Society stage III-IV ovarian endometriosis and 15 disease-free control subjects.Quantitative real-time RT-PCR, in situ hybridization, cell culture, transfections, and luciferase reporter assays were used in this study.The expression of miR23a/b and SF-1, CYP19A1, and StAR mRNAs; the relationships between miRNAs and SF-1 mRNA levels; and the effect of miR23a/b on SF-1 expression were measured in normal and eutopic endometrial stromal cells (ESCs) and 293T cells.Both miR23a and miR23b were downregulated in ectopic and eutopic endometrium, compared with normal endometrium, and their expression was inversely correlated with NR5A1 mRNA levels. SF-1 expression was inhibited by miR23a/b overexpression in eutopic ESCs and upregulated by miR23a/b inhibition in normal ESCs.MiR23a and miR23b are potential biomarkers of ovarian endometriosis. This study provides a novel approach for targeting the mechanisms controlling aberrant local estrogen biosynthesis in endometriosis.Altered expression of activin, cripto, and follistatin in the endometrium of women with endometrioma.To evaluate the expression pattern of activin A, activin receptors, and activin modulators messenger RNA (mRNA) in the eutopic endometrium of patients with endometriosis at different phases of the menstrual cycle and to evaluate the mRNA expression of the same proteins in endometriomas during the menstrual cycle.Prospective study.University hospital.Women with and without endometriosis.Samples of endometrial and endometriotic tissue from women with endometrioma (n=48), and endometrial samples from women without endometriosis (controls) (n=48).Quantification of activin A, activin B, activin receptor II, nodal, cripto, inhibin α, and follistatin expression by real-time reverse-transcriptase polymerase chain reaction (RT-PCR).The eutopic endometrium of patients with endometriosis showed [1] higher activin A mRNA expression in the proliferative phase and a lack of late secretory phase peak, [2] a lack of endometrial cycle-related variations of cripto and inhibin α mRNA expression, and [3] an inverse expression pattern of follistatin mRNA. Endometriomas showed similar variations in the expression of activin-related protein mRNA during the menstrual cycle as eutopic endometrium.The disturbed expression of endometrial activin A, cripto (activin receptor antagonist), and follistatin (activin-binding protein) suggests a dysfunction of the activin pathway in endometriosis. Endometriomas showed similar changes of activin-related proteins during the menstrual cycle, which supports a common biology for eutopic and ectopic endometrium in endometriosis.CRISPLD2 is a target of progesterone receptor and its expression is decreased in women with endometriosis.Endometriosis, defined as the presence of endometrial cells outside of the uterine cavity, is a major cause of infertility and pelvic pain, afflicting more than 10% of reproductive age women. Endometriosis is a chronic inflammatory disease and lipopolysaccharide promotes the proliferation and invasion of endometriotic stromal cells. Cysteine-rich secretory protein LCCL domain-containing 2 (CRISPLD2) has high affinity for lipopolysaccharide and plays a critical role in defense against endotoxin shock. However, the function of CRISPLD2 has not been studied in endometriosis and uterine biology. Herein, we examined the expression of CRISPLD2 in endometrium from patients with and without endometriosis using immunohistochemistry. The expression of CRISPLD2 was higher in the secretory phase in human menstrual cycle compared to proliferative phase. The expression of CRISPLD2 was significantly decreased in the endometrium of women with endometriosis in the early secretory phase compared to women without endometriosis. The increase of CRISPLD2 expression at the early secretory and dysregulation of its expression in endometriosis suggest progesterone (P4) regulation of CRISPLD2. To investigate whether CRISPLD2 is regulated by P4, we examined the expression of the CRISPLD2 in the uteri of wild-type and progesterone receptor knock out (PRKO) mice. The expression of CRISPLD2 was significantly increased after P4 treatment in the wild-type mice. However, CRISPLD2 expression was significantly decreased in the (PRKO) mice treated with P4. During early pregnancy, the expression of CRISPLD2 was increased in decidua of implantation and post-implantation stages. CRISPLD2 levels were also increased in cultured human endometrial stromal cells during in vitro decidualization. These results suggest that the CRISPLD2 is a target of the progesterone receptor and may play an important role in pathogenesis of endometriosis. Identification and quantification of dopamine receptor 2 in human eutopic and ectopic endometrium: a novel molecular target for endometriosis therapy.Previous studies in an experimental mouse model of endometriosis have shown that the dopamine agonist (DA) cabergoline (Cb2) reduces angiogenesis and endometriotic lesions, hypothetically binding to the dopamine receptor type-2 (DRD2). To date, this has not been described in human endometrium and/or endometriotic lesions. Thus, we aimed to investigate the presence of DRD2 in said tissues. Endometrium fragments were implanted in nude mice treated with different doses of Cb2. Polymerase chain reaction assays and immunohistochemistry were performed to analyze the gene and protein expressions (respectively) of DRD2, VEGF, and VEGF receptor-2 (KDR). In addition, lesions and endometrium from women with mild and severe endometriosis and endometrium from healthy women were collected to analyze their gene expression profile. In experimental endometriosis, DRD2 was expressed at gene and protein levels in all three groups. VEGF gene and protein expressions were significantly lower in lesions treated with Cb2 than in controls. KDR protein expression was significantly lower in experimental lesions treated with Cb2 than in controls. In eutopic endometria, there was a significant decrease in DRD2 expression and an increase in VEGF in women with mild and severe endometriosis with respect to healthy patients. In endometriosis, KDR expression was significantly higher in red than in white and black lesions. VEGF expression was significantly lower in black than in red lesions. DRD2 is present in the human eutopic and ectopic endometrium and is regulated by DA, which provides the rationale for pilot studies to explore its use in the treatment of endometriosis.[Semiquantitative analysis of mRNA aromatase expression in eutopic endometrium as a diagnostic marker of endometriosis and estrogen dependent diseases].To determine clinical benefits of mRNA aromatase expression in entopic endometrium as a diagnostic marker of endometriosis.Prospective clinical trial.Department of Obstetrics and Gynaecology of Jessenius Medical Faculty and Faculty Hospital, Martin.The expression of mRNA aromatase of eutopic endometrium was determined among women who underwent laparoscopy or laparotomy due to pelvic pain, infertility or benign pelvic tumor. Endometriosis was confirmed histologicaly and classified by rAFS.On the basis of entering criteria 23 women were enrolled in this study and divided into two subgroups: 12 endometriotic and 11 without endometriosis. Sensitivity of aromatase expression was 75% and specificity 54.5% at the cut-off value of at least minimal aromatase activity. By the presence of estrogen-dependent diseases- endometriosis, myomas or endometrial hyperplasia 18 women were compared to 5 disease free women. In this case, sensitivity of aromatase expression was 72.2 and specificity 80%.Aromatase expression in eutopic endometrium is a good diagnostic marker for endometriosis.Expression of vascular endothelial growth factor and thrombospondin-1 mRNA in patients with endometriosis.To investigate the expression of vascular endothelial growth factor (VEGF) mRNA and thrombospondin-1 (TSP-1) mRNA in endometriosis.Molecular studies in human tissue.Department of Obstetrics and Gynecology, Peking Union Medical College Hospital, Peking Union Medical College, Chinese Academy of Medical Sciences, Beijing, P. R. China.Patients undergoing laparoscopy for infertility or other benign gynecologic conditions.Biopsies were taken from endometriotic lesions (red peritoneal lesion, ovarian endometrioma, and unterosacral ligament nudule) and eutopic endometrium during laparoscopy.mRNA expression from endometriotic lesion and eutopic endometrium was analyzed by reverse transcriptase polymerase chain reaction (PCR) and Northern blotting.Among the endometriotic lesions, red peritoneal lesions expressed higher levels of VEGF mRNA and lower levels of TSP-1 mRNA, whereas ovarian endometrioma expressed lower levels of VEGF mRNA and higher levels of TSP-1 mRNA. Eutopic endometrium of women with endometriosis had higher expression levels of VEGF mRNA and lower expression levels of TSP-1 mRNA than that of women without endometriosis.The expression of VEGF and TSP-1 in endometriotic lesions appears to be associated with the extent of their neovascularization. The imbalance in expression of VEGF and TSP-1 in the endometrium may play a role in the development of endometriosis.Immunohistochemical analysis of estrogen and progesterone receptors in endometriosis: comparison with normal endometrium during the menstrual cycle and the effect of medical therapy.Estrogen receptors (ER) and progesterone receptors (PgR) in 19 endometriotic implants from 16 normally cycling and hormonally treated women were measured using immunohistochemical techniques and compared with 34 samples of normal intrauterine endometrium. Endometriotic implants contained specific ER and PgR in both glandular epithelium and stroma. In contrast to intrauterine endometrium, receptor content among implants was noted to be more heterogeneous, and did not undergo predictable changes in response to endogenous hormones. In the endometriotic implants of patients treated with hormonal therapy, there were significant decreases in ER and PgR in both the glands and stroma relative to untreated patients. These data imply that endometriosis is unpredictable in its response to the cyclic hormonal milieu in terms of ER and PgR, but retains the ability to respond to hormonal suppression over a prolonged interval.Stromal cells from endometriotic lesions and endometrium from women with endometriosis have reduced decidualization capacity.To evaluate the phenotype, proliferative, and differentiation capacities in vitro of stromal cells derived from peritoneal, ovarian, and deeply infiltrating endometriosis.Experimental study using phase contrast microscopy, immunocytochemistry, and functional bioassays.University-based laboratory.Women with and without endometriosis undergoing surgery for benign indications.None.The stability in vitro of stromal cells derived from peritoneal (n = 18), ovarian (n = 29), and deeply infiltrating (n = 14) endometriotic lesions, as well as endometrium from women with (n = 5) and without endometriosis (n = 5) was evaluated by detection of endometrial markers. The proliferative and differentiation capacity of the cells was assessed by the use of cell doubling estimation and in vitro decidualization assays.The expression of the progesterone receptor and CD10 in stromal cells derived from the three types of endometriotic lesions is retained in culture up to passage 10. The doubling time of stromal cells from deeply infiltrating lesions is lower than that of endometrial stromal cells. Levels of prolactin and insulin-like growth factor binding protein-1 (IGFBP-1) are reduced in supernatants from stromal cells derived from the three types of lesions and from the endometrium of women with endometriosis.The peritoneal, ovarian, and deeply infiltrating endometriotic stromal cell lines we describe retain in vivo tissue markers. Loss of differentiation capacity of the endometriotic cell lines and endometrial cells from women with endometriosis may influence the capacity for proliferation and survival of these cells in the ectopic environment.A defective expression of ICAM-1 (CD54) on secretory endometrial cells is associated with endometriosis.A defect in the cytolytic activity against autologous endometrial cells refluxed in the peritoneal cavity has been hypothesized as being involved in the etiology of endometriosis, although its causes have not been definitively identified. Cell adhesion molecules are necessary not only for cell-to-cell contact but also for the binding of immune effectors to their targets. In this study, the expression of CD54, CD58 and CD106, three adhesion molecules with a crucial role in cytotoxic mechanisms, was quantitatively studied on fresh endometrial cells by immunofluorescence and flow cytometry. Samples were collected from endometriosis patients (n=10) and controls (n=12), either during the follicular or luteal phase of the cycle. While no significant differences were observed for CD58 and CD106, a significantly reduced expression of CD54 in the secretory endometrial cells of women with endometriosis was observed (-75% with respect to apparently healthy controls). These findings could account for an apparently cyclic defect in the expression of CD54 that could result in poor binding of immune effectors to secretory endometrial cells in vivo. The defective recognition and removal of refluxed endometrial cells could, at least in part, be involved in the pathogenesis of endometriosis.Glycodelin expression in the endometrium of healthy women and in the eutopic and ectopic endometrium of women with endometriosis.To analyze the expression of the glycodelin gene to better understand the molecular environment of endometriotic lesions and to elucidate the potential mechanisms that underlie the complex physiopathology of endometriosis.Prospective laboratory study.University hospital.Eleven healthy fertile women and 17 patients with endometriosis in the early proliferative phase of the menstrual cycle.Endometrial biopsy specimens were obtained from the endometrium of healthy women without endometriosis (controls) and from eutopic and ectopic endometrium tissues (pelvic and ovarian endometriotic implants) of endometriosis patients.The glycodelin relative expression level by real-time polymerase chain reaction (PCR) analysis.The glycodelin down-regulation found in the endometriotic lesions was 332.26 and 123.17-fold lower, respectively, when compared with the eutopic tissue and the control endometrium.Glycodelin may be one of the molecules that contributes to the loss of cellular homeostasis in endometriotic lesions.Endometrial leukocyte subpopulations in women with endometriosis.The aim of this study was to investigate whether the endometrium of women with endometriosis differs immunologically from the endometrium of normal fertile women. Endometrial biopsies were obtained from 18 normal fertile women who were requesting sterilisation or reversal of sterilisation and 21 infertile women who had laparoscopically diagnosed pelvic endometriosis. The endometrial biopsies were obtained from both groups during the either early, mid or late luteal phase of the menstrual cycle. A panel of 11 monoclonal antibodies and immuno-histochemical techniques were employed to characterise the endometrial stromal leukocytes in frozen sections. Image analysis was used for semi quantitation of leukocytes. In both groups, the number of endometrial granulated lymphocytes (CD56+ CD38+ cells) and macrophages (CD68+ cells) increased significantly between the early and late luteal phase of the menstrual cycle. Compared with fertile controls, women with endometriosis had fewer T-suppressor/cytotoxic (CD8+) cells and endometrial granulated lymphocytes but more T-helper/inducer (CD4+) cells, CD68+ cells and CD16+ cells. None of these differences reached a statistically significant level. This study has shown that the endometrial lymphoid tissue of women with endometriosis does not differ qualitatively or quantitively from that of normal fertile controls. However, functional differences of endometrial leukocytes between the two groups cannot be excluded.Proliferative activity of microvessels and angiogenesis in eutopic endometrium in patients with peritoneal endometriosis.Comparative analysis of the density of microvessels and angiogenic activity in eutopic endometrium during different phases of the menstrual cycle in patients with peritoneal endometriosis showed that peritoneal form of endometriosis is a paracrine disease with dysregulation of angiogenesis processes in the eutopic endometrium. Excessive angiogenesis in this condition promotes implantation of eutopic endometrium on the peritoneum. Angiogenesis in eutopic endometrium can be maintained due to high concentrations of vascular endothelial growth factor A in the peritoneal fluid.Integrins alpha 3 and alpha 6 are differentially expressed in endometrium and endometriosis.The expression of integrin subunits has been investigated in the stroma and epithelium of eutopic and ectopic endometrial tissues, using immunohistochemistry and fluorescently activated cell-sorting techniques. Integrin subunits exhibited tissue-specific expression in both eutopic and ectopic endometrium. Integrin alpha 3 subunit was up-regulated in ectopic endometrium compared with the eutopic counterpart, whereas alpha 6 integrin subunit was down-regulated in the ectopic tissues. Cycle stage-dependent expression of alpha v and beta 3, observed in eutopic endometrium, was absent in the ectopic counterpart. It is concluded that the development and regeneration of the endometrium involve complex integrin-ligand interactions and that regulation of specific adhesive events is lost in endometriosis.Caldesmon: new insights for diagnosing endometriosis.Considerable effort has been invested in searching for less invasive methods of diagnosing endometriosis. Previous studies have indicated altered levels of the CALD1 gene (encoding the protein caldesmon) in endometriosis. The aims of our study were to investigate whether average CALD1 expression and caldesmon protein levels are differentially altered in the endometrium and endometriotic lesions and to evaluate the performance of the CALD1 gene and caldesmon protein as potential biomarkers for endometriosis. Paired biopsies of endometrial tissue (eutopic endometrium) and endometriotic lesions (ectopic endometrium) were obtained from patients with endometriosis to evaluate CALD1 gene expression and caldesmon protein levels by real-time PCR and Western blot analysis, respectively. In addition, immunostaining for caldesmon to determine cellular localization was also performed. Endometrium from women without endometriosis was used as a control. Increased CALD1 expression and caldesmon levels were detected in the endometriotic lesions. The electrophoretic profile of caldesmon by Western blot analysis was clearly different between the control group (endometrium of women without endometriosis) and the group of women with endometriosis (eutopic endometrium and endometriotic lesions). Caldesmon expression as determined by immunostaining showed no variation among the cell types in endometriotic lesions and eutopic endometrium. Stromal cells marked positively in eutopic endometrium from control patients and in the endometriotic lesions. The presence of caldesmon in the endometrium of patients with and without endometriosis permitted diagnoses with 95% sensitivity (specificity 100%) and 100% sensitivity (specificity 100%) for the disease and for minimal to mild endometriosis in the proliferative phase of the menstrual cycle, respectively. In the secretory phase, minimal to mild endometriosis was detected with 90% sensitivity and 93.3% specificity. Caldesmon is a possible predictor of endometrial dysregulation in patients with endometriosis. A potential limitation of our study is the fact that other endometrial diseases were not excluded, and therefore prospective studies are needed to confirm the potential of caldesmon as a biomarker exclusively for endometriosis.MicroRNAs expression profiling of eutopic proliferative endometrium in women with ovarian endometriosis.The eutopic endometrium of women with endometriosis, compared with disease-free individuals, contains certain molecular alterations, including the differential expression of microRNA (miRNA). The aim of the study was to compare the expression of the most relevant miRNAs in the eutopic endometrium of women with and without ovarian endometriosis.A total of 46 regularly menstruating patients, 21 patients with ovarian endometriosis and 25 controls, underwent surgery in the proliferative phase of the cycle. The eutopic endometrium was collected through aspirating biopsy prior to laparoscopy. Only patients with advanced (stage III and IV) histopathologically confirmed ovarian endometriosis were included. TaqMan MicroRNA Array Cards were applied to examine the expression of 667 human miRNAs in 10 patients with endometriosis and 10 controls. Custom-made, low-density real-time PCR arrays were used to confirm the expression of 15 selected molecules in 21 endometriosis patients and 25 disease-free individuals.Of 667 miRNAs, 2 were highly likely to be upregulated and 13 were downregulated in the eutopic endometrium of patients with endometriosis compared with the controls. Validation using real-time PCR showed that hsa-miR-483-5p (p = 0.012) and hsa-miR-629* (p = 0.02) are significantly downregulated in patients with endometriosis.Changes in the expression of select miRNAs might lead to or be a consequence of an early defect in the physiological activity of the proliferative endometrium, ultimately resulting in the overgrowth of this tissue outside the uterus.Expression profiling of endometrium from women with endometriosis reveals candidate genes for disease-based implantation failure and infertility.Endometriosis is clinically associated with pelvic pain and infertility, with implantation failure strongly suggested as an underlying cause for the observed infertility. Eutopic endometrium of women with endometriosis provides a unique experimental paradigm for investigation into molecular mechanisms of reproductive dysfunction and an opportunity to identify specific markers for this disease. We applied paralleled gene expression profiling using high-density oligonucleotide microarrays to investigate differentially regulated genes in endometrium from women with vs. without endometriosis. Fifteen endometrial biopsy samples (obtained during the window of implantation from eight subjects with and seven subjects without endometriosis) were processed for expression profiling on Affymetrix Hu95A microarrays. Data analysis was conducted with GeneChip Analysis Suite, version 4.01, and GeneSpring version 4.0.4. Nonparametric testing was applied, using a P value of 0.05, to assess statistical significance. Of the 12,686 genes analyzed, 91 genes were significantly increased more than 2-fold in their expression, and 115 genes were decreased more than 2-fold. Unsupervised clustering demonstrated down-regulation of several known cell adhesion molecules, endometrial epithelial secreted proteins, and proteins not previously known to be involved in the pathogenesis of endometriosis, as well as up-regulated genes. Selected dysregulated genes were randomly chosen and validated with RT-PCR and/or Northern/dot-blot analyses, and confirmed up-regulation of collagen alpha2 type I, 2.6-fold; bile salt export pump, 2.0-fold; and down-regulation of N-acetylglucosamine-6-O-sulfotransferase (important in synthesis of L-selectin ligands), 1.7-fold; glycodelin, 51.5-fold; integrin alpha2, 1.8-fold; and B61 (Ephrin A1), 4.5-fold. Two-way overlapping layer analysis used to compare endometrial genes in the window of implantation from women with and without endometriosis further identified three unique groups of target genes, which differ with respect to the implantation window and the presence of disease. Group 1 target genes are up-regulated during the normal window of implantation but significantly decreased in women with endometriosis: IL-15, proline-rich protein, B61, Dickkopf-1, glycodelin, N-acetylglucosamine-6-O-sulfotransferase, G0S2 protein, and purine nucleoside phosphorylase. Group 2 genes are normally down-regulated during the window of implantation but are significantly increased with endometriosis: semaphorin E, neuronal olfactomedin-related endoplasmic reticulum localized protein mRNA and Sam68-like phosphotyrosine protein alpha. Group 3 consists of a single gene, neuronal pentraxin II, normally down-regulated during the window of implantation and further decreased in endometrium from women with endometriosis. The data support dysregulation of select genes leading to an inhospitable environment for implantation, including genes involved in embryonic attachment, embryo toxicity, immune dysfunction, and apoptotic responses, as well as genes likely contributing to the pathogenesis of endometriosis, including aromatase, progesterone receptor, angiogenic factors, and others. Identification and validation of selected genes and their functions will contribute to uncovering previously unknown mechanism(s) underlying implantation failure in women with endometriosis and infertility, mechanisms underlying the pathogenesis of endometriosis and providing potential new targets for diagnostic screening and intervention.Identification of local angiogenic and inflammatory markers in the menstrual blood of women with endometriosis.The aim of this study was to evaluate the presence of myeloperoxidase (MPO), N-acetyl-β-D-glucosaminidase (NAG), tumor necrosis factor alpha (TNF-α) and vascular endothelial growth factor (VEGF) in peripheral and menstrual blood in women with (n=10) and without (n=7) endometriosis. NAG and MPO activities were evaluated by enzymatic methods, whereas TNF-α and VEGF by immunoassay. No significant differences were found for these markers, neither in menstrual nor in peripheral blood between groups. Menstrual blood NAG (P=0.039) and MPO (P=0.0117) activities in the endometriosis group were significantly higher than in peripheral blood. NAG and MPO presented positive linear correlation in peripheral (P=0.07; r=0.641) and menstrual blood (P=0.01; r=0.603). These findings point to the existence of an increased local inflammatory activity in women with endometriosis. Interleukin-6- and tumour necrosis factor alpha-mediated expression of hepatocyte growth factor by stromal cells and its involvement in the growth of endometriosis.We investigated the expression of the hepatocyte growth factor (HGF) gene and protein by the stromal cells derived from women with or without endometriosis and its regulation by interleukin-6 (IL-6) and tumour necrosis factor alpha (TNFalpha).Stromal cells immunoreactive to vimentin were isolated from the eutopic and ectopic endometrium of 18 infertile women with endometriosis and 12 women without endometriosis. The production of HGF in the culture media of basal and IL-6- or TNFalpha-stimulated stromal cells was examined with an enzyme-linked immunosorbent assay. The mRNA expression of HGF and its receptor c-Met in the stroma was investigated by RT-PCR. The localization of HGF and c-Met in isolated stromal cells and in intact tissue was examined by immunohistochemistry. The effect of HGF on the growth of stromal cells alone or in combination with IL-6 or TNFalpha was examined in a bromodeoxyuridine (BrdU) incorporation study.The production of HGF in the culture medium of stromal cells was significantly increased after single or combined treatment with either IL-6 or TNFalpha when compared with non-treated cells. The production of HGF by stromal cells derived from the eutopic endometrium of women with endometriosis was significantly higher than that of cells from women without endometriosis. This effect was paralleled by increased expression of HGF and c-Met mRNA, as demonstrated by RT-PCR. The BrdU incorporation study indicated that the addition of HGF enhanced the growth of endometrial and endometriotic stroma alone or in combination with IL-6 or TNFalpha.IL-6 and TNFalpha are involved in the production of HGF by endometrial stromal cells and may be involved in the growth of endometriosis by an autocrine mechanism.Endometrial osteopontin mRNA expression and plasma osteopontin levels are increased in patients with endometriosis.The aim of this study was to evaluate osteopontin (OPN) mRNA expression in eutopic endometrium and plasma OPN levels in patients with endometriosis.A total of 79 patients with histologically confirmed endometriosis and 43 patients without endometriosis participated in this study. OPN mRNA expression in endometrial tissues was measured by real-time quantitative polymerase chain reaction (PCR) and plasma concentrations of OPN were quantified using a specific commercial sandwich enzyme-linked immunosorbent assays (ELISA).Osteopontin mRNA expression in endometrial tissue was significantly higher in women with endometriosis than in controls (P = 0.010). The mean plasma levels of OPN (mean +/- S.E.M.) in patients with endometriosis and controls were 407.31 +/- 37.80 ng/mL and 165.84 +/- 19.29 ng/mL, respectively (P < 0.001). Receiver operating characteristic (ROC) analysis for plasma OPN revealed an area under the curve (AUC) of 0.894, with a sensitivity of 93.0%, specificity of 72.4%, positive likelihood ratio of 3.37, and negative likelihood ratio of 0.1 using a cut-off value of 167.68 ng/mL.Osteopontin may be involved in the pathogenesis of endometriosis and plasma OPN may be a useful non-invasive marker for the diagnosis of endometriosis.Identification of biomarkers for endometriosis in eutopic endometrial cells from patients with endometriosis using a proteomics approach.Endometriosis is a gynecological disease defined as the presence of endometrial tissue outside the uterine cavity, which is caused by various factors. Proteomic analysis of two sets of eutopic endometrial cells collected from the menstrual blood of females with (n=6; n=3) or without (n=6; n=3) endometriosis was performed to identify novel potential biomarkers for endometriosis. The data revealed that samples from endometriosis patients had stem cell characteristics, as they had higher mRNA expression levels of octamer-binding transcription factor 4 (Oct-4), C-X-C chemokine receptor type 4 (CXCR4), SRY-box containing gene 2 (SOX2) and mesenchymal-epithelial transition factor (MET) compared with that of the normal controls. Three proteins, collapsin response mediator protein 2 (CRMP2), ubiquitin carboxyl-terminal hydrolase isozyme L1 (UCH-L1) and myosin regulatory light polypeptide 9 (MYL9), were simultaneously identified from the two sets of samples from females with or without endometriosis by two-dimensional electrophoresis (2-DE). A difference in CRMP2 expression was confirmed with western blotting. Taken together, the results suggest that CRMP2 plays a role in the pathogenesis of endometriosis.[Expressions of matrix metalloproteinase-9 and tissue inhibitor of metalloproteinase-1 in ectopic and eutopic endometrium].To study the expression of matrix metalloproteinase-9(MMP-9) and tissue inhibitor of metalloproteinase-1 (TIMP-1) in ectopic and eutopic endometrium in patients with endometriosis.The expressions of MMP-9 and TIMP-1 in ectopic and eutopic endometrium were detected by immunohistochemistry streptavidin-biotin peroxidase (SP) method in 45 patients with endometriosis (study group) and in 32 patients with uterine fibroid (control group).In the ectopic and eutopic endometrium of group and in the control group endometrium, the expression of MMP-9 was respectively 0.381, 0.336 and 0.276; the expression of TIMP-1 was respectively 0.239, 0.253, 0.267. As a result, the ratio of MMP-9/TIMP-1 in ectopic and eutopic endometrium of study group and in the control group endometrium was respectively 1.594, 1.293, 1.034. The difference of MMP-9, MMP-9/TIMP-1 in ectopic and eutopic and the control group endometrium was markedly significant (P < 0.01 or P < 0.05). The difference of the expression of TIMP-1 between ectopic and the control group endometrium was also markedly significant (P < 0.01). Higher expression of MMP-9 and lower expression of TIMP-1 in ectopic endometrium and higher expression of MMP-9 in eutopic endometrium occurred in the whole menses period, in which higher expression of MMP-9 in ectopic endometrium than in eutopic endometrium only took place in proliferative phase.The change of expression of MMP-9 and TIMP-1 in ectopic endometrium may be related to the pathogenesis of endometriosis.High density of small nerve fibres in the functional layer of the endometrium in women with endometriosis.Endometriosis is a common gynaecological disease and is frequently associated with recurrent and serious pelvic pain such as dysmenorrhoea and dyspareunia, but the mechanisms by which these symptoms are generated are not well understood.Histological sections of endometrial tissue were prepared from endometrial curettings and hysterectomies performed on women with endometriosis (n=25 and n=10, respectively) and without endometriosis (n=47 and n=35, respectively). These were stained immunohistochemically for the highly specific polyclonal rabbit anti-protein gene product 9.5 (PGP9.5) and monoclonal mouse anti-neurofilament protein (NF) to demonstrate both myelinated and unmyelinated nerve fibres.Small nerve fibres were identified throughout the basal and functional layers of the endometrium in all endometriosis patients, but were not seen in the functional layer of the endometrium in any of the women without endometriosis (P<0.001). NF-immunoreactive nerve fibres were present in the basal layer in all endometriosis patients but not in non-endometriosis patients, with one exception (P<0.001).Small nerve fibres detected in the functional layer in all women with endometriosis may have important implications for understanding the generation of pain in these patients. The presence of nerve fibres in an endometrial biopsy may be a novel surrogate marker of clinical endometriosis.The expression profile of micro-RNA in endometrium and endometriosis and the influence of ovarian steroids on their expression.MicroRNAs (miRNAs), through mRNA degradation or repression, act as key regulator of gene expression. Our aim was to identify specific miRNAs that are expressed in endometrium of women with and without endometriosis. We profiled the expression of 287 miRNAs in paired eutopic and ectopic endometrium and isolated endometrial cells using microarray and validated the expression of selected miRNAs using real-time PCR. On the basis of global normalization, 65 of these miRNAs were identified to be expressed above the threshold levels set during the analysis in the endometrium of women without endometriosis with a progressive decline in expression in paired eutopic and ectopic endometrium. Statistical analysis (ANOVA) identified 48 of these miRNAs as differentially expressed among these tissues and 32 miRNAs between isolated endometrial stromal cell (ESC) and glandular epithelial cell (GEC) (P < 0.05). The expression of hsa-miR20a, hsa-miR21, hsa-miR26a, hsa-miR18a, hsa-miR206, hsa-miR181a and hsa-miR142-5p, predicted to target many genes, including TGF-betaR2, ERalpha, ERbeta and PR, respectively, was validated in these tissues and cells using real-time PCR. Treatment of ESC and GEC with 17beta-estradiol and medroxyprogesterone acetate (10(-8) M) differentially regulated the expression of hsa-miR20a, hsa-miR21 and hsa-miR26a, which in part reversed following co-treatment with ICI-182780 and RU-486 (10(-6) M), respectively (P < 0.05). In conclusion, we provided evidence for the expression of a number of differentially expressed miRNAs in eutopic/ectopic endometrium and isolated endometrial cells, opening up the possibility that aberrant/altered expression of some miRNAs whose expression is regulated by the ovarian steroids may influence the expression of specific target genes with central roles in normal endometrial cellular activities and pathogenesis of endometriosis.[Expression of vascular endothelial growth factor receptors in the ectopic and eutopic endometrium of women with endometriosis].To study the localization and expression of the vascular endothelial growth factor receptors (VEGFR) Fms-like tyrosine kinase (Flt-1) and kinase insert domain-containing receptor (KDR) in human ectopic and eutopic endometrium of patients with endometriosis.Specimens of endometriosis patients, aged (38 +/- 8) years, including 37 specimens of entopic endometrium, 34 specimens of ovarian chocolate cyst, 34 specimens of ovarian chocolate cyst, 15 specimens of red peritoneal endometriosis lesions, and 4 abdominal wall endometriosis lesions were collected. Specimens of endometrium of 33 patients with other gynecological diseases, aged (36 +/- 8) years, were collected during operation and used as controls. Immunohistochemistry was used to detect the location and expression of Flt-1 and KDR protein in different tissues. Western blotting was used to detect the protein expression of Flt-1 and KDR protein in different tissues. The mRNA expressions of Flt-1 and KDR were detected by RT-PCR.Flt-1 and KDR were expressed in the endometrial glandular epithelium and stromal cells besides the endometrial blood vessels. The positive expression rate of Flt-1 and KDR in the ectopic endometrium of endometriosis patients were 94.3% and 91.4% respectively, both significantly higher than those in the ovarian endometrial cyst (74.3% and 77.1% respectively, both P < 0.05), and similar to those in the eutopic endometrium of the endometriosis patients (93.8% and 90.6% respectively, both P > 0.05). In the eutopic endometrium of the endometriosis patients, the Flt-1 mRNA expression level was 2.4 +/- 1.2 and the Flt-1 protein expression level was 31 +/- 17, and the KDR mRNA expression level was 3.0 +/- 1.4 and the KDR protein expression level was 36 +/- 24, all significantly higher than those in the ovarian endometrial cyst (1.5 +/- 0.9 and 1.8 +/- 1.0 for the Flt-1 and KDR mRNA expressions, and 17 +/- 6 and 20 +/- 11 for the Flt-1 and KDR protein expressions, all P < 0.05), and similar to those in the eutopic endometrium of the non-endometriosis patients (1.9 +/- 0.8 and 2.3 +/- 1.3 for the Flt-1 and KDR mRNA expressions, and 24 +/- 18 and 25 +/- 16 for the Flt-1 and KDR protein expressions, all P > 0.05)VEGF may play certain biological role in the development of endometriosis through VEGFR (Flt-1 and KDR). The expression of Flt-1 and KDR in the endometriotic lesion appears to be associated with neovascualization.Alteration of focal adhesion kinase expression in eutopic endometrium of women with endometriosis.To investigate whether focal adhesion kinase (FAK) expression is altered in eutopic endometrium of women with endometriosis.Experimental study using human endometrial tissue.Academic research center.Women with or without endometriosis who were undergoing surgery for benign indications.Endometrial biopsy.Expression of FAK was assessed by immunohistochemistry, Western blotting analysis, and reverse-transcription polymerase chain reaction.At secretory phase, the average level of endometrial FAK expression of women with endometriosis was significantly higher than that of controls, but no significant difference was found between the two groups at proliferative phase. There was a positive correlation between FAK expression in secretory endometrial tissues and disease stage and pelvic pain in women with endometriosis. Furthermore, the endometrial FAK protein expression varied with the serum E(2) at proliferative phase and with the ratio of E(2) to P at secretory phase.The study showed a significant increase of FAK expression in the secretory endometrial tissues of women with endometriosis, a relationship between FAK expression and disease stage, pelvic pain, and serum steroid hormones. Those results suggest that FAK may play a role in the pathogenesis of endometriosis and be regulated by steroid hormones.Expression of neuronal markers in the endometrium of women with and those without endometriosis.How do the expression patterns of neuronal markers differ in the endometrium of women with and without endometriosis?The neuronal markers, PGP9.5, NGFp75 and VR1, are expressed in the endometrium at levels that do not differ between women with and without endometriosis.Aberrant neuronal growth within the uterus may contribute to abnormal fertility and uterine dysfunction. However, controversy still exists as to whether aberrant innervation in the endometrium is associated with gynaecological pathology such as endometriosis. This may reflect the use of subjective methods such as histology to assess the innervation of the endometrium. We, therefore, employed a quantitative method, western blotting, to study markers of endometrial innervation in the presence and absence of endometriosis.This study included 45 women undergoing laparoscopic examination for the diagnosis of endometriosis. Endometrial samples were analysed by western blot for the expression of neuronal and neurotrophic markers, PGP9.5, VR1 and NGFp75.Endometrial pipelle biopsies were obtained from patients with (n = 20, study group) and without (n = 25, control group) endometriosis. Tissue was analysed by immunohistochemistry and western blot analysis for the expression of pan-neuronal marker, PGP9.5, sensory nociceptive marker, TPVR1, and low-affinity neurotrophic growth factor receptor, NGFRp75.PGP9.5, NGFp75 and VR1 were expressed in the endometrium of women, independent of the presence of endometriosis. Furthermore, the expression level of PGP9.5, VR1 and NGFp75 did not alter between the two cohorts of women.Studies of this nature are subject to the heterogeneous nature of patient population and tissue samples despite attempts to standardize these parameters. Hence, further studies using similar methodology will be required to confirm our results.Our results highlight that sensory neuronal markers are present in women with and without endometriosis. Future work will assess what the targets of the endometrial nerves are and investigate their function, their impact on endometrial biology and, in particular, whether aberrant neuronal function, rather than the mere presence of neuronal function, could be the root cause of subfertility and/or pain affecting many endometriosis sufferers. Our results do not, however, confirm the previous paradigm of increased innervation in the endometrium of women with endometriosis, nor the use of nerve cell detection from pipelle biopsies to diagnose endometriosis.Localization of matrix metalloproteinase-2 in uterine endometrium and ectopic implants.We performed an immunohistochemical study on paraffin-embedded tissues to evaluate the invasion pattern of endometriotic implants by determination of matrix metalloproteinase (gelatinase A) expression. Endometriotic tissues (n=32) and uterine endometria (n=18) of patients with endometriosis and uterine endometria of normal-menstruating women without endometriosis (n=11) were examined. Endometriotic tissues showed statistically significantly stronger staining compared with uterine endometria. However, we did not find differences in staining between uterine endometrium of women with endometriosis and normal controls. Compared to uterine endometrium, ectopic endometrium has a significantly higher capacity to produce the latent forms (72 kD) of gelatinase A. This leads to the conclusion that endometriotic implants express the protease enabling the invasion of surrounding tissue.Inflammatory changes of the endometrium in patients with minimal-to-moderate endometriosis.To investigate the endometrium of normal patients for chemotactic activity to neutrophils and macrophages and compare these findings with those of patients with endometriosis.Endometrial biopsies from patients with and without endometriosis were analyzed for chemotactic activity throughout the menstrual cycle. Glands and stroma of luteal samples were isolated to determine the source of this activity. Infiltrating cells to the endometrium were identified by immunohistochemistry with the use of the monoclonal antibody OKM1.Luteal endometrial samples from normal patients had higher chemotactic activity than samples from the proliferative phase; this was true for both cells types studied: macrophages, 84 versus 10 and neutrophils, 74 versus 11. Patients with endometriosis had high chemotactic activity in both proliferative and luteal biopsies: macrophages, 73 +/- 9 versus 78 +/- 1 and neutrophils, 41 +/- 18 versus 63 +/- 26. Stromal cells from luteal biopsies demonstrated a higher chemotactic activity than the epithelial component. Immunohistochemistry staining identified the infiltrating cells as macrophages.Extracts from endometrium of normal patients contain chemotactic activity for neutrophils and macrophages; this activity is higher in the secretory phase of the cycle. Endometriosis patients had high chemotactic activity throughout the menstrual cycle. Separation of the endometrial tissue into stroma and the glandular epithelium indicated that the stromal cells are the source of this factor.Calpain5 expression is decreased in endometriosis and regulated by HOXA10 in human endometrial cells.Calpains have been implicated in the regulation of apoptosis. Here, we identified Calpain5 as a target of HOXA10 transcriptional regulation in endometrial cells as well as its aberrant regulation in endometriosis. Histologically confirmed biopsies of endometriosis were obtained from 20 women. Eutopic endometrium was collected by endometrial biopsy from 30 controls and from the 20 subjects with endometriosis. First trimester decidual samples were obtained from five subjects at the time of pregnancy termination. Immunohistochemistry was used to identify Calpain5 expression. Calpain5 was expressed in endometrial stromal and glandular cells throughout the menstrual cycle and in decidua. Calpain5 protein expression was decreased in both stromal and glandular cells from women with endometriosis compared with that of fertile controls. Human endometrial stromal and epithelial cell lines were transfected with pcDNA/HOXA10, HOXA10 siRNA or respective controls. Quantitative real-time RT-PCR was performed to determine expression of HOXA10 and Calpain5 in each group. Transfection of HESC cells with an HOXA10 expression construct led to increased Calpain5 expression, whereas transfection with siRNA resulted in decreased expression. In conclusion, Calpain5 expression is regulated by HOXA10. Calpain5 expression was decreased in endometriosis likely as a result of decreased HOXA10 expression. Decreased apoptosis in endometrial cells may promote the development of endometriosis through a pathway involving HOXA10, Calpain5 and caspase.Detection of mitochondrial biomarkers in eutopic endometria of endometriosis using surface-enhanced laser desorption/ionization time-of-flight mass spectrometry.To detect specific mitochondrial proteins in eutopic endometrial samples from women with and without endometriosis and to build diagnostic models.Eutopic endometrial samples from women with endometriosis (excluding adenomyosis) and women with benign indications as control were studied by using surface-enhanced laser desorption/ionization time-of-flight mass spectrometry protein-chip technology. After finding the biomarkers, the diagnostic model was evaluated and validated by leave-one cross-validation.Collaborative investigation in an academic research environment.Twenty-four patients with endometriosis (excluding adenomyosis) and 29 patients with benign indications as control.Surgical excision of eutopic endometrial biopsy of patients with endometriosis and controls.Mitochondrial protein expression.Seventy-eight qualified mitochondrial protein peaks were detected, ten of them had a significant difference. Three combined potential biomarkers, with mass-to-charge ratios (m/z) of 15,334, 15,128, and 16,069, were found, and the diagnostic system distinguished endometriosis from control samples with a specificity of 86.2% and a sensitivity of 87.5%.We discovered potential mitochondrial biomarkers of eutopic endometrium in endometriosis and set up a diagnostic model. Further identification of the proteins we found will help to explain pathology, new diagnoses, and therapeutic approaches for endometriosis.Macrophage migration inhibitory factor expression in the intrauterine endometrium of women with endometriosis varies with disease stage, infertility status, and pelvic pain.To evaluate the concentrations of macrophage migration inhibitory factor (MIF) in the eutopic endometrial tissue of women with and without endometriosis.Retrospective study using ELISA to measure MIF concentrations in total endometrial tissue proteins extracts.Gynecology clinic and human reproduction research laboratory.Forty-five women with endometriosis and 25 normal women.Endometrial biopsies were obtained a few days before laparoscopy.Concentrations of MIF in tissue protein extracts.Levels of MIF were significantly higher in women with endometriosis, increased with disease stage, and were cycle phase dependent. Of note is the significant increase in MIF levels occurring in the midsecretory phase in women with endometriosis as compared with controls, particularly in infertile patients, as well as in the late secretory phase preceding menstruation. Furthermore, MIF levels seemed to be particularly elevated in women with endometriosis who were infertile and who suffered from pelvic pain.This study showed a significant increase in MIF concentrations in the intrauterine endometrial tissue of women with endometriosis, occurring at specific phases of the menstrual cycle, a relationship between MIF concentrations and disease stage, and a possible role for this factor in endometriosis-associated pain and infertility.Aberrant expression of glutathione peroxidase in eutopic and ectopic endometrium in endometriosis and adenomyosis.To determine the expression of glutathione peroxidase (GPx) in the eutopic and ectopic endometria during the menstrual cycle in endometriosis and adenomyosis.Immunohistochemical identification of GPx in endometrial tissues identified using the polyclonal antibody.Department of obstetrics and gynecology in a university hospital.One hundred fourteen women divided into three groups: 33 patients with endometriosis, 34 patients with adenomyosis, and 47 fertile control subjects.Endometrium biopsied throughout the menstrual cycle.Endometrial cells: semiquantitative immunostaining (evaluation nomogram) score.The analyses revealed phase-dependent changes of GPx expression in the surface and glandular epithelia in the eutopic endometrium during the menstrual cycle in the fertile controls, i.e., the expression was weak in the early proliferative phase, gradually increased, was most marked in the early secretory phase, and decreased thereafter. The expression of GPx in the eutopic endometrium in endometriosis lost the variation during the menstrual cycle. The expression of GPx in adenomyosis was persistently marked over the control levels throughout the menstrual cycle.The aberrant expression of GPx in the eutopic endometrium throughout the cycle suggests a pathological role in endometriosis and adenomyosis.Analysis of aromatase and 17beta-hydroxysteroid dehydrogenase type 2 messenger ribonucleic acid expression in deep endometriosis and eutopic endometrium using laser capture microdissection.To investigate mRNA expression of aromatase and 17beta-hydroxysteroid dehydrogenase type 2 (17betaHSD2) in epithelial and stromal cells from eutopic and ectopic endometrium of patients with deep endometriosis.Prospective study.University hospital.Patients with deep endometriosis and fertile women with macroscopically normal pelvic cavities.During surgery, 30 endometrial and 16 endometriotic samples were obtained from 30 patients with deep endometriosis. Control endometrial samples were obtained from 24 fertile women with macroscopically normal pelvic cavities who underwent laparoscopic tubal ligation or reversal of tubal sterilization. Epithelial cells and stromal cells from endometrial or endometriotic tissues were microdissected using laser capture microdissection.Expression levels of aromatase and 17betaHSD2 mRNA in microdissected epithelial and stromal cells were determined using quantitative real-time reverse transcriptase polymerase chain reaction.Aromatase mRNA expression was significantly higher in epithelial cells than in stromal cells in both eutopic and ectopic endometrium obtained from endometriosis patients. In the ectopic endometrium of 8 patients (8/16, 50%), 17betaHSD2 expression was not detected in either epithelial or stromal cells. In eutopic endometrium from endometriosis patients, 17betaHSD2 expression in epithelial cells was significantly increased during the early, middle, and late secretory phases compared with the late proliferative phase, whereas no significant cyclical difference was detected in control endometrium.Local estrogen concentration may be much higher in epithelial cells than in stromal cells in deep endometriotic tissue.A predictive model for endometriosis.Aromatase is the key enzyme in the process of estrogen biosynthesis from the precursor androgen. Recently, aromatase has been found to be aberrantly expressed in eutopic endometrium of patients suffering from endometriosis. This finding has prompted speculation about the contribution of this enzyme to the prediction of this disease.We prospectively aimed to evaluate whether endometrial biopsy, prior to laparoscopy in symptomatic women to screen for the presence of aromatase by real-time RT-PCR and immunohistochemistry, combined with select patients' characteristics, is of value to predict endometriosis.Of 48 consecutive symptomatic and eligible patients, 25 (52.1%) exhibited endometriosis and 23 (47.9%) were disease-free. A multiple logistic regression model revealed that 95.5% of patients whose eutopic endometrium was found to be positive for aromatase mRNA as well as immunohistochemically detected protein and who were additionally suffering from moderate to severe dysmenorrhoea (visual analogue scale score >4/10) exhibited endometriosis at laparoscopy.These findings provide direct evidence that screening for eutopic endometrial aromatase in combination with clinical data could be of discriminative value in the prediction of disease.Increased telomerase activity and human telomerase reverse transcriptase mRNA expression in the endometrium of patients with endometriosis.Endometriosis is considered a frequent, benign disease with the ability to undergo neoplastic processes. The aim of this study was to evaluate the limitless replication potential of the endometrium in patients with endometriosis by examining human telomerase reverse transcriptase (hTERT) mRNA expression and telomerase activity.Endometrium samples from 30 endometriosis patients and 30 patients without endometriosis were obtained via endometrial biopsy. The expression of hTERT mRNA was determined by real-time RT-PCR assay, and telomerase activity was measured by telomerase repeat amplification protocol (TRAP) assay.The mean normalized hTERT (N hTERT) mRNA level was significantly higher in the endometriosis than in the control group (P = 0.013). The mean hTERT mRNA levels during the proliferative phase and during the secretory phase were higher in the endometriosis group than in the control group, although the difference was only significant for the secretory phase (P = 0.036). We found a prominent difference in endometrial telomerase activity between moderate-to-severe endometriosis and the control group (P = 0.048). The levels of hTERT mRNA and telomerase activity increased as the disease became more severe (P = 0.038, P = 0.016).This study showed the overexpression of hTERT mRNA and telomerase activity in the endometrium of endometriosis patients. These finding suggest that replication potential of endometrial cells may have an important role in the pathogenesis of endometriosis.Adenosine triphosphate-binding cassette transporter G2 expression in endometriosis and in endometrium from patients with and without endometriosis.To investigate adenosine triphosphate (ATP)-binding cassette transporter G2 (ABCG2) expression in endometriosis and in samples of endometrium from patients with and without endometriosis.Prospective study.University hospital.Patients with and without endometriosis.Endometrial and endometriotic tissues obtained throughout the menstrual cycle.Density of ABCG2(+) microvessels, density of CD31(+) microvessels.No statistically significant differences in the density of ABCG2(+) microvessels were observed between endometrium of patients with and without endometriosis in the proliferative phase and early, middle, and late secretory phases. The density of ABCG2(+) microvessels was statistically significantly higher in the menstrual endometrium of patients with endometriosis compared with patients without endometriosis. The density of ABCG2(+) microvessels was reduced in the ectopic endometrium compared with matched eutopic endometrium except in cases of deep infiltrating endometriosis. The density of ABCG2(+) microvessels was statistically significantly higher in deep infiltrating endometriosis compared with ovarian endometriosis and red and black peritoneal lesions throughout the menstrual cycle.ABCG2 is strongly expressed in the endothelial cells of microvessels of eutopic endometrium, and the density of ABCG2(+) microvessels is reduced in ectopic endometrium except in cases of deep infiltrating endometriosis. ABCG2(+) microvessels may represent an integral part of the pathophysiology of deep infiltrating endometriosis.The depolarized expression of the alpha-6 integrin subunit in the endometria of women with endometriosis.The current study sought to compare the endometrial localization of the integrin subunit alpha-6 in women with endometriosis and women without the disease. Alpha-6 integrins have an important function, not only in the attachment of cells to the extracellular matrix and laminin, but they also serve as inductors of cell migration and invasion, depending on their pattern of expression in the cell membrane.The endometriosis group consisted of 32 women with a confirmed diagnosis of endometriosis by laparoscopy or laparotomy. The control group consisted of 20 women not having endometriosis or any other gynecologic disease at laparoscopy. Endometria were obtained by biopsy. Immunohistochemical techniques were used to assess alpha-6 localization. In each section, the percentage of positive cells and the localization of expression were evaluated.All glandular cells expressed alpha-6 in all of the samples but presented two different patterns, either only in the basal side of the cells (polarized) or also in other sides of the cells (depolarized). The percentage of samples showing depolarized expression was significantly higher in the endometriosis group (66.6% vs 15.8%, chi2 =12.09, P = .001).The endometria of women with endometriosis more frequently show a depolarized expression of integrin subunit alpha-6, a characteristic usually found in highly proliferating cells with migrating and invasive abilities.[Study on expression of estrogen receptor isoforms in eutopic and ectopic endometrium of ovarian endometriosis].To investigate the distribution of ER isoforms in endometriosis and eutopic endometrium.Tissue samples of patients with ovarian endometriosis, treated in People's Liberation Army General Hospital from January 2004 to December 2006, were retrieved. A total of 60 cases of ovarian endometriotic cysts with their corresponding eutopic endometrium (30 cases of proliferation phase and 30 of secretary phase eutopic endometrium) and 30 cases of normal endometrium (15 proliferative and 15 secretary phase endometrial samples respectively) were included. Expressions of ERalpha and ERbeta were analyzed using immunohistochemistry and the expression ratio was statistically analyzed by using SPSS 12.0 software.Expressions of both ERalpha and ERbeta in epithelial cells were positively correlated with that of the stromal cells. The expression of ERalpha in eutopic endometrium (73.3% in epithelium and 76.7% in stroma) was significantly higher than that in ovarian endometriotic cysts (43.3% in epithelium and 46.7% in stroma), or normal control (56.7% in epithelium and 50.0% in stroma, respectively, each P < 0.05. However, the expression of ERbeta (90.0% in epithelium and 76.7% in stroma) was higher in ovarian endometriotic cysts than that in the eutopic endometrium (68.0% in epithelium and 63.3% in stroma respectively, P < 0.05), and ERbeta expression in eutopic endometrium was higher than that in the normal control endometrium (36.7% in epithelium and 26.7% in stroma, respectively, P < 0.05). The expressions of both ERalpha and ERbeta changed periodically in eutopic and normal endometrium, whereas ERalpha and ERbeta level were less variable in the ectopic endometrium. The expression of ERbeta was statistically higher than that of ERalpha (P < 0.05) in ectopic endometrium, whereas no significant difference was seen between the two isoforms in the eutopic or normal endometrium.Both ERalpha and ERbeta have higher expression levels in eutopic endometrium of patients with ovarian endometriotic cysts. ERbeta is predominantly expressed in endometriotic cysts, where the expression of ERalpha is limited. The different distribution of ERalpha and ERbeta may play an important role in the development of ovarian endometriosis.Analysis of matrix metalloproteinase-7 expression in eutopic and ectopic endometrium samples from patients with different forms of endometriosis.The objective of the present study was to expand our understanding of the role of matrix metalloproteinase-7 (MMP-7) in the pathophysiology of endometriosis.Expression levels of MMP-7 mRNA and protein in the eutopic endometrium and ectopic endometrium of patients with different forms of endometriosis were measured with immunohistochemistry and real-time RT-PCR. Endometrial tissues from patients with uterine myomas and those with macroscopically normal pelvic cavities were included as comparison groups. The real-time RT-PCR utilized endometrial cells isolated by laser capture microdissection. MMP-7 immunostained cells were quantified using a computerized image analysis system.MMP-7 expression levels were significantly higher in the endometrial epithelial cells from patients with deep infiltrating endometriosis compared with those isolated from the endometria of patients with only superficial peritoneal endometriosis, uterine myomas or normal endometrium, in the proliferative, late secretory and menstrual phases. MMP-7 protein expression was detected in the ectopic endometrial epithelial cells of 13 samples of deep infiltrating endometriosis (24.5%), 11 samples of ovarian endometriosis (28.6%), 23 samples of black peritoneal lesions (76.7%) and 24 samples of red peritoneal lesions (100%). MMP-7 protein expression in epithelial cells was significantly higher in red peritoneal lesions compared with that of deep infiltrating endometriosis, ovarian endometriosis and black peritoneal lesions, in all phases of the menstrual cycle.These findings suggest that MMP-7 expression levels vary significantly among the different forms of endometriosis.Pyrrolidine dithiocarbamate inhibits nuclear factor-κB pathway activation, and regulates adhesion, migration, invasion and apoptosis of endometriotic stromal cells.The activation of nuclear factor-κB (NF-κB) has been implicated in the development and progression of endometriosis. The aim of this study is to investigate the potential application of pyrrolidine dithiocarbamate (PDTC), a potent NF-κB inhibitor, in the treatment of endometriosis. NF-κB-DNA-binding activity, IκB phosphorylation and expression of nuclear p65 protein in endometriotic ectopic stromal cells (EcSCs), endometriotic eutopic stromal cells (EuSCs) and normal endometrial stromal cells (NESCs) were detected by electrophoretic mobility shift assay and western blot analysis. Adhesion, migration, invasion and apoptosis of EcSCs were observed by means of adhesion, migration, invasion and terminal deoxynucleotidyl transferase-mediated dUDP nick-end labeling assay, respectively. Gene and protein expressions of CD44s, matrix metalloproteinase (MMP)-2, MMP-9 and survivin in EcSCs were measured by RT-PCR and western blot analysis. The results showed that PDTC in the absence or presence of interleukin (IL)-1β showed stronger inhibitory effects on NF-κB-DNA-binding activity, IκB phosphorylation and expression of nuclear p65 protein in EcSCs than those in EuSCs or NESCs. PDTC enhanced apoptosis, and suppressed IL-1β-induced cellular adhesion, migration and invasion of EcSCs. Pretreatment of EcSCs with PDTC attenuated IL-1β-induced expressions of CD44s, MMP-2, MMP-9 and survivin at gene and protein levels. All these findings suggest that PDTC induces apoptosis and down-regulates adhesion, migration and invasion of EcSCs through the suppression of various molecules. Therefore, PDTC could be used as a therapeutic agent for the treatment of endometriosis.The endometria of patients with endometriosis show higher expression of class I human leukocyte antigen than the endometria of healthy women.To compare the expression of class I human leukocyte antigen (HLA I) in endometrial samples from patients with and without endometriosis.Cross-sectional study.Acute-care teaching hospital in Barcelona, Spain.The endometriosis group included 32 patients for whom the only diagnosis during an operation was endometriosis. The control group included 20 women who underwent a laparoscopy and in whom no evidence of endometriosis or any other genital disease was seen.Samples of endometrium were obtained by curettage and immediately frozen. A pan-HLA I mouse antihuman IgG2a monoclonal antibody was used for immunohistochemical study.Frequency of positive glandular and stromal cells was evaluated in each section.A significantly higher expression of HLA I in the endometriosis group than in controls, both in the glandular cells (median 100% vs. 80%) and in the stromal cells (median 60% vs. 20%), was observed.Patients with endometriosis had a significantly higher expression of HLA I molecules in endometrial cells than did the controls. This could be a possible explanation for their higher resistance to natural killer cytolysis.Post-translational modifications and protein-specific isoforms in endometriosis revealed by 2D DIGE.Endometriosis is a chronic disorder affecting approximately 10% of women in whom endometrial tissue forms painful lesions outside the uterus. It has a major impact on their physical, mental and social well-being but has no known cure, and there is no nonsurgical means of diagnosis. We have used a proteomic approach to identify proteins with altered abundance in the eutopic endometrium of endometriosis patients in the midsecretory phase of the menstrual cycle. 2D-differential in gel electrophoresis (DIGE) and mass spectrometry identified 20 proteins that were present at different levels in endometriosis patients (p < 0.05), many of which have not previously been associated with endometriosis. Protein abundance changes did not correlate well with published gene array data, emphasizing the extensive post-translational modification that occurs in this tissue. Abundance or localization changes in endometrial tissue were validated by immunohistochemistry and Western blotting for three proteins, vimentin (VIM), peroxiredoxin 6 (PRDX6), and ribonuclease/angiogenin inhibitor 1 (RNH1), while observed changes could not be confirmed for coronin 1A (CORO1A) or transgelin (TAGLN2). In addition, multiple charge and size isoforms were observed for PDRX6 and vimentin (VIM), and an additional PDRX6 isoform was observed in endometriosis patients that was below the level of detection in healthy women. Biological pathway analysis identified that cytoskeletal remodeling via keratin intermediate filaments, processing of the cystic fibrosis transmembrane receptor (CFTR), the glucocorticoid receptor subunit alpha (GCR), and heat shock factor 1 (HSF1) were all significantly over-represented features in endometriosis patients. This study highlights the highly dynamic nature of endometrial tissue and suggests that considerable post-translational modification of proteins is a key factor in the pathology of endometriosis.Diagnosis of endometrial nerve fibers in women with endometriosis.Recent studies indicated that there is a high density of small nerve fibers in the functional layer of the endometrium in women with endometriosis and that it can be used as a marker to detect endometriosis. In this study, the efficacy assessment of small nerve fibers' density as a diagnostic marker was compared in patients with and without endometriosis.In this study, women with history of pelvic pain and/or infertility who were candidates for laparoscopy or laparotomy in Rassoul hospital (2007-2009) were enrolled. Histological sections of endometrial tissue were prepared from endometrial biopsy from women with endometriosis (n = 12) (1) and without endometriosis (n = 15) (2). Protein gene product 9.5 and neurofilament were evaluated as marker from endometrial biopsies by immunohistochemical methods.There was no statistically significant difference between two groups according to age, body mass index. Nerve fibers were detected in all endometrial biopsies from all women with endometriosis but detected only in three women without endometriosis. The mean density of nerve fibers was 2.2 ± 4.7 mm(-2) in group without endometriosis and) 13.1 ± 3.3 (in group with endometriosis (p < 0.001). Women with endometriosis had significantly higher nerve fiber density in comparison with women without endometriosis.Our findings indicated that endometrial biopsy for detecting density of nerve fibers by usage of protein gene product 9.5, provided a reliable marker for diagnosis of endometriosis.Determination of cathepsins B, D and G concentration in eutopic proliferative endometrium of women with endometriosis by the surface plasmon resonance imaging (SPRI) technique.To determine the concentrations of cathepsins B, D and G in proliferative eutopic endometrium of patients with and without endometriosis, by use of the surface plasmon resonance imaging (SPRI) technique.A total of 55 patients were recruited in the study: 31 patients with endometriosis (stages I-IV) and 24 controls. Endometrial samples were obtained in the first phase of the menstrual cycle from regularly menstruating premenopausal women, prior to laparoscopy, by the use of aspiration biopsy. Endometriosis was appropriately classified according to the Revised American Fertility Society classification and confirmed by histopathology in every case. The SPRI technique was used to determine the concentration of cathepsins B, D and G. To compare the two groups for quantitative data, Mann-Whitney-Wilcoxon's test was used due to the non-normal distribution of the tested variables and normality of distribution was assessed using Shapiro-Wilk W test.The concentration of the three examined cathepsins was higher in the proliferative eutopic endometrium of patients with endometriosis, especially in advanced stages, e.g. III and IV, when compared to healthy individuals. Corresponding median values were, for cathepsin B: [7.93 pmol/mg (min-max 2.82-15.71) vs 1.2 pmol/mg (min-max 0.7-15.49) p=0.0014], for cathepsin D: [1.86 pmol/mg (min-max 0.51-5.4) vs 1.03 pmol/mg (min-max 0.4-2.72) p=0.00041] and for cathepsin G: [0.6 pmol/mg (min-max 0.33-2.51) vs 0.3 pmol/mg (min-max 0.16-1.29) p=0.00051].Increased concentrations of cathepsins B, D and G in the proliferative eutopic endometrium may play a role in the implantation of endometrial tissue outside the uterine cavity.Impaired down-regulation of E-cadherin and beta-catenin protein expression in endometrial epithelial cells in the mid-secretory endometrium of infertile patients with endometriosis.Only a few, small, human studies on E-cadherin and beta-catenin expression in normal cycling human endometrium have been reported. It remains unclear whether expression of these molecules might be altered in the endometrium of infertile patients with endometriosis.The aim of the present study was to investigate E-cadherin and beta-catenin expression in the endometrium of infertile patients with endometriosis, those with uterine fibromas, and patients with unexplained infertility.Expression levels of E-cadherin and beta-catenin mRNA and/or protein in the endometrium of infertile patients with endometriosis (n = 151), those with uterine fibromas (n = 41), patients with unexplained infertility (n = 9), as well as healthy fertile controls (n = 57) were measured. This study utilized laser capture microdissection, real-time RT-PCR, and immunohistochemistry.No significant differences in E-cadherin or beta-catenin mRNA expression in microdissected epithelial cells were observed among the different groups throughout the menstrual cycle. However, very low or no protein expression of E-cadherin, total beta-catenin, or dephosphorylated beta-catenin in luminal and glandular epithelial cells was detected in the mid-secretory endometrium of healthy fertile controls. E-cadherin, total beta-catenin, and dephosphorylated beta-catenin protein expression in the mid-secretory endometrium of infertile patients with endometriosis or unexplained infertility was significantly higher compared to that of healthy fertile controls in both luminal and glandular epithelial cells.These findings suggest that impaired down-regulation of E-cadherin and beta-catenin protein expression, along with Wnt/beta-catenin signaling pathway activation during the window of implantation, might be one of the potential molecular mechanisms of infertility in patients with endometriosis.Epidermal growth factor receptor expression in normal endometrium and endometriosis: an immunohistochemical study.To study epidermal growth factor (EGF) receptor expression in endometrium throughout the menstrual cycle and to compare EGF-receptor expression in endometrium from patients with endometriosis with receptor expression in synchronously sampled endometriosis and in endometrium from healthy women.An immunohistochemical study of receptor expression using murine monoclonal antibodies and timed endometrial and endometriotic biopsies.25 healthy women and 27 patients with a diagnosis of endometriosis.Positive staining for EGF receptors was observed in 24 of 25 samples from normal women and in 26 of 27 endometrial samples from patients with endometriosis. In neither group was there any variation in the intensity of staining throughout the menstrual cycle and both glands and stroma were stained. EGF-receptor expression was observed in the glands of 15 out of 17 endometriotic lesions and in 12 of these biopsies positive staining was also present within endometriotic stroma.This study shows no difference in the intensity of staining of EGF receptors in endometrium throughout the menstrual cycle or between the glands of normal endometrium and those of endometriosis.Nitric oxide synthesis is increased in the endometrial tissue of women with endometriosis.Previous studies have shown that peritoneal macrophages from women with endometriosis produce excess nitric oxide (NO). This study was designed to quantify the amount of NO and determine the expression of endothelial (eNOS) and inducible NO synthases (iNOS) in women with and without endometriosis.An enzyme-linked immunosorbent assay (ELISA) was performed on endometrial tissues obtained from controls (myoma, n = 30) and on eutopic/ectopic endometrial tissues from endometriosis patients (n = 34) to evaluate eNOS and iNOS protein concentrations in these endometrial tissues. A rapid-response chemiluminescence analyser was used to measure NO directly in fresh endometrial tissues.Mean (+/- SEM) levels of NO were significantly increased in the endometrial tissues of women with endometriosis (13.2 +/- 7.8 versus 19.8 +/- 12.6 nmol/g tissue; P = 0.016). Apparently higher levels of NO were found in ectopic compared with eutopic endometrium (P = 0.057). Endometrial tissues of women with endometriosis appeared to contain more iNOS than those of controls (3.6 +/- 2.2 versus 8.6 +/- 12.2 pg/ microg protein; P = 0.06), but no significant difference was found in eNOS levels.Greater amounts of NO and NOS are present in the endometrial tissues of women with endometriosis, implying a possible role for NO in the pathogenesis of endometriosis.Increased expression of stathmin in eutopic endometrium of patients with endometriosis.Stathmin was identified as an endometriosis-related protein by comparative proteomics in our previous study. As a microtubule-destabilizing factor, stathmin was shown to participate in the relay and integration of diverse intracellular signaling pathways involved in cell proliferation, differentiation, and many other cellular activities. To investigate whether stathmin is involved in the pathogenesis of endometriosis, we examined the expression of stathmin in eutopic endometrium of women with or without endometriosis.Eutopic endometrium samples were collected from thirty-six patients who were diagnosed as endometriosis and the nineteen age-matched patients who were confirmed to be free of endometriosis surgically and histologically. The expression of stathmin mRNA was detected by real-time PCR, and its protein was detected by Western blotting and immunohistochemistry.Stathmin was overexpressed in eutopic endometrium of women with endometriosis detected by real-time PCR in mRNA levels and by Western blotting in protein levels, without significant difference between proliferative and secretory phase. Immunohistochemistry showed that stathmin protein was localized in both endometrial glandular and stromal cells throughout the menstrual cycle.Stathmin is overexpressed in endometrium of patients with endometriosis and may play a role in the pathogenesis of endometriosis.Activin-A secretion is increased in the eutopic endometrium from women with endometriosis.Activin is a well-characterised growth and differentiation factor and an important inflammatory mediator. Activin is secreted by normal endometrial glands and stroma and is expressed by endometrial leucocytes. It is also known that the eutopic endometrium from women with endometriosis is functionally different to that from women without endometriosis. In this study, we hypothesise that the endometrial secretion of activin is altered in women with endometriosis.To determine whether the expression of inhibin/activin subunits and the secretion of activin-A is different in eutopic endometrium from women with and without endometriosis.Endometrial biopsies were obtained from premenopausal, regularly menstruating women with and without endometriosis. Staining intensity for the different inhibin/activin subunits was compared in endometrial and endometriotic biopsies. Activin-A secretion was studied using endometrial explants and endometrial glandular and stromal monolayer cell cultures.The alpha- and betaA-subunits of inhibin/activin were more abundant in eutopic glandular cells from patients with minimal to mild endometriosis compared to women without endometriosis. In patients with endometriosis, the betaB-subunit was more abundant in eutopic stromal cells and endometrial leucocytes. Comparison of paired endometrial and endometriotic biopsies from the same patient did not reveal significant differences for any of the inhibin/activin subunits or activin receptors. Activin-A secretion by glandular and stromal endometrial cells was sevenfold and threefold higher, respectively, in women with endometriosis compared to women without endometriosis.The expression of inhibin/activin subunits in eutopic endometrium is altered in women with endometriosis, leading to higher levels of activin-A secretion by both glandular cells and stromal cells.[P450Arom and estrogenic microenvironment of eutopic endometria in endometriosis].Endometriosis, a common gynecologic disorder characterized by endometrial glands and stroma outside the uterus, is diagnosed by direct visualization of peritoneal and ovarian implants during laparoscopy.To study the estrogenic microenvironment in eutopic endometria of women with and without endometriosis.Eutopic endometria, obtained during laparoscopy from 23 women with endometriosis and 20 fertile cyclic women undergoing tubal sterilization, was studied. P450Arom mRNA expression (RT-PCR) was measured. Also, P450Arom activity was assessed measuring testosterone conversion to estradiol and the concentration of this last hormone in cultured endometrial explants.Age and body mass index was similar in both groups studied. Seventy nine percent of endometria from women with endometriosis and in 29.4% from control group expressed P450Arom mRNA (p <0.01). The intensity of the band was higher in secretory endometria from women with endometriosis when compared to controls (p <0.01), but it was similar during the proliferative phase. Estradiol secretion to the culture media by proliferative endometria explants from women with endometriosis was 3-fold higher than secretory endometria (p <0.01) and endometria from control women in both phases. P450Arom activity, in the presence of testosterone, was 7-fold higher in endometrial cultures from women with endometriosis, when compare with the basal culture (p <0.01). However, in endometrial explant cultures from control women, this activity was not statistical different.These results indicate that in women with endometriosis, the microenvironment in the endometria is estrogenic as a consequence of an increased expression and activity of the P450Arom.Immunohistochemical localization of insulin-like growth factor-binding protein-3 in eutopic and ectopic endometrial tissues.To evaluate the expression of insulin-like growth factor-binding protein-3 (IGFBP-3) in the eutopic endometrium and in endometriotic lesions.Retrospective immunohistochemical study.Twenty-five normal women and 39 women with endometriosis.Endometrial and endometriotic tissue biopsies obtained at laparoscopy.Expression of IGFBP-3 assessed by immunohistochemistry.In the endometrium, positive immunostaining of IGFBP-3 was observed both in the stroma and the epithelial glands. The intensity of staining in the glands during the secretory phase was significantly higher in women with endometriosis compared with controls (P = .018). An increased expression of IGFBP-3 over controls was found in stages I and II of the disease (P = .018), whereas in stages III and IV, the difference between controls and women with endometriosis was not significant (P = .300). In endometriotic tissues, a much-marked immunostaining of IGFBP-3 was noted in 90% of the glands and 67% of the stroma without apparent differences related to cycle phase.These data show intense staining of IGFBP-3 in endometriosis lesions and increased expression of the protein in the endometrium of patients with endometriosis compared to controls. This marked expression of IGFBP-3 could be related to its previous finding in the peritoneal fluid and to its potential involvement in the pathophysiology of endometriosis.Detection of aromatase cytochrome P-450 in endometrial biopsy specimens as a diagnostic test for endometriosis.To evaluate the clinical usefulness of examining endometrial biopsy specimens for aromatase cytochrome P-450 as a diagnostic test for endometriosis.Retrospective, case-controlled study.Department of Obstetrics and Gynecology, Kyoto Prefectural University of Medicine, Kyoto, Japan.One hundred five women of reproductive age with normal menstrual cycles underwent endometrial biopsy laparotomy or laparoscopy, and examination of their tissue revealed endometriosis, adenomyosis, and/or leiomyomas. Patients who had cervical carcinoma in situ but no other gynecologic disease were considered to be disease-free.Endometrial biopsy specimens were collected.The expression of aromatase cytochrome P-450 was examined by reverse transcription-polymerase chain reaction and immunohistochemical analysis. The distribution and intensity of the immunostaining was assessed using a semiquantitative index designed H-score.Immunostaining for aromatase cytochrome P-450 was detected in biopsy specimens obtained from patients with endometriosis, adenomyosis, and/or leiomyomas but not in specimens obtained from disease-free patients (H-score <20), with a sensitivity and specificity of 91% and 100%, respectively.The expression of aromatase cytochrome P-450 in biopsy specimens of eutopic endometrium distinguishes between disease-free women and women with endometriosis, adenomyosis, and/or leiomyomas. This technique can be used at outpatient infertility clinics as an initial screening procedure to rule out the presence of estrogen-dependent disease.Aberrant integrin expression in the endometrium of women with endometriosis.Integrins are ubiquitous cell adhesion molecules that undergo dynamic alterations during the normal menstrual cycle in the human endometrium. The alpha v beta 3 vitronectin receptor integrin is expressed in endometrium at the time of implantation, but its presence is delayed in endometrium that is assessed to be out of phase using classical histological features. To investigate the expression of this integrin in women with endometriosis, we assessed the presence of the beta 3-subunit throughout the menstrual cycle in 268 "in-phase" endometrial biopsies, using immunohistochemistry. The beta 3-subunit was expressed on endometrial epithelium after days 19-20 of the menstrual cycle. In 241 women whose biopsies were obtained after day 19, a lack of beta 3 expression was found to be closely related to the diagnosis of endometriosis (by Wilcoxon test, P = 0.02). This defect in integrin expression was associated with nulliparity, inversely related to the stage of disease, and occurred despite the presence of in-phase histological features. In a prospective double blind assessment of this integrin, we found endometrial beta 3 analysis to have a high specificity and positive predictive value as a nonsurgical diagnostic test for minimal and mild endometriosis. In conclusion, aberrant integrin expression in the native endometrium is associated with the finding of endometriosis and may identify some women with decreased cycle fecundity due to defects in uterine receptivity.Proliferative activity of the endometrium throughout the menstrual cycle in infertile women with and without endometriosis.To assess whether changes in endometrial proliferation in patients with endometriosis contribute to ectopic endometrial implantation.Endometrial biopsies from patients with endometriosis were stained immunohistochemically and compared with endometrium of a control group (n = 111). The newly developed monoclonal antibody Ki-S3 was used as a marker of cellular proliferation in surface and glandular epithelia and in stromal cells.Female Infertility Clinic, Research Centre of Obstetrics, Gynecology, and Perinatology, Moscow, Russia, and Institute of Pathology, Christian-Albrechts-University, Kiel, Germany.One hundred thirty-nine women with endometriosis and 111 women without endometriosis, all being infertile.Collecting endometrial samples during diagnostic and therapeutic laparoscopy.Number of proliferating cells in endometrial stroma, glandular, and surface epithelia.Endometrial proliferation showed a characteristic cyclic dependency with greatest activity in the follicular phase. Although epithelial proliferation ceased completely during the luteal phase, the number of proliferating cells in the stroma increased again toward the end of the menstrual cycle after its maximum at ovulation. No significant differences could be found between both investigated groups.Endometriosis is not due to an altered proliferative activity in eutopic endometrium. Proliferating stromal cells at the end of the menstrual cycle may reflect increasing numbers of immunocompetent cells. Endometrium of patients with endometriosis reveals almost the same cyclical changes as endometrium of patients without endometriosis does. Further attention to cells and cell-mediated reactions in the extrauterine milieu is required to elucidate the pathogenesis of endometriosis.Expression of membrane-type 5 matrix metalloproteinase in human endometrium and endometriosis.The metalloproteinases (MMPs) are a family of proteolytic enzymes involved in tissue remodeling and cell migration. Endometrial tissue remodeling proceeds during the menstrual cycle and requires a temporary and spatially balanced expression of several different MMPs. Various members of the MMPs also seem to play an important role in the invasion process of endometriosis; however, so far only a limited number of studies have focused on membrane-associated MMPs.The present study investigated the expression of membrane-type 5 metalloproteinase (MT5-MMP) in the human endometrium and endometriotic lesions by microarray hybridization, real-time polymerase chain reaction (PCR) and immunofluorescence.Both the gene chip expression analyses as well as PCR indicated expression of MT5-MMP in normal human endometrium and strongly elevated transcript levels in most peritoneal endometriosis lesions analyzed. Moreover we detected enhanced MT5-MMP expression in the eutopic endometrium from patients suffering from endometriosis, further supporting a role of MT5-MMP in the formation of endometriosis. Immunohistochemical analysis was used to determine the intracellular localization and tissue distribution of MT5-MMP. While the MT5-MMP antigen expression could be clearly attributed to the membrane of epithelial cells, a highly complex differential immunohistochemical staining of MT5-MMP in the various compartments of endometrial tissue was observed. The strongest staining was seen in luminal epithelial cells, whereas endometrial glands frequently showed partial expression of MT5-MMP.Our microarray analysis and real-time PCR of MT5-MMP transcripts may point to an elevated tissue remodeling and cell migration in endometrium from endometriosis patients as implied by the function of related MMPs.Identification of endometriosis-related genes by representational difference analysis of cDNA.Accumulated evidence reveals that abnormally expressed genes in eutopic endometrium of endometriosis play a critical role in the pathogenesis of endometriosis.Identification of endometriosis-related genes for further revealing the pathogenesis of endometriosis and offering the basis for developing the molecular-targeted diagnosis and therapy of endometriosis.Forty women with endometriosis and forty control women without endometriosis during their secretory phase were selected for this study. cDNA representational difference analysis (cDNA-RDA) was performed to screen the up-regulated genes in eutopic endometrium samples of endometriosis (n = 10) compared with the controls (n = 10). To validate the results, MAT2A, the most abundantly expressed gene, was selected to detect mRNA and protein levels between eutopic endometrium of endometriosis (n = 40) and controls (n = 40) using immunohistochemistry, real-time fluorescent quantitative PCR and Western blotting.Ten up-regulated genes were identified in eutopic endometria of endometriosis compared with controls. Among these genes, COX-2, BRAF, NRAS and CFL1 have already been reported to be associated with the endometriosis in previous studies. MAT2A, SEPT9, ATAD3A and CADM2 have been reported to be involved in other diseases but not in endometriosis. NAA15 and CCDC21 have not reported in any diseases. Further study showed that MAT2A protein was localised in both endometrial glandular and stromal cells. Compared with controls, the mRNA and protein levels of MAT2A were significantly higher in eutopic endometrium of endometriosis (P < 0.05).cDNA-RDA can be used to effectively identify the endometriosis-related genes, which can provide novel experimental data and further understand the pathogenesis of endometriosis.Endometrial estradiol and progesterone receptors in patients with luteal phase defects and endometriosis.Endometrial cytosol estrogen receptors (ERs) and progesterone receptors (PgRs) were quantitated in postovulatory endometrial biopsy samples of patients with luteal phase defect (LPD), those with endometriosis, and normal control subjects. Serum levels of estradiol (E2) and progesterone (P), obtained on the day of the biopsy, were also measured. No significant differences among endometrial ER, PgR, serum E2, and P levels were detected between the patients with endometriosis and normal control subjects. Although ER concentrations in the luteal defect group did not differ from those of control subjects, the PgR levels in day 20 to 23 endometrium were significantly higher. Mean serum E2 and P levels in the group with luteal insufficiency were significantly lower than those of the control subjects. Our data suggest that in patients with LPD the increase in PgR levels during the midluteal days is compatible with a relative deficiency of P secretion by the corpus luteum.Differential expression and localization of de-novo synthesized endometriotic haptoglobin in endometrium and endometriotic lesions.Endometriosis protein-I (ENDO-I) mRNA expression and protein localization were evaluated using in-situ hybridization and immunohistochemistry in endometriotic lesions and eutopic endometrium from women with endometriosis, and in eutopic endometrium from women without endometriosis (controls). When present, ENDO-I mRNA and protein were observed in the functionalis zone of endometrial stroma and the stroma of endometriotic lesions. Expression and localization differences were scored and statistically analysed. During the secretory stage, ENDO-I mRNA expression by endometriotic lesions and eutopic endometrium from women with disease was significantly greater than ENDO-I mRNA expression by proliferative stage eutopic endometrium from women with disease or eutopic endometrium from controls, regardless of cycle stage (P < 0.001). More ENDO-I protein was localized in endometriotic lesions and eutopic endometrium from women with disease than in eutopic endometrium from controls, regardless of cycle stage (P < 0.001). Differential expression and localization of ENDO-I may help develop minimally invasive diagnostic strategies for endometriosis. Further, as ENDO-I shares nucleotide sequence and amino acid sequence with hepatic haptoglobin-which in certain disease states is immunosuppressive and angiogenic-differences in ENDO-I expression and localization in the peritoneal cavity may contribute to the pathogenesis of endometriosis and/or facilitate development of unprecedented diagnostic or therapeutic approaches for management of this enigmatic disease.Up-regulation of p21-activated kinase 1 by in vitro treatment with interleukin 1-beta and its increased expression in ovarian endometriotic cysts.We evaluated whether the proinflammatory cytokines can regulate p21-activated kinase (Pak1) expression in endometrial cells as well as whether its expression is increased in endometriotic cysts. We found that interleukin-1β up-regulates Pak1 expression in endometrial stromal cells (ESC) and that the immunoreactivity of Pak1 is increased in the endometriotic cysts.HLA-G is expressed by the glandular epithelium of peritoneal endometriosis but not in eutopic endometrium.HLA-G is a major histocompatability antigen with documented immune-regulatory function. Various epithelial cancers and tissue allografts have been noted to express HLA-G, which is postulated to aid in their escape from immunosurveillance. We evaluated peritoneal endometriosis and eutopic endometrium for the expression of HLA-G protein and gene transcript.Two experiments were performed: (i) archived tissue blocks from peritoneal endometriotic lesions (n = 15) and eutopic endometrium (n = 12) were evaluated for extent of protein immunostaining, and (ii) eutopic endometrial biopsies from women without (n = 17) and with (n = 24) endometriosis, and peritoneal endometriotic lesions (n = 14) were evaluated for presence of RNA transcript by in situ hybridization.HLA-G protein localized in the glandular epithelium of 14 of 15 (93.3%) peritoneal endometriotic lesions, but not in stromal cells. HLA-G protein staining was absent in endometrial biopsies (n = 12). HLA-G gene transcript localized to the glandular epithelium in 13 of 14 (92.8%) peritoneal endometriotic lesions. HLA-G transcript was never observed in eutopic endometrium, regardless of cycle stage or whether from women with (n = 24) or without (n = 18) endometriosis.HLA-G is expressed by endometriotic glandular epithelium but not by eutopic endometrium under normal conditions. Differential expression of HLA-G suggests that peritoneal inflammation or cellular stress may up-regulate mechanisms to promote ectopic endometrial survival.[HOXA11 gene expression in women with and without impaired infertility].HOXA genes are receptivity markers and their altered expression can help identify women with implantation defect.The purpose of this study was to examine the expression pattern of HOXA11 and expression and localization of its protein product in the endometrium of women with endometriosis, idiopathic infertility and normal fertile patients during different phases of the menstrual cycle.We evaluated HOXA11 mRNA level in the endometrium from endometriosis (n=36), idiopathic infertility (n=48) and fertile patients (n=30) during a menstrual cycle. The amounts of mRNA were determined by real-time quantitative PCR. Using the immunohistochemical techniques we compared the localization of HOXA11 protein in the proliferative, early secretory and midsecretory endometrium in all of the studied groups. Endometrial biopsy was performed by pipelle or during hysteroscopy.We observed statistically significantly elevated HOXA11 transcripts levels in the midsecretory phase in both, the idiopathic infertility and the fertile control groups (p<0.05). Patients with endometriosis had low HOXA11 transcript level in the implantation window. Normal fertile patients showed statistically significantly decreased (p=0.003) HOXA11 mRNA level in the proliferative phase and statistically significantly increased level (p=0.018) in midsecretory phase, comparing to endometriosis patients. HOXA11 protein were localized in the nuclei of the endometrial stromal cells whereas the cytoplasm of these cells did not stain.Our results suggest that altered HOXA11 gene expression in the endometrium during a menstrual cycle may be a common phenomenon among patients with endometriosis and may cause infertility in this group of patients. Further research should explain the mechanism of altered expression of HOXA11 gene.Krüppel-like factor 9 and progesterone receptor coregulation of decidualizing endometrial stromal cells: implications for the pathogenesis of endometriosis.Endometriosis is characterized by progesterone resistance and associated with infertility. Krüppel-like factor 9 (KLF9) is a progesterone receptor (PGR)-interacting protein, and mice null for Klf9 are subfertile. Whether loss of KLF9 expression contributes to progesterone resistance of eutopic endometrium of women with endometriosis is unknown.The aims were to investigate 1) KLF9 expression in eutopic endometrium of women with and without endometriosis, 2) effects of attenuated KLF9 expression on WNT-signaling component expression and on WNT inhibitor Dickkopf-1 promoter activity in human endometrial stromal cells (HESC), and 3) PGR and KLF9 coregulation of the stromal transcriptome network.Transcript levels of KLF9, PGR, and WNT signaling components were measured in eutopic endometrium of women with and without endometriosis. Transcript and protein levels of WNT signaling components in HESC transfected with KLF9 and/or PGR small interfering RNA were analyzed by quantitative RT-PCR and Western blot. KLF9 and PGR coregulation of Dickkopf-1 promoter activity was evaluated using human Dickkopf-1-luciferase promoter/reporter constructs and by chromatin immunoprecipitation. KLF9 and PGR signaling networks were analyzed by gene expression array profiling.Eutopic endometrium from women with endometriosis had reduced expression of KLF9 mRNA together with those of PGR-B, WNT4, WNT2, and DKK1. KLF9 and PGR were recruited to the DKK1 promoter and modified each other's transactivity. In HESC, KLF9 and PGR coregulated components of the WNT, cytokine, and IGF gene networks that are implicated in endometriosis and infertility.Loss of KLF9 coregulation of endometrial stromal PGR-responsive gene networks may underlie progesterone resistance in endometriosis.Metalloproteinases, vascular endothelial growth factor, and angiopoietin 1 and 2 in eutopic and ectopic endometrium.To evaluate the expression of vascular endothelial growth factor (VEGF), angiopoietin 1 and 2 (ANGPT1/ANGPT2), and matrix metalloproteinases 1, 2, and 9 (MMP-1, MMP-2, MMP-9) in eutopic and ectopic endometrium.Experimental retrospective study.University hospital.Eutopic and ectopic endometrium samples from 30 women with endometriosis and endometrium biopsy samples from 30 healthy women.Biopsies of ovarian endometriomas and eutopic endometrium.Immunohistochemical staining to evaluate the expression of VEGF, ANGPT1, ANGPT2, MMP-1, MMP-2, and MMP-9, and real-time polymerase chain reaction analysis to quantify mRNA expression.Patients with endometriosis had higher levels of angiogenic factors and metalloproteinases in endometriotic cysts than in eutopic endometrium. These substances were also overexpressed in eutopic endometrium of patients with endometriosis when compared with normal controls.Overexpression of angiogenic factors and metalloproteinases may be the characteristic feature of endometrium with greater potential to transform into endometriotic lesions in the peritoneal cavity. Structural and/or functional differences of eutopic endometrium could have a role in the pathogenesis of endometriosis secondary to the backward passage of endometrial cells into the peritoneal cavity. Whether these local factors may induce, promote, and/or regulate this transformation remains to be determined.Aromatase expression in endometriosis.The conversion of C19 steroids to estrogens occurs in a number of tissues, such as the ovary and placenta, and is catalyzed by aromatase P450 (P450arom; the product of the CYP19 gene). P450arom expression has also been detected in a number of uterine tumors, such as leiomyomas and endometrial cancer. On the other hand, P450arom expression was undetectable in normal endometrial and myometrial tissues. The present study was conducted to determine the presence or absence of aromatase expression in peritoneal endometriotic implants and in the eutopic endometrium of women with endometriosis. Endometriotic implants in pelvic peritoneum (n = 17; e.g. posterior culdesac, bladder, and anterior culdesac) and eutopic endometrial curettings (n = 11) of 14 patients with histologically documented pelvic endometriosis were obtained at the time of laparoscopy or laparotomy. Pelvic peritoneal biopsies distal to endometriotic implants as well as normal endometrial tissues (n = 7) from disease-free women were used as negative controls. We used competitive RT-PCR technology employing an internal standard to amplify P450arom transcripts in total ribonucleic acid (RNA) isolated from these tissues. P450arom transcripts were detected in all endometriotic implants and in all eutopic endometrial tissues from patients with endometriosis. P450arom messenger RNA species were not detectable in endometrial tissues from disease-free women or in endometriosis-free peritoneal tissues. The highest levels of transcripts were detected in an endometriotic implant that involved the full thickness of the anterior abdominal wall. The P450arom transcript level within the core of this endometriotic mass was 4-fold higher than that in the surrounding adipose tissue. It has been shown recently that aromatase expression in various human tissues is regulated by the use of tissue-specific promoters via alternative splicing. To analyze promoter usage, we amplified by RT-PCR the most likely promoter-specific untranslated 5'-termini of P450arom transcripts in 2 endometriotic implants. It appears that these endometriotic implants use both the adipose-type promoter I.4 and gonadal-type promoter II for aromatase expression. The use of promoter I.4 for aromatase expression in adipose tissue has been recently observed to be regulated by members of the interleukin-6 (IL-6) cytokine family. Based on these findings, we examined by RT-PCR, IL-6 and IL-11 messenger RNA expression in 5 endometriotic tissues and 1 eutopic endometrial sample from a patient with endometriosis. We detected IL-6 and IL-11 transcripts in all endometriotic tissues and in the eutopic endometrial tissue sample studied. Our findings indicate that both eutopic endometrial tissues and endometriotic implants from patients with endometriosis are biochemically different from normal endometrial tissues of disease-free women. The presence of aromatase expression in eutopic endometrial tissues from patients with endometriosis may be related to the capability of implantation of these tissues on peritoneal surfaces. Furthermore, the possibility of estrogen production in these implants may serve to promote their growth. Increased IL-6 and IL-11 expression in these tissues suggests that P450arom expression in endometriosis may be regulated in part by these cytokines.Expression of epidermal growth factor, fibroblast growth factor-2, and platelet-derived growth factor-A in the eutopic endometrium of women with endometriosis.The objective of the present study was to compare the levels of expression of epidermal growth factor (EGF), fibroblast growth factor-2 (FGF-2), and platelet-derived growth factor-A (PDGF-A) mRNA in the eutopic endometrium of women with and without endometriosis.Thirty-five women with advanced stage endometriosis and 31 control women were recruited. Following isolation of total RNA from endometrial tissue and reverse transcription, cDNA samples were amplified to quantify the level of expression of EGF, FGF-2, PDGF-A.While the levels of mRNA of EGF and FGF-2 were not different between the two groups, the PDGF-A mRNA level was significantly lower in the endometriosis group than in the control group during the secretory phase (6.12 +/- 0.51 vs 12.50 +/- 0.99, mean +/- SEM, P < 0.05).The expression level of PDGF-A, but not EGF and FGF-2, might be decreased during the secretory phase in the eutopic endometrium of women with advanced stage endometriosis.Endometrial synthesis and secretion of complement component-3 by patients with and without endometriosis.In the present study we examined complement-3 (C3) synthesis and secretion from early proliferative endometrium of infertile patients with and without endometriosis. One gram of tissue was obtained by endometrial sampling at the time of diagnostic laparoscopy and incubated for 12 to 16 hours in the presence of radioactive methionine. Immunoprecipitation was performed with rabbit antihuman C3 immunoglobulin G and only a single 180-kDa radiolabeled protein (C3) was immunoprecipitated. This protein dissociates into 113- and 69-kDa subunits in the presence of dithiothreitol. The amount of C3 produced and secreted by the endometrium was quantitated as a percentage of counts per minute recovered by immunoprecipitation. Patients with minimal endometriosis produced significantly greater amounts of endometrial C3 than patients with no endometriosis or patients with severe endometriosis.Distribution of heat shock proteins in eutopic and ectopic endometrium in endometriosis and adenomyosis.To evaluate the pathophysiologic role of heat shock proteins and to examine the effect of danazol on these proteins in patients with endometriosis and adenomyosis.Immunohistochemical identification of human heat shock proteins 27, 60, and 70 in endometrial glandular cells identified using monoclonal antibodies.Department of obstetrics and gynecology in a university hospital.Subjects were 119 women with documented endometriosis or adenomyosis. The subjects were divided into three groups: fertile control (n = 38), with 14 in the proliferative phase and 24 in the secretory phase; endometriosis (n = 38); and adenomyosis (n = 43), including 33 who underwent hysterectomy and 10 treated with danazol.Staining of glandular cells by semiquantitative immunostaining (evaluation nomogram) score.Significantly increased expression of heat shock protein 27 was noted in eutopic endometrium from patients with endometriosis and adenomyosis as compared with controls, regardless of the menstrual phase. The scores for heat shock protein 27 and heat shock protein 70 in the ectopic endometrium of patients with endometriosis were low compared with those in eutopic endometrium, whereas in adenomyosis, the scores were similar to those of eutopic endometrium. After treatment with danazol, the expression of heat shock proteins returned to control levels.We suggest that abnormally increased expression of heat shock proteins plays a role in the pathophysiology of endometriosis and adenomyosis.miRNA-199a-5p regulates VEGFA in endometrial mesenchymal stem cells and contributes to the pathogenesis of endometriosis.It is believed that endometrial miRNAs contribute to the aetiology of endometriosis in stem cells; however, the mechanisms remain unclear. Here we collected serum samples from patients with or without endometriosis and characterized the miRNA expression profiles of these two groups. MicroRNA-199a-5p (miR-199a-5p) was dramatically down-regulated in patients with endometriosis compared with control patients. In addition, we found that the tumour suppressor gene, SMAD4, could elevate miR-199a-5p expression in ectopic endometrial mesenchymal stem cells. Up-regulation of miR-199a-5p suppressed cell proliferation, motility and angiogenesis of these ectopic stem cells by targeting the 3' untranslated region of VEGFA. Furthermore, we established an animal model of endometriosis and found that miR-199a-5p could decrease the size of endometriotic lesions in vivo. Taken together, this newly identified miR-199a-5p module provides a new avenue to the understanding of the processes of endometriosis development, especially proliferation, motility and angiogenesis, and may facilitate the development of potential therapeutics against endometriosis.Inhibition of IDO1 suppresses cyclooxygenase-2 and matrix metalloproteinase-9 expression and decreases proliferation, adhesion and invasion of endometrial stromal cells.Indoleamine 2,3-dioxygenase-1 (IDO1) is an intracellular enzyme that catalyses essential amino acid tryptophan along the kynurenine pathway. The aim of this study was to determine the impact of IDO1 expression on the biological characteristic of the endometrial stromal cells (ESCs). IDO1, cyclooxygenase-2 (COX-2) and matrix metalloproteinases (MMPs) in endometriotic ectopic stromal cells, endometriosis-derived eutopic stromal cells and normal ESCs (control) were detected by the in-cell Western analysis. After being treated with lipopolysaccharide, levo-1-methyl-tryptophan (L-1-MT) alone or a combination, a comparative analysis of the above protein expression was evaluated. The effects of IDO1 on ESCs proliferation, adhesion and invasion were detected through ELISA, adhesion assay and Matrigel invasion assay, respectively. The results showed that, contrary to healthy ESCs from control women, the expression of IDO1 was significantly higher in eutopic and ectopic ESCs obtained from women with endometriosis. Inhibition of IDO1 by L-1-MT suppressed the expression of COX-2 and MMP-9 in ESCs. It could also decrease the ESCs proliferation, adhesion and invasion, while stimulating ESCs decidualization. Thus, IDO1 is possibly involved in endometriosis pathogenesis via promoting COX-2 and MMP-9 expression and regulation of ESCs biological characteristics. The information may be useful for developing a new therapeutic strategy for endometriosis.Aberrant expression of metastasis-inducing proteins in ectopic and matched eutopic endometrium of women with endometriosis: implications for the pathogenesis of endometriosis.Endometriosis is a metastatic disease without obvious tumorigenesis. Expression of S100P, S100A4, osteopontin (OPN) or anterior gradient homologue 2 (AGR2) proteins can induce metastasis but fail to induce tumorigenesis per se. We now explore whether this group of metastasis-inducing proteins (MIPs) are associated with the pathogenesis of endometriosis.Eutopic endometrial biopsies were taken from 73 women (35 fertile women without endometriosis and 38 women with surgically diagnosed endometriosis). Ectopic endometriotic lesions were collected from eight of the women with endometriosis. The expression of MIPs at the cellular level was evaluated by immunohistochemistry and the presence of these proteins in the endometrial tissues was verified by western blotting and their gene expression was confirmed by RT-PCR.All four MIPs were immunolocated in the endometrium of control women and S100P, AGR2 and OPN showed a cyclical variation. Proliferative phase eutopic endometrium of both groups showed a similar staining pattern for all MIPs, whereas secretory phase endometrium showed a differential expression between controls and cases. The secretory phase endometrial immunostaining of controls showed weak stromal and perivascular AGR2, and decreased stromal and glandular S100P. In contrast, immunostaining for all MIPs was increased in the late secretory endometrial samples of women with endometriosis and intense immunostaining was seen for S100A4 in the stroma (P< 0.05) and for S100P (P< 0.001) and AGR2 (P< 0.0001) in both glands and stroma (P< 0.001). All active peritoneal endometriotic lesions showed strong immunostaining for each of the MIPs studied.We propose that these MIPs enhance endometrial cell invasiveness and contribute to the establishment of ectopic endometriotic deposits after retrograde menstruation.RHOC: a key gene for endometriosis.Considerable efforts have been invested in elucidating the potential mechanisms involved in the physiopathology of endometriosis. The aims of our study were to investigate whether RHOC expression is differentially altered in the endometrium and in endometriotic lesions. A total of 40 patients diagnosed with endometriosis and 15 healthy fertile women were selected for the study. Paired biopsies of endometrial tissue (eutopic endometrium) and endometriotic lesions (ectopic endometrium) were obtained from the patients with endometriosis. Endometrium from women without endometriosis was used as a control. Expression of the RHOC gene was analyzed by real-time polymerase chain reaction in autologous endometrial tissues of women with endometriosis and in the endometrium of control women. Increased RHOC expression was detected in endometriotic lesions compared to the eutopic endometrium of women with endometriosis and control women. RHOC changes may be among the key elements involved in the origin and the maintenance of endometriosis. Expression of gamma delta T cells and adhesion molecules in endometriotic tissue in patients with endometriosis and adenomyosis.Are T cell subsets including gamma delta T cells. HLA antigens or adhesion molecules, expressed in eutopic and ectopic endometria in patients with endometriosis and adenomyosis?Subjects consisted of 23 patients with adenomyosis and 21 patients with endometriosis. Controls consisted of 15 patients with adenomyoma and 42 infertile women without habitual abortion and autoimmune diseases. Staining of the glandular cells in eutopic and ectopic endometria or T lymphocyte subsets or macrophages in the stroma were analyzed immunohistochemically to localize the expression of the antigens.Immunohistochemical analysis revealed significantly increased expression of the antigens, particularly of the number of gamma delta T cells in the stroma and adhesion molecules and HLA antigens on the glandular cells in eutopic and ectopic endometria, compared with materials from patients with adenomyoma and infertile patients.It is likely that three distinct pathways of cell-cell interactions are activated in patients with endometriosis or adenomyosis.Profiling of selected angiogenesis-related genes in proliferative eutopic endometrium of women with endometriosis.To compare the expression level of the most relevant angiogenesis-related genes in the eutopic endometrium of women with and without endometriosis.32 regularly menstruating patients (18 with endometriosis and 14 controls) underwent surgery in the proliferative phase of the cycle. Eutopic endometrium was collected by the use of aspirating biopsy prior to laparoscopy. Only patients with advanced (stage III and IV) histopathologically confirmed ovarian endometriosis were studied. Real-time PCR gene arrays were applied to examine the expression of 84 human angiogenesis-connected genes. Western-blot and enzyme-linked immunosorbent assays (ELISA) were used to confirm the expression of selected proteins.We found significantly higher levels of AKT1 (p=0.003), TYMP (p=0.02), JAG1 (p=0.007), LAMA5 (p=0.005) and TIMP-1 (p=0.03) in eutopic endometrium of patients with endometriosis as compared with controls. By the use of Western blot we found clearly positive expression of AKT1 whereas ELISA assays confirmed expression of AKT1, TYMP, JAG1, LAMA5 and TIMP1.Changes in the expression of selected genes might lead to or be a consequence of an early defect in the physiological activity of proliferative endometrium ultimately resulting in its overgrowth outside the uterine cavity.CA-125 in menstrual discharge in patients with chronic pelvic pain.CA-125 levels in menstrual discharge were determined in 55 patients with chronic pelvic pain to evaluate whether this test would be useful in differentiating between pelvic pain due to endometriosis and other causes. Of the 28 women with endometriosis, 25 (89%) had CA-125 concentration greater than or equal to 72,000 units/ml. The frequencies of elevated levels in Stage I, Stage II and Stages III/IV were 85.7, 85.7 and 92.8%, respectively. When used for the detection of endometriosis, the test had a sensitivity of 89.3% and a specificity of 96.3%. These results suggest that CA-125 in menstrual discharge may be helpful in the evaluation of women with chronic pelvic pain.The role of SRC1 and SRC2 in steroid-induced SDF1 expression in normal and ectopic endometrium.To compare the expression patterns of steroid receptor coactivators (SRCs) and steroid-induced stromal cell-derived factor 1 (CXCL12 (SDF1)) in normal and ectopic endometrium and to explore the roles of NCOA1 (SRC1) and NCOA2 (SRC2) in the steroid-induced CXCL12 expression in normal and ectopic endometrial stromal cells (ESCs). The NCOA1, NCOA2, NCOA3 (SRC3), and CXCL12 (SDF1)α mRNA levels in normal and ectopic endometrium were analyzed by quantitative real-time PCR. Steroid-induced CXCL12 expression was detected by the ELISA method and the chemotactic activity of conditioned supernatant to monocyte was assessed by the Boyden chamber method before and after the silencing of NCOA1 or NCOA2 with siRNA in normal and ectopic ESCs. The expression of NCOA1 and CXCL12 in ectopic endometrium was significantly greater than that in normal endometrium in the secretory phase. Progesterone (P4) was able to significantly inhibit estradiol (E2)-stimulated CXCL12 expression in normal and ectopic ESCs. The inhibitory rate of P4 in ectopic ESCs at 72 and 96 h was significantly lower than that in normal ESCs. Silencing of NCOA1 but not NCOA2 significantly reduced the E2-induced CXCL12 expression in normal and ectopic ESCs. The ability of P4 to inhibit E2-induced CXCL12 expression and monocyte chemotaxis in normal and ectopic ESCs was significantly attenuated when NCOA2 was silenced. NCOA1 plays a necessary role in E2-induced CXCL12 expression and NCOA2 is required for P4 to inhibit the E2-induced CXCL12 production in normal and ectopic endometrium.Correlation between decreased type-II interleukin-1 receptor and increased monocyte chemotactic protein-1 expression in the endometrium of women with endometriosis.Monocyte chemotactic protein-1 (MCP-1), a potent inducer of macrophage recruitment and activation, is overexpressed in the eutopic endometrium of women with endometriosis. Eutopic endometrial cells of women with endometriosis secrete higher levels of MCP-1 than those of normal women, following stimulation with interleukin-1 (IL-1). The aim of this study was to examine whether there is any correlation between the expression of IL-1 receptor type II (IL-IRII), a specific downregulator of IL-1 activity, and that of MCP-1 in the eutopic endometrium of women with endometriosis.Endometrial biopsies of 46 women with endometriosis and 22 healthy women were evaluated simultaneously for IL-1RII and MCP-1 expression by immunohistochemistry.Our study revealed a highly significant correlation between the decreased expression of IL-1RII and the increased expression of MCP-1 in the endometrial tissue of women with endometriosis (Spearman correlation coefficient r = -0.377, P = 0.002), particularly in the initial stages of the disease (stages I and II; r = - 0.368, P = 0.020 and r = -0.480, P = 0.002, respectively). Furthermore, this correlation was observed in the proliferative (r = -0.366, P = 0.047) and the secretory phases (r = -0.321, P = 0.049) of the menstrual cycle.These results suggest that the reduced capability of endometrial tissue to downregulate IL-1 proinflammatory effects may be involved in the increased expression of MCP-1 in the endometrium of women with endometriosis and the establishment of an inflammatory state. The results also indicate a sustained process of cell activation throughout the menstrual cycle.Expression pattern of osteopontin and αvβ3 integrin during the implantation window in infertile patients with early stages of endometriosis.To study endometrial receptivity in terms of osteopontin (OPN) and αvβ3 integrin expression and co-expression in infertile women with early stages of endometriosis.We investigated the immunohistochemical expression and co-expression of OPN and αvβ3 integrin in the endometrium of 20 infertile patients with Stage I or II endometriosis as the only detectable cause of infertility, 20 infertile patients with unexplained infertility and 20 fertile women undergoing tubal sterilization. Two endometrial biopsies were performed during a single menstrual cycle (postovulatory Day +7 to +8 and 4 days later) in each subject.No statistically significant differences regarding OPN and αvβ3 integrin expression were found between infertile patients with endometriosis and the two control groups. There was no significant correlation between OPN and αvβ3 integrin staining intensity in the mid-luteal phase biopsies in any of the groups studied.Endometrial OPN and αvβ3 integrin expression or co-expression is not impaired during the window of implantation in patients with Stage I-II endometriosis. Further studies are needed to determine whether these results imply normal endometrial receptivity in such patients or add to the increasing uncertainty about the clinical value of assessing the endometrium with these markers of implantation.mRNA-binding protein TIA-1 reduces cytokine expression in human endometrial stromal cells and is down-regulated in ectopic endometrium.Cytokines and growth factors play important roles in endometrial function and the pathogenesis of endometriosis. mRNAs encoding cytokines and growth factors undergo rapid turnover; primarily mediated by adenosine- and uridine-rich elements (AREs) located in their 3'-untranslated regions. T-cell intracellular antigen (TIA-1), an mRNA-binding protein, binds to AREs in target transcripts, leading to decreased gene expression.The purpose of this article was to determine whether TIA-1 plays a role in the regulation of endometrial cytokine and growth factor expression during the normal menstrual cycle and whether TIA-1 expression is altered in women with endometriosis.Eutopic endometrial tissue obtained from women without endometriosis (n = 30) and eutopic and ectopic endometrial tissues from women with endometriosis (n = 17) were immunostained for TIA-1. Staining intensities were evaluated by histological scores (HSCOREs). The regulation of endometrial TIA-1 expression by immune factors and steroid hormones was studied by treating primary cultured human endometrial stromal cells (HESCs) with vehicle, lipopolysaccharide, TNF-α, IL-6, estradiol, or progesterone, followed by protein blot analyses. HESCs were engineered to over- or underexpress TIA-1 to test whether TIA-1 regulates IL-6 or TNF-α expression in these cells.We found that TIA-1 is expressed in endometrial stromal and glandular cells throughout the menstrual cycle and that this expression is significantly higher in the perimenstrual phase. In women with endometriosis, TIA-1 expression in eutopic and ectopic endometrium was reduced compared with TIA-1 expression in eutopic endometrium of unaffected control women. Lipopolysaccharide and TNF-α increased TIA-1 expression in HESCs in vitro, whereas IL-6 or steroid hormones had no effect. In HESCs, down-regulation of TIA-1 resulted in elevated IL-6 and TNF-α expression, whereas TIA-1 overexpression resulted in decreased IL-6 and TNF-α expression.Endometrial TIA-1 is regulated throughout the menstrual cycle, TIA-1 modulates the expression of immune factors in endometrial cells, and downregulation of TIA-1 may contribute to the pathogenesis of endometriosis.Hyperprolactinemia and luteal insufficiency in infertile patients with mild and minimal endometriosis.The objective of the present paper was to assess the presence of hormonal alterations in infertile women with stage I or II endometriosis (Group III, n = 20) compared to fertile women without endometriosis (Group I, n = 14) and to fertile women with endometriosis (Group II, n = 7). Serum levels of FSH, LH, estradiol, TSH, and PRL were measured between days 1 and 5 of the early follicular phase; in the luteal phase, three serum samples were collected for progesterone measurement, and endometrial biopsies were performed. Serum estradiol levels were lower (p = 0.035) in infertile patients with endometriosis than in fertile patients without endometriosis. Six infertile patients with endometriosis presented prolactin levels above 20 ng/ml. This was not observed in the other groups. Luteal insufficiency was more frequent in infertile patients with endometriosis (78.9%) than in fertile patients with (42.9%) or without endometriosis (0%). In a multiple logistic regression analysis, only the presence of endometriosis and infertility was significantly associated with luteal insufficiency. The serum levels of LH, FSH, and TSH were not significantly different among the groups. Luteal insufficiency and altered prolactin secretion were associated with endometriosis, and could be important mechanisms causing infertility in this group of patients.Increased expression of macrophage colony-stimulating factor and its receptor in patients with endometriosis.To investigate the expression and regulation of colony-stimulating factor 1 (CSF-1) and its receptor, C-FMS, in endometriosis.In vivo and vitro study.University-based academic medical center.Reproductive-age women undergoing surgery for benign conditions.Peritoneal and endometrial tissue samples were obtained.CSF-1 and C-FMS expression.Significantly higher CSF-1 levels were found in peritoneal fluid of patients with endometriosis compared with control subjects. Ectopic endometriotic tissue had 3.5-fold and 1.7-fold increases in CSF-1 and C-FMS expression, respectively, compared with eutopic tissue. Coculture of endometrial cells from either established cell lines or patient samples with peritoneal mesothelial cells (PMCs) led to increased expression of CSF-1 and C-FMS. A higher but nonsignificant increase in levels of C-FMS and CSF-1 was found in cocultures of endometrial epithelial cells from patients with endometriosis compared with those without endometriosis.Increased CSF-1 levels may contribute to endometriosis lesion formation and progression. Elevation in CSF-1 after coculture of endometrial cells with PMCs suggests that endometrial tissue may be a source of peritoneal CSF-1. Increased C-FMS expression in endometrial cells from women with endometriosis cocultured with PMCs suggests that endometrial tissue involved in lesion formation is highly responsive to CSF-1 signaling.Clinical usefulness of determination of CA 125 levels in the serum and menstrual blood.We measured CA 125 levels in sera and menstrual blood of subjects with a normal ovulatory cycle and in those with endometriosis. Serum CA 125 levels were higher in the latter, in each phase of the menstrual cycle. The CA 125 levels in patients with endometriosis, particularly those with adenomyosis, tend to be higher than in those with a normal ovulatory cycle. We propose that measurement of CA 125 in the menstrual blood may be able to help distinguishing adenomyosis from myoma uteri and may also help in assessing clinical endometriosis.Physiologic activation of nuclear factor kappa-B in the endometrium during the menstrual cycle is altered in endometriosis patients.To evaluate nuclear factor kappaB (NF-κB) activation and NF-κB-p65 subunit activation, immunolocalization, and expression in the endometrium of healthy women and endometriosis patients throughout the menstrual cycle.Prospective observational study.Affiliated hospital and university research laboratory.Twenty-four healthy women and 24 endometriosis patients.Menstrual, proliferative, and secretory endometrial biopsies.Assessment of NF-κB and p65 activation by protein-DNA binding assays and p65 localization and expression by immunohistochemistry.Total NF-κB-DNA binding was constitutive and variable in human endometrium accross the menstrual cycle. Healthy women (physiologic conditions) showed higher p65-DNA binding in proliferative than in menstrual and secretory endometrium. Conversely, in endometriosis patients, p65-DNA binding was higher in proliferative and secretory endometrium than in menstrual endometrium. Endometrial epithelial cells showed higher p65 expression level score than endometrial stromal cells.NF-κB activity is constitutive, physiologic, and variable in human endometrium. The physiologic cyclic p65 activation pattern was altered in endometriosis patients, showing no cyclic variation between the proliferative and secretory phase of the menstrual cycle. The absence of decreased p65 activity in secretory endometrium from endometriosis patients is concurrent with progesterone resistance and could participate in endometrial biologic alterations during the implantation window in endometriosis patients.Different types of small nerve fibers in eutopic endometrium and myometrium in women with endometriosis.To investigate types of nerve fibers in endometrium and myometrium in women with endometriosis.Laboratory study using human tissue.University-based laboratory.Women with and without endometriosis undergoing hysterectomy.Histologic sections of contiguous endometrial and myometrial tissues were prepared from hysterectomies performed on women with and without endometriosis.Types and density of nerve fibers in endometrium and myometrium in women with and without endometriosis were determined using a series of specific markers for neuronal structure and function: PGP9.5, NF, SP, CGRP, TH, VAChT, VIP, and NPY.Nerve fibers stained with PGP9.5 and NF in endometrium and myometrium were significantly increased in women with endometriosis compared with women without endometriosis. Nerve fibers in the functional layer of endometrium in women with endometriosis were likely to be sensory C, a mixture of sensory A delta, sensory C, and adrenergic fibers in the basal layer of the endometrium, a mixture of sensory A delta, sensory C, adrenergic and cholinergic fibers in the myometrium.Increased nerve fiber density in endometrium and myometrium, and sensory C fibers and adrenergic nerve fibers in the endometrium in women with endometriosis may play an important role in the mechanisms of pain generation in this condition.Matrix metalloproteinase-9 and tissue inhibitor of metalloproteinase-3 mRNA expression in ectopic and eutopic endometrium in women with endometriosis: a rationale for endometriotic invasiveness.To investigate mRNA expression of metalloproteinase-9 (MMP-9) and tissue inhibitor of metalloproteinase-3 (TIMP-3) in ectopic endometriosis tissue and uterine endometrium from women with and without endometriosis throughout the menstrual cycle.Molecular studies in human tissue.Department of Gynecology and Obstetrics, Reproductive Immunology Laboratory, Stanford University Medical Center.Fifty-three premenopausal woman (23 women with endometriosis and 30 women without endometriosis undergoing laparoscopic surgery). Endometrium and ectopic endometriosis tissue were obtained at the time of surgery.None.mRNA expression from eutopic and ectopic endometrium was analyzed by quantitative, competitive PCR.Both uterine endometrium and ectopic endometriotic tissue from women with endometriosis expressed significantly (P<.05) lower levels of TIMP-3 than endometrium from normal women. Also, ectopic endometrium expressed higher levels of MMP-9 and a higher ratio of MMP-9/TIMP-3 than eutopic endometrium from normal and endometriosis patients.These results suggest that ectopic and eutopic endometrium from endometriosis patients may be more invasive and prone to peritoneal implantation because of greater MMP and less TIMP-3 mRNA expression than endometrium from women without endometriosis. Thus, increased proteolytic activity may be one of the reasons for the invasive properties of the endometrium, resulting in the development of endometriosis.Differential proteome profiling of eutopic endometrium from women with endometriosis to understand etiology of endometriosis.The identification of molecular differences in the endometrium of women with endometriosis is an important step toward understanding the pathogenesis of this condition and for developing novel strategies for the treatment of associated infertility and pain. In this study, we investigated protein expression analysis of eutopic endometrium from women with and without endometriosis. The proteomic analysis revealed molecular dysregulation of more than 70 proteins in the proliferative phase of eutopic endometrium in stage IV and secretory phase of stage II, III and IV endometriosis. Using mass spectrometry, 48 proteins spots which were consistently differentially expressed from stage II to IV endometriosis were identified. The differentially expressed proteins include structural proteins, proteins involved in stress response, protein-folding and protein-turnover, immunity, energy production, signal transduction, RNA biogenesis, protein biosynthesis, and nuclear proteins. Immunoblot and immunohistochemical analyses confirmed the observed changes in eight representative proteins. The present study provides identification of new players that have a potential role in the initiation and progression of endometriosis and also sets a framework for further investigations on mechanisms underlying the pathogenesis of endometriosis.Increased expression of matrix metalloproteinase-9 in the eutopic endometrial tissue of women with endometriosis.Endometriosis is a disease where endometrial tissue implants in ectopic locations. Remodelling of the extracellular matrix (ECM) is a prerequisite for the implantation of this tissue to be possible.In this study, we detected immunoreactive matrix metalloproteinase-9 (MMP-9) throughout endometrial tissue and identified von Willebrand factor (vWF)-positive endothelial cells, CD45-positive leukocytes, CD3-positive T lymphocytes and CD68-positive macrophages as cells expressing MMP-9 in the stroma.We found an increased expression of MMP-9 in the uterine endometrial tissue of women with endometriosis, as assessed by zymography and enzyme-linked immunosorbent assay (ELISA) (P < 0.05). However, RT-PCR did not show a statistically significant increase in MMP-9 mRNA expression in these tissues (P = 0.14). There was no significant difference between women with and without endometriosis in the expression of tissue inhibitor of MMPs (TIMP)-1, a known natural inhibitor of the pro- and active forms of MMP-9, whether tested by ELISA or by RT-PCR (P = 0.46 and 0.37, respectively). Interestingly, the ratio of MMP-9/TIMP-1 expression was significantly higher in women with endometriosis than in normal women both at the protein and the mRNA levels (P < 0.05).These findings make plausible the involvement of MMP-9/TIMP-1 imbalance in the invasiveness of the endometrial tissue of patients with endometriosis and the ectopic development of the disease.Density of small diameter sensory nerve fibres in endometrium: a semi-invasive diagnostic test for minimal to mild endometriosis.The aim of our study was to test the hypothesis that multiple-sensory small-diameter nerve fibres are present in a higher density in endometrium from patients with endometriosis when compared with women with a normal pelvis, enabling the development of a semi-invasive diagnostic test for minimal-mild endometriosis.Secretory phase endometrium samples (n = 40), obtained from women with laparoscopically/histologically confirmed minimal-mild endometriosis (n = 20) and from women with a normal pelvis (n = 20) were selected from the biobank at the Leuven University Fertility Centre. Immunohistochemistry was performed to localize neural markers for sensory C, Adelta, adrenergic and cholinergic nerve fibres in the functional layer of the endometrium. Sections were immunostained with anti-human protein gene product 9.5 (PGP9.5), anti-neurofilament protein, anti-substance P (SP), anti-vasoactive intestinal peptide (VIP), anti-neuropeptide Y and anti-calcitonine gene-related polypeptide. Statistical analysis was done using the Mann-Whitney U-test, receiver operator characteristic analysis, stepwise logistic regression and least-squares support vector machines.The density of small nerve fibres was approximately 14 times higher in endometrium from patients with minimal-mild endometriosis (1.96 +/- 2.73) when compared with women with a normal pelvis (0.14 +/- 0.46, P < 0.0001).The combined analysis of neural markers PGP9.5, VIP and SP could predict the presence of minimal-mild endometriosis with 95% sensitivity, 100% specificity and 97.5% accuracy. To confirm our findings, prospective studies are required.Expression of integrins and E-cadherin in cells from menstrual effluent, endometrium, peritoneal fluid, peritoneum, and endometriosis.To detect the expression of integrins and E-cadherin in cells from peritoneal fluid (PF), endometrium, menstrual effluent, peritoneum, and endometriotic lesions during the early follicular phase of the menstrual cycle.An immunohistochemical study.Tertiary care university medical center.Sixteen patients undergoing a diagnostic laparoscopy as part of a subfertility work-up. All patients had regular and ovulatory cycles.A laparoscopy was performed in the early follicular phase (days 2 to 5). Simultaneously, samples were taken from endometrium, menstrual effluent, and PF, and a representative biopsy of an endometriotic lesion was obtained. If endometriosis was not noted, a peritoneal biopsy was obtained instead.The expression of cell adhesion molecules, including the integrin alpha 2 beta 1, alpha 3 beta 1, alpha 4 beta 1, alpha 5 beta 1, and alpha 6 beta 1 and E-cadherin, as determined by immunohistochemistry on frozen sections.All integrins tested could be detected in the endometrium samples and in endometriotic lesions. In menstrual effluent samples, positive staining for the integrins alpha 2 beta 1 and alpha 3 beta 1 was found in epithelial cells in 13 of 16 cases. Integrin alpha 5 beta 1 was detected in 11 of 16 samples, and integrins alpha 4 beta 1 and alpha 6 beta 1 were detected in 5 of 16 samples. In PF, integrin alpha 3 beta 1 was found in epithelial cells in 12 of 16 samples, integrin alpha 5 beta 1 in 5 of 16, and integrins alpha 4 beta 1 in 2 of 16. The antibody for E-cadherin showed positive staining of epithelial cells in 6 of 16 menstrual effluent samples. All endometrial tissue samples showed positive staining for E-cadherin. In PF, E-cadherin was detected in the epithelial cells of one sample. One peritoneum biopsy revealed positive staining for E-cadherin.Integrins alpha 2 beta 1, alpha 3 beta 1, alpha 4 beta 1, alpha 5 beta 1, and E-cadherin, important cell adhesion molecules, are expressed in endometriotic lesions and in cells and tissues that are potentially involved in the development of endometriosis. These cell adhesion molecules could be involved in the shedding of endometrial tissue during menstruation and the attachment of endometrial tissue fragments to the peritoneum.[Study on microRNA expression in endometrium of luteal phase and its relationship with infertility of endometriosis].To study the different expression of microRNA(miRNA) including mir-29c, mir-200a, mir-145 in the mid-secretary endometrium and its relationship with infertility of endometriosis.From August 2011 to February 2013, 36 infertile cases with endometriosis confirmed by laparoscopy and pathology and excluded the other infertile factors in Department of Reproductive Medicine in Peking University Shenzhen Hospital were enrolled in this study, which were divided into 17 cases with stage I-II, 19 cases with stage III-IV according to the revised classification American Fertility Society. Forty-four healthy women with male factor infertility were chosen as control group. The relative expression levels of mir-29c, mir-200a, mir-145 in the endometrium of women in two groups were detected by using real-time quantitative polymerase chain reaction. Those women were followed up for pregnancy outcome of endometriosis group after assisted reproductive techniques (pregnancy and non-pregnancy group respectively).(1) The expression of miRNA between endometriosis and control groups:the average expression level of mir-29c, mir-200a, mir-145 in the endometrium of endometriosis group was 2.46 ± 1.98, 3.20 ± 2.45, 6.378 ± 3.275, which were significantly higher than 1.36 ± 1.05, 2.04 ± 1.16, 4.548 ± 1.885 in control group (P = 0.026, 0.027, 0.041, respectively). (2) The expression of miRNA between I-II stage and III-IV: the average expression level of mir-29c, mir-200a, mir-145 in the endometrium was 0.53 ± 0.51, 0.33 ± 0.26, 0.048 ± 0.021 in patients with of stage I-II, while 0.26 ± 0.18, 0.28 ± 0.12, 0.045 ± 0.016 in stage III-IV respectively, there were no statistically significant differences between the two groups (P = 0.191,0.661,0.753, respectively) . (3) The expression of miRNA between pregnancy and non-pregnancy groups:the average expression level of mir-29c, mir-200a, mir-145 in the endometrium were 0.60 ± 0.30, 1.23 ± 0.48, 0.886 ± 0.238 in pregnancy group, while 2.64 ± 1.73, 4.39 ± 2.58, 7.199 ± 3.945 in non pregnancy group, there were statistically significant differences between the two groups (P = 0.030,0.039,0.028, respectively).Up-regulation of mir-29c, mir-200a, mir-145 in the endometrial tissue might play a role in endometriosis associated infertility.ProteinChip technology is a useful method in the pathogenesis and diagnosis of endometriosis: a preliminary study.To test the feasibility of ProteinChip (Ciphergen Biosystems, Inc., Fremont, CA) technology as a proteomic tool in discovering and identifying proteins that are differentially expressed in endometrium, endometriotic tissue, and normal peritoneum from women with and without endometriosis.Differential analysis of protein expression in women with and without endometriosis.University hospital.A total of nine patients during their secretory phase (days 20-22) were selected for this study on the basis of cycle phase and presence/or absence of endometriosis.Twelve tissues used in the study included six endometrial biopsies from women with mild endometriosis (n = 3) and a normal pelvis (n = 3) as well as paired samples of peritoneal endometriotic lesions (n = 3) and macroscopically normal peritoneum biopsies (n = 3) from three women with endometriosis.Numerous expression differences were observed in the above comparisons, representing both up-regulation and down-regulation in protein and peptide expression levels.Endometrial expression for a number of proteins and peptides in the range of 2.8-12.3 kDa was 3-24 times lower in women with endometriosis than in those without endometriosis. When compared with normal peritoneum, endometriotic lesions showed an increased expression for a set of proteins and peptides in the range of 3-96 kDa, and especially an up-regulated cluster of proteins between 22 and 23 kDa, identified to be transgelin, a smooth muscle actin-binding protein.This preliminary study demonstrated that differential protein profiling by using ProteinChip array technology is feasible, reproducible, and may be developed into a powerful tool for endometriosis research.Functional microRNA involved in endometriosis.Endometriosis is a common disease seen by gynecologists. Clinical features involve pelvic pain and unexplained infertility. Although endometriosis is pathologically characterized by endometrial tissue outside the normal uterine location, endometriosis is otherwise not easily explained. Endometriomas, endometriotic cysts of the ovary, typically cause pain and distortion of pelvic anatomy. To begin to understand the pathogenesis of endometriomas, we describe the first transcriptome-microRNAome analysis of endometriomas and eutopic endometrium using next-generation sequencing technology. Using this approach, we generated a total of more than 54 million independent small RNA reads from our 19 clinical samples. At the microRNA level, we found 10 microRNA that were up-regulated (miR-202, 193a-3p, 29c, 708, 509-3-5p, 574-3p, 193a-5p, 485-3p, 100, and 720) and 12 microRNA that were down-regulated (miR-504, 141, 429, 203, 10a, 200b, 873, 200c, 200a, 449b, 375, and 34c-5p) in endometriomas compared with endometrium. Using in silico prediction algorithms, we correlated these microRNA with their corresponding differentially expressed mRNA targets. To validate the functional roles of microRNA, we manipulated levels of miR-29c in an in vitro system of primary cultures of human endometrial stromal fibroblasts. Extracellular matrix genes that were potential targets of miR-29c in silico were significantly down-regulated using this biological in vitro system. In vitro functional studies using luciferase reporter constructs further confirmed that miR-29c directly affects specific extracellular matrix genes that are dysregulated in endometriomas. Thus, miR-29c and other abnormally regulated microRNA appear to play important roles in the pathophysiology of uterine function and dysfunction.Clinical usefulness of CA-125 levels in the menstrual discharge in patients with endometriosis.Altered expression of interleukin-18 in the ectopic and eutopic endometrium of women with endometriosis.This study has investigated the expression of interleukin (IL)-18 in the eutopic and ectopic endometrium of women with endometriosis and the role of IL-18 on the pathogenesis of endometriosis.Endometriotic tissue specimens and endometrium specimens were obtained from patients with endometriosis. IL-18 protein was determined by immunohistochemical analysis. Expression levels of IL-18 mRNA were analyzed by reverse transcriptase (RT)-PCR.IL-18 was detected in the glandular epithelial and stromal cells of eutopic and ectopic endometrium. RT-PCR analysis showed that endometrial IL-18 mRNA expression levels were significantly higher at the secretory phase than the proliferative phase in normal women, but not in patients with endometriosis. IL-18 mRNA expression levels were lower in the ectopic endometrium than in the eutopic endometrium of women with endometriosis. IL-18 mRNA levels in both ectopic and eutopic endometrium of patients with endometriosis were lower than in endometrium of women without endometriosis.Ectopic and eutopic endometrial IL-18 was down-regulated in women with endometriosis, suggesting that IL-18 might play a pathogenic role in the formation of endometriosis.A pilot study to evaluate the relative efficacy of endometrial biopsy and full curettage in making a diagnosis of endometriosis by the detection of endometrial nerve fibers.The purpose of this study was to evaluate endometrial biopsy and curettage in detecting small nerve fibers in eutopic endometrium for diagnosis of endometriosis.Endometrial biopsies with precise, consistent technique and curettings were taken from 37 women (20 with endometriosis and 17 without endometriosis). Sensitivity, specificity, and positive and negative predictive value were formally calculated. Endometrial nerve fibers were immunohistochemically detected using the pan-neuronal marker PGP9.5.Small nerve fibers were detected in all endometrial biopsies and curettings from all 20 women with endometriosis, but were not detected in endometrium taken from 17 women without endometriosis. Mean (+/-SD) nerve fiber density in the endometrial biopsies was 26.8 per mm(2) +/- 55.9 (range, 1.6-125) and for curettings was 21.6 per mm(2) +/- 33.1 (range, 0.8-250), with 100% specificity, sensitivity, and positive and negative predictive value.Careful endometrial biopsy combined with immunohistochemical staining for nerve fibers may be a reliable means of diagnosing or excluding endometriosis.Apoptosis pattern in human endometrium in women with pelvic endometriosis.In the present study we aimed to describe apoptosis patterns in eutopic endometrium in women suffering from endometriosis in order to assess its value as a marker of early forms of endometriosis, and also to try to answer whether endometriosis is caused by changes within the eutopic endometrium or whether endometriotic lesions change the characteristics of eutopic endometrium.The study was performed on 125 women treated in Division of Reproduction. In 52 patients peritoneal endometriosis was diagnosed (I(0)-23; II(0)-29). Seventy-three patients in whom no endometriotic foci could be found at laparoscopy were qualified as the control group. Endometrial biopsy 7-9 days after ovulation was taken for assessment of apoptosis (TUNEL) and routine histology.Apoptosis indices in the eutopic endometrium of women with endometriosis were lower compared to women without endometriosis. In the endometrial glands apoptosis indices were 2.94+/-1.66 versus 5.23+/-2.06 (p<0.01) in the group of women with and without endometriosis, respectively. In the endometrial stroma apoptosis indices were estimated at 2.04+/-1.72 in women with endometriosis and 4.12+/-1.62 in the control group (p<0.01).The observed changes could support the hypothesis of the different properties of eutopic endometrium in endometriotic women as a causing factor of peritoneal endometriosis.Expression of the transmembrane mucins, MUC1, MUC4 and MUC16, in normal endometrium and in endometriosis.Are the transmembrane mucins, MUC1, MUC4 and MUC16, differentially expressed in endometriosis compared with normal endometrium?This study revealed that transmembrane mucin expression does not vary significantly in normal endometrium during the menstrual cycle and is not altered in endometriosis relative to the epithelial marker, cytokeratin-18 (KRT18).Increased serum levels of the transmembrane mucin fragments MUC1, MUC4 and MUC16 that normally dominate the apical surface of simple epithelia are found in several pathological conditions, including endometriosis. Altered mucin expression in gynecologic diseases may promote infertility or endometrial pathologies.This was a laboratory-based study of samples from 12 endometriosis patients as well as non-endometriosis control samples obtained from 31 patients.Total RNA was isolated from endometrial biopsies of ectopic and eutopic endometrium from women with endometriosis and control patients from different stages of the menstrual cycle. Quantitative (q)-RT-PCR analyses were performed for the mucins, MUC1, MUC4 and MUC16, relative to the epithelial marker, cytokeratin-18 (KRT18), or β-actin (ACTB). Frozen sections from endometrial biopsies of proliferative and mid-secretory stage women with endometriosis were immunostained for MUC1, MUC4 and MUC16.qRT-PCR analyses of MUC1 and MUC16 mRNA revealed that these mucins do not vary significantly during the menstrual cycle nor are they altered in women with endometriosis relative to the epithelial marker, KRT18. MUC4 mRNA is expressed at very low levels relative to MUC1 and MUC16 under all conditions. There was little difference in MUC1 and MUC16 expression between eutopic endometrial and ectopic endometriotic tissues. MUC4 expression also was not significantly higher in the ectopic endometriotic tissues. Immunostaining for all three mucins reveals robust expression of MUC1 and MUC16 at the apical surfaces of endometrial epithelia, but little to no staining for MUC4.qRT-PCR analysis was the main method used for mucin detection. Additional studies with stage III-IV endometriotic tissue would be useful to determine if changes in MUC1 and MUC16 expression occur, or if MUC4 expression increases, at later stages of endometriosis.We report a comprehensive comparative profile of the major transmembrane mucins, MUC1, MUC4 and MUC16, relative to the epithelial marker, KRT18, in normal cycling endometrium and in endometriosis, and indicate constitutive expression. Previous studies have profiled the expression of individual mucins relative to β-actin and indicate accumulation in the luteal phase. Thus, these differences in interpretation appear to reflect the increased epithelial content of endometrium during the luteal phase.This study was supported by: NIH R01HD29963 to D.D.C.; NIH U54HD007495 to S.M.H.; and NIH R01HD067721 to S.L.Y. and B.A.L. The authors have no competing interests to declare.The ferroimmunomodulatory role of ectopic endometriotic stromal cells in ovarian endometriosis.To understand the role of ectopic endometriotic stromal cells in ovarian endometriosis (OEM) and the associated risks for infertility and carcinogenesis.Analyses of secreted proteins and gene expression using immortalized eutopic/ectopic endometrial(-otic) stromal cells from OEM.University.Women with and without OEM.Samples of endometrial(-otic) tissue from women with or without OEM.Immunohistochemical analysis of oxidative stress in OEM, gene expression profiles, and the identification of secreted proteins by mass spectrometry in immortalized endometrial(-otic) stromal cells.4-Hydroxy-2-nonenal-modified proteins and carboxymethyllysine were abundant in the stroma, rather than epithelia, of OEM patients, indicating the presence of oxidative stress. Immortalized ectopic endometriotic stromal cells exhibited high IRP1/IRP2/HIF-1β expression and contained lower amounts of iron and copper than their eutopic counterparts. Expression profiles, in combination with protein identification, revealed that complement component 3 (C3) and pentraxin-3 (PTX3) are the major proteins secreted from immortalized ectopic endometriotic stromal cells. Complement-3/PTX3 promoted the secretion of various cytokines by THP1 macrophage cells and thus supported M1 differentiation.Immortalized ectopic endometriotic stromal cells in OEM predominantly secrete C3 and PTX3 and exhibit a differential regulation of iron metabolism.Additive effects of inflammation and stress reaction on Toll-like receptor 4-mediated growth of endometriotic stromal cells.Is there any combined effect between inflammation and stress reaction on Toll-like receptor 4 (TLR4)-mediated growth of endometriotic cells?A combined effect of local inflammation and stress reaction in the pelvic environment may be involved in TLR4-mediated growth of endometriotic stromal cells.In endometriosis, higher endotoxin levels in the menstrual fluid (MF) and peritoneal fluid (PF) and higher tissue concentrations of human heat shock protein 70 (HSP70) in the eutopic and ectopic endometria promote TLR4-mediated growth of endometriotic cells.This is a case-controlled research study with prospective collection and retrospective evaluation of sera, MF, PF and endometrial tissues from 43 women with and 20 women without endometriosis.PF was collected from 43 women with endometriosis and 20 control women during laparoscopy. Sera and endometrial biopsy specimens were collected from a proportion of these women. MF was collected from a separate population of 20 women with endometriosis and 15 control women. HSP70 concentrations in sera, MF, PF and in culture media were measured by ELISA. Gene expression of HSP70 by endometrial cells in response to lipopolysaccharide (LPS) was examined by qRT-PCR. The individual and combined effects of LPS and HSP70 on the secretion of interleukin-6 (IL-6) and tumor necrosis factor α (TNFα) by PF-derived macrophages (M[Symbol: see text]) were examined by ELISA, while their effects on endometrial cell proliferation were examined by bromodeoxyuridine and [(3)H]-thymidine incorporation assay.Concentrations of HSP70 were maximal in MF, intermediate in PF and the lowest in sera. In MF and PF, HSP70 levels were higher in women with endometriosis than in controls. LPS stimulated gene expression and secretion of HSP70 by eutopic endometrial stromal cells (ESCs) and this effect was abrogated after pretreatment of cells with an anti-TLR4 antibody. This effect was significantly higher for ESCs derived from women with endometriosis than for ESCs from control women. Exogenous treatment with either HSP70 or LPS significantly stimulated the production of IL-6 and TNFα by M[Symbol: see text] and promoted the proliferation of ESCs, and a significant additive effect between LPS and HSP70 was observed. While individual treatment with either polymyxin B, an LPS antagonist, or anti-HSP70 antibody was unable to suppress the combined effects of LPS and HSP70 on cytokine secretion or ESC proliferation, pretreatment of cells with the anti-TLR4 antibody was able to significantly suppress their combined effects.Further studies are needed to examine the mutual role between other secondary inflammatory mediators and endogenous stress proteins in promoting pelvic inflammation and growth of endometriotic stromal cells.Our findings suggest that endotoxin and HSP70 are mutually involved in a stress reaction and in inflammation. A combined effect between local inflammation and a stress reaction in pelvic environment may be involved in TLR4-mediated growth of endometriotic cells. Since endometriosis is a multi-factorial disease, it is difficult to explain uniformly its growth regulation by a single factor. Our findings may provide some new insights in understanding the physiopathology or pathogenesis of endometriosis and may hold new therapeutic potential.This work was supported by Grants-in-Aid for Scientific Research (grant no. 16591671 and 18591837) from the Ministry of Education, Sports, Culture, Science and Technology of Japan (to K.N.K.). There is no conflict of interest related to this study.Not applicable.Expression of vascular endothelial growth factor (VEGF) and its soluble receptor-1 in endometriosis.The aim of this study is to evaluate the expression of vascular endothelial growth factor (VEGF) and its soluble receptor (sFlt-1) in peritoneal fluid (PF), peritoneal endometriotic lesions and eutopic endometrial tissues of patients with endometriosis. Peritoneal fluid, peritoneal endometriotic lesions and eutopic endometrial samples from patients with endometriosis, and peritoneal fluid, peritoneal tissue and endometrial samples from patients without endometriosis were obtained during an operative laparoscopy. The mean PF concentrations of VEGF and sFlt-1 were significantly higher in patients with endometriosis than in the controls. In the peritoneal tissue, the expressions of VEGF and sFlt-1 were significantly higher, where the expression of sFlt-1 in endometrium was significantly lower in patients with endometriosis. These findings indicate that not only abnormal expressions of angiogenic factors, but also aberrant expressions of antiangiogenic factors in the peritoneal and endometrial environment seem to be involved in the pathogenesis of endometriosis.[Expression of integrin beta 3 and intracellular adhesion molecule in endometrium and endometriotic tissue].To study the relationship between integrin beta 3, intracellular adhesion molecule (ICAM) and endometriosis.The expression of integrin beta 3 and ICAM protein were determined in 3 batches by immunoblotting method in 15 endometrium and 15 endometriotic tissues of patients with endometriosis and 30 endometrium from non-endometriosis subjects during the same menstrual phase. The results were scanned and semi-quantified, and then analysed by F test and t test.The results from 3 measurements showed the same trend. Endometrium from patients with endometriosis expressed significantly fewer integrin beta 3 and ICAM protein than those without endometriosis. On the other hand, the expression of integrin beta 3 in endometriotic tissue was significantly lower while the ICAM expression was significantly higher than those in controls.In patients with endometriosis, integrin beta 3 and ICAM expression changed significantly from eutopic to ectopic endometrium which may be related to the development of endometriosis and infertility.Endometrial vascular and glandular expression of integrin alpha(v)beta3 in women with and without endometriosis.The integrin alpha(v)beta3 functions in both cell-cell and cell-extracellular matrix adhesion, and has reported roles in platelet aggregation, immune function, tissue repair, tumour invasion, angiogenesis and uterine receptivity. The aim of this study was to use immunohistochemistry to describe the vascular and glandular expression of integrin alpha(v)beta3 in formalin fixed, paraffin embedded endometrium obtained from women with (n = 29) and without (n = 24) endometriosis. The results showed a significant increase in the percentage of vessels expressing alpha(v)beta3 in the endometrium of women with endometriosis compared with controls (P = 0.0001). This difference was more pronounced in the secretory phase (P = 0.001) than the proliferative phase (P = 0.016). There was no correlation between vascular alpha(v)beta3 expression and the endothelial cell proliferation index (P > 0.05). Vascular sprouts were not observed in any of the 53 endometrial tissues obtained from women with or without endometriosis throughout the menstrual cycle. Results from semi-quantitative scoring of gland immunostaining showed that neither controls (P = 0.3329) nor the endometriosis group (P = 0.2260) had any significant changes in terms of alpha(v)beta3 expression between the different stages of the menstrual cycle. There was also no difference in glandular alpha(v)beta3 expression between women with and without endometriosis (P = 0.4302). These results provide evidence for increased endometrial angiogenesis in women with endometriosis compared with controls, and suggest that glandular expression of alpha(v)beta3 is not related to uterine receptivity per se.Transcriptional changes in the expression of chemokines related to natural killer and T-regulatory cells in patients with deep infiltrative endometriosis.To evaluate the expression of chemokines that regulate natural killer (NK) and T-regulatory (T-reg) cell activity in eutopic and ectopic endometrial tissue samples from endometriosis patients.Case-control study (Canadian Task Force classification II-2).Tertiary referral hospital.Sixty-four consecutive patients with and without endometriosis.After videolaparoscopy, patients were divided into three groups: bowel endometriosis (n = 22), retrocervical endometriosis (n = 10), and endometriosis-free women (n = 32).Gene expression of the chemokines that regulate NK (CXCL9, CXCL10, CXCL11, CXCL12, XCL1, and CX3CL1) and T-reg cell activity (CCL17 and CCL21) evaluated by real-time polymerase chain reaction.Of the chemokines associated with NK cells, CX3CL1 and CXCL12 expression was statistically significantly greater in the foci of endometriosis compared with the eutopic endometrium in patients and controls. From the chemokines associated with T-reg cells, CCL17 expression was statistically significantly greater in the eutopic endometrium of the patients with rectosigmoid endometriosis compared with the foci of endometriosis or eutopic endometrium of the patients with retrocervical endometriosis or the disease-free women.Both T-reg and NK cells mediate inflammatory response and may play a fundamental role in endometriosis by causing an impaired clearing of endometrial cells. Establishing how CCL17, CXCL12, and CX3CL1 modulate this response is essential to understanding inflammatory responses in endometriosis.Lymphocyte subsets in the endometrium of patients with endometriosis throughout the menstrual cycle.Comparison and characterisation of different lymphocyte subsets in the endometrium of endometriosis patients and in healthy women on every day of the menstrual cycle with special emphasis on the CD4:CD8 ratio in the endometrium.Immunohistochemical staining of 253 endometrial biopsies of infertile women with and without endometriosis with Anti-Leu4 (CD3), Anti-Leu3a (CD4), Anti-Leu2a (CD8), Anti-Leu7 and Anti-Human-B-cell (CD22) using the immune peroxidase reaction. Identification and counting of positive lymphocyte were performed on cryostat sections.Endometrial lymphocyte subsets show equal quantity and distribution in endometriosis patients and in the control group. After a peak in the early proliferative phase the absolute number of T lymphocytes decreases while a predominance of T-suppressor/cytotoxic T lymphocytes (CD8) compared to T-helper/inducer lymphocytes (CD4) occurs towards the end of the menstrual cycle.Endometrium as the potential parent epithelia of endometriosis lesions seems not to be altered in its lymphatic cell content compared to healthy women. Furthermore, endometrium is clearly characterised as part of the mucosa associated lymphatic tissue (MALT). T lymphocytes show specific quantitative changes due to different phases of the menstrual cycle.Expression of Annexin-1 in patients with endometriosis.Annexin-1 was identified as an endometriosis-related protein by comparative proteomics in previous study. As an endogenous anti-inflammatory mediator, Annexin-1 has been shown to regulate the immune response, cell proliferation and apoptosis. To investigate whether Annexin-1 is involved in the pathogenesis of endometriosis, we examined the expression of Annexin-1 in eutopic endometrium of women with or without endometriosis, and detected its expression in peritoneal fluids of those with endometriosis.Eutopic endometrium samples from twenty-five women with endometriosis and those from sixteen age-matched women without endometriosis were collected. Peritoneal fluids were obtained from ten patients with endometriosis. The expression of Annexin-1 protein in eutopic endometrium was detected by immunohistochemistry and Western blotting, and mRNA detected by real-time PCR. Annexin-1 protein in the peritoneal fluids was detected by Western blotting.Annexin-1 mRNA and protein were overexpressed in eutopic endometrium of endometriosis without significant differences between the proliferative and secretory phase. Immunohistochemistry showed that Annexin-1 protein was expressed mainly in endometrial glandular cells throughout the menstrual cycle. Annexin-1 protein was detected in the peritoneal fluids of all the ten patients with endometriosis.Annexin-1 is overexpressed in eutopic endometrium and presents in the peritoneal fluids of patients with endometriosis, and may play a role in the pathogenesis of endometriosis.Menstrual effluent in endometriosis shows no difference in volume, VEGF-A, MMP2 and MMP9 or sFLT.Since retrograde menstruation is considered a key event in the aetiology of endometriosis, this study sought to determine whether the menstrual effluent of women with this condition is different from that of those with a normal pelvis. As the amount of blood lost during menstruation is thought to be higher in this group, measured objective menstrual blood loss (MBL) was measured. In addition, factors enhancing both ectopic implantation of endometrium and its subsequent growth (by establishing a neo-vasculature) were chosen for study. Our hypothesis was that they are increased in the menstrual effluent of women with endometriosis. The study showed that at the time of menstruation, there is no difference in MBL or in the volume of menstrual effluent between women with endometriosis and those with a normal pelvis at laparoscopy. In addition, vascular endothelial growth factor-A (VEGF-A) message and protein, soluble truncated receptor sVEGF-R1 (sFLT), matrix metalloproteinase (MMP) 2 and MMP9 activities were also shown to be similar between the two groups. It is concluded that the enhanced expression of VEGF-A and MMP in the peritoneal fluid and ectopic lesions of endometriotic patients may be a secondary event, resulting from an innate difference in peritoneal and systemic factors rather than in the endometrium, causing an abnormal peritoneal response to menstrual debris and facilitating its ectopic implantation.Apoptosis and bcl-2 expression in normal human endometrium, endometriosis and adenomyosis.Apoptosis has been implicated in the pathogenesis of several diseases and is partly regulated by bcl-2, which blocks the apoptotic pathway and promotes cell survival. Apoptosis and bcl-2 expression were examined in paired eutopic and ectopic endometrium from women with endometriosis (n = 30 samples) or adenomyosis (n = 15 samples) and compared with control endometrium (n = 30 samples). Apoptotic cells were detected using the dUTP nick-end labelling (TUNEL) assay for DNA fragmentation; bcl-2 expression was demonstrated with a streptavidin-biotin peroxidase immunohistochemical technique. Apoptotic cells were rare in eutopic, ectopic and control endometrium; there were no significant differences between subject groups nor between eutopic and ectopic endometrium. Stromal bcl-2 expression increased in the late secretory phase in control and eutopic endometrium in endometriosis; double labelling studies revealed that most stromal bcl-2+ cells were leukocytes. Stromal bcl-2 expression in endometriotic foci was significantly increased compared with the paired eutopic endometrium, did not vary with menstrual cycle and included a significant population of non-leukocytic bcl-2+ stromal cells. In contrast, stromal bcl-2 expression in adenomyosis remained at low levels and did not show significant cyclical variation. Glandular epithelial bcl-2 expression also varied with menstrual cycle phase and peaked in the proliferative phase; in contrast, surface epithelial bcl-2 expression increased in the late secretory phase. Elevated stromal bcl-2 expression in ovarian endometriotic lesions could have implications for the growth and survival of ectopic endometrial tissue at these sites.Decreased expression of the decoy interleukin-1 receptor type II in human endometriosis.Many of the biological changes occurring in the endometrium during the menstrual cycle bear a striking resemblance to those associated with inflammatory and reparative processes. Hence, it would not be surprising to find that cytokines known for their pro-inflammatory properties, such as interleukin-1 (IL-1), could play a key role in the physiology of this tissue and that their action would be tightly controlled by local mechanisms. In the present study, immunohistochemical and Western blot analyses show that in normal women (n = 39), the endometrial tissue expresses, in a cycle-dependent manner, the IL-1 receptor type II (IL-1RII), a molecule of which the only biological property known to date is that of capturing IL-1, inhibiting thereby its binding to the functional type I IL-1 receptor. IL-RII immunostaining was particularly intense within the lumen of the glands and at the apical side of surface epithelium. Interestingly, the intensity of staining was markedly less pronounced in the endometrium of women with endometriosis (n = 54), a disease believed to arise from the abnormal development of endometrial tissue outside the uterus, especially in the early stages of the disease (stages I and II). This study is the first to show the local expression in endometrial tissue of IL-1RII, a potent and specific down-regulator of IL-1 action and its decreased expression in women suffering from endometriosis.Cold-shock domain family member YB-1 expression in endometrium and endometriosis.The Y-box-binding protein (YB-1) is described as a potential oncogene highly expressed in tumors and associated with increased cell survival, proliferation, migration and anti-apoptotic signaling. The aim of our study was to examine the expression and role of YB-1 in human endometriosis (Eo) and its association with cell survival, proliferation and invasion.We analyzed the gene and protein expression levels of YB-1 by quantitative real-time RT-PCR and immunoassays, respectively, in peritoneal macrophages, ovarian endometrioma and eutopic endometrial tissues/cells derived from women with (n= 120) and without (n= 91) Eo. We also evaluated the functional consequences of YB-1 knockdown in the Z12 Eo cell line by measuring cell proliferation [3-(4,5-dimethylthiazol-2-yl)-2,5-diphenyltetrazoliumbromid cell proliferation assay], invasion (Matrigel invasion assay) and spontaneous and tumour necrosis factor (TNFα)-induced RANTES (regulated upon activation, normal T-cell expressed and secreted chemokine) expression and apoptosis (ELISA-based assay).YB-1 gene and protein expression was statistically significantly higher in ovarian lesions, eutopic endometrium and peritoneal macrophages of patients with Eo in comparison with the control group. Interestingly, the strongest YB-1 expression was observed in the epithelial compartment of endometrial tissues. In the Z12 cell line, YB-1 knockdown resulted in significant cell growth inhibitory effects including reduced cell proliferation and increased rates of spontaneous and TNFα-induced apoptosis. Significantly, higher RANTES expression and decreased cell invasion in vitro were also associated with YB-1 inactivation.High YB-1 expression could have an impact on the development and progression of Eo. This study suggests the role of YB-1 as a potential therapeutic target for Eo patients.Differential expression of CRH, UCN, CRHR1 and CRHR2 in eutopic and ectopic endometrium of women with endometriosis.Endometriosis is considered as a benign aseptic inflammatory disease, characterised by the presence of ectopic endometrium-like tissue. Its symptoms (mostly pain and infertility) are reported as constant stressors. Corticotropin releasing hormone (CRH) and urocortin (UCN) are neuropeptides, strongly related to stress and inflammation. The effects of CRH and UCN are mediated through CRHR1 and CRHR2 receptors which are implicated in several reproductive functions acting as inflammatory components. However, the involvement of these molecules to endometriosis remains unknown. The aim of this study was to examine the expression of CRHR1 and CRHR2 in endometriotic sites and to compare the expression of CRHR1 and CRHR2 in eutopic endometrium of endometriotic women to that of healthy women. We further compared the expression of CRH, UCN, CRHR1 and CRHR2 in ectopic endometrium to that in eutopic endometrium of women with endometriosis. Endometrial biopsy specimens were taken from healthy women (10 patients) and endometrial and endometriotic biopsy specimens were taken from women with endometriosis (16 patients). Τhe expression of CRH, UCN, CRHR1, and CRHR2 was tested via RT-PCR, immunohistochemistry and Western blotting. This study shows for the first time that CRH and UCN receptor subtypes CRHR1β and CRHR2α are expressed in endometriotic sites and that they are more strongly expressed (p<0.01) in eutopic endometrium of women with endometriosis compared to healthy women endometrium at the mRNA and protein level. CRH, UCN, CRHR1 and CRHR2 mRNA were also more highly expressed in ectopic rather than eutopic endometrium (CRH, UCN, CRHR2α: p<0.01, CRHR1β: p<0.05) and protein (CRH and UCN: p<0.05, CRHR1 and CRHR2: p<0.01) in women with endometriosis. These data indicate that CRH and UCN might play an immunoregulatory role in endometriotic sites by affecting reproductive functions such as decidualization and implantation of women with endometriosis.Expression of phosphoinositide-specific phospholipase C enzymes in normal endometrium and in endometriosis.To delineate the panel of expression of phosphoinositide-specific phospholipase C (PI-PLC) signaling enzymes in normal endometrium and in endometriosis.Clinical/experimental study.University.Healthy donor woman and endometriosis-affected woman.Normal endometrium and endometriosis surgical biopsies were analyzed using gene expression analyses methodology (reverse transcriptase-polymerase chain reaction [PCR], bioanalyses).Gene expression (messenger RNA concentration) measures of 12 PI-PLC enzymes: PI-PLC β1, PI-PLC β2, PI-PLC β3, PI-PLC β4, PI-PLC γ1, PI-PLC γ2, PI-PLC δ1, PI-PLC δ3, PI-PLC δ4, PI-PLC ε, PI-PLC η1, and PI-PLC η2.PI-PLC β1, PI-PLC β3, PI-PLC δ1, and PI-PLC δ3 enzymes were detected, although differently expressed in normal and endometriosis tissues.The involvement of PI-PLC enzymes in inflammation and the consistency of susceptible endometriosis loci with PI-PLC genes mapping corroborate the hypothesis that PI signaling might be involved in the pathogenesis of endometriosis.Inflammatory status influences aromatase and steroid receptor expression in endometriosis.Aberrant up-regulation of aromatase in eutopic endometrium and implants from women with endometriosis has been reported. Aromatase induction may be mediated by increased cyclooxygenase-2 (COX-2). Recently, we demonstrated that progesterone receptor (PR)-A and PR-B serve an antiinflammatory role in the uterus by antagonizing nuclear factor kappaB activation and COX-2 expression. PR-C, which antagonizes PR-B, is up-regulated by inflammation. Although estrogen receptor alpha (ERalpha) is implicated in endometriosis, an antiinflammatory role of ERbeta has been suggested. We examined stage-specific expression of aromatase, COX-2, ER, and PR isoform expression in eutopic endometrium, implants, peritoneum, and endometrioma samples from endometriosis patients. Endometrial and peritoneal biopsies were obtained from unaffected women and those with fibroids. Aromatase expression in eutopic endometrium from endometriosis patients was significantly increased compared with controls. Aromatase expression in endometriosis implants was markedly increased compared with eutopic endometrium. Aromatase mRNA levels were increased significantly in red implants relative to black implants and endometrioma cyst capsule. Moreover, COX-2 expression was increased in implants and in eutopic endometrium of women with endometriosis as compared with control endometrium. As observed for aromatase mRNA, the highest levels of COX-2 mRNA were found in red implants. The ratio of ERbeta/ERalpha mRNA was significantly elevated in endometriomas compared with endometriosis implants and eutopic endometrium. Expression of PR-C mRNA relative to PR-A and PR-B mRNA was significantly increased in endometriomas compared with eutopic and control endometrium. PR-A protein was barely detectable in endometriomas. Thus, whereas PR-C may enhance disease progression, up-regulation of ERbeta may play an antiinflammatory and opposing role.Regulation of P21-activated kinase-4 by progesterone and tumor necrosis factor-α in human endometrium and its increased expression in advanced-stage endometriosis.Endometriosis is a common gynecological condition characterized by enhanced proliferation, adhesiveness, invasiveness, and survival of endometrial cells after retrograde menstruation. Originally identified as a cytoskeletal regulatory kinase, p21-activated kinase 4 (Pak4) regulates diverse cellular activities that might be altered in the establishment and progression of endometriosis.The aim was to evaluate the effects of sex steroids and proinflammatory cytokines on the Pak4 expression in endometrial cells along with the functional change caused by inhibition of Pak4 expression as well as to see whether the Pak4 expression is altered in endometriosis.Pak4 expression was analyzed using immunohistochemistry and Western blot analysis. Viability and invasiveness were assayed after transfection of endometrial cells with Pak4 small interfering RNA.The Pak4 expression was significantly decreased in the stromal cells during the secretory phase as well as by in vitro treatment with progesterone. The immunoreactivity of Pak4 was significantly increased in the eutopic endometrium as well as in the ovarian endometriotic cyst of women with endometriosis compared with the control subjects. TNF-α induced a significant increase in the Pak4 expression in endometrial cells in vitro, whereas IL-1β had no effects. Transfection of endometrial cells with Pak4 small interfering RNA led to a significant decrease in viability and invasiveness in endometrial cells.These findings suggest that Pak4 is regulated by progesterone and TNF-α in endometrial cells and that the increased expression of Pak4 might lead to the establishment and progression of endometriosis by enhanced cellular viability and invasiveness in endometrial cells.Leukaemia inhibitory factor and interleukin 11 levels in uterine flushings of infertile patients with endometriosis.Exact aetiology of infertility in stage I/II endometriosis patients is not known. Interleukin 11 (IL-11) and leukaemia-inhibitory factor (LIF) are factors associated with implantation window in human eutopic endometrium. We decided to test whether there is an altered secretion of these factors, which could explain receptivity defect in patients with minimal endometriosis.Uterine flushing and endometrial samples were collected 7-9 days after ovulation (implantation window) from infertile patients with stage I/II endometriosis (n = 14) and fertile, endometriosis-free controls (n = 21). IL-11 and LIF were assessed in uterine flushings in eutopic endometria in all patients by enzyme-linked immunosorbent assay (ELISA). In eutopic endometrium, semiquantitative RT-PCR was performed for LIF and IL-11 mRNA expressions.No statistically significant differences were found in uterine flushing in women with and without endometriosis with regard to IL-11 levels (0.0 pg/ml versus 0.0 pg/ml) and LIF (25.53 pg/ml versus 36.26 pg/ml). These results were confirmed by the results of RT-PCR, where there were also no differences between studied groups.There is no receptivity defect with regard to LIF and IL-11 secretions by eutopic endometrium in infertile women with endometriosis.Xanthine oxidase in eutopic and ectopic endometrium in endometriosis and adenomyosis.To investigate the expression of xanthine oxidase in eutopic and ectopic endometrium in endometriosis and adenomyosis.Immunohistochemical identification of xanthine oxidase in endometrial tissues by using polyclonal antibody.University hospital.Thirty-four women with endometriosis, 34 women with adenomyosis, and 44 fertile control women.Biopsy samples were obtained from the endometrium throughout the menstrual cycle.Semiquantitative immunostaining (evaluation nomogram) score of endometrial cells.The level of xanthine oxidase expression in the glandular epithelium of control varied according to menstrual phase, but no such variation in expression was seen in endometriosis. Variation in xanthine oxidase expression was observed during the menstrual cycle in patients with adenomyosis; this variation differed completely from that in controls. Xanthine oxidase expression was found in ectopic endometrial tissue in all cases. The mean evaluation nomogram levels in the glandular epithelium in adenomyosis tissue were as high as those in the early secretory phase in the eutopic endometrium.Aberrant expression of xanthine oxidase in eutopic and ectopic endometrium appears to play a pathologic role in endometriosis and adenomyosis.Down-regulation of p21-activated kinase 1 by progestin and its increased expression in the eutopic endometrium of women with endometriosis.P21-activated kinase 1 (Pak1) integrates various signaling pathways that are vital to cell survival and function. This study was performed to evaluate whether sex steroids may regulate the expression of Pak1 in endometrial cells as well as whether its expression is increased in the eutopic endometrium of women with endometriosis.Following in vitro estradiol (E(2)) and/or medroxyprogesterone acetate (MPA) treatment of Ishikawa cells and endometrial stromal cells (ESCs), Pak1 protein was analyzed utilizing western blot analysis and immunocytochemistry. Immunohistochemistry was performed to evaluate Pak1 immunoreactivity semiquantitatively in women with endometriosis and in controls. To assess the role of Pak1 on endometrial cell viability, crystal violet assay was performed following transfection of Ishikawa cells with Pak1 small interfering RNA (siRNA).In vitro treatment with E(2) plus MPA or MPA alone led to a significant decrease of Pak1 protein in Ishikawa cells and ESCs (both P < 0.05 versus control). Immunohistochemistry also revealed that Pak1 protein is significantly decreased during the secretory phase in both epithelial and stromal cells in the control subjects (P < 0.001 and P < 0.01, respectively). The immunoreactivity of Pak1 in glandular cells was significantly increased in the eutopic endometrium of women with endometriosis compared with the controls during the secretory phase (P < 0.01). Crystal violet assay has shown that transfection of Ishikawa cells with Pak1 siRNA led to a significant decrease of cellular viability (P < 0.05).These findings suggest that Pak1 is down-regulated by progesterone during the secretory phase in normal endometrium and increased Pak1 activity during the secretory phase might lead to establishment of endometriosis.Steroidogenic enzyme and key decidualization marker dysregulation in endometrial stromal cells from women with versus without endometriosis.Identification of mechanisms underlying endometriosis pathogenesis will facilitate understanding and treatment of infertility and pain associated with this disorder. Herein, we investigated the expression of steroidogenic pathway enzymes and key decidualization biomarkers in endometrial tissue and in eutopic endometrial stromal fibroblasts (hESFs) from women with vs. those without endometriosis, and subsequently treated in vitro with 8-bromo-cAMP (8-Br-cAMP) or progesterone (P4). Real-time quantitative PCR, immunohistochemistry, ELISA, and radiometric aromatase activity assay were used. The results demonstrate significantly increased (14.5-fold; P=0.037) expression of aromatase in eutopic endometrium of women with disease. In 8-Br-cAMP-treated hESF from eutopic endometrium of women with endometriosis, the balance in estradiol (E2) and P4 biosynthetic and metabolizing enzymes is disturbed (decreased HSD3B1 and HSD17B2, and increased HSD17B1 and aromatase), with the equilibrium being shifted towards an E2-enriched milieu. However, hESF from the same group of women treated with P4 did not demonstrate such responsiveness. Lower expression of IGFBP1 and prolactin mRNA and protein was observed in hESF from women with vs. those without endometriosis in response to 8-Br-cAMP, but not P4, suggesting a blunted response of these decidual biomarkers to activation of the PKA pathway in eutopic endometrium in women with disease. The dichotomy of 8-Br-cAMP regulation of select steroidogenic enzymes leading to an enriched E2 milieu within the endometrium and a blunted response of decidual biomarkers to this decidualizing agent of hESF from women with endometriosis suggests resistance to full decidualization of the stromal fibroblasts and mechanisms underlying implantation failure and the pathophysiology of this disorder.Association between MMP1 and MMP9 activities and ICAM1 cleavage induced by tumor necrosis factor in stromal cell cultures from eutopic endometria of women with endometriosis.Endometriosis is a benign gynecological pathology in which immune system deregulation may play a role in its initiation and progression. In endometriotic lesions, intercellular adhesion molecule-1 (ICAM1) is released from the cell membrane by proteolytic cleavage of its extracellular domain, a process that coincides with increased expression and proteolytic activity of metalloproteinases such as MMP1 and MMP9. The objective of our study was to investigate the association between MMP1 and MMP9 activities and ICAM1 cleavage mediated by tumor necrosis factor (TNF) in eutopic endometrial stromal cells from women with and without (control) endometriosis during culture. The RNA was evaluated by RT-PCR, and the protein was determined by western blot (ICAM1, MMP1), casein or gelatin zymographies (secreted active MMP1 or MMP9 respectively), ELISA (soluble ICAM1 (sICAM1)), and fluorescence assay (secreted active MMP1). Under basal conditions, proMMP9 dimer and MMP9 were higher in endometriosis cell cultures. In stromal cultures derived from control women and those with endometriosis, TNF augmented the intracellular proMMP1 (1.2-fold in control stromal cells) and ICAM1 (1.4- and 1.9-fold), greatly increased MMP1 and proMMP9 levels, and the sICAM1 concentration (2.3- and 4.3-fold) in their media compared with basal levels. The combination of TNF and MMP9 increased the sICAM1 concentration 14-fold in the endometriosis cell media, whereas GM6001 inhibited the stimulatory effect of TNF in both cell cultures. The deregulation of MMP9, and the TNF participation in the MMP1 and proMMP9 secretions, in the MMP9 expression and in the expression and cleavage of ICAM1 may contribute to the pathophysiology of this disease.Combination of non-invasive and semi-invasive tests for diagnosis of minimal to mild endometriosis.Non-surgical diagnostic approach for endometriosis would be of great gain to both physicians and patients. The aim of this study was to evaluate the diagnostic value of serum measurement of IL-6 combined with the presence of nerve fibres in the functional layer of endometrium for diagnosis of minimal-mild endometriosis.In this prospective study 114 women who underwent laparoscopy for infertility and/or pelvic pain were divided into two groups: control cases (40 cases) with no pathologic findings; and endometriosis patients (74 cases) [subdivided into stages 1-2 or minimal-mild (MM) and stages 3-4 or moderate-severe cases]. Blood was drawn one day before laparoscopy and stored for subsequent analysis of IL-6. Endometrial biopsy was obtained prior to laparoscopy and Immunohistochemistry was performed using the pan-neuronal marker protein gene product 9.5(PGP9.5). Then laparoscopic diagnosis of endometriosis confirmed by histopathology was done.Serum IL-6 with a threshold of 15.4 pg/ml was found to be able to diagnose MM endometriosis with 89.5 % sensitivity and 82.5 % specificity, but sensitivity and specificity of presence of nerve fibres in the functional layer of endometrium were 92 % and 80 % respectively. When two diagnostic modalities were combined the sensitivity and specificity were raised to 100 and 92.5 % respectively.Combination of both serum IL-6 and presence of nerve fibres in the endometrium is more reliable method for diagnosis of MM endometriosis than in single test.[Expressions of nuclear factor-kappaB and intercellular adhesion molecule-1 in endometriosis].To investigate the association of nuclear factor-kappaB (NF-kappaB) and intercellular adhesion molecule-1 (ICAM-1) with endometriosis.Immunohistochemistry was used to examine the NF-kappaB and VEGF protein expression in 35 specimens of normal endometrium, 48 eutopic endometrium of endometriosis and 76 ectopic endometrium, and the results were analyzed statistically.The expressions of NF-kappaB and ICAM-1 were found mainly in the glandular epithelial cells of the three endometrium specimens, with the ectopic endometriotic tissues showing the highest and normal endometrium the lowest expressions (P<0.001). NF-kappaB and ICAM-1 expressions were positively correlated to normal, eutopic and ectopic endometrium (r=0.688, 0.773 and 0.777, respectively, P<0.01).NF-kappaB and ICAM-1 may participate in the process of the pathogenesis in endometriosis.DNA microarray analysis of gene expression profiles in deep endometriosis using laser capture microdissection.Endometriosis, a common gynecological disorder that causes infertility and pelvic pain, is defined as the presence of endometrial glands and stroma within extra-uterine sites. However, despite extensive studies its etiology and pathogenesis are not completely understood. Differentially expressed genes were investigated in epithelial and stromal cells from deep endometriosis and matched eutopic endometrium using cDNA microarrays and laser capture microdissection. Validation of results of several up- and down-regulated genes was performed by quantitative real-time RT-PCR. Our data showed that platelet-derived growth factor receptor alpha (PDGFRA), protein kinase C beta1 (PKC beta1) and janus kinase 1 (JAK1) were upregulated, and Sprouty2 and mitogen-activated protein kinase kinase 7 (MKK7) were downregulated in endometriosis stromal cells, suggesting the involvement of the RAS/RAF/MAPK signaling pathway through PDGFRA in endometriosis pathophysiology. In addition, two potential negative regulators of aromatase expression, chicken ovalbumin upstream promoter transcription factor 2 (COUP-TF2) and prostaglandin E2 receptor subtype EP3 (PGE2EP3), were downregulated in endometriosis epithelial cells, which might result in increased local production of estrogen in endometriosis epithelial cells. Furthermore, three potential candidate genes that might be involved in endometriosis related pain were identified: tyrosine kinase receptor B (TRkB) in endometriosis epithelial cells, and serotonin transporter (5HTT) and mu opioid receptor (MOR) in endometriosis stromal cells were all upregulated. One of the candidate genes, MOR, may be involved in a defective immune system in endometriosis. This study has provided new insights into endometriosis pathophysiology.MicroRNA 135 regulates HOXA10 expression in endometriosis.Homeo box A10 (HOXA10) regulates endometrial receptivity and its expression is decreased in women with endometriosis. Although sex steroids regulate HOXA10, these hormones are unaltered in endometriosis. We hypothesized a role for microRNA in the regulation of HOXA10.MicroRNA 135a and -b are small noncoding RNA with predicted targets that include HOXA10. We evaluated miR135a/b expression and HOXA10 regulation in endometrium from subjects with and without endometriosis.The design of the study was the measurement of miR135a/b expression by quantitative PCR and in vitro analysis of HOXA10 regulation.The study was conducted at a university medical center.Patients included 50 controls and 32 women with endometriosis.Study interventions included endometrial biopsies and in vitro transfection.miR135a/b and HOXA10 expression were measured in the study.All endometrial samples expressed miR135a and -b. miR135a expression in controls was increased during the proliferative phase, decreased at the time of ovulation, and increased during the luteal phase. Subjects with endometriosis had 3-fold higher expression of miR135a in the proliferative phase than controls. miR135b showed less variation across the menstrual cycle; however, it was significantly increased in women with endometriosis in the proliferative and secretory phases. HOXA10 expression was simultaneously repressed in the endometrium of women with endometriosis. Transfection of endometrial stromal cells with mir135a/b or miR135a/b inhibitors resulted in the altered expression of HOXA10 mRNA and protein. miR135a or -b decreased luciferase expression driven by the HOXA10 3' untranslated region containing the miR135 binding site. miR135a regulation of HOXA10 was absent in MCF-7 cells, demonstrating cell specificity.HOXA10 was aberrantly regulated in the endometrium of women with endometriosis by both miR135a and miR135b. Increased microRNA expression likely suppresses genes required for implantation.Altered expression of claudin-3 and claudin-4 in ectopic endometrium of women with endometriosis.To investigate the expression of claudin-3 and claudin-4 in the eutopic and ectopic endometrium of women with endometriosis and to evaluate the role of claudin-3 and claudin-4 in the pathogenesis of endometriosis.Cross-sectional measurement of gene expression levels of claudin-3 and claudin-4 on endometriotic tissue.Academic.Thirty-five patients with endometriosis and 35 healthy women who were free of endometriosis were recruited for the study.Expression of claudin-3 and claudin-4 were investigated with immunohistochemical analysis, Western blot, and real-time polymerase chain reaction. Morphologic change of tight junction was also observed in different kinds of endometria.The expression levels of claudin-3 and claudin-4 in epithelial cells from 35 ectopic endometrial tissues, 27 eutopic endometrial tissues from women with endometriosis, and 35 normal endometrial tissues from women without endometriosis.Expression of claudin-3 and claudin-4 was significantly lower in the ectopic endometriotic tissue than in the eutopic endometrium from women with endometriosis and normal controls at both the messenger RNA and protein levels. No significant difference was found between eutopic endometrium from women with endometriosis and normal endometrium from women without endometriosis.Down-regulated expression of claudin-3 and claudin-4 in ectopic endometrium suggests that claudin-3 and claudin-4 might play a pathogenic role in the formation of endometriosis.The expression of estrogen receptors as well as GREB1, c-MYC, and cyclin D1, estrogen-regulated genes implicated in proliferation, is increased in peritoneal endometriosis.To analyze the expression of estrogen receptors α and β as well as their target genes implicated in proliferation, c-myc, cyclin D1, and GREB1, in the endometrium of women with or without endometriosis.Expression analysis in human tissue.University hospitals and a clinic.Ninety-one premenopausal women (59 patients with endometriosis and 32 controls) undergoing laparoscopic surgery.Biopsies were obtained at time of surgery, performed during the proliferative phase of the cycle.Estrogen receptors α and β as well as c-myc, cyclin D1, and GREB1 mRNA expression levels were determined by quantitative reverse transcriptase-polymerase chain reaction. Tissue localization of these estrogen-regulated genes was analyzed by immunohistochemistry.Estrogen receptors α and β as well as c-myc, cyclin D1, and GREB1 mRNA expression levels were increased in ectopic tissue in comparison with both normal and eutopic endometrium. Estrogen receptor mRNA levels also were upregulated in the eutopic peritoneal tissue of patients with endometriosis. Cyclin D1 and GREB1 expression was augmented in eutopic endometrium. c-myc, cyclin D1, and GREB1 proteins exhibited a nuclear localization in ectopic endometrial tissue.This constitutes the first report of increased expression of GREB1, as well as cyclin D1 and c-myc, in peritoneal endometriotic lesions, implicating these proteins in estrogen-dependent growth in this context.Androgen receptor and 5alpha-reductase are expressed in pelvic endometriosis.The aim of this study was to evaluate whether androgen receptor (AR) and the enzymes that convert testosterone into the more potent androgen dihydrotestosterone, 5alpha-reductases (5alpha-R1 and 5alpha-R2) are expressed in pelvic endometriosis. The study involved 21 infertile women who underwent laparoscopy and were divided into two groups: control (n= 13) and endometriosis (n= 8) according to the histological and laparoscopic findings. Endometrial and endometriotic implant biopsies were performed. By reverse transcription polymerase chain reaction and immunohistochemistry, AR, 5alpha-R1 and 5alpha-R2 messenger RNA and protein were detected in biopsies of pelvic endometriosis, as well as in the eutopic endometrium of both groups. These findings suggest that active androgens may be formed within the endometriotic tissue and that both local and systemic androgens have the potential to act on endometriotic cells.Macrophage expression in endometrium of women with and without endometriosis.Endometriosis is an inflammatory condition, characterized by the presence of endometrial-like tissue outside the uterus. The immune system provides a defence mechanism in response to foreign pathogens, and macrophages play important roles in this response. Activation of macrophages has been reported in peritoneal fluid and ectopic endometriotic lesions; however, controversy exists regarding the composition and function of macrophage populations in eutopic endometrium of women with and without endometriosis. This study aimed to quantify macrophages in eutopic endometrium of women with and without endometriosis, during the early, mid and late proliferative and menstrual phases of the cycle.Paraffin-embedded endometrial curettage blocks were selected from pathology archives. Seventy-six specimens from women with and without endometriosis were analysed using standard immunohistochemical techniques with CD68-PGM1 (phosphoglucomutase 1) clone antibody. Macrophages were counted according to their morphology over several fields of view.A significant increase in macrophage cell numbers was shown in eutopic endometrium in women with endometriosis (mean +/- SD, 182.7 +/- 72.9/mm(2)) during all stages of the proliferative phase compared with normal controls (101.6 +/- 53.4/mm(2); P < 0.001). Significant increase in macrophage density occurred in the control group during the mid-menstrual phase, Days 3-4 (P < 0.01), which was not observed in women with endometriosis.This study further supports an association between immune changes in eutopic endometrium and presence of endometriosis. However, it remains uncertain if eutopic immune changes are primary or secondary occurrences.Endometrial expression of estrogen receptor β and its splice variants in patients with and without endometriosis.The role of estrogen receptor beta (ERβ) in pathogenesis of endometriosis remains to be elucidated. In this study, we have examined the expression of the four main ERβ transcript isoforms in human endometrial tissue in women with or without endometriosis.Total RNA was isolated from native endometrial tissue and transcript levels of ERα, β1, β2, β4, β5 were analyzed by means of RT-PCR. We compared the results with regard to menstrual cycle phase as well as to presence or absence of endometriosis. We prospectively harvested the endometrium of ten women without endometriosis (five for each cycle phase) and eight patients with endometriosis (five in the proliferative phase, three in the secretory phase).ERα, β1, β2, and β5 transcripts were detected in both cycle phases. During the proliferative phase, healthy women had a significantly higher ERα/ERβ1-ratio than patients with endometriosis. Irrespective of the cycle phase, ERα-mRNA level was significantly higher than transcript levels of ERβ isoforms.ERα, β1, β2, and β5 are expressed in human endometrium. The individual receptors differed in terms of expression strength but there was no relevant change during the cycle. The decreased ERα/ERβ1-ratio in proliferative endometrium of endometriosis patients suggest that ERβ1 might be involved in the pathogenesis of endometriosis. Further studies should be undertaken to substantiate the role of ERβ in endometrial pathology.Expression of angiogenic factors in endometriosis: relationship to fibrinolytic and metalloproteinase systems.Endometriosis is a highly prevalent, benign disease in which the angiogenic, fibrinolytic and metalloproteinase (MMP) systems may be implicated. The objective of this study is to analyse mRNA expression and protein levels of several angiogenic factors and to correlate them with several components of the fibrinolytic and MMP systems in samples from 71 women with endometriosis and 50 controls.Eutopic endometrium showed higher mRNA expression of vascular endothelial growth factor (VEGF) in patients than in controls. However, ovarian endometrioma had lower VEGF mRNA levels than did the eutopic endometrium of patients. Similar results were obtained for VEGF protein levels. On the other hand, a significant increase in thrombospondin-1 (TSP-1) levels was observed in ovarian endometrioma than in eutopic endometrium. The peritoneal fluid from women with endometriosis showed a significant increase in VEGF, urokinase-type plasminogen activator (uPA) and MMP-3 levels than that of controls. A significant correlation was observed between the levels of VEGF and uPA in endometrium and in peritoneal fluid.Endometrium and peritoneal fluid from women with endometriosis have increased levels of VEGF, uPA and MMP-3 levels. Therefore, the development of endometriotic implants at ectopic sites may be facilitated, promoting the progress of the endometriosis.Increased expression of interleukin-1 receptor type 1 in active endometriotic lesions.The establishment and progression of ectopic endometrial implants are dependent upon their interaction with and responsiveness to the stimuli present in their new environment. According to our and other previous studies, immune cells-derived cytokines, such as IL-1, may alone or in concert with estrogens, enhance the capability of ectopic endometrial cells to implant and develop into the host tissue. In the present study, immunohistochemical and dual immunofluorescence analyses showed that the functional signaling interleukin-1 receptor type 1 (IL-1RI) is expressed in endometriotic tissue, particularly in the glands, and identified endothelial cells, macrophages, and T-lymphocytes as cells having marked expression of IL-1RI. The highest concentrations of IL-1RI protein in endometriotic tissue, as evaluated using histological score (HSCORE) and measured by ELISA, were found in red endometriotic lesions as compared with typical black-blue or white lesions. Western blotting showed a significant increase in the levels of the 50 kDa band, whose apparent molecular weight corresponds to the soluble form of IL-1RI. RT-PCR analysis of IL-1 mRNA levels showed a pattern of expression comparable to that of the protein. Interestingly, IL-1RI expression was more significant in the proliferative than in the secretory phase of the menstrual cycle. Marked expression of IL-1RI, the functional signaling receptor that mediates cell activation by IL-1, in red endometriotic implants, which are highly vascularized and represent the earliest and most active forms of the disease, point to a higher cell receptivity for IL-1 in these lesions, a relationship with the activity of the disease and a possible involvement in the early steps of endometriotic tissue growth and development.NME1 suppression of endometrial stromal cells promotes angiogenesis in the endometriotic milieu via stimulating the secretion of IL-8 and VEGF.Nonmetastatic gene 23-H1 (NME1, also known as nm23-H1) is a wide-spectrum tumor metastasis suppressor gene that plays an important role in suppressing the proliferation, adhesion and invasion of endometrial stromal cells (ESCs). The present study is undertaken to explore the mechanism by which NME1 in ESCs from endometriosis modulates the angiogenesis and herein participates in the pathogenesis of endometriosis. The expression of NME1 in the primary ESCs from normal endometrium without endometriosis was higher than that from eutopic endometrium and ectopic lesion with endometriosis. Silencing NME1 stimulated the secretion of angiogenic factors interleukin-8 (IL-8) and vascular-endothelial growth factor (VEGF) of the eutopic ESCs from women with endometriosis, and these effects could be abrogated by MAPK/ERK1/2 or AKT inhibitor. In addition, the supernatant of NME1-silenced ESCs increased the expression of angiogenesis-relative molecules CD62E and CD105, and promoted angiogenesis of human umbilical vein endothelial cells (HUVECs). Anti-human IL-8 or VEGF neutralizing antibody reversed the effect on angiogenesis of HUVECs induced by NME1-silenced ESCs. Our current results suggest that the abnormal lower expression of NME1 in ESCs secrete more IL-8 and VEGF through activation of MAPK/ERK1/2 and AKT signal pathways, up-regulate the level of CD62E and CD105, and finally lead to numerous angiogenesis of vascular endothelial cells in the endometriotic milieu, which is beneficial to the origin and development of endometriosis. KISS1/KISS1R expression in eutopic and ectopic endometrium of women suffering from endometriosis.The KISS1/KISS1R system has been implicated in the physiology of reproduction and many studies have documented the stimulatory effect of kisspeptin on Gonadotropin-releasing Hormone (GnRH) and gonadotropin secretion. In addition, the KISS1/KISS1R system has been implicated in several pathophysiological processes, including cancer.We examined the pattern of KISS1 and KISS1R expression in eutopic and ectopic endometrium tissues which were obtained from 24 women suffering from endometriosis and 16 control women who underwent laparoscopic excision for other benign gynecological diseases.Significant KISS1R expression was detected in 10 out of the 24 samples of eutopic endometrial biopsies of women suffering from endometriosis, while their matched biopsies of ectopic endometrial lesions did not reveal any KISS1R expression. KISS1R expression was not detected in the endometrial biopsies of control women. In addition, KISS1 expression was not detected in practically any the endometrial tissues of either control women or women with endometriosis.The expression of KISS1R in 10/24 samples of human endometrial biopsies of women suffering from endometriosis and the loss of its expression in the samples of matched ectopic endometrial tissues, suggests that the KISS1/KISS1R system may play a role in the pathophysiology of endometriosis only for a particular group of patients. Since KISS1 is not expressed by the endometrium and endometriotic tissue, it is conceivable that the activation of KISS1R in this particular group is mediated by KISS1 expression by non-endometrial tissues (endocrine action).[Integrin expression in eutopic and ectopic endometrium].The significance of retrograde menstruation as a risk factor for endometriosis has been confirmed by numerous clinical observations. Integrins mediate both cell-cell and cell-matrix adhesion, and it is therefore suspected that integrins are involved in the development of endometriosis. Using immunohistochemistry, integrin expression in eutopic and ectopic endometrium is examined in endometriosis patients and control individuals. In nearly all cases, the glandular epithelial cells in the endometrium showed expression of alpha (2-), alpha (3)-, alpha (6)- and alpha (v)- integrin and a low percentage of expression of alpha (1)-, alpha (4)-, and alpha (5)-integrin. In comparison with eutopic endometrium, ectopic endometrium shows reduced expression of alpha (2)- and alpha (v)-integrin. Since no differences in alpha (2)- and alpha (v)-integrin expression were observed in eutopic endometrium between endometriosis patients and control individuals, it may be suspected that the reduced expression of these in ectopic endometrium is explained by influences in the altered environment -- e. g., in the peritoneal fluid -- on the ectopic endometrium.Expression patterns of Aurora A and B kinases, Ki-67 and the estrogen and progesterone receptors determined using an endometriosis tissue microarray model.The roles of cell proliferation and genomic instability in endometriosis are highly debated aspects of the pathogenesis of this disease. Aurora A and B kinases play different important roles in cell cycle control and genomic instability and have never been studied in endometriosis. The aim of this study was to compare the expression levels of Aurora kinases, Ki-67 and hormone receptor in endometriotic tissue (ET) and normal endometrium.We retrospectively analysed 438 samples obtained from 194 patients affected by endometriosis and 28 samples from 28 patients with normal endometrium, which were all collected by the Pathology Department and Gynecologic Clinic of the University Hospital of Udine. A tissue microarray model was constructed to use immunohistochemistry to analyse the expression of Aurora A and B kinases, Ki-67 and the estrogen and progesterone receptors in ET and normal endometrium.Aurora A and B kinases were expressed at a very low level in the majority of endometriosis core biopsies. Aurora A and B kinases, Ki-67 and the estrogen and progesterone receptors were expressed at a higher level in the proliferative endometrium than in the secretory endometrium and in ovarian and non-ovarian ET (P < 0.05). Additionally, Aurora B kinase, Ki-67 and the estrogen and progesterone receptors were more highly expressed in non-ovarian than ovarian ET (P < 0.05).Considering the low expression levels of Aurora A and B kinases in the majority of endometriosis core biopsies, the growth and survival of endometrial tissue outside the uterus cannot be explained by deregulation of this pathway. The analysed ectopic endometrium protein expression pattern resembled that of the secretory endometrium, and markers of proliferation and hormone receptors were expressed at lower levels in ovarian than in non-ovarian ET. The low level of hormone receptors and the consequent low levels of proliferation markers in ovarian ETs may be due to down-regulation by the ovary's hormone milieu.CXCL8 enhances proliferation and growth and reduces apoptosis in endometrial stromal cells in an autocrine manner via a CXCR1-triggered PTEN/AKT signal pathway.Chemokine CXCL8 (also known as IL-8) has been identified as a potential regulator of endometrial stromal cells (ESCs), but it is unclear how CXCL8 regulates the survival of ESCs in the pathogenesis of endometriosis.We assessed the secretion of CXCL8 by enzyme-linked immunosorbent assays and the expression of its receptors, CXCR1 and CXCR2, by in-cell Western assay and immunohistochemistry. The effects of CXCL8 on the activation or expression of various cell mediators were also investigated by in-cell Western assay. The effects of CXCL8 on the proliferation, growth and apoptosis of ESCs in vitro were assessed by BrdU assays, cell counts and annexin V labeling, respectively.Secretion of CXCL8 and expression of CXCR1 in the eutopic ESCs from women with endometriosis were significantly higher than that in control ESCs, but the expression of CXCR2 showed no significant difference between these two cell types. CXCL8 stimulated proliferation and growth and reduced apoptosis of ESCs in an autocrine manner, and these effects were abolished by anti-human CXCL8 and CXCR1 neutralizing antibodies and by a PI3K/Akt inhibitor. Moreover, CXCL8 up-regulated the expression of the anti-apoptotic proteins, survivin and Bcl-2, inhibited the expression of the Phosphatase and tensin homolog (PTEN) and activated the phosphorylation of Akt.This study suggests that CXCL8 and CXCR1 are involved in the pathogenesis of endometriosis by up-regulating proliferation and growth and restricting apoptosis in ESCs by activating the PTEN/Akt pathway and mediating the expression of survivin and Bcl-2.Endometrial fluid is a specific and non-invasive biological sample for protein biomarker identification in endometriosis.The development of non-invasive diagnostic methods for endometriosis requires sensitive and disease specific biomarkers. Here, we describe the use of aspirated endometrial fluid from women with and without endometriosis as a novel biological sample for biomarker discovery.Differential protein expression profiling of aspirates from women with early endometriosis (n = 14), advanced endometriosis (n = 32) and without evidence of the disease (n = 32) was assessed by two-dimensional gel electrophoresis (2-DE). A biomarker validation study was performed in an independent cohort (early endometriosis n = 6 and advanced endometriosis n = 14, controls n = 15).The analysis resulted in the identification of 31 proteins showing statistically significant differences in expression. The proteins identified are related to cell signalling, cell death and cell movement, processes that may be involved in the onset and/or progression of endometriosis. The differences in expression observed for 14-3-3 (signal transduction) and moesin (cytoskeletal structure) were confirmed in an independent group of endometriosis patients.Endometrial fluid represents a novel sample for proteomic analysis offering reliable, disease specific information on protein expression, facilitating the discovery of biomarkers for endometriosis. The results described here complement previous proteomic studies, providing new endometriosis-related proteins to be validated as diagnostic markers.Quantitative assessment of endometrial-peritoneal interaction in vitro: a non-invasive diagnostic test for women with endometriosis?Immunohistochemical localization of acidic and basic fibroblast growth factors in normal human endometrium and endometriosis and the detection of their mRNA by polymerase chain reaction.Growth factors play a role in the cyclical growth and vascularization of normal endometrium. Abnormal endometrial proliferation and neovascularization may result in endometriosis. This study determines the presence and localization of acidic and basic fibroblast growth factors (aFGF and bFGF respectively) in endometrium of normal women, and in normal and ectopic endometrium of women with endometriosis. Endometrium was obtained at curettage or hysterectomy for benign disease, or laparoscopy for endometriosis. aFGF- and bFGF-immunoreactivity was detected at different phases of the menstrual cycle by immunohistochemistry using primary polyclonal rabbit antibodies. Expression of mRNA for aFGF and bFGF was determined in normal endometrium by nested reverse transcriptase polymerase chain reaction (RT-PCR). aFGF- and bFGF-immunoreactivity were both detected in endometrium from normal women, and in normal and ectopic endometrium of women with endometriosis. The pattern of staining with the two different FGFs was the same: immunoreactivity was predominantly confined to glandular epithelial cells and did not change throughout the menstrual cycle. Little or only light staining was seen in stromal cells and myometrium, and the pattern of staining did not differ between endometriotic and normal tissue. The presence of mRNA for aFGF and bFGF was demonstrated in normal endometrium. The detection of aFGF and bFGF mRNA in normal endometrium and aFGF- and bFGF-immunoreactivity in normal and endometriotic tissues suggests that these peptides may play a role in the proliferation and angiogenesis of normal and ectopic human endometrium.Proteomic identification of neurotrophins in the eutopic endometrium of women with endometriosis.To evaluate neurotrophin (NT) expression in the endometrium of women with and without endometriosis.Prospective, cross-sectional, translational study.Academic hospital.Thirty-three reproductive-age women undergoing laparoscopy for infertility, pelvic pain, intramural fibroids, or tubal ligation.Endometrial biopsies, protein microarrays, reverse transcriptase-polymerase chain reaction, ELISAs, and Western blotting.Neurotrophin proteins and mRNAs in eutopic endometrial biopsies.Among seven neurotrophic proteins detected on the antibody microarrays, reverse transcriptase-polymerase chain reaction analysis confirmed nerve growth factor, NT-4/5, and brain-derived neurotrophic factor mRNAs in endometrial tissue. Quantitative ELISAs revealed that NT-4/5 (806 ± 701 vs. 256 ± 190 pg/100 mg protein) and brain-derived neurotrophic factor (121 ± 97 vs. 14 ± 11 ng/100 mg protein) concentrations were significantly higher in women with endometriosis. Nerve growth factor (100 ± 74 vs. 93 ± 83 pg/100 mg protein) levels did not differ between cases and controls.Neurotrophins are synthesized in situ within the endometrium. NT-4/5 and brain-derived neurotrophic factor proteins were more concentrated in biopsies from endometriosis cases than controls, whereas nerve growth factor levels were similar. We hypothesize that the local production of NTs induces sensory innervation of endometrium of women with endometriosis. These NTs represent novel targets for the diagnosis and treatment of endometriosis.[Diagnostic value of the detection of aromatase cytochrome P450 and CA125 for endometriosis].To evaluate the diagnostic value of examining endometrial biopsy specimens for aromatase cytochrome P450 and CA125 for endometriosis.The expression of aromatase cytochrome P450 in endometrium was detected by immunohistochemical analysis for 36 endometriosis women and 22 non-endometriosis but subfertility or pelvic pain women served as controls; the serum CA125 levels were measured by chemical radiation method.By measuring serum CA125, the sensitivity of the serum CA125 assay was 44%, the specificity was 82%, the positive predictive value was 80%, and the negative predictive value was 47%; the sensitivity of aromatase cytochrome P450 in biopsy endometrium of endometriosis was 82%, the specificity was 59%, the positive predictive value was 76%, and the negative predictive value was 67%.The combination assay of aromatase cytochrome P450 in eutopic endometrium and CA125 can be used as a diagnostic test for endometriosis, especially for the early stage of endometriosis, which is superior to the assay of CA125.Increased c-Jun N-terminal kinase activation in human endometriotic endothelial cells.Endometriosis is a common inflammatory gynecological disease characterized by the presence of endometrial tissue outside of the uterine cavity. The c-Jun N-terminal kinase (JNK) is a subfamily of the mitogen-activated protein kinases (MAPKs) involved in cellular processes ranging from cytokine expression to apoptosis, and is activated in response to inflammation and cellular stress. We hypothesized that inflammatory cytokines in the peritoneal microenvironment increase JNK MAPK activity in endometriotic endothelial cells, and that human endometrial endothelial cells (HEECs) may be involved in inflammatory pathogenesis of endometriosis. Thus, we evaluated the expression of the total- and phosphorylated-(phospho)-JNK in endometrial and endometriotic endothelial cells in vivo, and in HEECs treated with normal peritoneal fluid (NPF), endometriotic peritoneal fluid (EPF), and the inflammatory cytokines interleukin-1beta (IL-1β) and tumor necrosis factor-alpha (TNF-α) in vitro. Phospho-JNK immunoreactivity in HEECs in normal endometrium was significantly higher in the early proliferative and late secretory phases compared to other phases. Both eutopic and ectopic HEECs from the early secretory phase also revealed higher phospho-JNK immunoreactivity, compared to their respective cycle-matched normal HEECs. Moreover, HEECs treated with EPF showed significantly higher phospho-JNK levels compared to that in HEECs treated with NPF. In conclusion, our in vivo and in vitro findings suggest that increased phosphorylation of JNK in HEECs from women with endometriosis is likely due to high level of IL-1β and TNF-α in peritoneal fluid; this in turn may up-regulate inflammatory cytokine expression and thus play a role in the pathogenesis of endometriosis.Aromatase expression in endometriotic tissues and cell cultures of patients with endometriosis.Cytochrome P-450 aromatase is responsible for catalysing the conversion of androstendione into estrone, so its expression in endometriotic tissue could contribute to the development of endometriosis. The aims of this study were, on the one hand, to determine the presence of aromatase in eutopic and ectopic endometrium, healthy peritoneum, myometrium and leiomyomas from patients with (n = 61) and without endometriosis (n = 12) and, on the other hand, to determine the effect of peritoneal fluid (PF), interleukin-6 (IL-6) and tumour necrosis factor-alpha (TNFalpha) on aromatase activity from endometriotic stromal cells and subcutaneous adipocytes. After immunohistochemical analysis, aromatase expression was detected in the endometriotic tissue of 61% of patients, whereas the rest of the tissues, as well as those from disease-free women, were negative. Cell cultures were made to determine aromatase activity in endometriotic stromal cells and adipocytes. The addition of PF, TNFalpha and especially IL-6 (P < 0.05) stimulated the basal enzymatic activity observed in both cell types. Our findings confirm the presence of aromatase in endometriosis and probably the existence of a local estrogen production that may be stimulated by some factors such as cytokines present in the PF of these patients. Therefore, the use of aromatase inhibitors combined with immunomodulator agents could be a novel approach to be investigated in future clinical trials.Increased expression of monocyte chemotactic protein-1 in the endometrium of women with endometriosis.The pathogenesis of endometriosis, a disease widely believed to arise from an aberrant growth of endometrial tissue outside the uterus, is still unclear. We have previously observed that cytokine-stimulated endometrial cells of women with endometriosis secrete in vitro increased amounts of monocyte chemotactic protein-1 (MCP-1). This factor may be important in the recruitment and activation of peritoneal macrophages observed in endometriosis patients. The present study reports that, in the presence of the disease, such an up-regulation of MCP-1 expression arises in vivo and can be encountered in situ in the intrauterine endometrium. In women with endometriosis, MCP-1 expression was elevated in endometrial glands, both at the level of the protein (immunohistochemistry) and the mRNA (in situ hybridization). This was observed throughout the menstrual cycle and varied according to the stage of the disease. These findings strongly argue in favor of the presence of pathophysiological changes in the eutopic endometrium of patients with endometriosis and make plausible MCP-1 as a key effector cell mediator involved in the pathogenesis of the disease.Intraepithelial leukocytes in endometriosis and adenomyosis: comparison of eutopic and ectopic endometrium with normal endometrium.Intraepithelial leukocytes (IEL) are recognized as an important component of most mucosal surfaces but have received scant attention in the human female reproductive tract. The aim of the present study was to characterize, quantify and compare IEL populations in normal endometrium (n = 30) and in eutopic and ectopic (endometriotic or adenomyotic lesions) endometrium from women with endometriosis (n = 30) or adenomyosis (n = 15) at different menstrual cycle phases in order to assess the role of IEL in these common but poorly understood disorders. IEL populations were examined in formalin-fixed, paraffin-embedded sections using a streptavidin-biotin-peroxidase complex technique and quantified in relation to epithelial cell numbers. IEL in control endometrium and eutopic endometrium in endometriosis and adenomyosis varied during the menstrual cycle, with CD45+, CD43+ and CD56+ cells increasing from the proliferative to the late secretory phase. IEL were elevated in surface compared with glandular epithelium in the proliferative and early secretory phases. Throughout the menstrual cycle there were no significant differences in IEL between eutopic and ectopic endometrium in adenomyosis. Endometriotic foci, however, contained elevated levels of CD45+, CD3+ and CD8+ cells and reduced numbers of CD56 + cells compared with the corresponding eutopic endometrium and these did not vary with menstrual cycle phase. In contrast, ectopic endometrium in adenomyosis showed some cyclical changes with CD56+ cells increasing significantly in the late secretory phase. It is possible these differences may play a role in the pathogenesis of endometriosis and the associated complications.Autoimmune phenomena in infertile patients with endometriosis.To assess the presence of autoimmune factors in patients with endometriosis, endometrial homogenates, peritoneal fluid, and serum were evaluated in 23 patients with endometriosis and 22 control subjects. The methods used were Ouchterlony immunodiffusion, immunoelectrophoresis, polyacrylamide gel electrophoresis, and radial immunodiffusion. The study demonstrated precipitation lines between endometrial homogenates and serum from some endometriosis patients but not from the control subjects. Immunoelectrophoresis demonstrated precipitation lines at beta-globulin position when endometrial homogenates were used against serum of patients with endometriosis and with goat antihuman serum. It is suggested that an antigen, possibly a glycoprotein, is present in the endometrial homogenates. Radial immunodiffusion studies for immunoglobulins (Ig) G, A, and M and complement components C3c and C4 showed significantly higher concentrations of C3c and C4 in serum and peritoneal fluid of patients with endometriosis than the control subjects (P less than .05). There was no significant difference in concentration of IgG, A, M, factor B, and properdin.The role of Foxp3+ regulatory T-cells in endometriosis: a potential controlling mechanism for a complex, chronic immunological condition.Endometriosis is an inflammatory condition, associated with highly dysregulated immune response at both uterine and peritoneal levels. Surprisingly, Foxp3+ regulatory T-cells, which control and suppress a range of immune responses, have not previously been investigated in endometriosis.Immunohistochemical analysis of Foxp3+ cells in 127 eutopic endometrial samples and 59 ectopic peritoneal lesions revealed that these immune cell populations are highly disturbed in women suffering from endometriosis. We showed that Foxp3+ cells remained highly up-regulated during the secretory phase of the menstrual cycle, while at this time their expression is significantly down-regulated in women without endometriosis (P < 0.001). Foxp3+ cells were detected in the stroma of 18 of the 59 peritoneal endometriotic lesions, but not in the surrounding or control peritoneal tissue.We propose that in eutopic endometrium in women with endometriosis Foxp3+ cells decrease the ability of newly recruited immune cell populations to effectively recognize and target endometrial antigens shed during menstruation, allowing their survival and ability to implant in ectopic sites. At these ectopic sites, variable expression of Foxp3+ cells within some peritoneal endometriotic lesions is likely to be linked to the characteristics and stage of individual lesion development and be playing key roles in pathogenesis and progression of this unique condition.microRNAs expression in endometriosis and their relation to angiogenic factors.Endometriosis is a common, multifactorial disease in which angiogenesis may be involved in the growth of endometrium outside the uterus. microRNAs (miRNAs) are 21-22 nucleotide non-coding RNAs that regulate gene expression and play fundamental roles in biological processes. The objective of this study was to analyze several miRNAs related to angiogenesis and the angiogenic factors, vascular endothelial growth factor-A (VEGF-A) and thrombospondin-1 (TSP-1), in endometriotic lesions (ovarian endometrioma, peritoneal lesion and rectovaginal nodule) and eutopic endometrium from women with endometriosis.TaqMan real-time PCR was used to assess the expression of the miRNAs (miR-15b, -16, -17-5p, -20a, -21, -125a, -221 and -222), while VEGF-A and TSP-1 mRNA were assessed by real-time PCR, with SYBR Green I and VEGF-A and TSP-1 protein levels were quantified by ELISA. Included in the study were 58 women with endometriosis and 38 control women.In paired samples, ovarian endometrioma showed significantly lower VEGF-A mRNA (P = 0.02) and protein (P = 0.002) expression than eutopic endometrium and higher expression of miR-125a (P = 0.003) and miR-222 (P <0.001). However, ovarian endometrioma had significantly higher expression of the angiogenic inhibitor TSP-1 and lower expression of miR-17-5p than eutopic endometrium (P < 0.001). Moreover, a significant inverse correlations between miR-222 and VEGF-A protein levels (-0.267, P = 0.018) and between miR-17-5p and TSP-1 protein levels (-0.260, P=0.022) were observed. Peritoneal lesions showed a significant increase in VEGF-A in comparison with ovarian endometrioma (P < 0.01).Expression levels of miRNAs related to angiogenesis were different in eutopic endometrium from that observed in ovarian endometrioma. This could influence the expression of angiogenic factors and play a role in the pathogenesis of endometriosis.Eutopic and ectopic stromal cells from patients with endometriosis exhibit differential invasive, adhesive, and proliferative behavior.To study immunophenotype, differential proliferation capacity, invasiveness, adhesion, and cytokine production in ectopic and eutopic endometrial stromal cells (EESCs and EuESCs) from patients with endometriosis.In vitro study.Academic research center.Patients with ovarian endometriosis (endometrioma) and nonendometriotic controls.None.EESCs and EuESCs from 25 patients with endometrioma and ESCs from 20 nonendometriotic controls (CESCs) were isolated, and their immunophenotype, proliferation, invasion, adhesion, and cytokine production were assessed and compared.Isolated ESCs from all three sources expressed markers specific for cells of mesenchymal origin but were negative for hematopoietic markers. EESCs exhibited a significantly lower proliferation rate in fibronectin-coated plates and less invasive capacity compared with CESCs or EuESCs. Among all stromal cell groups studied, EuESCs showed the highest invasive behavior. EESCs adhered more firmly to extracellular matrix than EuESCs or CESCs in all time intervals examined. The levels of interleukin (IL) -6 and IL-8 production by EESCs were significantly higher compared with those of EuESCs or CESCs.The results of the present study demonstrated that retrograde menstruation alone does not account for the pathogenesis of endometriosis as eutopic and ectopic counterparts of ESCs from patients with endometriosis exhibit differential invasive, adhesive, and proliferative behavior.Abnormal interleukin-1 receptor type II gene expression in the endometrium of women with endometriosis.Interleukin 1 (IL-1) is a major proinflammatory cytokine that is believed to play a central role in the pathophysiology of endometriosis. The IL-1 receptor type II (IL-1RII) is known to bind to IL-1 and to inhibit its biological effects. In our previous studies, we showed that human endometrium expresses IL-1RII, and we observed reduced expression of the protein in women with endometriosis. The aim of this study was to investigate IL-1RII mRNA in the endometrial tissue of normal women (n = 26) and of patients with various degrees of endometriosis (n = 53). In situ hybridization showed that IL-1RII mRNA expression was significantly decreased in endometriosis, particularly during the early stages of the disease (stages I and II). This was quite obvious in both glandular and stromal cells, and it was corroborated by reverse transcription-polymerase chain reaction analysis of IL-1RII mRNA in the endometrial tissue of women with (n = 10) and without (n = 8) endometriosis. The reduced levels of IL-1RII mRNA in the endometrium of women suffering from endometriosis reveals a profound defect in IL-1RII gene expression and, consequently, a reduced capability of endometrial tissue to down-regulate IL-1 activity. Defective IL-1RII gene expression during the early stages of endometriosis (stages I and II) may contribute to the etiology of the disease.Progesterone induction of 17beta-hydroxysteroid dehydrogenase type 2 during the secretory phase occurs in the endometrium of estrogen-dependent benign diseases but not in normal endometrium.In the human endometrium, inactivation of 17beta-estradiol to estrone is catalyzed by 17beta-hydroxysteroid dehydrogenase type 2 (17betaHSD2). Previous studies have shown that the 17betaHSD2 activity in the endometrium is elevated during the secretory phase, as compared with the level during the proliferative phase, and that the elevation is in response to progesterone via the progesterone receptors. Recently, it has been demonstrated that aromatase cytochrome P450, the enzyme responsible for estrogen biosynthesis, is not present in the endometrium obtained from normal menstruating women with cervical cancer in situ showing no other gynecological disease (defined as "disease free"), but present in the endometrium obtained from patients with endometriosis, adenomyosis, and/or leiomyomas (defined as "diseased"). However, the previous 17betaHSD studies have been performed without distinguishing between disease-free and diseased endometria. We, therefore, analyzed 17betaHSD2 distinguishing between disease-free and diseased endometria. During the proliferative phase, the abundance of messenger RNA (mRNA) and activity of 17betaHSD2 were comparable in both disease-free and diseased endometrium. However, during the secretory phase, while the abundance of mRNA and activity of 17betaHSD2 increased 4- to 6-fold in diseased endometrium, the 17betaHSD2 remained unchanged in the disease-free endometrium. Kinetic studies showed that the Km was identical among the four groups of endometria, suggesting that the elevation of 17betaHSD2 simply resulted from increased mRNA transcription. Organ culture of proliferative endometria in the presence of progestins resulted in the stimulation of 17betaHSD2 in diseased endometria via the progesterone receptors, whereas disease-free endometrium was not stimulated by progestins. These results suggest that the previous paradigm that 17betaHSD2 activity in the endometrium is elevated during the secretory phase is confined to diseased endometrium but not to disease-free endometrium and that the estrogen metabolism is altered in the endometria of the patients with estrogen-dependent benign diseases.Nuclear factor kappaB pathway and interleukin-6 are affected in eutopic endometrium of women with endometriosis.In order to investigate the role of the nuclear factor kappaB (NFKB) pathway on gene expression in the eutopic endometrium in endometriosis, and in particular of interleukin-6 (IL6), we evaluated RELA, IkappaB kinase (CHUK), NFKBIA and IL6 expressions and NFKB DNA binding in eutopic endometrium from women with endometriosis. Eutopic endometrium was obtained from 37 women with endometriosis and 42 fertile women during laparoscopy. We analysed RELA, CHUK, NFKBIA and IL6 mRNA levels (RT-PCR); RELA, CHUK and NFKBIA proteins and p-NFKBIA/NFKBIA ratio (western blot); and NFKB binding (DNA shift assay) and IL6 concentration (ELISA) in endometrial explants. Our results indicate that mRNA and cytoplasmic proteins of RELA and CHUK exhibit constant levels in normal endometrium during the menstrual cycle. A dramatic increase (P<0.05) in NFKBIA mRNA expression, RELA nuclear presence and the mRNA and the protein of IL6 during late secretory phase was also observed in this tissue. By contrast, in eutopic endometrium from endometriosis patients, a decrease (P<0.05) in IL6 mRNA and protein (61%), NFKBIA mRNA (46%), p-NFKBIA/NFKBIA ratio (42%), RELA nuclear stromal (68%) and CHUK (48%) proteins were found exclusively during the late secretory phase compared with normal endometrium. In conclusion, the canonical activation of NFKB pathway is deregulated and may have reduced transcriptional function affecting NFKBIA and IL6 expression, genes related local proinflammatory processes. These molecular alterations observed during the late secretory phase in eutopic endometrium from endometriosis patients constitute a NFKB system dysfunction, suggesting that NFKB could be an important factor in endometriosis aetiology.Immunohistochemical study of HLA-DR antigen in endometrial tissue of patients with endometriosis.In order to evaluate the expression of HLA-DR antigen in glandular cells in eutopic and ectopic endometrium in patients with endometriosis, 19 infertile patients with endometriosis were analyzed immunohistochemically by labelled streptavidin biotin (LSAB) method. Nineteen infertile patients without endometriosis were studied as controls. The results showed that the expression of HLA-DR antigen in the glandular cells in both eutopic and ectopic endometrium was increased significantly as compared with that in the controls (P < 0.01). It is likely that aberrant expression of HLA-DR antigen in endometriotic tissue is involved in abnormal immunogenesis of endometriosis.Endometrial pinopode and alphavbeta3 integrin expression is not impaired in infertile patients with endometriosis.To investigate endometrial receptivity in terms of pinopode formation and alphavbeta3 integrin expression in infertile women with endometriosis during natural cycles.We investigated the expression of alphavbeta3 integrin and pinopode formation in the endometrium of 12 infertile patients with stage I or II endometriosis as the only cause of infertility, 12 infertile patients having unexplained infertility, and 12 fertile women who were undergoing tubal sterilization. Two endometrial biopsies (postovulatory day +7 to +8 and 4 days later) were performed during a single menstrual cycle in each subject.No statistically significant difference regarding alphavbeta3 integrin expression and pinopode formation was found between infertile patients with endometriosis and the two control groups.alphavbeta3 integrin expression and pinopode formation are not reduced during the window of implantation in patients with stage I-II endometriosis. Whether these results imply normal endometrial receptivity in such patients or add to the increasing uncertainty about the clinical value of assessing the endometrium with those markers of implantation, warrants further studies.Matrix metalloproteinase-2, membranous type 1 matrix metalloproteinase, and tissue inhibitor of metalloproteinase-2 expression in ectopic and eutopic endometrium.To investigate expression of matrix metalloproteinase-2 (MMP-2), membranous type 1 matrix metalloproteinase (MT1-MMP), and tissue inhibitor of metalloproteinase-2 (TIMP-2) in ectopic and eutopic endometrium from women with and without endometriosis throughout the menstrual cycle.Molecular studies in human tissue.Reproductive immunology laboratory of a university medical center.Fifty-three premenopausal woman (23 with endometriosis and 30 without endometriosis) undergoing laparoscopic surgery. Endometrium and ectopic endometriosis tissue were obtained at the time of surgery.Messenger RNA and protein expression from eutopic and ectopic endometrium was analyzed by using quantitative competitive polymerase chain reaction, zymography, and Western blot assay.Uterine endometrium from women with endometriosis expressed higher levels of MMP-2 and MT1-MMP and lower levels of TIMP-2 than did endometrium from normal women.Eutopic endometrium from patients with endometriosis may be more invasive and prone to peritoneal implantation because of greater expression of MMP-2 and MT1-MMP and lower expression of TIMP-2 messenger RNA, compared with endometrium from women without endometriosis. Thus, increased proteolytic activity may help to explain the invasive factors that result in endometriosis.Lack of varied endometrial expression of proprotein convertase 6 in infertile women with minimal grade endometriosis and idiopathic infertility.Proprotein convertase 6 (PC6) is known to be the key enzyme involved in the transformation of many hormones, cytokines and their receptors into their active forms. Experimental in vitro studies have also proven that lack of PC6 in the endometrium prevents decidualisation. Therefore in our study we have aimed at determining whether infertility in some patients might be attributable to decreased expression of PC6.With the use of RealTime PCR we have studied the expression level of PC6 in receptive phase endometria from 36 idiopathic infertile patients, 26 infertile patients with minimal grade endometriosis and compared those results with fertile, age-matched controls. The endometria were collected 7-9 days after ovulation.There were no statistically significant differences regarding the expression of PC6 in endometria from patients with idiopathic infertility, infertile patients with endometriosis and controls.Since there is no detectable difference in PC6 expression, the decreased expression of PC6 is unlikely to cause infertility.Apoptosis in endometrial glandular and stromal cells in women with and without endometriosis.The aetiology of endometriosis is unknown. Ectopic dissemination of the endometrial cells gives origin to endometriotic lesions, but occurs in women with and without endometriosis. It has been suggested that increased ectopic cell survival facilitates their implantation. The objectives of this study were to evaluate endometrial apoptosis in women with endometriosis according to: (i) cyclic changes, (ii) glandular and stromal contribution, and (iii) stage of the disease.The subjects were women undergoing diagnostic laparoscopy and endometrial biopsies for suspected endometriosis. Spontaneous apoptosis was evaluated using TdT-mediated dUTP-biotin nick end-labelling (TUNEL) assay. Apoptotic cells per 10 mm(2) (apoptotic index) in an area of 10-50 mm(2) in 5 microm endometrial tissue sections were counted and location of these cells was recorded.The apoptotic index in glandular epithelium was lower in endometriosis than controls (26.0 +/- 5.5 versus 51.2 +/- 9.7, P = 0.03) but not in the stroma (36.3 +/- 6.4 versus 48.4 +/- 11.3, NS). In controls, apoptosis was highest during the late secretory/menstrual and early proliferative phases and cyclic variability was apparent. In endometriosis, this cyclic variability was lost. There was a trend toward decreased apoptosis with increasing stage of the disease, but the differences lacked statistical significance.Spontaneous apoptosis is decreased in the endometrial glands in women with endometriosis, especially during late secretory/menstrual and early proliferative phases of the cycle. This may indicate increased viability of endometrial cells shed during menses, facilitating their ectopic survival and implantation.Decreased expression of pigment epithelium-derived factor and increased microvascular density in ovarian endometriotic lesions in women with endometriosis.To determine whether women with endometriosis have altered expression of pigment epithelium-derived factor (PEDF) in ovarian endometriotic lesions as compared to women without endometriosis.Ectopic and eutopic and normal endometrial tissues were sampled from 40 women with ovarian endometriosis and 20 control women, respectively. Endometrial PEDF expression and microvascular density (MVD) using an antibody to von Willebrand factor (vWF) and alpha-smooth muscle actin (α-SMA) were evaluated by using immunohistochemical staining.We detected decreased PEDF expression and increased MVD using anti-vWF and -α-SMA in ovarian endometriotic lesions in women with endometriosis compared with the control group. In women with endometriosis, the MVD using anti-vWF and -α-SMA but not PEDF expression in ovarian endometriotic lesions correlated with the size of ovarian endometriotic cysts and the severity of the disease. Moreover, the MVD using anti-vWF was negatively correlated with PEDF expression in control endometrium but not in ovarian endometriotic lesions.Our results suggest that decreased PEDF expression and increased MVD in ovarian endometriotic lesions might play an important role in the pathogenesis of ovarian endometriosis.Reduced expression of biomarkers associated with the implantation window in women with endometriosis.To evaluate the expression of biomarkers of implantation, glycodelin A (GdA), osteopontin (OPN), lysophosphatidic acid receptor 3 (LPA3), and HOXA10, in eutopic endometrium of women with and without endometriosis.Prospective observational study.Clinical research center.Twenty-four women with endometriosis and 23 healthy volunteers of similar age.Secretory phase endometrial biopsy.Expression of immunohistochemical staining intensity and localization of GdA, OPN, LPA3, and HOXA10 in eutopic endometrium.Endometrial GdA expression was significantly reduced in patients after cycle day 22. The endometrium from women with endometriosis also showed decreased expression of OPN in the late secretory phase and LPA3 and HOXA10 expression in the midsecretory and late secretory phases.The decreased expression of these four biomarkers of implantation may indicate impaired endometrial receptivity in patients with endometriosis, providing one explanation for the subfertility observed even in women with few pelvic implants. Because many of these markers are P dependent, these findings suggest the possibility of reduced endometrial P action in this population.The macrophage stimulating protein/RON system: a potential novel target for prevention and treatment of endometriosis.Our recent DNA microarray analysis using tissue obtained by laser capture microdissection (LCM) identified up-regulation of RON (a tyrosine kinase receptor) during the late secretory phase in eutopic endometrial epithelial cells from patients with deep endometriosis compared with control endometrium from women with macroscopically normal pelvic cavities. In the present study, we further investigated mRNA expression of RON and its ligand, macrophage stimulating protein (MSP), in deep endometriotic lesions, eutopic endometrium from patients with deep endometriosis and control endometrium by using LCM and quantitative real-time RT-PCR. MSP mRNA expression in endometrial epithelial cells was significantly up-regulated in endometriosis patients during the late secretory phase compared with expression in controls. Furthermore, we detected up-regulation of MSP mRNA in ectopic endometrial epithelial cells compared with matched eutopic endometrial epithelial cells within the same patients regardless of the menstrual phase. MSP has an intrinsically dual functional nature through its receptor RON-it is a trophic cytokine preventing apoptosis and a scatter factor promoting invasion, both of which may be necessary for the initial development and growth of endometriosis. The present findings suggest that the MSP/RON system may be involved in the pathophysiology of endometriosis.Interleukin-11, IL-11 receptoralpha and leukemia inhibitory factor are dysregulated in endometrium of infertile women with endometriosis during the implantation window.Interleukin (IL)-11 is essential for embryo implantation in the mouse and evidence suggests it has a role in implantation in humans. This study has evaluated immunoreactive IL-11, IL-11 receptor (R) alpha and leukemia inhibitory factor (LIF) in endometrium of infertile women with endometriosis (I/E) and normal fertile women (controls) during the implantation window. Endometrial biopsies from I/E (N = 7) were timed from the LH surge and were post-ovulatory days (POD) 5-10. Control biopsies (N = 8) from women were between days 19 and 24 of the menstrual cycle. Staining intensity of IL-11, IL-11Ralpha and LIF evaluated using semi-quantitative immunohistochemistry scores. Immunoreactive IL-11, IL-11Ralpha and LIF were present predominantly in glandular epithelium, while luminal epithelium showed patchy staining. All controls stained positively for IL-11, IL-11Ralpha and LIF in glandular epithelium. IL-11 and IL-11Ralpha staining was absent from glandular epithelium in cohorts of I/E. LIF staining intensity in glandular epithelium was significantly lower in I/E compared to controls. The results suggest that reduced endometrial IL-11 and/or LIF may contribute to infertility in some endometriotic women.The impact of leukemia inhibitory factor in uterine flushing on the reproductive potential of infertile women--a prospective study.To determine the value of leukemia inhibitory factor (LIF) assessment for predicting the reproductive outcome.Two phase study. Phase I: assessment of LIF in uterine flushing. Phase II: 1,5 years after examining the last patient, a questionnaire was sent to all participants of the phase I. Phase I: Uterine flushing and endometrial samples were collected during implantation window from infertile patients with stage I/II endometriosis (n = 14), patients with idiopathic infertility (n = 27), luteal phase deficiency (n = 13), and fertile control (n = 21). LIF was assessed in uterine flushings in all patients by ELISA. In endometrium, semiquantitative RT-PCR was performed for LIF mRNA expression. Phase II: questionnaire has been sent to all infertile women taking part in the first phase of the experiment, regarding their reproductive outcome.65.4% patients who had returned the questionnaire did get pregnant. LIF concentration at a cut-off point of 2.31 pg/ml had a 95.7% sensitivity and 81.8% specificity in predicting the reproductive outcome.This prospective study for the first time in literature indicates that the LIF assessment can be used as a predictor of reproductive success.Characterization of periostin expression in human endometrium and endometriotic lesions.To investigate the expression of periostin in the eutopic and ectopic endometrium of women diagnosed as endometriosis and evaluate the role of periostin in the pathogenesis of endometriosis.In this study, the expression of periostin was evaluated in the endometrial specimens from 35 women diagnosed as endometriosis and from 30 healthy women. To assess the presence and localization of periostin throughout the menstrual cycle in both eutopic and ectopic endometrium of women with endometriosis, microscopic evaluation was conducted. It was also subsequently compared with normal endometrium.In the eutopic and ectopic endometrium of women with endometriosis, immunoreactivities of periostin increased compared with those of normal endometrium. We also observed a cyclic variation in the eutopic stromal periostin immunoreactivity throughout their menstrual cycle because higher H score values were observed in the proliferative phase than those in the secretory phase.These findings indicated that periostin may be involved in the pathophysiology of endometriosis.Eutopic endometrium and peritoneal, ovarian and colorectal endometriotic tissues express a different profile of nectin-1, -3, -4 and nectin-like molecule 2.How is the expression of nectins and nectin-like molecules (Necls) detected by immunostaining altered by endometriosis?Our results suggest that Nectin-1, -3, -4 and Necl-2 may contribute to the pathogenesis of endometriosis. Immunostaining of nectins and Necls varies according to the anatomical location of endometriosis.Nectin and Necl molecules are immunoglobulin-like cell adhesion molecules involved in apoptosis, cell proliferation and in metastases. Previous studies have demonstrated the involvement of adhesion molecules in the development of endometriotic lesions but no data exist on immunostaining of nectins and Necls molecules in endometriosis.This retrospective study was conducted in a tertiary-care hospital (Tenon Hospital, Paris, France). Samples were collected from 55 women undergoing endometrial biopsy or surgery for endometriosis and 20 controls having hysterectomy or endometrial biopsy for other reasons; multiple samples were collected from 15 women. We studied the immunostaining of Nectin-1, -3, -4 and Necl-2 in secretory and proliferative endometrium from women with (n = 20) or without endometriosis (i.e. control group, n = 20), and in peritoneal (n = 20), ovarian (n = 20) and colorectal endometriosis (n = 20).Semi-quantitative immunostaining demonstrated that (1) Necl-2 staining was stronger in all types of endometriotic lesions than in the eutopic endometrium from patients with endometriosis (P < 0.0125) and in ovarian endometriotic cysts compared with other locations (P < 0.001); (2) Nectin-3 staining was stronger in the eutopic endometrium of patients with endometriosis compared with controls (P = 0.03) and in all endometriotic lesions compared with the eutopic endometrium from patients with endometriosis (P < 0.0125); (3) Nectin-4, staining was stronger in the eutopic endometrium of patients with endometriosis compared with controls (P = 0.04) and (4) Nectin-1 staining was significantly increased in colorectal endometriosis compared with other locations (P = 0.004).We did not assess the pattern of expression in endometriosis of all nectins and Necl molecules. Indeed, Necl-5 is implicated in many pathophysiological processes such as cell movement and proliferation with potential relevance to endometriosis. GENERALISABILITY TO OTHER POPULATIONS: At present, few data on implication of nectins and Necl molecules in endometriosis exist. Hence, our results should be confirmed by further quantitative studies at protein or RNA levels.No funding source. All the authors declare no conflict of interest.Is the detection of endometrial nerve fibers useful in the diagnosis of endometriosis?Laparoscopy is currently considered to be the gold standard investigation in patients suspected to have endometriosis, but this is an invasive and relatively costly procedure and there may be significant delays in diagnosis. As the eutopic endometrium is recognized to be abnormal in patients with endometriosis, it has been suggested that endometrial sampling could provide an indirect diagnostic approach. In particular, recent reports have suggested that the presence of nerve fibers within the endometrial functional layer could represent a specific and sensitive marker of concurrent peritoneal endometriosis. However, such studies have been performed in select patient groups and using novel sampling and analytic techniques that are not used routinely in clinical pathology laboratories. The present study was performed upon conventional endometrial biopsies from 68 patients who underwent laparoscopy for suspected endometriosis. The biopsies were stained immunohistochemically for the neural marker PGP 9.5 and examined in a blinded manner. Endometrial functional layer nerve fibers were identified in 15 (22%) biopsies overall including 9/47 (19%) cases with histologically confirmed peritoneal endometriosis and 6/21 (29% cases) without endometriosis. There was no correlation between the presence of functional layer nerve fibers and the presenting symptoms, endometrial histology, or current hormonal therapy. In our experience, endometrial functional layer nerve fibers assessment performed using standard immunohistochemical techniques on routine biopsy specimens proved neither sensitive nor specific for the diagnosis of endometriosis. Pathologists and gynecologists considering this diagnostic approach should carefully consider the methodological factors that may influence its reliability.Deficient expression of tumor necrosis factor receptor type 2 in the endometrium of women with endometriosis.Tumor necrosis factor-alpha (TNF-alpha) is secreted mainly during the menstrual phase and has been suggested to play a role in induction of apoptosis in endometrial cells and menstrual shedding. TNF-alpha receptor type 2 (TNF-RII) is believed to play a central role in TNFalpha-mediated cytotoxic, mitogenic, anti-proliferative and apoptotic effects. The aim of this study was to assess whether TNF-RII maybe expressed differentially in the endometrium of women with different degrees of endometriosis.TNF-RII expression in the endometrial tissue of women with and without endometriosis was investigated by immunohistochemical techniques and in situ hybridization.In histological sections, we observed TNF-RII mRNA and the corresponding protein localized mainly in endometrial glandular cells, with only very faint immunostaining in the surrounding stromal cells. Statistical analysis of our data showed a significant decrease in protein and mRNA expression of TNF-RII in endometrial glandular cells of patients with stages I and II endometriosis compared to normal subjects. TNF-RII expression was also found to decrease significantly in the secretory phase of the menstrual cycle in women with early endometriosis stages (I and II).In view of the relevant role of TNF-RII in the modulation of the inflammatory and the proapoptotic effects of TNFalpha, deficient expression of TNF-RII mRNA in the endometrium of women at the earliest stages of endometriosis may play a significant role in the pathophysiology of this disease.Expression of allograft inflammatory factor-1 in human eutopic endometrium and endometriosis: possible association with progression of endometriosis.Allograft inflammatory factor-1 (AIF-1) is a cytokine originally identified in rat cardiac allografts with chronic rejection. AIF-1 is expressed in various human immune-related tissues and is thought to play a role in inflammatory responses and the immune activation and function of macrophages. Expression has also been shown in human placentas and bovine embryos, suggesting that AIF-1 may be involved in reproductive function. Immune factors are thought to be involved in the pathogenesis of endometriosis. High concentrations of activated macrophages and various cytokines have been found in the peritoneal fluid of patients with endometriosis. In the current work we examined the expression of AIF-1 in human eutopic endometrium and endometriosis, and measured AIF-1 in peritoneal fluid samples from women with and without endometriosis. RT-PCR, Western blot analysis, and immunohistochemistry showed that AIF-1 mRNA and protein were expressed both in eutopic endometrium and in endometriotic tissue. In eutopic endometrium, expression was greater in the late secretory and menstrual phases than in other phases of the menstrual cycle (P < 0.01). AIF-1 protein was present in greater amounts in peritoneal fluid from patients with endometriosis than in women without it (P < 0.01), and its concentration correlated with the Revised American Society for Reproductive Medicine score (rs = 0.693; P < 0.0001). Peritoneal macrophages from endometriosis patients secreted more AIF-1 than those from unaffected women (P < 0.05). AIF-1 release from macrophages was stimulated by IL-1beta (P < 0.01) and interferon-gamma (P < 0.05). These results demonstrate for the first time that AIF-1 is expressed in eutopic endometrium and endometriotic tissue, suggesting that AIF-1 is one cytokine in the local network involved in the onset of menstruation. AIF-1 derived from peritoneal macrophages may also possibly play a significant role in the pathophysiology and progression of endometriosis.Immunohistochemical analysis of alphavbeta5 and alphavbeta6 integrins in the endometrium and endometriosis.We performed a case-controlled study to study the immunoreactivity patterns and staining intensity of alphavbeta5 and alphavbeta6 integrins in ectopic and eutopic endometrium from women with endometriosis and compared them with those in normal control endometrium. Forty eutopic and ectopic samples from patients with endometriosis were compared with 12 control endometrial samples. Staining was evaluated using a computerized image analysis system by a blinded, independent observer. The immunoreactivity patterns for both alphavbeta5 and alphavbeta6 were very similar. In eutopic endometrium from women with or without endometriosis, the immunostaining intensity score for both integrins was stronger during the secretory than the proliferative phase. Immunoreactivity in endometriosis was greater than in eutopic endometrium. There were no significant menstrual cycle-related staining differences in endometriosis. The percentage of blood vessels immunolabeled was greater in endometriosis than eutopic endometrium from endometriosis patients and greater in eutopic endometrium from these patients compared with control endometrium. Ectopic tissue from patients with stages I and II endometriosis showed significantly higher staining intensity than ectopic tissue from patients with stages III and IV disease. Determination of the specific functional consequences of the differences observed in alphavbeta5 and alphavbeta6 integrin immunostaining may provide an increased understanding regarding the pathogenesis of endometriosis.Dysregulation of vascular endothelial growth factors and their neuropilin receptors in the eutopic endometrium of women with endometriosis.Despite the importance of neuropilins (NRPs) in a number of processes that are altered in endometriosis, such as angiogenesis and neuronal guidance, these molecules have not been previously studied in the disease. Similarly, potent lymphangiogenic factors, vascular endothelial growth factor C (VEGF-C) and VEGF-D, have not been comprehensively investigated in endometriosis. The objective of this study was to examine their expression in women with and without endometriosis. NRPs and VEGFs were quantified in 79 histologically normal uterine tissue samples (37 control and 42 endometriosis, all menstrual cycle phases) using immunohistochemistry and automated cellular imaging analysis. NRP-1 was significantly reduced in women with endometriosis (P = .004). The normal significant menstrual cyclical variations in endometrial NRP-1, NRP-2, and VEGF-C were absent in endometriosis, and VEGF-D was dysregulated. Dysregulated expression of growth factors and receptors, such as NRPs and VEGFs, likely contribute to altered angiogenesis, lymphangiogenesis, neurogenesis and immune function in endometriosis and may reflect altered hormone signals. Interleukin 1beta, interleukin-6, and tumor necrosis factor-alpha in endometriotic tissue and in endometrium.To compare the levels of IL-1beta, IL-6, and TNFalpha in endometriotic tissue and in endometrium from women with endometriosis and healthy controls.Open.Department of Obstetrics and Gynecology at a university hospital.Twenty-six women with endometriosis and 22 controls operated on for clinical indications.ELISA in homogenized tissue samples collected during surgery.Levels of IL-1beta, IL-6, and TNFalpha in tissue homogenates.The three types of tissue differed significantly with respect to all three cytokines. Endometriotic tissue had significantly higher concentrations of IL-1beta than endometrium from both patients with endometriosis and healthy controls. Both endometriotic tissue and endometrium from patients had significantly higher concentrations of IL-6, and endometriotic tissue had significantly lower concentration of TNFalpha than did endometrium from controls. IL-1beta showed a cycle phase dependence that was significant in endometrium from patients, being higher in the secretory than in the follicular phase. IL-1beta was significantly higher in endometrioma than in lesions of other localizations. Concentrations of IL-1beta and IL-6 were positively correlated in endometriotic tissue and in endometrium from controls. No other significant correlations were found.This study has shown a significant production of IL-1beta, IL-6, and TNFalpha in endometriotic tissue and endometrium, with significant differences between the tissue types, indicating a deviating cytokine pattern in both endometriotic tissue and endometrium from women with endometriosis compared with that from healthy controls.Use of proteomic analysis of endometriosis to identify different protein expression in patients with endometriosis versus normal controls.To use proteomic techniques, including two-dimensional electrophoresis (2-DE), Western blot, and mass spectrometry, to screen and identify proteins that were expressed differently in patients with endometriosis versus normal controls.First, we aimed to find a difference in the way serum and eutopic endometrial proteins were expressed in women with and without endometriosis. Second, we were interested in searching for endometriotic proteins, which were specifically recognized by sera from patients with endometriosis.Collaborative investigation in an academic research environment.Consenting women of reproductive age taking no medications and with laparoscopically proven endometriosis.Surgical excision of eutopic and ectopic endometrial biopsy and phlebotomization of patients with endometriosis and controls.Protein expression.Thirteen protein spots from serum correlated with 11 known proteins and 11 protein spots from endometrium correlated with 11 known proteins were found differently expressed between women with and without endometriosis. Some proteins may be cytoskeletons, and some may be involved in the regulation of cell cycle, signal transduction, or immunological function. Three proteins, which were identified as vimentin, beta-actin, and ATP synthase beta subunit, hybridized significantly differently between endometriosis sera and normal sera.The data help to establish a human endometriosis proteome database and broaden our understanding of the pathogenesis of endometriosis. Further study of the proteins identified herein will assist in the eventual development of new diagnoses and treatments for endometriosis.Downregulation of miR-183 inhibits apoptosis and enhances the invasive potential of endometrial stromal cells in endometriosis.Endometriosis is a common gynecological disease, yet its pathogenesis remains poorly understood. Recent studies have demonstrated that the aberrant expression of certain microRNAs (miRNAs) may correlate with the development and progression of endometriosis. In this study, we profiled several differentially expressed miRNAs in the normal, eutopic and ectopic endometrium by miRNA microarray screening analysis, among which, miR-183 was found to be downregulated in the ectopic and eutopic tissues, and the result was further confirmed by real-time PCR (qPCR). Functional analysis indicated that miR-183 plays a promotional role in endometrial stromal cell (ESC) apoptosis and has a negative regulatory impact on the invasive ability of cells, although it has no effect on ESC proliferation. Ovarian steroids (17β-estradiol and progesterone) and inflammatory factors (tumor necrosis factor-α and interleukin-6) decreased the expression of miR-183 in the ESCs. This regulatory function may further manifest the growth and invasive potential of ESCs by altering the expression of miR-183. These findings suggest that the downregulation of miR-183 expression is involved in the development and progression of endometriosis. The progesterone receptor coactivator Hic-5 is involved in the pathophysiology of endometriosis.Endometriosis is an estrogen-dependent disorder primarily associated with pelvic pain and infertility in up to 10% of women of reproductive age. Recent studies suggest that resistance to progesterone action may contribute to the development and pathophysiology of this disorder. In this study we examined the in vivo and in vitro expression and function of one progesterone receptor (PR) coactivator, Hic-5, in human endometrium and endometrial stromal fibroblasts (hESFs) from 29 women with and 30 (control) women without endometriosis. Hic-5 was highly expressed in stromal, but not epithelial, cells in women without endometriosis, in a cycle-dependent manner. In contrast, Hic-5 expression was not regulated during the menstrual cycle in hESFs from women with endometriosis and was significantly reduced in hESFs from women with vs. without disease. Hic-5 mRNA expression throughout the cycle in endometrium from control women, but not those with endometriosis, correlated with expression of PR. Hic-5 mRNA in hESFs was significantly up-regulated in control but not endometriosis hESFs after treatment in vitro with 8-bromoadenosine-cAMP for 96 h but only modestly after 14 d of progesterone treatment. Hic-5 silencing did not influence cAMP-regulated gene expression but affected genes regulated solely by progesterone (e.g. DKK1 and calcitonin). Together the data suggest that the proposed progesterone resistance in endometrium from women with endometriosis derives, in part, from impaired expression of the PR coactivator, Hic-5, in endometrial tissue and cultured endometrial stromal fibroblasts.Expression of several components of the plasminogen activator and matrix metalloproteinase systems in endometriosis.Endometriosis is considered a benign disease that has the ability to invade normal tissue. As in neoplastic growth, local extracellular proteolysis may take place. The aim of this study is to analyse several components of the plasminogen activator (PA) pathway and the matrix metalloproteinase (MMP) system in endometriotic tissue, endometrium and peritoneal fluid from women with and without endometriosis (controls).Thirty-nine women with endometriosis and 35 controls were studied. In eutopic endometrium of women with endometriosis, the antigenic levels of urokinase-type PA (uPA) and MMP-3 were elevated when compared with endometrium from controls. Ovarian endometriotic tissues had higher antigenic levels of PA inhibitor type 1 (PAI-1) and tissue inhibitor of metalloproteinases type 1 (TIMP-1) than endometrium. The peritoneal fluid from women with endometriosis showed a significant increase in uPA levels compared with controls.The increase in antigenic levels of uPA and MMP-3 in endometrium of women with endometriosis might contribute to the invasive potential of endometrial cells. Once the ovarian endometriotic cyst is developed, an increase in PAI-1 and TIMP-1 is detected and significant proteolytic activity is no longer observed. This increase in inhibitors and decrease in proteolytic activity could explain the frequent clinical finding of isolated endometriotic cyst without invasion of the surrounding ovarian tissue.beta-HCG/LH receptor (beta-HCG/LH-R) expression in eutopic endometrium and endometriotic implants: evidence for beta-HCG sensitivity of endometriosis.Luteinizing hormone (LH) and human chorionic gonadotropin (HCG) target their receptor in gonadal and nongonadal cells to stimulate steroidogenesis and cell growth. The aim of the present study was to investigate the expression of HCG/LH-R in endometriosis to elucidate a possible impact of LH and HCG on this disease.Analysis of HCG/LH-R protein expression in 23 paired samples of ectopic and eutopic tissue of cycling women with endometriosis and in endometrial samples from 22 healthy controls was conducted via immunofluorescence. HCG and HCG/LH-R gene expression in endometriotic lesions was confirmed by reverse-transcriptase polymerase chain reaction.In endometriotic implants, epithelial HCG/LH-R was found in 12/23 samples. No significant differences in HCG/LH-R levels were observed when compared with glands of uterine endometrium from the same patients or healthy controls. Messenger RNA transcripts for HCG were detected in all 12 samples, whereas HCG/LH-R mRNAs were observed in 10 of the 12 endometriotic lesions investigated.Although HCG/LH-R was not found to be selectively upregulated in endometriosis, the mere presence of HCG/LH-R in endometriotic tissue may suggest sensitivity of endometriosis to HCG and LH that target HCG/LH-R.Reduced expression of progesterone receptor-B in the endometrium of women with endometriosis and in cocultures of endometrial cells exposed to 2,3,7,8-tetrachlorodibenzo-p-dioxin.To analyze endometrial progesterone receptor (PR) expression in women with endometriosis compared with disease-free women and to assess the impact of in vitro 2,3,7,8-tetrachlorodibenzo-p-dioxin (TCDD) exposure on PR isotype expression.Controlled laboratory study.University medical center.Healthy volunteers and women with surgically diagnosed endometriosis.None.Analysis of in vivo PR-A and PR-B expression in endometrium from women with and without endometriosis. The impact of in vitro TCDD exposure on PR-B/PR-A ratio and cell-specific matrix metalloproteinase (MMP) expression was also determined.The PR-B/PR-A ratio was lower in endometrial tissues from women with endometriosis compared with normal tissues. A similar ratio was induced in normal stromal cells cocultured with epithelial cells and exposed to TCDD. Disruption of stromal PR expression following TCDD exposure was associated with a failure of P-mediated down-regulation of both stromal-specific pro-MMP-3 and epithelial-specific pro-MMP-7.Our data suggest that reduced progesterone (P) sensitivity in the endometrium of women with endometriosis may be related to an altered pattern of PR expression. The ability of TCDD to selectively down-regulate stromal PR-B expression and increase MMP expression in both stromal and epithelial cells suggests that exposure to this toxin may negatively impact P-mediated cell-cell communication in the human endometrium.Menstrual blood-derived stromal stem cells from women with and without endometriosis reveal different phenotypic and functional characteristics.Retrograde flow of menstrual blood cells during menstruation is considered as the dominant theory for the development of endometriosis. Moreover, current evidence suggests that endometrial-derived stem cells are key players in the pathogenesis of endometriosis. In particular, endometrial stromal stem cells have been suggested to be involved in the pathogenesis of this disease. Here, we aimed to use menstrual blood, as a novel source of endometrial stem cells, to investigate whether stromal stem cells from endometriosis (E-MenSCs) and non-endometriosis (NE-MenSCs) women differed regarding their morphology, CD marker expression pattern, proliferation, invasion and adhesion capacities and their ability to express certain immunomodulatory molecules. E-MenSCs were morphologically different from NE-MenSCs and showed higher expression of CD9, CD10 and CD29. Furthermore, E-MenSCs had higher proliferation and invasion potentials compared with NE-MenSCs. The amount of indoleamine 2,3-dioxygenase-1 (IDO1) and cyclooxygenase-2 (COX-2) in E-MenSCs co-cultured with allogenic peripheral blood mononuclear cells (PBMCs) was shown to be higher both at the gene and protein levels, and higher IDO1 activity was detected in the endometriosis group. However, NE-MenSCs revealed increased concentrations of forkhead transcription factor-3 (FOXP3) when compared with E-MenSCs. Nonetheless, interferon (IFN)-γ, Interleukin (IL)-10 and monocyte chemoattractant protein-1 (MCP-1) levels were higher in the supernatant of E-MenSCs-PBMC co-cultures. Here, we showed that there are inherent differences between E-MenSCs and NE-MenSCs. These findings propose the key role MenSCs could play in the pathogenesis of endometriosis and further support the retrograde and stem cell theories of endometriosis. Hence, considering its renewable and easily available nature, menstrual blood could be viewed as a reliable and inexpensive material for studies addressing the cellular and molecular aspects of endometriosis. Endometrial leptin and leptin receptor expression in women with severe/moderate endometriosis.The leptin system has been implicated in reproductive function, acting at endocrine and paracrine levels. Recently, deregulation of this gene family has been linked to endometrial changes caused by endometriosis. In the present study, we compare the expression of leptin receptor mRNA during the pre-receptive (LH+2) and receptive (LH+9) phases in the eutopic endometrium from patients with severe/moderate endometriosis (n = 30) versus fertile controls (n = 12). In each patient, two endometrial samples were obtained at LH+2 and LH+9 in their natural cycles. When real-time quantitative fluorescent PCR was performed, an up-regulation of OB-RL and all the isoforms investigated was observed at LH+9 versus LH+2 in patients with and without endometriosis. However, no difference was found in the expression pattern of the total leptin receptor OB-RT, or in its long OB-RL and soluble HuB219.3 forms when the eutopic endometria of patients with severe/moderate endometriosis and fertile controls were compared. By means of in situ hybridization, total leptin receptor mRNA was localized in the luminal epithelium and the glands of the endometrium. The immunohistochemical analysis of the long form of leptin receptor was also performed in order to confirm these findings at the protein level. Finally, we have also shown similar leptin mRNA expression in both the control group and patients with endometriosis. In conclusion, we have not identified differences in the endometrial expression and localization of leptin and the leptin receptor when comparing the eutopic endometrium of women with severe/moderate endometriosis and fertile controls.Escherichia coli contamination of menstrual blood and effect of bacterial endotoxin on endometriosis.To test the hypothesis that bacterial contamination of menstrual blood could be a local biologic event in the development of endometriosis, menstrual blood was cultured and bacterial endotoxin was measured in menstrual blood and peritoneal fluid. Our results suggest that compared with control women, higher colony formation of Escherichia coli in menstrual blood and endotoxin levels in menstrual fluid and peritoneal fluid in women with endometriosis may promote Toll-like receptor 4-mediated growth of endometriosis.Up-regulation of endocrine gland-derived vascular endothelial growth factor but not vascular endothelial growth factor in human ectopic endometriotic tissue.To study the expression of vascular endothelial growth factor (VEGF), endocrine gland-derived VEGF (EG-VEGF/PK1), and its receptors (PKR1 and PKR2) in eutopic and ectopic endometrial tissues.A case-control study.University reproduction unit.Infertile women undergoing diagnostic laparoscopy for tubal patency.Endometrial and endometriotic tissue sampling from women with and without endometriosis.Quantitative polymerase chain reaction (PCR) analysis of genes in eutopic and ectopic endometrial tissues. The EG-VEGF protein was studied by immunohistochemistry.In normal endometrium, EG-VEGF messenger RNA (mRNA) expression was 50-fold higher in the secretory than in the proliferative phase, but that of PKR1 was 6-fold higher in the latter than in the former. The PKR2 transcript was detected in the proliferative but not the secretory endometrium. In patients with endometriosis, eutopic endometrial PKR2 transcript level was 4-fold higher in the proliferative than in the secretory phase. No differences in EG-VEGF or PKR1 were found in proliferative versus secretory endometrium in these patients. There were no significant differences in the expression of EG-VEGF in eutopic endometrium of normal women and in those with endometriosis. In the paired laser-captured microdissected eutopic endometrial and ectopic endometriotic samples, a significantly higher EG-VEGF, but not VEGF, transcript level was detected in the ectopic when compared with eutopic samples; whereas the expressions of PKR1 and PKR2 were barely detectable. The H-scoring confirmed that the stroma of endometriotic samples had a significantly higher EG-VEGF protein expression than that in the paired eutopic endometrium.High levels of EG-VEGF expression may play an important role in angiogenesis in endometriotic tissues.mRNA analysis of several components of the plasminogen activator and matrix metalloproteinase systems in endometriosis using a real-time quantitative RT-PCR assay.The plasminogen activator (PA) and matrix metalloproteinase (MMP) systems are implicated in the establishment of endometriosis. The mechanisms by which these systems are involved in the pathogenesis of this disease are not well defined and controversial results have been published. The aim of this study was to analyse mRNA and protein levels of several components of the PA and MMP systems in endometriotic tissue and endometrium from women with and without endometriosis.Real-time quantitative RT-PCR assays were developed to quantify mRNA levels of these components in 57 women with endometriosis and 32 controls. Endometrium of women with endometriosis showed higher mRNA and antigenic levels of urokinase type-PA (uPA) and MMP-3 than endometrium from controls. In these patients, ovarian endometriotic tissue had higher mRNA and antigenic levels of PA inhibitor type 1 (PAI-1) and MMP inhibitor type 1 (TIMP-1) than endometrium.The increase in mRNA and protein levels of uPA and MMP-3 observed in endometrium of women with endometriosis may facilitate the attachment of endometrial tissue to the peritoneum and ovarian surface, as well as the invasion of the extracellular matrix. This process would lead to the formation of early endometriotic lesions. Once the ovarian endometriotic cyst is developed, PAI-1 and TIMP-1 would increase which could explain the frequent clinical finding of an endometrioma without invasion of the adjacent ovarian tissue.Regulation of interleukin-8 expression in human endometrial endothelial cells: a potential mechanism for the pathogenesis of endometriosis.The elevation of the proinflammatory chemoattractant cytokine levels in ectopic and eutopic endometrium of endometriosis implies an inflammatory basis for this disease. The relationship between endothelial cells and leukocytes is likely to be important in the regulation of inflammatory mediators of endometriosis. The aim of this study was to describe the temporal and spatial expression of IL-8 in human endometrial endothelial cells (HEEC) in vivo and to compare the in vitro regulation of IL-8 expression by sex steroids in HEEC from women with or without endometriosis. Eutopic endometrial tissues and endometriosis implants were grouped according to menstrual cycle phase and examined by immunohistochemistry for IL-8 expression. Endothelial cells of endometriotic implants expressed higher IL-8 immunoreactivity compared with endothelial cells of eutopic endometrium from women with or without endometriosis (P < 0.02). For in vitro studies, HEEC were isolated from women with or without endometriosis and grown to preconfluence. The purity of cultured HEEC (90-95%) was confirmed by immunocytochemistry using endothelium-specific markers, CD31 and CD146. The effects of estradiol (5 x 10(-8) m), progesterone (10(-7) m), or both on IL-8 mRNA and protein levels were analyzed by RT-PCR and ELISA, respectively. Sex steroids reduced the expression of IL-8 mRNA and protein in HEEC from women without endometriosis. In contrast, both estradiol and progesterone stimulated IL-8 mRNA and protein expression in HEEC from women with endometriosis. We postulate that the stimulation of chemokine expression by sex steroids in HEEC of women with endometriosis may play a role in the inflammatory aspect of this disease.Clinical usefulness of determination of estradiol level in the menstrual blood for patients with endometriosis.The role of tissue factor and protease-activated receptor 2 in endometriosis.Little is known about the roles of TF and PAR-2 in endometriosis. This article investigated the expression of TF and PAR-2 in ectopic and eutopic endometrium with endometriosis and their relationship with the menstrual cycle.Ectopic and eutopic endometrium tissues from 42 women with ovarian endometrioma and endometrium tissues from 20 women without endometriosis were obtained. All the samples were assessed for TF and PAR-2 protein location using immunohistochemistry and for relative TF and PAR-2 mRNA expression using real-time florescent quantitative polymerase chain reaction (FQ-PCR).Total TF and PAR-2 expression were significantly higher in ectopic and eutopic endometrium of women with endometriosis when compared with controls. Moreover, TF expression in ectopic and eutopic endometrium and PAR-2 expression in ectopic endometrium were significantly increased through the whole menstrual cycle. However, in eutopic endometrium with endometriosis, PAR-2 expression only in secretory phase was higher than its cycle-matched normal controls. There is no such difference in the proliferative phase.The abnormal co-upregulated expression of TF and PAR-2 in eutopic and ectopic endometrium may affect the development and growth of endometriotic lesions and highlighted the pathologic role of TF and PAR-2 in eutopic endometrium in endometriosis.Cyr61, a deregulated gene in endometriosis.Gene expression profiling was performed to identify genes involved in the development of endometriosis. In the secretory phase of the menstrual cycle, several estrogen-regulated genes were up-regulated in endometria of women with endometriosis. The most consistent regulation with one of the highest factors was observed for the Cyr61 gene, which codes for a secreted, cysteine-rich, heparin-binding protein that promotes cell adhesion, migration, and neovascularization. Estrogen responsiveness of endometrial Cyr61 expression was suggested by the higher expression during the proliferative phase and the reduction observed in human endometrial fragments grafted into nude mice subsequently treated with an anti-estrogen. The expression level of Cyr61 was found to be further increased in ectopic endometriotic lesions, as compared to eutopic endometria. In these lesions, an imbalance in expression of the estrogen-converting enzymes 17beta-hydroxysteroid dehydrogenase type 1 and 2 was found, which might explain the elevated Cyr61 level. However, Cyr61 expression was not altered in endometriotic lesions of women treated with a GnRH agonist. These results suggest that Cyr61 may represent a gene characteristic for endometriosis and also play an important role in the development and persistence of endometriotic lesions.Expression of macrophage migration inhibitory factor in human endometriosis: relation to disease stage, menstrual cycle and infertility.The aim of the present study was to compare the expression of macrophage migration inhibitory factor (MIF) in eutopic and ectopic endometria of women with endometriosis and eutopic endometria of women without endometriosis, and to investigate whether such an expression varies according to disease stage, menstrual cycle and infertility status.Forty patients with endometriosis and 15 control women were recruited for the study. Following isolation of total RNA from endometria and reverse transcription, cDNA samples were amplified to quantify the level of MIF expression by real-time fluorescent quantitative polymerase chain reaction. All of the endometriosis tissue and normal endometrium specimens were analyzed using immunohistochemistry.The levels of MIF in eutopic and ectopic endometria in endometriosis patients were significantly higher than in normal eutopic endometria (P < 0.01). Further, when comparing MIF in eutopic endometria (separated by phases) between the endometriosis and control groups, MIF was higher in the former group, both in the proliferative and secretory phases (P < 0.05). In addition, the MIF mRNA level was cycle phase-dependent and increased in the proliferative phase, both in women with endometriosis and the control women, compared with the level in the secretory phase (P < 0.05). There was no significant association between MIF expression and American Fertility Society staging of endometriosis (P > 0.05). However, MIF levels were obviously elevated in sterile women in the endometriosis group compared with women in the endometriosis group who were not sterile (P < 0.05).The expression of MIF was increased significantly in the eutopic and ectopic endometrial tissue of women with endometriosis, and this factor may play a possible role in endometriosis-associated infertility.Combined mRNA microarray and proteomic analysis of eutopic endometrium of women with and without endometriosis.An early semi-invasive diagnosis of endometriosis has the potential to allow early treatment and minimize disease progression but no such test is available at present. Our aim was to perform a combined mRNA microarray and proteomic analysis on the same eutopic endometrium sample obtained from patients with and without endometriosis.mRNA and protein fractions were extracted from 49 endometrial biopsies obtained from women with laparoscopically proven presence (n= 31) or absence (n= 18) of endometriosis during the early luteal (n= 27) or menstrual phase (n= 22) and analyzed using microarray and proteomic surface enhanced laser desorption ionization-time of flight mass spectrometry, respectively. Proteomic data were analyzed using a least squares-support vector machines (LS-SVM) model built on 70% (training set) and 30% of the samples (test set).mRNA analysis of eutopic endometrium did not show any differentially expressed genes in women with endometriosis when compared with controls, regardless of endometriosis stage or cycle phase. mRNA was differentially expressed (P< 0.05) in women with (925 genes) and without endometriosis (1087 genes) during the menstrual phase when compared with the early luteal phase. Proteomic analysis based on five peptide peaks [2072 mass/charge (m/z); 2973 m/z; 3623 m/z; 3680 m/z and 21133 m/z] using an LS-SVM model applied on the luteal phase endometrium training set allowed the diagnosis of endometriosis (sensitivity, 91; 95% confidence interval (CI): 74-98; specificity, 80; 95% CI: 66-97 and positive predictive value, 87.9%; negative predictive value, 84.8%) in the test set.mRNA expression of eutopic endometrium was comparable in women with and without endometriosis but different in menstrual endometrium when compared with luteal endometrium in women with endometriosis. Proteomic analysis of luteal phase endometrium allowed the diagnosis of endometriosis with high sensitivity and specificity in training and test sets. A potential limitation of our study is the fact that our control group included women with a normal pelvis as well as women with concurrent pelvic disease (e.g. fibroids, benign ovarian cysts, hydrosalpinges), which may have contributed to the comparable mRNA expression profile in the eutopic endometrium of women with endometriosis and controls.Relative expression of 1,25-dihydroxyvitamin D3 receptor, vitamin D 1 alpha-hydroxylase, vitamin D 24-hydroxylase, and vitamin D 25-hydroxylase in endometriosis and gynecologic cancers.The authors demonstrate expression of the vitamin D receptor (VDR) and its hydroxylases in the endometrium and ovaries of women with and without endometriosis and endometrial or ovarian cancer. Immunohistochemistry showed strong staining of the VDR in endometriosis and endometrial cancer, with the most intense staining in epithelial cells. The VDR mRNA was significantly increased in patients with endometrial and ovarian cancer compared to the control group. There was a significantly higher 1 alpha-hydroxylase expression in the endometrium of patients with endometriosis compared to healthy controls. The observed differences in VDR and 1 alpha -hydroxylase mRNA levels were maintained at the protein level. The authors found no differences in 25-OH vitamin D levels between the serum of patients with endometriosis (25.7 +/- 2.1 ng/mL, n = 46) and healthy controls (22.6 +/- 2.0 ng/mL, n = 33, P = .31). They hypothesize that vitamin D might influence the local activity of immune cells and cytokines thought to play important pathogenic roles in the development and maintenance of endometriosis.Silencing of cofilin-1 gene attenuates biological behaviours of stromal cells derived from eutopic endometria of women with endometriosis.Eutopic endometria with endometriosis (EMs) differ dramatically from normal endometria, physiologically and biochemically, yet the pathogenesis of EMs remains unclear. Cofilin-1 (CFL1), a critical modulator of the actin cystoskeleton, is associated with tumour progression, cell motility, cell adhesion, cell invasion and angiogenesis. Although eutopic endometria with EMs exhibit many malignant-like behaviours and a higher expression of CFL1 than normal endometria, the effects of CFL1 on the pathogenesis of EMs are unknown. The aim of this study was to explore the role of CFL1 expression in proliferation, apoptosis, adhesion, invasion, angiogenesis and ultrastructure of endometrial cells.We isolated and cultured stromal cells derived from the eutopic endometria of 30 patients with advanced ovarian EMs (ESCs, Stromal Cells of eutopic endometria in Endometriosis patients) and 30 control patients without EMs (NSCs, Stromal Cells of eutopic endometria in Non-endometriosis patients), and evaluated their proliferation, apoptosis, adhesion, invasion and expression of markers of adhesion, invasion and angiogenesis in vitro. In addition, these functions were examined after short hairpin RNA (shRNA) was used to silence the CFL1 gene in ESCs, and pEGFP-N1-CFL recombinant plasmid was transiently transfected into NSCs to up-regulate CFL1 expression.Under basal conditions, CFL1 mRNA and protein were overexpressed in ESCs. Proliferation, adhesion, invasion and markers of adhesion, invasion and angiogenesis were enhanced in ESCs compared with NSCs; in contrast, the apoptosis rate was lower in ESCs than in NSCs. Silencing the CFL1 gene in ESCs markedly attenuated proliferation, adhesion, invasion and expression of the markers, but enhanced apoptosis. Conversely, up-regulation of CFL1 in NSCs increased proliferation, adhesion, invasion and expression of the markers but reduced apoptosis.The overexpression of CFL1 in ESCs is associated with enhanced proliferation, adhesion, invasion and angiogenesis and reduced apoptosis in EMs. These malignant-like behaviours of ESCs in EMs can be attenuated by inducing CFL1 gene silencing with shRNA interference.Identification biomarkers of eutopic endometrium in endometriosis using artificial neural networks and protein fingerprinting.Surface-enhanced laser desorption/ionization time-of-flight mass spectrometry (SELDI-TOF-MS) protein chip array technology was used to detect biomarkers of eutopic endometrium in endometriosis patients. Five potential biomarkers (6,898 m/z, 5,891 m/z, 5,385 m/z, 6,448 m/z, and 5,425 m/z) were found.Increased soluble interleukin-1 receptor type II proteolysis in the endometrium of women with endometriosis.Numerous functional changes were observed in the intrauterine endometrial tissue of women with endometriosis. Our previous studies revealed a marked decrease in the expression of interleukin-1 receptor type 2 (IL-1RII), a decoy receptor known for its ability to buffer IL-1 effects. The aim of the present study was to assess whether post-translational mechanisms such as proteolysis may contribute to the down-regulation of IL-1RII levels. Our data showed that soluble IL-1RII (sIL-1RII) concentrations released by freshly cultured endometrial tissue were significantly lower in women with endometriosis than in normal women (P < 0.01) and further revealed a statistically significant correlation between increased proteolysis and decreased sIL-1RII levels (P < 0.05; r = -0.47). (125)I-labelled soluble recombinant human IL-1RII ([(125)I]srhIL-1RII) was significantly more degraded in culture supernatant of tissues from women with endometriosis compared to normal women (P < 0.05), and natural tissue inhibitor of matrix metalloproteinase (TIMP)-1 inhibited [(125)I]srhIL-1RII degradation. Incubation of srhIL-1RII with active rhMMP-9 resulted in a dose-dependent degradation of srhIL-1RII as analysed by western blotting. Dual immunofluorescence showed an increased immunostaining for matrix metalloproteinase-9 in situ in the endometrial tissue of women with endometriosis compared to normal women and a decreased immunostaining for IL-1RII. The present study showed a reduced release of sIL-1RII by the endometrial tissue of women with endometriosis and revealed a proteolytic post-translational mechanism which may be involved in the down-regulation of IL-1RII levels. This may enhance IL-1-mediated activation of endometrial cells and contribute to the local immuno-inflammatory process observed in endometriosis patients.Immunoproteins in the endometrium: clinical correlates of the presence of complement fractions C3 and C4.The presence of complement fractions C3 and C4 in endometrial tissue was studied in a consecutive series of patients undergoing diagnostic laparoscopy, to determine their specific association with endometriosis. The incidence of complement in eutopic endometrium of patients grouped according to four diagnoses was: endometriosis, 66% positive (23 of 35); active pelvic inflammatory disease, 85% positive (11 of 13); combined endometriosis with pelvic inflammatory disease, 25% positive (one of four); laparoscopically normal pelvis, 67% positive (10 of 15). These differences were not statistically significant. Complement was equally likely to be found in proliferative, secretory, menstrual, or inflammatory endometrium. Endometrial complement was found less frequently in patients with severe endometriosis as compared with those with the mild form. Among patients with endometriosis and infertility, complement was much more likely to be found in patients with primary infertility than in those with secondary infertility (p less than 0.007). In short-term follow-up of these patients, the absence of complement in the eutopic endometrium appeared to be a good predictor of subsequent pregnancies.Phosphatase of regenerating liver-3: a novel and promising marker in human endometriosis.To investigate the expression of phosphatase of regenerating liver-3 (PRL-3) in ectopic, eutopic, and normal endometria and explore its relationship with endometriosis.A clinical retrospective and molecular study.Department of obstetrics, gynecology, and reproductive medicine.One hundred and five women with histopathologically confirmed endometriosis, and 50 women with histopathologically assessed normal endometria.Immunohistochemical staining and Western blot analysis.Expression of PRL-3 protein.As shown by the immunohistochemical analysis, PRL-3 was mainly located in the cytoplasm and membrane. The cells that tested positive for PRL-3 were detected in endometriotic tissues that did not occur in eutopic and normal endometria. Statistical analysis indicated that the expression of PRL-3 was closely associated with the clinical stages and recurrence of endometriosis.Expression of PRL-3 is related to the clinical stages and recurrence of endometriosis, which provides use with a novel marker and promising target in the treatment of human endometriosis.[Expression of interleukin1-alpha, beta and interferon-gamma in macrophages from endometrium of women with endometriosis].To assess interleukin (IL)-1alpha, beta and interferon (IFN) gamma expression in macrophages in eutopic and ectopic endometrium of women with endometriosis.In situ hybridization was used to examine the expression of IL-1alpha and beta and IFN-gamma in macrophages from eutopic and ectopic endometrium of 40 women with endometriosis and 15 control women. Eutopic endometrial samples were histologically classified into proliferative and secretary phases. Cervical polyp tissue was used as positive control.Expression of IL-1alpha and beta in macrophages from eutopic and ectopic endometrium of women with endometriosis were significantly higher than that in the control group (P < 0.05). Both gene expression in macrophages from ectopic endometrium was higher than that in eutopic endometrium of patients with endometriosis (P < 0.05). The expressions of the two genes were significantly increased in secretory phase of endometrium when compared to that in proliferative phase (P < 0.05). There was no difference in IFN-gamma expression in macrophages of endometium between patients with endometriosis and control (P > 0.05). No cycle dependent variation of the gene expression in the macrophages was found either in endometriosis group or in control group.There is a significant increase in the expression of IL-1alpha and beta in macrophages of endometriosis. IL-1 and activated macrophages may play an important role in the development and progression of endometriosis.Effect of GnRH-II on the ESC proliferation, apoptosis and VEGF secretion in patients with endometriosis in vitro.To study the effect of GnRH-II on the cell proliferation, apoptosis and secreting vascular endothelial growth factor (VEGF) of ectopic, eutopic and normal endometrial stromal cells (ESC) from patients with or without endometriosis (EMs) in vitro.The ectopic, eutopic and normal ESC were isolated, cultured and identified, then added 0 M, 10(-10) M, 10(-8) M, 10(-6) M GnRH-II. The growth and proliferation of three ESC were measured by MTT assay; the cell apoptosis were detected with the method of Hoechst staining and Flow Cytometry test; ELISA was used to measure the VEGF concentration change by three ESC secretion.GnRH-II inhibited the proliferation of ectopic, eutopic ESC from patients with endometriosis and normal ESC from control patients, in a dose- and time-dependent manner (P<0.05); GnRH-II increased the apoptotic rate of three ESC in a dose-dependent manner (P<0.05); The concentration of VEGF in three ESC was significantly decreased after the treatment of GnRH-II, in a dose-dependent manner (P<0.01); And these above effects were the strongest on the ectopic than on the eutopic or normal, there were statistical significance (P<0.05); and three was no significantly difference between the eutopic and normal (P>0.05).GnRH-II significantly inhibited the cell proliferation, induced cell apoptosis and decreased the VEGF secreting of ectopic, eutopic and normal ESC in EMs in vitro, and these effects were the strongest on ectopic ESC, which suggested that GnRH-II may become a new effective treatment for endometriosis.Endometrial nerve fibers in women with endometriosis, adenomyosis, and uterine fibroids.To determine whether nerve fibers in the functional layer endometrium are caused by an endometriosis itself or a common symptom of pain, endometrial tissues from 30 women with endometriosis, 40 women with adenomyosis, 41 women with uterine fibroids, and 47 endometriosis women with adenomyosis were stained immunohistochemically using the highly specific polyclonal rabbit antiprotein gene product 9.5 (PGP9.5) and monoclonal mouse antineurofilament protein. We demonstrated PGP9.5-immunoactive nerve fibers in the functional layer of endometrium in women with pain symptoms, but not in women without pain symptoms, whether the women had endometriosis, adenomyosis, uterine fibroids, or endometriosis with adenomyosis, suggesting a role of PGP9.5-immunoactive nerve fibers in the functional layer of the endometrium playing in pain generation in these disorders.Regulation of monocyte chemotactic protein-1 expression in human endometrial endothelial cells by sex steroids: a potential mechanism for leukocyte recruitment in endometriosis.The main aim of this study is to describe the in vivo temporal and spatial expression of monocyte chemotactic protein 1 (MCP-1) in human endometrial endothelial cells (HEECs) and to compare the in vitro regulation of MCP-1 expression by sex steroids in HEECs from women with or without endometriosis. Eutopic endometrial tissues and endometriosis implants were grouped according to the menstrual cycle phase and were examined by immunohistochemistry for MCP-1 expression. No significant difference was observed for MCP-1 immunoreactivity in the endothelial cells of eutopic endometrium of women with endometriosis when compared to endometrium of women without endometriosis and to endometriosis implants. For in vitro studies, the purity of cultured HEECs (90%-95%) was confirmed by immunocytochemistry using endothelium-specific markers CD31 and CD146. The effects of estradiol (5 x 10(- 8) mol/L), progesterone (10(-7) mol/L), or both on MCP-1 messenger RNA (mRNA) and protein levels were analyzed by reverse transcriptase-polymerase chain reaction (RT-PCR) analysis and enzyme-linked immunosorbent serologic assay (ELISA), respectively. Sex steroids did not have significant effect on MCP-1 mRNA and protein expression in HEECs from women without endometriosis. However, we observed that the sex steroid treatment stimulated MCP-1 mRNA and protein expression in HEECs from women with endometriosis (P < .05). We postulate that the stimulation of chemokine expression by sex steroids in the endometrial endothelial cells in women with endometriosis may play a central role in recruiting mononuclear cells, therefore contributing to the inflammatory aspect of endometriosis.Integrin pattern in human endometrium--new diagnostic tool in pelvic endometriosis?The only possibility to diagnose peritoneal endometriosis is laparoscopy or laparotomy with tissue sampling for histology. Women with impalpable endometriosis not visible on ultrasound suffering from infertility or teenagers with pelvic pain, where endometriosis may also be expected, would greatly benefit from an inoperative diagnostic method. A sure and comfortable method of assessing the effectiveness of endometriosis treatment does not exist. The aim of the study was description of the alpha 3 beta 1, alpha 4 beta 1 integrins and beta 1 chain expression in endometrial biopsies in women suffering from endometriosis.Laparoscopy and hysteroscopy was performed in 32 patients because of infertility (n = 23) and/or pelvic pain (n = 11). For histochemical stainings of endometrial biopsy primary and secondary mouse antibodies to human integrins alpha 3 beta 1, alpha 4 beta 1 and beta 1 chain were used (DAKO).In 17 women peritoneal endometriosis was diagnosed by biopsy at the time of laparoscopy. An alpha 3 beta 1 integrin was more common in the glandular epithelium of women with endometriosis and beta 1 subunit was less frequently observed in the stroma of the endometriosis group than in women without endometriosis. The differences were statistically significant.The selected integrins do not yet allow finding a pattern characteristic for endometriosis.CA 125 in serum, peritoneal fluid, active lesions, and endometrium of patients with endometriosis.Ca 125 levels in serum and peritoneal fluid were measured in 39 patients with endometriosis and 18 patients with normal pelvic anatomy at laparoscopy, and the presence of this antigen in endometriotic tissue and endometrial mucosa was also investigated. Serum CA 125 concentrations were elevated in patients with Stage III or IV endometriosis compared with control subjects (32.9 +/- 11.2 versus 16.4 +/- 8.9 U/ml, means +/- SD; p less than 0.001). CA 125 values were greater than 35 U/ml in 36.8% of women with Stage III or IV endometriosis and in none of the control subjects. No significant differences in CA 125 levels in peritoneal fluid were found between patients with endometriosis and control subjects. The immunohistochemical studies found CA 125 in 10% of the endometriotic lesions and 37.5% of the endometrial samples of patients with endometriosis and in 33.3% of the endometrial samples of control subjects.Epithelial cells in peritoneal fluid--of endometrial origin?Our purpose was to examine the immunohistochemical properties of epithelial cells in peritoneal fluid and to compare the staining characteristics with cells of endometrium, menstrual effluent, peritoneum, and endometriotic lesions.Samples of menstrual effluent, endometrium, and peritoneal fluid and biopsy specimens of endometriotic lesions and peritoneum from 16 patients were examined. Monoclonal antibodies against vimentin, cytokeratin 18 and 19, and the monoclonal antibody BW495/36, staining an epithelial marker present in endometrium and absent in peritoneal epithelium, were used.All but one sample of menstrual effluent and peritoneal fluid cells stained positively with antibodies against vimentin and cytokeratin 18 and 19. BW495/36 stained 14 of 16 menstrual effluent samples and nine of 16 peritoneal fluid cell samples. Endometriotic specimens showed staining with all markers. No major differences in staining properties were observed in menstrual effluent, endometrium, and peritoneal fluid cells between patients with or without endometriosis.These results support the contention of transport of menstrual detritus to the peritoneal cavity in women with patent fallopian tubes.Hormonal and immunologic methods in the diagnosis and treatment of patients with benign ovarian tumors and endometriotic cysts.To compare efficacy of various methods for characterizing endometriosis and benign ovarian tumors.Two parallel groups of patients, 54 with endometriotic ovarian cysts and 48 with benign tumors.Central clinic.Patients referred from all regions over a 5-year period.Estrogen Estrogen and progesterone receptor levels of endometrium and endometriotic foci, CA-125 concentration, and estradiol, progesterone, LH, and testosterone blood levels.LH levels elevated during follicular phase in patients; estradiol levels reduced; receptor levels abnormal in endometriosis, but not in benign ovarian cysts.Hormone therapy is adequate treatment for endometriotic cysts. CA-125 is not a reliable indicator for differential diagnosis.Endometrial cells from women with endometriosis have increased adhesion and proliferative capacity in response to extracellular matrix components: towards a mechanistic model for endometriosis progression.Endometriosis, classified as the presence of endometrial cells in ectopic sites, is a debilitating disease causing pain and infertility in approximately 10% of women of reproductive age. It is associated with the aberrant expression of extracellular matrix (ECM) components and their receptors, integrins.We analysed the expression of integrins in stromal cells derived from peritoneal, ovarian and deeply infiltrating endometriotic lesions and from endometrium from women with and without endometriosis in vitro, using quantitative immunocytochemistry. The adhesive and proliferative capacity of each of the cell types in response to ECM components was assessed by in vitro assays of cell attachment and DNA synthesis.We demonstrate that eutopic and ectopic endometrial stromal cells from women with endometriosis exhibit an aberrant integrin profile in vitro compared with stromal cells derived from healthy controls. In addition, the former display increased adhesion and proliferative capacity in response to specific ECM components.We propose that the increased adhesive and proliferative potential of cells from endometriotic lesions may be a key feature in the pathogenesis of endometriosis. Furthermore, the elevated responsiveness of eutopic cells from women with endometriosis may contribute to the predisposition of some women to the disease.[Expression of suppressor of cytokine signaling-3 and caspase-3 in endometriosis and their correlation].To investigate the expression of suppressor of cytokine signaling(SOCS)-3 and caspase-3 and their correlative significance in endometriosis.Immunohistochemical EnVision method was used to detect the SOCS-3 and caspase-3 protein expression in ectopic and eutopic endometrium (n = 32) of patients with endometriosis, as well as normal endometrium (n = 30) of women without endometriosis.SOCS-3 and caspase-3 proteins were expressed in all three groups and not affected by the menstrual cycles. The expression of SOCS-3 in ectopic endometrium (5.54 ± 2.12) was significantly lower than that in eutopic (7.39 ± 1.09, P = 0.001) and control group (7.48 ± 1.26, P < 0.01), but without difference between the eutopic and control group (P = 0.756). SOCS-3 expression in ectopic and eutopic endometrium was significantly lower in III/IV stages than that in I/II stages of endometriosis (P < 0.05). Significantly lower expression of caspase-3 protein was found in ectopic (3.20 ± 1.24) and eutopic endometrium (3.88 ± 1.93) as compared with the control group (6.49 ± 1.85, P < 0.01), however ectopic and eutopic endometrium showed no significant difference (t = 1.66, P = 0.10). There was no significant difference of the expression of caspase-3 in ectopic and eutopic endometrium at different disease stages (P > 0.05). Positive correlation was found between the expression of SOCS-3 and caspase-3 proteins in ectopic endometrium (r = 0.655, P < 0.01).SOCS-3 may be involved in the development of endometriosis through inhibition of apoptosis of ectopic endometrial cells.Expression of human β-defensin-2 in the eutopic and ectopic endometrial tissues in patients with endometriosis.To investigate the expression of human β-defensin-2 (hBD-2) in the endometrium of patients with endometriosis (EMS) and explore the potential role of hBD-2 in the pathogenesis of EMS.Prospective controlled study.50 women including EMS patients undergoing laparoscopic ovarian cystectomy and non-EMS patients undergoing hysterectomy for uterine fibroids.Large university teaching hospital.Patients were divided into EMS and non-EMS groups. The gene expressions of hBD-2, interleukin (IL)-1β and tumor necrosis factor (TNF)-α in the endometrial tissues of each group were detected with real-time quantitative polymerase chain reaction (PCR), and hBD-2 protein expression with immunohistochemical method.The gene expression levels of hBD-2, TNF-α, and IL-1β as well as the positive expression rate of hBD-2 protein in the ectopic endometrium of EMS patients were significantly higher than those in the eutopic endometrium of EMS and non-EMS patients (all P < 0.05). Correlation analysis showed that the gene expression levels of hBD-2 in the ectopic and eutopic endometrium of EMS patients were positively correlated with the gene expression levels of IL-1β and TNF-α (P < 0.01).High levels of hBD-2 gene and protein expressions in the ectopic endometrium of EMS patients may be an important contributor in the pathogenesis of EMS. TNF-α and IL-1β may promote the upregulation of hBD-2 expression.Dendritic cell populations in the eutopic and ectopic endometrium of women with endometriosis.Immune alterations may be involved in the pathogenesis and progression of endometriosis. Dendritic cells (DCs) are potent antigen presenting cells that are highly involved in the initiation of the immune response. The aim of this study was to investigate DC populations in the eutopic and ectopic endometrium of women with endometriosis compared with controls.Hysterectomy samples were obtained from premenopausal women with (n = 33) and without (n = 28) endometriosis. In addition, paired peritoneal endometriotic lesions and uterine curettings were collected from 32 women with endometriosis. Specimen sections were stained immunohistochemically using antibodies for monoclonal mouse antibodies directed against human CD1a and CD83, which are specific for immature and mature DCs, respectively.The mean density of endometrial CD1a+ DCs in the basal layer was significantly increased in women with endometriosis compared with controls during the proliferative phase only (P = 0.001). There was a highly significant decrease in the density of endometrial CD83+ DCs in women with endometriosis compared with controls in both layers of the endometrium across all phases of the menstrual cycle (P = 0.001). The density of CD1a+ DCs was significantly increased in peritoneal endometriotic lesions (P = 0.003) and in the surrounding peritoneum (P = 0.001) compared with paired uterine curettings and peritoneum distant from the lesion.Both CD1a+ and CD83+ DC populations were altered in the eutopic and ectopic endometrium of women with endometriosis compared with controls. Alterations in these cells, which play a crucial role in the coordination of the immune response, may be involved in pain generation and the pathogenesis of endometriosis.Endometriosis is associated with aberrant endometrial expression of telomerase and increased telomere length.In order to test our hypothesis that endometriosis is associated with abnormal expression of telomerase and telomere lengthening in endometrium, we assessed endometrial expression of the human telomerase enzyme and telomere length (TL).This prospective pilot study, included 29 women with symptomatic, surgically diagnosed endometriosis (Group 1) and 27 healthy, fertile, symptom-free women without endometriosis (Group 2, confirmed by laparoscopy). Seventeen women in Group 1 and 15 women in Group 2 had endometrial biopsies taken on Day 21 +/- 2 of the cycle. A further 12 women in each group were biopsied on Day 26 +/- 2. Telomerase and estrogen receptor beta (ERbeta) expression was evaluated by immunohistochemistry. Mean TL was determined by quantitative PCR.The endometria of fertile healthy women showed either weak or no telomerase immunoreactivity throughout the luteal phase. Immunostaining for telomerase was significantly increased during the implantation window and the premenstrual endometria of women with endometriosis (P < 0.0001). This was associated with a loss of stromal and vascular ERbeta immunostaining (P < 0.05). The mean TL were significantly longer in endometria of women with endometriosis during the implantation window (P = 0.005), indicating the biological relevance of our novel finding of telomerase in benign endometrium. There was positive correlation of the circulating estradiol with peripheral blood TL in women.We speculate that aberrant endometrial expression of telomerase mediates alterations in cell fate that enhance proliferation, contributing to the pathogenesis of endometriosis.Diagnosis of endometriosis by detection of nerve fibres in an endometrial biopsy: a double blind study.Diagnosis of endometriosis currently requires a laparoscopy and this need probably contributes to the considerable average delay in diagnosis. We have reported the presence of nerve fibres in the functional layer of endometrium in women with endometriosis, which could be used as a diagnostic test. Our aim was to assess efficacy of nerve fibre detection in endometrial biopsy for making a diagnosis of endometriosis in a double-blind comparison with expert diagnostic laparoscopy.Endometrial biopsies, with immunohistochemical nerve fibre detection using protein gene product 9.5 as marker, taken from 99 consecutive women presenting with pelvic pain and/or infertility undergoing diagnostic laparoscopy by experienced gynaecologic laparoscopists, were compared with surgical diagnosis.In women with laparoscopic diagnosis of endometriosis (n = 64) the mean nerve fibre density in the functional layer of the endometrial biopsy was 2.7 nerve fibres per mm(2) (+/-3.5 SD). Only one woman with endometriosis had no detectable nerve fibres. Six women had endometrial nerve fibres but no active endometriosis seen at laparoscopy. The specificity and sensitivity were 83 and 98%, respectively, positive predictive value was 91% and negative predictive value was 96%. Nerve fibre density did not differ between different menstrual cycle phases. Women with endometriosis and pain symptoms had significantly higher nerve fibre density in comparison with women with infertility but no pain (2.3 and 0.8 nerve fibre per mm(2), respectively, P = 0.005).Endometrial biopsy, with detection of nerve fibres, provided a reliability of diagnosis of endometriosis which is close to the accuracy of laparoscopic assessment by experienced gynaecological laparoscopists. This study was registered with the Australian Clinical Trials Registry (ACTR) 00082242 (registered: 12/12/2007). The study was approved by the Ethics Review Committee (RPAH Zone) of the Sydney South West Area Health Service (Protocol number X05-0345) and The University of Sydney Human Research Ethics Committee (Ref. No. 10761) and all women gave their informed consent for participation.Coexpression of growth arrest-specific gene 6 and receptor tyrosine kinases, Axl and Sky, in human uterine endometrium and ovarian endometriosis.We demonstrated the expression of Gas6, the protein product of the growth arrest-specific gene 6 (gas6) and a member of the vitamin K-dependent protein family, and its receptor tyrosine kinases, Axl and Sky, in human uterine and ovarian endometriotic endometria using RT-PCR-Southern blot analysis and immunohistochemistry. Gas6, Axl and Sky mRNA were detected in all samples analysed. There was no significant difference between the levels of Sky mRNA in normal uterine and endometriotic endometria; however, the levels of Gas6 and Axl mRNA in endometriotic endometria were significantly higher than in normal endometria. These mRNA levels showed no significant alteration during the menstrual cycle. In the immunohistochemical study, Gas6, Axl and Sky were found in endometrial glandular cells and stromal cells in all samples analysed. This study demonstrates the coexpression of receptor tyrosine kinases and their ligand, Gas6, in normal uterine and ovarian endometriotic endometria, and the overexpression of Axl and Gas6 in endometriotic endometria. It is suggested that Gas6 and Axl signal transduction is aberrantly stimulated in endometriotic endometria, and is plausibly related to its growth potential.Differential expression of IGF-I and IGF-II in eutopic and ectopic endometria of women with endometriosis and in women without endometriosis.Factors regulating the development, growth, and differentiation of endometrial cells of endometriotic lesions are poorly understood. To investigate the paracrine-autocrine regulation of ectopic endometrial cell growth, the expression of IGF-I and IGF-II were studied.Tissue specimens of eutopic and ectopic endometria were obtained from eight patients with endometriosis at laparoscopy and from the endometria of 14 women without endometriosis as controls. They were tested for the expression of IGF-I and IGF-II by immunohistochemical analysis.Immunohistochemical study for IGF-I in controls showed a more intense staining during the proliferative phase both in stromal and epithelial cells. In eutopic endometria of women with endometriosis a reduction in the staining was observed, whereas in epithelial cells of fibrotic peritoneal adhesions an intense immunostaining for IGF-I was observed. Immunohistochemical study of IGF-II in controls showed a more intense staining during secretory phase both in stromal and epithelial cells. In eutopic endometria of women with endometriosis, a reduction in the staining was observed, whereas in epithelial cells of fibrotic peritoneal adhesions an intense immunostaining for IGF-I was observed. Immunohistochemical study of IGF-II in controls showed a more intense staining during secretory phase both in stromal and epithelial cells. In eutopic endometria of women with endometriosis, a reduction in the staining was observed, whereas in epithelial cells of ovarian lesions and fibrotic peritoneal adhesions, no immunostaining for IGF-II was observed.In endometriosis there is an alteration of mechanisms regulating cell proliferation and differentiation.Local immune response in infertile patients with minimal endometriosis.To evaluate the role of local immunity in women with minimal endometriosis.Uterine endometrium and endometrial implants were obtained simultaneously from 30 infertile women with minimal endometriosis and examined immunohistochemically using antibodies of T cell, B cell, macrophage, Langerhans cell, immunoglobulin (Ig)G, and complement (C) 3d. Serum IgG, IgA, IgM, C3, C4, antinuclear antibody and anti-DNA antibody were also examined in 24 of the women. Data from uterine endometrium and serum were compared with 10 fertile women without endometriosis as a control.Microscopic examination revealed that the endometrial implants were divided into two groups: group 1 (n = 13) showed lymphocytic infiltration in the endometrial implants and group 2 (n = 17) showed no or slight lymphocytic infiltration. The endometrial implants of group 1 showed significantly more dense T-cell infiltration than those of group 2. Other types of infiltrating cells and deposits of IgG and C3d revealed no significant differences between groups 1 and 2. The immunohistochemical examination of the uterine endometrium and the serum data revealed no significant differences among all three groups. Cumulative pregnancy rates showed no significant difference between groups 1 and 2.The difference of local immune response in endometrial implants did not affect systemic immunity.Expression and possible role of non-steroidal anti-inflammatory drug-activated gene-1 (NAG-1) in the human endometrium and endometriosis.Non-steroidal anti-inflammatory drug (NSAID)-activated gene-1 (NAG-1) is involved in cellular processes such as inflammation, apoptosis and tumorigenesis. However, little is known about the expression and function of NAG-1 in the endometrium. This study aimed to evaluate the expression of NAG-1 in the endometrium and in the absence or presence of endometriosis and to investigate the effect of celecoxib, a selective cyclooxygenase (COX)-2 inhibitor, on NAG-1 mRNA levels and apoptosis in human endometrial stromal cells (HESCs).Eutopic endometrial samples were obtained during surgery from 40 patients with, and 40 patients without, endometriosis. Real-time PCR was used to quantify NAG-1 mRNA levels and immunohistochemistry was used to localize NAG-1 protein in the endometrium. To investigate the effects of celecoxib, HESCs were isolated and cultured with different concentrations of celecoxib or with 100 µM celecoxib at different times. Apoptosis was assessed by flow cytometry.NAG-1 mRNA levels and immunoreactivity showed cyclical changes through the menstrual cycle, increasing during the late secretory and menstrual phases. NAG-1 mRNA and protein levels were significantly lower in patients with endometriosis, compared with the control group. Celecoxib induced NAG-1 mRNA levels and apoptosis in cultured HESCs, with the effects dependent on drug concentrations and duration of treatment. Celecoxib treatment had no effect on prostaglandin E(2) levels in the culture supernatants.NAG-1 may be important in maintaining homeostasis in the normal endometrium and alterations in NAG-1 expression may be associated with the establishment of endometriosis. NAG-1 might be a therapeutic target for endometriosis.Distinct expression of the soluble and the membrane-bound forms of interleukin-1 receptor accessory protein in the endometrium of women with endometriosis.To investigate interleukin (IL) 1 receptor accessory protein (IL1RAcP) expression in the eutopic endometrium of women with endometriosis.Retrospective study.Human reproduction research laboratory.Sixty-six women with endometriosis and 60 healthy women with no laparoscopic evidence of endometriosis.Endometrial tissue samples were obtained during laparoscopic surgery.IL1RAcP protein expression was analyzed by immunohistochemistry, Western blot, and ELISA, and IL1RAcP mRNA expression was analyzed by quantitative real-time polymerase chain reaction.This study showed a significant downregulation of soluble (s)IL1RAcP expression in the eutopic endometrium of women with endometriosis compared to normal women, occurring at the protein or mRNA level. This finding appeared to vary according to endometriosis stage, being more obvious in the earliest (I and II) than the latest (III and IV) stages of the disease. However, the membrane-bound IL1RAcP did not show any noticeable endometriosis-related change, neither at the protein or mRNA level.In view of the wide spectrum of IL-1 inflammatory and growth-promoting effects, downregulation of sIL1RAcP, which is known for inhibiting IL1, indicates a profound defect in the capability of endometrial cells of women with endometriosis to counterregulate IL-1 effects and may represent an important mechanism underlying the ability of these cells to implant and develop into host tissues.Abnormal interleukin 1 receptor types I and II gene expression in eutopic and ectopic endometrial tissues of women with endometriosis.Interleukin-1 (IL1) is believed to play a central role in the immuno-inflammatory process associated with endometriosis. IL1 triggers cell activation via its receptor type I (IL1R1), but its receptor type II (IL1R2) is known instead as a scavenger that buffers the cytokine's effects. Our previous studies have shown increased expression of IL1R1 in active endometriotic implants compared to normal and endometriosis women-derived endometrial tissues, and a simultaneous decrease in IL1R2 expression at the protein level. In the present study, in situ hybridization demonstrated a noticeable decrease in IL1R2 mRNA hybridization score in eutopic and matched ectopic endometrial tissues of women with endometriosis compared to normal women in the stroma (P<0.001 and P<0.001, respectively) and the epithelium (P<0.01 and P<0.05, respectively), whereas IL1R1 mRNA hybridization score was higher only in the ectopic implants, with a statistically significant difference in the stroma (P<0.05). This was corroborated by RT-PCR analysis of IL1R1 and IL1R2 mRNAs in ectopic (P<0.05 and P<0.05, respectively) and matched eutopic (P=0.22 and P<0.05, respectively) endometrial tissues from women with endometriosis compared to endometrial tissues from normal women. The decrease in IL1R2 mRNA levels in eutopic endometrial tissue of endometriosis women, and the concomitant increase in IL1R1 mRNA levels in ectopic implants, reveal a profound defect in IL1R 1 and IL1R2 gene expression which may accentuate the capability of this tissue to respond to IL1 and favor its ectopic growth.DNA microarray analysis of gene expression in eutopic endometrium from patients with deep endometriosis using laser capture microdissection.To investigate differentially expressed genes in epithelial and stromal cells of eutopic endometrium from patients with deep endometriosis and women with normal pelvic cavities using laser capture microdissection and complementary DNA microarrays.Prospective study.University hospital.Patients with deep endometriosis and fertile women who underwent laparoscopic tubal ligation or reversal of tubal sterilization.Endometrial tissue biopsies during the late proliferative phase and early, mid-, and late secretory phases.Genes that were regulated with a change greater than threefold were selected as differentially expressed genes. Validation was performed with real-time reverse transcriptase-polymerase chain reaction (RT-PCR).Microarray analysis identified up-regulation during the late secretory phase (patients with endometriosis vs. controls) of several genes in two important signaling pathways: RAS/RAF/MAPK and PI3K. This included the genes RON, SOS, 14-3-3 protein eta, and uPAR in epithelial cells and KSR and PI3K p85 regulatory subunit alpha in stromal cells; real-time RT-PCR analysis validated up-regulation of all six genes.The RAS/RAF/MAPK and PI3K pathways may be involved in initial development of endometriosis.Estrogen receptor beta and matrix metalloproteinase 1 are coexpressed in uterine endometrium and endometriotic lesions of patients with endometriosis.To evaluate the local matrix metalloproteinase 1 (MMP-1), estrogen receptor (ER) alpha, and ERbeta protein expression in eutopic and dystopic tissue from patients with endometriosis and to compare the endometrial expression pattern in women with and without endometriosis.Immunohistochemical analysis of MMP-1, ERalpha, and ERbeta in paired samples of uterine and endometriotic endometrium from cycling women with endometriosis and in endometrial tissue from 37 healthy women.Research laboratory at a medical school.Thirty-seven matched samples from endometriotic and corresponding endometrial biopsies obtained during the proliferative and secretory phase. Thirty-seven endometrial biopsies obtained from healthy women during comparable cycle phases.Sampling of endometrial and endometriotic tissue.Matrix metalloproteinase 1, ERalpha, and ERbeta protein expression in paraffin-embedded tissue biopsies was measured by IHC.In patients with endometriosis, epithelial and stromal cells from endometriotic lesions both express significantly higher levels of MMP-1 and lower levels of ERalpha than corresponding cells in uterine endometrium. Endometriotic epithelium also expresses higher levels of ERbeta than of ERalpha. In both endometrial glands and corresponding endometriotic epithelium, the distribution of MMP-1 is correlated with ERbeta. No significant differences in endometrial ERalpha, ERbeta, or MMP-1 expression could, however, be detected when patients with endometriosis and healthy controls were compared.We have shown that MMP-1 and ERbeta are coexpressed and up-regulated in endometriotic lesions, whereas local ERalpha expression is down-regulated. The altered ERbeta/ERalpha ratio in endometriotic glands suggests that estrogenic effects on MMP-1 are primarily mediated via ERbeta, and the local control of MMP-1 in eutopic endometrium is not different from that observed in healthy cycling women.Increased expression of c-fos protein associated with increased matrix metalloproteinase-9 protein expression in the endometrium of endometriotic patients.To investigate c-fos and matrix metalloproteinase-9 (MMP-9) expression in the endometrium from women with or without endometriosis throughout the menstrual cycle, and to explore the correlation of c-fos expression with MMP-9 expression and 17beta-E(2) levels in serum.Molecular studies in human tissue.A women's hospital in China.Fifty-five premenopausal women (25 with endometriosis and 30 without endometriosis) undergoing laparoscopic surgery or hysterectomy.Eutopic and ectopic endometrium tissue were obtained at the time of surgery. Peripheral sera were also collected on the same day.Immunohistochemical localization of c-fos in the endometrium, c-fos and MMP-9 protein levels in the endometrium, and 17beta-E(2) levels in the serum.c-fos protein was predominantly located in the nuclei of glandular epithelial cells and stromal cells. c-fos and MMP-9 protein levels in paired eutopic and ectopic endometria from women with endometriosis were significantly higher than those in the endometrium from women without endometriosis. No significant difference in c-fos or MMP-9 protein levels was observed between paired eutopic and ectopic endometria. c-fos protein levels in endometrium positively correlated with endometrial MMP-9 levels and serum 17beta-E(2) levels.Expression of c-fos in the human endometrium may be regulated by 17beta-E(2), and c-fos may be involved in development of endometriosis by promoting MMP-9 gene expression and subsequently the invasive potential of endometrial explants.Paired-box gene 2 is down-regulated in endometriosis and correlates with low epidermal growth factor receptor expression.Paired-box 2 (Pax2) is involved in the development of the female genital tract and has been associated with endometrial pathologies. The expression of Pax2 is induced by epidermal growth factor (EGF) and estrogens. In the present study, Pax2 expression and regulation were investigated in endometriosis.Pax2 protein expression was assessed by immunohistochemistry in the eutopic (i.e. inside the uterus) and ectopic tissue (endometriosis) from 11 patients. Immunoreactivity was high in the endometrium, with strong epithelial and weaker stromal staining. Similar expression patterns of Pax2 were observed in the endometrium of women without endometriosis (n = 12). The mRNA level of Pax2 was assessed by real-time PCR in the eutopic and ectopic endometria of 14 patients and in the endometrium from women without endometriosis (n = 20). Pax2 expression was lower in endometriotic lesions than that in the eutopic endometrium of patients (P< 0.001) and controls (P= 0.007). Three possible mechanisms determining low Pax2 expression were investigated: EGF signalling, CpG DNA methylation of the Pax2 promoter and steroid response. The mRNA level of the EGF receptor (EGFR1) was assessed in the samples used for Pax2 mRNA assessment. A significant correlation between EGFR1 and Pax2 in both eutopic and ectopic tissues was observed (R = 0.58; slope regression line, 0.81; 95% CI: 0.09-1.52 and R = 0.54; slope regression line, 2.51; 95% CI: 0.02-4.99, respectively). CpG DNA methylation was analyzed by methyl-specific PCR in two regions of the Pax2 promoter but they were unmethylated in all samples. Steroid responsiveness was assessed using endometrial explant cultures and Pax2 was not regulated by either 17β-estradiol or progesterone.In endometriosis patients, Pax2 is down-regulated in the lesions compared with the eutopic tissue, possibly due to low EGF signalling.Endometrial and peritoneal expression of aromatase, cytokines, and adhesion factors in women with endometriosis.To examine messenger (m) RNA expression of aromatase, cytokines, and adhesion factors in women with and without endometriosis.Patients with endometriosis were compared with control patients.University Hospital Gasthuisberg, Leuven, Belgium.A total of 35 patients who had laparoscopic surgery during the luteal phase (n = 20) or the menstrual phase (n = 15) were selected for this study based on cycle phase and presence/absence of endometriosis.Tissues of endometrium and macroscopically normal peritoneum were collected during hysteroscopy and laparoscopic surgery, respectively, from 24 women with revised American Society for Reproductive Medicine stage (rASRM) stages I-II (n = 12) and III-IV (n = 12) endometriosis and 11 control patients with normal pelvic. Tissue samples were selected from a tissue bank, based on the phase of the cycle (menstrual or luteal) and the presence/absence of endometriosis.The mRNA levels of aromatase, vimentin, vascular cell adhesion molecule 1 (VCAM-1), alpha(V) and beta(3) integrins, interleukin (IL)-1 beta, regulated on activation normal T-cell expressed and secreted (RANTES), and monocyte chemotactic protein 1 (MCP-1) were evaluated using real-time reverse transcriptase polymerase chain reaction.During menstrual phase, increased endometrial mRNA levels of alpha(V) integrin, combined alpha(V)beta(3) integrins, and increased peritoneal IL-1 beta mRNA levels--but decreased peritoneal MCP-1 mRNA levels--were observed in women with endometriosis compared with control subjects. During luteal phase, endometrial mRNA levels of IL-1 beta and RANTES were increased in women with endometriosis compared with control subjects. Endometrial aromatase mRNA expression was higher in women with endometriosis than in control subjects in combined phases. Women with endometriosis had increased peritoneal mRNA expression of RANTES and VCAM-1 during menstrual compared with luteal phase.Aberrant mRNA expression of aromatase, cytokines, and adhesion factors in endometrium and peritoneum suggests that both tissues are involved in the pathogenesis of endometriosis.Antibodies to endometrial transferrin and alpha 2-Heremans Schmidt (HS) glycoprotein in patients with endometriosis.Identifying the endometrial antigens inciting autoimmunity is important in setting up an antibody assay for a non-invasive diagnosis and clinical monitoring of endometriosis.Two-dimensional gel electrophoresis of endometrial extracts, Western blot analysis, passive hemagglutination and enzyme-linked immunosorbent assay (ELISA), amino acid sequencing and molecular studies were done on chosen antigens. Forty-six women with endometriosis, 4 women with uterine leiomyomata, 4 with pelvic adhesions, 3 with repeat Cesarean sections (conditions that coexist with or predispose to endometriosis) and 46 controls participated.Antigens with molecular weights (MW) of 64 kDa [isoelectric point (pI) of 3.5-4.0] and 72 kDa (pI of 4.5) bound to IgG in all patients with endometriosis, but not the controls. Amino acid sequencing of the proteins revealed that they had homology to alpha 2-Heremans Schmidt (HS) glycoprotein (MW: 64 kDa) and transferrin (MW: 72 kDa). Endometriosis patients had significant antibody levels to these two proteins (predictive value of 80-90%). The analysis of patients' endometrial RNA detected the message for alpha 2-HS glycoprotein and transferrin. Albumin (pI 5.5) and collagen (pI 3.5) failed to elicit antibody responses.Patients with endometriosis have significant antibodies to endometrial transferrin and alpha 2-HS-glycoprotein. We can effectively use an antibody assay using these antigens for diagnosing endometriosis.Vascular endothelial growth factor polymorphisms (-460C/T, +405G/C, and 936C/T) and endometriosis: their influence on vascular endothelial growth factor expression.To analyze three functional vascular endothelial growth factor (VEGF) polymorphisms (-460C/T, +405G/C, and 936C/T) in women with and without endometriosis and their correlation with VEGF expression in endometrial tissue and peritoneal fluid (PF).Case-control study.University-based hospital.One hundred eighty-six women with endometriosis and 180 controls without the disease.Endometrial biopsies were performed by aspiration and PF samples were obtained at laparoscopy.VEGF polymorphisms (-460C/T, +405G/C, and 936C/T) were determined using a polymerase chain reaction (PCR)-restriction fragment length polymorphism assay. Quantitative real-time reverse transcriptase (RT)-PCR assay was used to quantify VEGF-A messenger RNA (mRNA) and VEGF-A antigen levels were quantified by ELISA.Patients with endometriosis showed a higher VEGF 936T allele frequency than controls. However, the distribution of genotypes and allele frequencies in the other two VEGF (-460C/T, +405G/C) polymorphisms was similar in the endometriosis and control groups. Endometrium and PF from women with endometriosis showed an increase in VEGF levels, but no association was found between the VEGF polymorphisms studied and VEGF expression in endometrial tissue and PF.These findings suggest that the VEGF 936C/T polymorphism may be associated with the risk of endometriosis in a Caucasian population, but the increased VEGF levels observed in endometriosis do not appear to be associated with this polymorphism.Laser capture microdissection and cDNA array analysis of endometrium identify CCL16 and CCL21 as epithelial-derived inflammatory mediators associated with endometriosis.Understanding the pathophysiology of chemokine secretion in endometriosis may offer a novel area of therapeutic intervention. This study aimed to identify chemokines differentially expressed in epithelial glands in eutopic endometrium from normal women and those with endometriosis, and to establish the expression profiles of key chemokines in endometriotic lesions.Laser capture microdissection isolated epithelial glands from endometrial eutopic tissue from women with and without endometriosis in the mid-secretory phase of their menstrual cycles. Gene profiling of the excised glands used a human chemokine and receptor cDNA array. Selected chemokines were further examined using real-time PCR and immunohistochemistry.22 chemokine/receptor genes were upregulated and two downregulated in pooled endometrial epithelium of women with endometriosis compared with controls. CCL16 and CCL21 mRNA was confirmed as elevated in some women with endometriosis compared to controls on individual samples. Immunoreactive CCL16 and CCL21 were predominantly confined to glands in eutopic and ectopic endometrium: leukocytes also stained. Immunoreactive CCL16 was overall higher in glands in ectopic vs. eutopic endometrium from the same woman (P < 0.05). Staining for CCL16 and CCL21 was highly correlated in individual tissues.This study provides novel candidate molecules and suggests a potential local role for CCL16 and CCL21 as mediators contributing to the inflammatory events associated with endometriosis.Endometriosis is characterized by an impaired localization of laminin-5 and alpha3beta1 integrin receptor.Endometriosis is an estrogen-correlated benign disease characterized by a marked ability of endometrial-like cells to invade and proliferate outside uterine cavity, resembling for some invasive aspect the cancer growth. The molecular mechanisms regulating endometrial cell invasiveness are mostly unknown, although interactions between extracellular matrix (ECM) proteins and their transmembrane receptors, integrins, are likely to play a central role. In particular, laminin (Ln)-5 could be closely involved, as it is in cancer. We have investigated the expression of Ln-1, Ln-5, and collagen IV (Coll IV) ECM proteins and their receptors, alpha3beta1 and alpha6beta4 integrins, in atrophic, proliferative, and secretive endometrium and in endometriosis. The results show that Ln-5, but not Ln-I and Coll IV, is altered in secretive endometrium as well as in endometriosis tissues. No alterations are observed in atrophic or proliferative endometrium. Consistently, the polarization of both integrin subunits alpha3 and beta1, but not alpha6 and beta4, is altered in secretive endometrium and endometriosis tissues, but not in atrophic and proliferative endometrium. These results seem to suggest that Ln-5 and alpha3beta1 could be involved in the invasive mechanism of endometriosis. The altered expression of Ln-5, by upregulating matrix metalloproteases activity, suggest an invading process similar to that of many cancer processes.MicroRNA expression profiling of eutopic secretory endometrium in women with versus without endometriosis.Endometriosis is a common gynecologic disorder characterized by pain and infertility. In addition to estrogen dependence, progesterone resistance is an emerging feature of this disorder. Specifically, a delayed transition from the proliferative to secretory phase as evidenced by dysregulation of progesterone target genes and maintenance of a proliferative molecular fingerprint in the early secretory endometrium (ESE) has been reported. MicroRNAs (miRNAs) are small noncoding RNAs that collectively represent a novel class of regulators of gene expression. In an effort to investigate further the observed progesterone resistance in the ESE of women with endometriosis, we conducted array-based, global miRNA profiling. We report distinct miRNA expression profiles in the ESE of women with versus without endometriosis in a subset of samples previously used in global gene expression analysis. Specifically, the miR-9 and miR-34 miRNA families evidenced dysregulation. Integration of the miRNA and gene expression profiles provides unique insights into the molecular basis of this enigmatic disorder and, possibly, the regulation of the proliferative phenotype during the early secretory phase of the menstrual cycle in affected women.The relationship between microvessel density, proliferative activity and expression of vascular endothelial growth factor-A and its receptors in eutopic endometrium and endometriotic lesions.Studies were performed to elucidate the possible relationship between microvessel density, proliferative activity and angiogenesis in eutopic endometrium from women with and without endometriosis and peritoneal endometriotic lesions. The question whether changes in these parameters in endometriotic lesions were reflected by the level of vascular endothelial growth factor-A (VEGF-A) in serum and peritoneal fluid was also studied. Biopsy specimens of both eutopic endometrium and peritoneal endometriotic lesions from women with endometriosis (n = 25) as well as eutopic endometrium from women without endometriosis (n = 14) were analysed immunohistochemically regarding microvessel density, proliferative activity, and expression of VEGF-A and its receptors vascular endothelial growth factor receptors 1 and 2 (VEGFR-1 and VEGFR-2) in stroma, glands and blood vessels. The VEGF-A concentration was measured in peritoneal fluid and serum. Secretory phase eutopic endometrium from women with endometriosis had significantly higher microvessel density, expression of VEGF-A in glandular epithelium and VEGFR-2 in endometrial blood vessels than those from women without endometriosis. Endometriotic lesions with high proliferative activity had a higher microvessel density and showed higher vascular expression of VEGFR-2 as well as being accompanied by higher levels of VEGF-A in peritoneal fluid and serum, compared with lesions with low proliferative activity. In conclusion, there seems to be a dysregulation of angiogenic activity in the eutopic endometrium of women with endometriosis and endometriotic lesions with high proliferative activity were accompanied by higher local angiogenic activity and higher levels of VEGF in serum and peritoneal fluid.Increased levels of biglycan in endometriomas and peritoneal fluid samples from ovarian endometriosis patients.In our previous low-density-array gene-expression analysis we found an increased expression of biglycan gene in ovarian endometriosis patients. In the present study we evaluated biglycan expression at the protein level in tissue, serum and peritoneal fluid (PF) from ovarian endometriosis patients, patients with benign ovarian cysts and healthy women. Twenty samples of endometriomas and 27 of control tissues (benign ovarian cysts and eutopic endometrium of healthy women) were obtained laparoscopically or by curettage. Serum and PF samples were collected from 56 ovarian endometriosis patients and 40 controls (patients with benign cysts and healthy women). Tissue biglycan levels and serum and PF biglycan concentrations were determined by Western blotting and ELISA, respectively. Biglycan was detected in endometriomas and in benign cysts tissues but differed in glycosylation levels. The PF biglycan concentrations were significantly increased in ovarian endometriosis patients (mean ± SD=220.3 ± 190.5 pg/mg protein) compared to the whole control group (101.9 ± 94.7 pg/mg protein, p<0.001), while serum concentrations did not differ significantly. Biglycan appears to be involved in ovarian pathologies and probably has different roles in benign cysts as compared to ovarian endometriomas.Endometrial aromatase mRNA as a possible screening tool for advanced endometriosis and adenomyosis.Endometriosis (ENDs) and adenomyosis (ADNs) are estrogen-dependent diseases. The aim of this study was to determine the clinical usefulness of examining endometrial biopsy specimens for aromatase cytochrome P450 (CYP19) as a diagnostic importance for endometriosis and adenomyosis. In general, the RT-PCR analyses of 101 samples revealed increased aromatase mRNA expression in eutopic endometrium in women with endometriosis and adenomyosis compared to healthy controls (p = 0.0002). The highest number of positive cases (93.3%) of CYP19 mRNA expression was detected in women with advanced disease stages. Concrete expression of CYP19 mRNA level in controls was 0.68 compared to patients with ADNs (1.21), ENDsL stage I-II (1.15) and ENDsA stage III-IV (1.65) (p < 0.0001), respectively. The possible influence of increased body mass index on aromatase expression in each group showed in controls an insignificant slight increase of aromatase expression, contrary to cases where this trend was the opposite. The results point to the higher (2.45-fold) difference in aromatase expression in patients with endometriosis stage III-IV compared to controls and provide direct evidence that screening for eutopic endometrial aromatase expression in combination with clinical data could be of discriminative value in the prediction of estrogen-dependent diseases, independent from body mass index.Dysregulated sphingolipid metabolism in endometriosis.In endometriosis, the establishment and subsistence of ectopic lesions outside the endometrium suggest an altered cellular state for pathological hyperplasia. Sphingolipids are bioactive compounds, and their biosynthesis and metabolism modulate a range of cellular processes including proliferation, migration and apoptosis. We demonstrate that aberrations in sphingolipid metabolism occur in women with endometriosis.Targeted mass spectrometry on >120 sphingolipids were measured in the sera (n = 62), peritoneal fluid (n = 63), and endometrial tissue (n = 14) of women with and without endometriosis. Quantitative RT-PCR and immunohistochemistry were performed on endometrial tissues determine the expression levels of sphingolipid enzymes.Sphingolipidomics identified the in vivo accumulation of numerous sphingolipids, including the functionally antagonistic glucosylceramides and ceramides in the serum and PF of women with endometriosis. We found upregulation of specific sphingolipid enzymes, namely sphingomyelin synthase 1 (SMS1), sphingomyelinase 3 (SMPD3), and glucosylceramide synthase (GCS) in the endometrium of endometriotic women with corresponding increased GlcCer, decreased sphingomyelin levels, and decreased apoptosis in the endometrium.Our sphingolipidomics approach provided evidence of altered sphingolipid metabolism flux in serum, peritoneal fluid, and endometrial tissue in women with endometriosis. The results provide new information on how sphingolipids and eutopic endometrium may contribute to the pathophysiology of endometriosis. The results also have implications for the use of sphingolipids as potential biomarkers.Development of a nonsurgical diagnostic tool for endometriosis based on the detection of endometrial leukocyte subsets and serum CA-125 levels.To determine whether the proportion of several leukocyte subsets is modulated in the endometrium of patients with endometriosis and, if yes, whether it can be used for diagnostic purposes.Case-control study.Eight clinical institutions of the Montreal area.Women who underwent laparoscopy or laparotomy between 1997 and 2001, who had regular menstrual cycles and were not under hormone treatment for the previous 3 months were selected. This study included 368 women, 173 with surgically confirmed endometriosis and 195 controls with no surgical evidence of endometriosis.Oxidative cell injury as a predictor of endometriosis progression.There is increasing evidence that oxidative stress is one of the key factors for progression of endometriosis. In this prospective controlled trial, we measured 6 different biomarkers of oxidative stress targeting protein, lipid, and DNA to quantify the severity and progression of endometriosis and establish a diagnostic marker for the disease.A total of 62 consecutive patients were identified and enrolled in this study. After exclusion criteria, 44 patients were allocated to 3 groups: stage I/II (n = 14), stage III/IV (n = 16), and a control group (n = 14). The levels of 8-hydroxy-2-deoxyguanosine (8-OHdG), 8-oxoguanine DNA glycosylase (OGG1), protein carbonyl (PC), lipid peroxidation (LPO), reactive oxygen species (ROS), and total antioxidant capacity (TAC) were accessed in peritoneal fluid and tissue.Significantly higher levels of 8-OHdG and PC were seen in patients with endometriosis, in addition OGG1 expression was found to be significantly lower in patients with endometriosis (P < .001, P = .001, P = .033, respectively); ROS, TAC, and LPO were similar in stages I/II, stages III/IV, and control group. A predictive model was built using multivariable analyses and receiver-operating characteristics curves. The ability to predict and distinguish between patients without endometriosis, stage I/II endometriosis, and stage III/IV was very high. This model was highly discriminatory and had a concordance index of 0.87.In this cohort, higher DNA damage and lower DNA repair activity was related to endometriosis progression. Our results indicate that oxidative stress as a biomarker of cell injury can be used as a reliable quantitative test of endometriosis severity.Apoptosis and expression of Bcl-2 and Bax in eutopic endometrium from women with endometriosis.To evaluate and compare spontaneous apoptosis and Bcl-2 and Bax expression in eutopic endometrium from women with and without endometriosis.Apoptosis and Bcl-2 and Bax expression were examined in eutopic endometrium from women with and without endometriosis.Instituto de Biología y Medicina Experimental-CONICET, Department of Gynecology and Department of Gynecological Pathology, Clínicas University Hospital, Buenos Aires, Argentina.Women with untreated endometriosis (n = 14) and controls (n = 16).Collection of endometrial samples during diagnostic or therapeutic laparoscopy.Apoptotic cells were detected with use of the dUTP nick-end labeling (TUNEL) assay; Bcl-2 and Bax expressions were assessed with use of immunohistochemical techniques.Spontaneous apoptosis was significantly lower in eutopic endometrium from patients with endometriosis, compared with healthy controls (2.26 +/- 0.53 and 9.37 +/- 1.69 apoptotic cells/field, respectively) and was independent of cycle phase. An increased expression of Bcl-2 protein was found in proliferative eutopic endometrium from patients with endometriosis. Bax expression was absent in proliferative endometrium, whereas there was an increase in its expression in secretory endometrium from both patients and controls.Women with endometriosis show decreased number of apoptotic cells in eutopic endometrium. The abnormal survival of endometrial cells may result in their continuing growth into ectopic locations.Differential expression of interleukins (IL)-13 and IL-15 in ectopic and eutopic endometrium of women with endometriosis and normal fertile women.Interleukins (IL) 13 and 15 are key regulators of inflammatory and immune responses, processes that are central to endometriosis and associated abnormalities. The present study examined (1) whether ectopic endometrial tissue expresses IL-13 and IL-15 (2) if their expression differs compared with matched eutopic endometrium and control endometrium from normal fertile women, and (3) if peritoneal fluids (PF) content of these cytokines reflects the disease compared with PF from women with peritoneal adhesions unrelated to endometriosis and those without pelvic pathology.The expression of IL-13 and IL-15 mRNA and protein was determined using quantitative RT-PCR, ELISA and immunohistochemistry.Ectopic endometrium expresses IL-13 and IL-15 mRNA and protein with elevated levels compared with eutopic and control endometrium, irrespective of the phases of the menstrual cycle, with predominance in IL-13 expression. Endometrial epithelial cells were found to be the primary site of IL-13 and IL-15 expression. The PF content of IL-13 and IL-15 show a trend toward higher concentrations in women with adhesion and endometriosis, respectively, compared with fertile control without pelvic pathology.Interleukins 13 and 15 are expressed in ectopic endometrium and present in PF of women with endometriosis and their elevated expression in ectopic endometrium suggests that these cytokines play a key role in local inflammatory/immune responses that are critical in endometriosis-associated abnormalities.High expression levels of cyclin B1 and Polo-like kinase 1 in ectopic endometrial cells associated with abnormal cell cycle regulation of endometriosis.To investigate the possible roles of cyclin B1/cyclin-dependent kinase (cdc2) and Polo-like kinase 1 (Plk1) in the pathogenesis of endometriosis.A case-control study.University hospital.Patients with or without endometriosis were diagnosed by pathological examination or laparoscopy. The patients with the following criteria within the past 6 months were excluded: endocrine or inflammatory diseases, pregnancy or lactation, hormonal therapy, and neoplasm in the uterine cavity.Eutopic and ectopic endometria were obtained at the time of surgery. Blood was collected on the same day as surgery.The mRNA/protein expression and localization of cyclin B1, cdc2, and Plk1 in endometrium, and serum levels of E(2) and P.The expression levels of cyclin B1 and Plk1, but not cdc2, in ectopic endometria were significantly higher than in eutopic endometria. The immunohistochemical staining of cyclin B1 and Plk1 was detected in the nuclei of ectopic and eutopic endometrial cells. Furthermore, ectopic endometrial expression levels of cyclin B1 or Plk1 were positively correlated with serum E(2) levels.Cyclin B1 and Plk1 may play important roles in the pathogenesis of endometriosis by mediating ectopic endometrial cell proliferation under regulation of ovarian hormones.Expression of the gamma 2 chain of laminin-332 in eutopic and ectopic endometrium of patients with endometriosis.Endometrial cells, which are shed by retrograde menstruation, may aberrantly express molecules involved in invasion and migration, leading to endometriosis. The aim of this study was to investigate the expression of the laminin gamma 2 chain (LAMC2) in the tissues of women with and without endometriosis.Endometrial biopsy specimens were collected from healthy volunteers and from endometriosis patients. Biopsy specimens from the corresponding endometriotic lesions were also collected. The expression of laminin gamma 2 chain was evaluated by immunohistochemistry and reverse transcription polymerase chain reaction (RT-PCR).Endometrial tissue from women with or without endometriosis showed constitutive expression of LAMC2 mRNA throughout the menstrual cycle. A higher mRNA level was observed in ectopic endometrium (Ec) from women with endometriosis compared with eutopic endometrium (Eu) from women with endometriosis. Immunohistochemistry revealed a varied pattern of laminin gamma 2 chain expression, with increased epithelial expression in eutopic endometrium from women with endometriosis compared with those without endometriosis.The altered expression of laminin gamma 2 chain in eutopic endometrium from women with endometriosis may provide new opportunities for diagnosis and treatment.Expression and localisation of osteopontin and prominin-1 (CD133) in patients with endometriosis.In this study, we investigated the expression and localisation of the proteins, osteopontin (OPN) and prominin-1 (CD133), as well as the plasma OPN levels in the endometrium of patients with endometriosis. Samples of ectopic endometriotic lesions and normal endometrium were obtained from 31 women with endometriosis and 28 healthy control subjects. The mRNA and protein expression of OPN and CD133 was analysed by real‑time RT-PCR and immunohistochemistry. The plasma levels of OPN were determined by ELISA. Our results revealed that OPN mRNA and protein expression, as well as its release in the blood, was significantly increased in the endometriotic lesions in comparison to normal tissue. Although the presence of CD133+ cells was detected in the normal endometrium, as well as in the endometriosis specimens, a significant quantitative variation of this protein was not demonstrated in the patients with endometriosis. In conclusion, our data indicate that OPN is involved in the development of endometriosis by enhancing the invasiveness, proliferation and survival of endometrial cells in ectopic lesions. CD133 cannot be used as a disease marker for endometriosis, although an involvement of this protein in the pathogenesis of endometriosis cannot be excluded.Endometriosis markers: immunologic alterations as diagnostic indicators for endometriosis.Because endometriosis, a chronic disease affecting 7% to 10% of women, is associated with immunologic aberrations, the authors hypothesize that the presence of specific immune alterations may be diagnostic. Autoantibodies were assayed by Western immunoblotting using antigens derived from the plasma membrane, cytosol, and nucleus from endometrial and ovarian cells. Natural killer (NK) activity was defined by levels of signaling protein zeta and induction of interferon (IFN)-gamma following exposure to patients' sera. Patients with endometriosis exhibited autoantibodies reactive with cellular proteins; endometrial membrane proteins exhibited the greatest reactivity, followed by nuclear antigens. In all subcellular fractions, patients with stage 3 endometriosis exhibited significantly more immunoreactivity than did stage 2 patients, which was greater than that observed in stage 1 patients. The stage-associated increased reactivity resulted from both recognition of additional proteins and enhanced reactivity with shared proteins. Patient sera suppressed NK zeta expression, which resulted in suppression of NK IFN induction. Alterations in autoreactivity and NK activity are observed in endometriosis and may be useful as diagnostic markers, even in early stage disease.Tyrosine receptor kinase B (TrkB) protein expression in the human endometrium.Tyrosine kinase receptor B (TrkB) gene expression, a neurotrophic factor receptor expressed in the brain and ovary, has recently been identified in deep infiltrating endometriosis by gene array. TrkB is thought to be important in resistance to anchorage independent apoptosis (ANOIKIS) and thus could be important in the pathogenesis of endometriosis. However, TrkB protein expression in the eutopic endometrium of women with and without endometriosis is unknown. Therefore, we examined TrKB protein expression in the endometrium by Western blot (n = 50) and immunohistochemistry (n = 17). Immunoblots of endometrial biopsies were prepared from women with endometriosis (n = 21) vs. healthy controls (n = 29) undergoing benign gynecological surgery at McMaster University Medical Centre. TrkB protein expression was significantly higher in immunoblots from women with endometriosis compared to women without endometriosis. In samples of archived paraffin-embedded endometrial tissue TrkB was localized to the cytoplasm of epithelial cells of the eutopic endometrium from women with endometriosis (n = 7) and without endometriosis (n = 10). We conclude that TrkB protein is expressed in human endometrium. Our results also suggest that TrkB expression may be greater in women with endometriosis compared to women without endometriosis.Expression of interleukin-8 and monocyte chemotactic protein 1 in women with endometriosis.To investigate the expression and localization of interleukin-8 (IL-8) and monocyte chemotactic protein 1 (MCP-1) in women with and without endometriosis.Comparative immunohistochemical study.Academic medical center.Ectopic (n = 24) and homologous eutopic endometrium (n = 24) from women with endometriosis and endometrium from women without endometriosis (n = 27) were used for immunohistochemical analysis of IL-8 and MCP-1.Tissue sections were immunostained with antihuman IL-8 and MCP-1 antibodies.Microscopic evaluation to assess the presence and localization of IL-8 and MCP-1 throughout the menstrual cycle in both eutopic endometrial and endometriotic tissues of women with endometriosis and comparison with normal endometrium.In normal endometrium, secretory phase samples expressed higher levels of epithelial IL-8 than in proliferative phase samples. Epithelial MCP-1 expression was similar in both proliferative and secretory phases. Proliferative phase samples showed higher epithelial IL-8 and MCP-1 expressions in eutopic endometrium of women with endometriosis compared with that of normal women. Immunoreactivities of both chemokines were significantly increased in the epithelial cells of ectopic endometrial tissues compared with those of normal endometrium.These findings suggest that IL-8 and MCP-1 may be involved in the pathogenesis of endometriosis.Expression of interleukin-8 receptors in endometriosis.Although the etiology of endometriosis is not well understood, chemokines and their receptors are believed to play a role in its pathogenesis. Therefore, we aimed to investigate the expression and localization of interleukin-8 (IL-8) receptors CXCR1 and CXCR2 in eutopic and ectopic endometrial tissues of women with endometriosis, and in endometrium of women without endometriosis.Ectopic (n = 27) and homologous eutopic endometrium (n = 25) from women with endometriosis and endometrium from women without endometriosis (n = 27) were used for immunohistochemical analysis of CXCR1 and CXCR2.In normal endometrium, epithelial CXCR1 and CXCR2 immunostaining intensities were similar in the proliferative and secretory phase. Stromal CXCR1 expression was less then epithelial expression and did not show cyclical difference. No stromal CXCR2 expression was observed. In eutopic endometrium of women with endometriosis compared to endometrium of women without endometriosis, there was a significant increase in both proliferative and secretory phases for epithelial CXCR2 expression, and in proliferative phase for CXCR1 expression (P < 0.05). Both receptor immunoreactivities were significantly increased in the epithelial cells of ectopic endometrial tissues compared to that of normal endometrium (P < 0.05).These findings suggest that IL-8 and its receptors may be involved in the pathogenesis of endometriosis.Changes in the T-helper cytokine profile and in lymphocyte activation at the systemic and local levels in women with endometriosis.To estimate regulatory cytokine synthesis and lymphocyte activation in the peripheral blood and endometrial tissue of patients with endometriosis.Controlled clinical study.Medical center.Fifteen women with laparoscopically diagnosed endometriosis; 20 gynecologically healthy women with previously documented fertility (control group).Peripheral venous blood sampling; laparoscopic collection of ectopic and matched eutopic endometrium.Messenger RNA (mRNA) for interleukin (IL)-2, IL-4, and IL-10 expression in peripheral and endometrium lymphocytes was assessed by real-time reverse transcriptase polymerase chain reaction; intracellular synthesis of these cytokines and lymphocyte phenotype profile were established by flow cytometry.Both mRNA expression and intracellular synthesis of IL-4 and IL-10 were sharply increased in peripheral lymphocytes. The same changes were observed for IL-4 in ectopic endometrium of women with endometriosis. Simultaneously, elevation of the amount of pan-B cells, CD20+CD5+ B-1 cells, and activated HLA-DR+CD20+ B lymphocytes was observed in endometriosis lesions. Only an enhanced amount of B lymphocytes was seen in eutopic endometrium.Endometriosis development is accompanied by the activation of a T-helper type 2 immune response at the systemic and local levels. Our results support the hypothesis regarding the autoimmune nature of endometriosis and can explain the high level of autoantibody production in patients with endometriosis.Imbalance in the expression of the activating type I and the inhibitory type II interleukin 1 receptors in endometriosis.The ectopic establishment and progression of endometrial tissue is dependent upon its interaction with and responsiveness to the stimuli present in its new environment. Immune cell-derived cytokines, such as interleukin 1 (IL1), may alone or in concert with estrogens enhance the capability of ectopic endometrial cells to implant and develop into the host tissue. The objective of this study was to further evaluate the expression and significance of IL1 receptor type I (IL1R1), the signalling receptor that mediates cell activation by IL1, and IL1 receptor type II (IL1R2), a potent and specific down-regulator of IL1 action, in normal compared to endometriotic/endometrial tissues.Techniques included immunohistochemistry, immunofluorescent staining, ELISA, western blotting and endometriotic cell culture transfection.Our study showed an imbalance in the expression of IL1R1 and IL1R2 in eutopic, and particularly in ectopic, endometrial tissues of women with endometriosis. Actually, a decreased IL1R2 expression is predominant in the eutopic and ectopic endometrium of women with endometriosis when compared with normal women, whereas a concomitant increase in IL1R1 expression occurs in ectopic endometrial tissue in comparison to eutopic endometrial tissue of normal or endometriotic women, particularly in the initial and most active implants. Transfection of endometriotic cells with a cDNA coding for IL1R2 resulted in a significant decrease in IL1-induced secretion of vascular endothelial cell growth factor and monocyte chemotactic protein 1.IL1R1/IL1R2 imbalance may amplify endometrial cell responsiveness to IL1 and represent a key mechanism underlying the ability of these cells to implant and develop into host tissues.Semi-quantitative analysis of HOXA11, leukemia inhibitory factor and basic transcriptional element binding protein 1 mRNA expression in the mid-secretory endometrium of patients with endometriosis.HOXA11 and leukemia inhibitory factor (LIF) and basic transcriptional element binding protein1 (BTEB1) are expressed in endometrium throughout the menstrual cycle and show a dramatic increase during the mid-luteal phase at the time of implantation. In this case-control study, the expression pattern of these mRNA was evaluated in patients with endometriosis at the time of implantation. We also describe a semi-quantitative RT-PCR protocol optimized in our laboratory.Eight patients with endometriosis were considered as our case and 8 fertile women as control group. Expression levels of HOXA11, LIF and BTEB1 mRNA were measured in endometrium during the mid-secretory phase using semi-quantitative RT-PCR.We describe the detailed procedure for the analysis of HOXA11, LIF and BTEB1 mRNA levels. Endometrial HOXA11 and LIF mRNA expression levels (normalized to beta-actin expression) were significantly decreased in endometrium of infertile patients with endometriosis compared with healthy fertile controls at the time of implantation (P < 0.05). A similar trend was seen in BTEB1 mRNA expression.The results suggest that the alteration in expression pattern of the some genes could account for some aspects of infertility in endometriosis.L1 cell adhesion molecule (L1CAM) as a pathogenetic factor in endometriosis.Endometriosis is a benign and progressive disease with a high prevalence. Women with endometriosis, especially with atypical endometriosis, have a higher probability for developing ovarian cancer compared with women without endometriosis. The L1 cell adhesion molecule (L1CAM) is over expressed in ovarian and endometrial carcinomas and is associated with a bad prognosis. Here, we have analysed L1CAM expression in endometriosis.In our study with the samples from 79 patients with, and 37 patients without, endometriosis, we found that endometriosis cell lines and short-term cultures of endometrium from women with endometriosis expressed L1CAM at the mRNA and protein level. Quantitative RT-PCR analysis showed that L1CAM was expressed at significantly higher level in the epithelial compartment from patients with endometriosis compared with healthy controls (P = 0.0126). By immunohistochemical staining, 15 of 31 ovarian endometriotic lesions (48%) were shown to have L1CAM-positive staining. Of these 15 L1CAM-positive samples, 13 were atypical endometriotic lesions. Soluble L1 present in the conditioned medium of epithelial endometrium cultures from women with endometriosis was able to stimulate neurite outgrowth as measured in a chicken ganglion assay.We propose that L1CAM could promote endometriosis development by increasing enervation and aggravation. L1CAM expression is higher in atypical endometriosis compared with normal endometriosis.In vitro CA-125 secretion by endometrium from women with advanced endometriosis.To determine if the endometrium of women with endometriosis is a potential source of the elevated serum concentrations of CA-125 associated with endometriosis.Secretion of CA-125 by the endometrium in tissue culture was documented and measured in response to treatment with progesterone (P), 17 beta-estradiol (E2), and progesterone and estradiol (E2+P). Sequential biopsies of the endometrium from the early and late luteal phase were obtained from women with laparoscopically documented normal anatomy or moderate to severe endometriosis.Division of Reproductive Endocrinology, Department of Obstetrics and Gynecology at the University of Vermont, College of Medicine, Burlington, Vermont.Secretion of CA-125 by endometrium in vitro was determined by radioimmunoassay in spent media using a commercially available kit (Centicor CA-125 Kit; Centicor, Malvern, PA).Secretion of CA-125 by endometrium in vitro is inhibited by the presence of P and E2+P in both the early and the late luteal phase. The amount of CA-125 secreted increases significantly from the early to the late luteal phase in all treatment groups. When compared with controls, the endometrium of women of with endometriosis secreted two to four times more CA-125 in all treatment groups, in both the early and late luteal phase.When compared with control endometrium, the endometrium of women with advanced endometriosis secretes significantly more CA-125 and represents a potential source of the elevated serum levels of CA-125 seen in these women.Intercellular adhesion molecule-1 and hepatocyte growth factor in human endometriosis: original investigation and a review of literature.Defects in the cell-mediated immune system may play a role in the pathogenesis or progression of pelvic endometriosis. Possible mediators include macrophages, interleukins-1 and -6, and tumor necrosis factor-alpha. More recent work points to the involvement of adhesion molecules and growth factors. To clarify the pathogenesis of endometriosis, we compared the characteristics of soluble intercellular adhesion molecule-1 (soluble ICAM-1) and hepatocyte growth factor (HGF) in women with and without endometriosis. We found that, in patients with endometriosis, the concentrations of soluble ICAM-1 in peritoneal fluid increased and interfered with the activity of natural killer cells. We also found that HGF secretion was significantly increased in cultured endometrial stromal cells, and that HGF stimulated the proliferation and migration of, and morphogenic changes in, endometrial epithelial cells. HGF and ICAM-1 play important roles in the initiation and regulation of endometriotic lesions on the microenvironment level. The increased secretion of HGF by eutopic endometrial stromal cells may contribute to the pathogenesis of endometriosis, whereas the increased levels of soluble ICAM-1 may impair natural killer cell activity and accelerate the progression of the disease.Interleukin 1alpha and tissue-lytic matrix metalloproteinase-1 are elevated in ectopic endometrium of patients with endometriosis.Matrix metalloproteinases (MMP) play an essential role in tissue remodelling and menstruation and appear to be regulated by cytokines such as interleukin-1alpha (IL-1alpha). In order to investigate their role in the pathogenesis of endometriosis, the aim of the present study was to compare the protein localization of matrix metalloproteinase-1 (MMP-1) and of its main stimulatory cytokine IL-1alpha in eutopic and dystopic endometrium of patients with endometriosis.MMP-1 and IL-1alpha protein localization was analysed retrospectively in paired paraffin-embedded tissue biopsies obtained simultaneously from the endometrial cavity and from endometrial lesions of 37 patients with peritoneal or ovarian endometriosis and in cycling endometria from 37 women without endometriosis. Protein localization was demonstrated by immunohistochemistry; antibody specificity was confirmed by western blot analysis.MMP-1 and IL-1alpha protein staining in women suffering from endometriosis was significantly more pronounced in endometriotic lesions than in eutopic endometrium. This held true for both epithelial MMP-1 and IL-1alpha staining (P < 0.006 and P < 0.001), and for stromal MMP-1 and IL-1alpha staining (P < 0.001 and P < 0.001). Furthermore, stromal MMP-1 and IL-1alpha were significantly co-expressed in dystopic endometriotic tissue (P = 0.045). Endometrial MMP-1 and IL-1alpha protein expression pattern in eutopic endometrium from women suffering from endometriosis, however, did not differ significantly from the pattern seen in healthy women.The increased expression of both matrix-degrading MMP-1 and its major stimulatory cytokine IL-1alpha in endometriotic lesions and the selective co-expression in the stroma of endometriotic foci clearly suggests their involvement in the pathogenic mechanisms leading to local invasion and tissue destruction.P27Kip1 is down-regulated in the endometrium of women with endometriosis.To evaluate p27 protein expression in the endometrium of women with endometriosis.Transversal case-control study.Endometriosis Unit, Federal University of São Paulo, Brazil.Thirteen patients with stage I/II endometriosis, five with stage III/IV endometriosis, and 11 control subjects.Endometrial biopsies were obtained from patients with proven endometriosis and women without disease at laparoscopy. P27 protein was immunolocalized in the biopsy tissues and quantified by light microscopy.Immunostaining scores of glandular and stromal cells in endometrial biopsies obtained from patients with confirmed endometriosis compared with those of healthy control women with normal pelvis at laparoscopy. The staining scores of stage I/II and stage III/IV patients and of both patient groups and the control group were compared.The level of p27 protein expression observed in the control group, both in the stroma and in the endometrial glands, was significantly different from that observed in the endometriosis patient groups. Significant differences in p27 protein expression levels in the glandular epithelium and stroma were not observed among groups of patients with endometriosis.The decreased level of p27 protein in the endometrium of women with endometriosis suggests that cell cycle alterations in the endometrial mucosa may be involved in the pathogenesis of this disease.VCAM-1 on peritoneum and α4β1 integrin in endometrium and their implications in endometriosis.The objective of the study is to investigate vascular cellular adhesion molecule-1 (VCAM-1) expression on peritoneal mesothelial cells and α4β1 integrin on eutopic endometrium as possible mechanisms in the pathogenesis of endometriosis. It is a case-control study carried out at an academic medical center. Participants are patients with (n=9) and without (n=15) endometriosis. The main outcome measures included VCAM-1 expression on peritoneal mesothelial cells and α4β1 expression on eutopic endometrium using immunohistochemistry and flow cytometry, respectively. Patients with endometriosis were more likely to express VCAM-1 on peritoneal mesothelial cells, both in areas with and without macroscopic disease, compared with patients without endometriosis (9/9 vs. 3/15, P<0.001). No differences were found between cases and controls in regards to eutopic endometrial expression of α4β1 integrin. The presence of VCAM-1 on peritoneal mesothelial cells is associated with endometriosis. This field effect, in addition to the similarity found with regards to the expression of α4β1 integrin in eutopic endometrium between cases and controls, may implicate the expression of VCAM-1 in the peritoneum, and not changes in the eutopic endometrium, as a contributor to the pathogenesis of endometriosis. Expression of Th1 and Th2 cytokine-associated transcription factors, T-bet and GATA-3, in the eutopic endometrium of women with endometriosis.The objective of the present study was to evaluate the expression of T-box expressed in T cells (T-bet) and GATA binding protein 3 (GATA-3) in the eutopic endometrium from women with endometriosis. Endometrial tissues were collected from 20 women with laparoscopically confirmed endometriosis and 20 women without endometriosis. T-bet and GATA-3 expression was measured by quantitative real-time PCR (qPCR), immunohistochemistry and Western blot analysis. Eutopic endometrial tissues from patients with endometriosis expressed lower levels of T-bet mRNA and high levels of GATA-3 mRNA, leading to a significant lower T-bet/GATA-3 mRNA ratio (P<0.05). Western blot analysis showed that the T-bet/GATA-3 protein ratio in endometriosis group was also statistically lower than that in the control group (P<0.05). These results suggested that T-bet and GATA-3 may act as cytokine regulatory genes, and the Th2-specific transcription factor, GATA-3, probably plays an essential role in the immune response and the development of endometriosis.Chemokine CCL2 enhances survival and invasiveness of endometrial stromal cells in an autocrine manner by activating Akt and MAPK/Erk1/2 signal pathway.To clarify the role and mechanism of CCL2 in regulating the biological functions of endometrial stromal cells (ESCs).The CCL2 effect on the viability, proliferation, and invasion in the eutopic ESCs from endometriosis.Research laboratories.Patients with endometriosis aged 23-47 years.None.Signal transduction and downstream molecules from CCR2.We have found that the secretion of CCL2 by the eutopic ESCs from endometriosis is higher than that of healthy ESCs without endometriosis. The CCL2 can enhance the viability, proliferation, and invasion of ESCs in a dosage and time-dependent manner. Anti-CCL2 neutralizing antibody and CCR2 antagonist can completely abolish the increase in viability, proliferation, and invasiveness of ESCs induced by CCL2. The CCL2 can increase the expression of proliferating cell nuclear antigen, survivin, and matrix metalloproteinase 2, and decrease the expression of tissue inhibitor of metalloproteinase 1 and 2, and promote the viability, proliferation and invasiveness of ESCs by activating Akt and MAPK/Erk1/2 signal pathway, but not p38 and JNK signal pathway.CCL2 might play an important role in regulating the functions of ESCs through Akt and MAPK/Erk1/2 signal pathway, and overexpression of CCL2 in ESCs and peritoneal fluid (PF) would lead to onset and development of endometriosis.The expression of human leukocyte antigens class I and II in women with endometriosis or adenomyosis.The human leukocyte antigen (HLA) system has been implicated in the aetiology of endometriosis. We aimed to compare the HLA class I and II expression in endometrial specimens from women with endometriosis or adenomyosis.We studied the HLA class I and II expression in endometrial specimens from 16 women with endometriosis and 15 with adenomyosis which were compared with 15 specimens from women without endometriosis or adenomyosis. Immunohistochemistry was performed using mouse antihuman IgG2a monoclonal antibody for HLA I and IgG1 for HLA II.Women with endometriosis had significantly higher HLA I and II expression in stroma (100% and 87.5% vs. 66.7% and 40%, p < 0.02 and p = 0.007, respectively) and glands (87.5% and 56.3% vs. 46.7% and 20%, p < 0.02 and p = 0.04, respectively) compared to controls, while in the adenomyosis group the expression of HLA I was comparable with controls and the HLA II expression was increased in stromal cells (73.3% vs. 40%, p = 0.03) and decreased in glands (6.6% vs. 20%, p = NS).Women with endometriosis had a significantly higher expression of HLA molecules whereas in adenomyosis there was a tendency of lower expression of these molecules. This could explain the suppression of cellular immunity in the peritoneal cavity.Characterization of WNT7A expression in human endometrium and endometriotic lesions.To characterize the expression of WNT7A in human eutopic and ectopic endometrium.Experimental study using real-time polymerase chain reaction, laser microdissection, in situ hybridization, and immunofluorescence.University-based laboratory.Patients with and without endometriosis undergoing surgery for benign indications.None.Relative expression values compared with housekeeping genes using real-time polymerase chain reaction. Detection of positive cells by immunofluorescence and in situ hybridization.In endometriosis, statistically significant higher WNT7A mRNA expression was observed compared with eutopic endometrium. Expression of WNT7A was found in the luminal and glandular epithelial cells as well as stroma cells in endometrium and endometriosis by immunofluorescence, in situ hybridization, and polymerase chain reaction of laser microdissected tissue.The results of the present study suggest that WNT7A plays a role in the pathophysiology of endometriosis.Expression of leptin receptor in human endometrium and fluctuation during the menstrual cycle.Leptin is secreted by adipocytes and regulates appetite through interaction with hypothalamic leptin receptors (OB-R). Accumulated evidence shows that leptin is involved in the stimulation of reproductive functions and that local expression of leptin and OB-R in the ovary, oocyte, embryo, and placenta plays a role in early development. To investigate the role of leptin in implantation, we examined the expression of OB-R and leptin in the human endometrium. Northern and Western blot analyses and RT-PCR showed that the long form of OB-R (OB-R(L)) messenger ribonucleic acid (mRNA) and protein were expressed. In contrast, leptin mRNA or protein was not detected. All of the splice variants of OB-R (OB-R(T)) and OB-R(L) transcripts were expressed in 90% and 84% of the cases, respectively. OB-R mRNA expression peaked in the early secretory phase. Decidual tissue of early gestation also expressed OB-R(T) and OB-R(L). Their incidence and abundance were comparable among endometria with benign uterine diseases and disease-free endometria and were not related to a body mass index within the normal range. The present results indicate that OB-R, but not leptin, is expressed in the human endometrium.Activin A stimulates interleukin 8 and vascular endothelial growth factor release from cultured human endometrial stromal cells: possible implications for the pathogenesis of endometriosis.Activin A is an endometrial secretory product involved in inflammation and angiogenesis. The present study aimed to evaluate the effect of activin A and its antagonist follistatin on interleukin (IL)-6, IL-8, and vascular endothelial growth factor (VEGF) expression and release from cultured human endometrial stromal cells (HESCs) from women with and without endometriosis.The HESCs were collected from women with endometriosis (n = 6) and controls (n = 6). Primary cultures were treated with activin A at different doses or activin A plus follistatin. The IL-6, IL-8, and VEGF messenger RNA expression was evaluated by real-time polymerase chain reaction and protein release was evaluated by enzyme-linked immunosorbent assay.Unstimulated HESC from women with endometriosis secreted more IL-6 and IL-8 than controls. The addition of activin A increased IL-8 and VEGF secretion in HESC from controls and decreased IL-6 and IL-8 secretion in HESC from women with endometriosis. These effects were counteracted by follistatin.Activin A regulates the expression and secretion of IL-8 and VEGF in cultured HESC, and this mechanism appears to be disrupted in eutopic endometrial cells from women affected by endometriosis.Endometrial immunofluorescence associated with endometriosis and pelvic inflammatory disease.Anti-immunoglobulin G (anti-IgG) staining in the endometrium by immunofluorescence has been associated with endometriosis. To investigate this phenomenon further, we took endometrial samples from 42 patients who underwent laparoscopy or laparotomy, which were tested for immunofluorescence. Fluorescein-labeled anti-IgG was incubated with tissue samples. Of 18 patients with documented endometriosis, 16 had positive immunofluorescence (89% sensitivity). Of 24 patients with no evidence of endometriosis, 9 had false-positive immunofluorescence and 15 had negative immunofluorescence. Of the 9 false-positive samples, 8 had evidence of old pelvic inflammatory disease. In the absence of this condition, there was only one false-positive study for immunofluorescence. The implications of these findings in terms of the pathophysiology of endometriosis-associated infertility is that it may be an immune-mediated process. With regard to diagnosis, the high predictive value of endometrial immunofluorescent IgG may be a useful tool in indicating early laparoscopic examination of the infertile period.Elevated levels of gremlin-1 in eutopic endometrium and peripheral serum in patients with endometriosis.To examine the expression of gremlin-1 (GREM1) on the levels of messenger RNA (mRNA) and protein in eutopic endometrium and its serum level in patients with endometriosis.Prospective, experimental study using reverse-transcription polymerase chain reaction, Western blot, immunofluorescence, and ELISA.Gynecological oncology laboratory in a department of obstetrics and gynecology in a medical college in China.Thirty-five patients with endometriosis and 23 healthy control women.During surgery, the eutopic endometria and peripheral serum were obtained from the patients with endometriosis and the control women.The cellular compartment location of GREM1 expression was examined by using immunofluorescent double staining. The expression levels of mRNA and protein for GREM1 were determined by reverse-transcription polymerase chain reaction and Western blot, respectively. The serum level of GREM1 was measured by indirect ELISA.The expression of GREM1 was defined within endometrial blood vessel endothelium exclusively, with the concomitant expressions of GREM1 and CD146. The expression of GREM1 on the levels of mRNA and protein was significantly higher in eutopic endometria of patients with endometriosis than in those from healthy control women. According to the ELISA established in our laboratory, the concentration of GREM1 in peripheral serum that was collected during the follicular menstrual phase of patients with endometriosis was significantly higher than that in serum from healthy control women.Gremlin-1 plays a role to some extent in the aberrant angiogenesis of eutopic endometrium in patients with endometriosis. It is possible that the peripheral serum level of GREM1 is a prospective serum biomarker of endometriosis.Transcriptional expression of type-I interferon response genes and stability of housekeeping genes in the human endometrium and endometriosis.Endometriosis is a painful chronic female disease defined by the presence of endometrial tissue implants in ectopic (Ec) locations. The pathogenesis is much debated, and type-I interferons (IFNs) could be involved. The expression of genes of the type-I IFN response were profiled by a specific PCR array of RNA obtained from Ec and eutopic (Eu) endometrium collected from nine endometriosis patients and nine healthy control women. Transcriptional expression levels of selected IFN-regulated and housekeeping genes (HKGs) were investigated by real-time quantitative reverse transcriptase PCR (qRT-PCR). Stably expressed HKGs for valid normalization of transcriptional studies of endometrium and endometriosis have not yet been published. Here, seven HKGs were evaluated for stability using the GeNorm and NormFinder software. A normalization factor based on HMBS, TBP and YWHAZ expression was suitable for normalization of qRT-PCR studies of Eu versus Ec endometrium. In the endometrial cell lines HEC1A, HEC1B, Ishikawa and RL95-2, HMBS and HPRT1 were the most stably expressed. The IFN-specific PCR array indicated significantly different expression of the genes BST2, COL16A1, HOXB2 and ISG20 between the endometrial tissue types. However, by correctly normalized qRT-PCR, levels of BST2, COL16A1 and the highly type-I IFN-stimulated genes ISG12A and 6-16 displayed insignificant variations. Conversely, HOXB2 and ISG20 transcriptions were significantly reduced in endometriosis lesions compared with endometrium from endometriosis patients and healthy controls. In conclusion, appropriate HKGs for normalization of qRT-PCR studies of endometrium and endometriosis have been identified here. Abolished expression of ISG20 and HOX genes could be important in endometriosis.Aromatase expression in endometriotic tissues and its relationship to clinical and analytical findings.To study the relationship between aromatase expression in endometriotic tissues and clinical and laboratory findings.Prospective basic and clinical research.University hospital.Sixty-two women with endometriosis, and 12 without endometriosis.Conservative surgery, or hysterectomy and adnexectomy, along with an immunohistochemical study of aromatase in endometriotic and nonendometriotic tissues.Symptoms of the disease, ultrasound and surgical findings, values of tumor markers, steroids and immunoglobulins, and recurrences after surgery.We observed positive immunohistochemical expression for aromatase in endometriotic tissues from 38 patients (61.3%). Aromatase expression was negative in the rest of the tissues studied and in the 12 cases without endometriosis. Aromatase-positive patients had a higher number of endometriomas, more bilaterality, and more moderate-to-severe chronic pelvic pain. Also, infertility and associated leiomyomas were more frequent in these patients, though without significant differences. There were no differences in recurrence of the disease 1 year later. Estradiol and PRL levels were significantly higher, and IgG values lower, than in aromatase-negative patients. High values of blood sedimentation rate were more frequent in aromatase-negative patients.Molecular alterations such as the presence of aromatase in endometriotic tissues could be involved in the development or maintenance of endometriosis. Our findings suggest major severity, activity, and chronic pelvic pain in patients with aromatase in endometriotic tissue.Increased peritoneal and endometrial gene expression of biologically relevant cytokines and growth factors during the menstrual phase in women with endometriosis.To examine differential messenger RNA (mRNA) expression of relevant cytokines, metalloproteases, growth and adhesion factors in endometrium and peritoneum from women with endometriosis when compared with women without the disease during menstrual and luteal phases of the cycle.Patients with endometriosis were compared with control patients.University hospital.A total of 35 patients (20 patients during the luteal phase and 15 patients during the menstrual phase) were selected for this study on the basis of cycle phase and presence or absence of endometriosis.In this study, endometriosis was laparoscopically and histologically confirmed in 24 women with endometriosis of revised American Society for Reproductive Medicine (ASRM) stage I-II (n = 12) and revised ASRM stage III-IV (n = 12), and the presence of a normal pelvis was documented by laparoscopy in 11 control patients. The macroscopically normal peritoneum tissues were collected from lateral wall left or right, near the colon ascendens or descendens.The expression levels were determined as ratios between the target molecules and beta-actin as housekeeping gene.In women with endometriosis, peritoneal mRNA levels of matrix metalloproteinase (MMP)-3, transforming growth factor-beta, interleukin (IL)-6, and intercellular adhesion molecule-1 and endometrial mRNA levels of MMP-3, tumor necrosis factor (TNF)-alpha, and IL-8 were significantly higher during the menstrual phase when compared with luteal phase. During the menstrual phase of the cycle, both endometrial expression of TNF-alpha, IL-8, and MMP-3 mRNA levels and peritoneal expression of transforming growth factor-beta, IL-6, and intercellular adhesion molecule-1 mRNA levels were significantly higher in women with endometriosis when compared with controls. Immunohistochemical staining confirmed the presence of TNF-alpha in peritoneum and endometrium in both women with endometriosis and controls.Increased endometrial and peritoneal cytokine mRNA expression during menstruation may contribute to a pelvic inflammatory microenvironment favoring the development of endometriosis.Endometriotic stromal cells lose the ability to regulate cell-survival signaling in endometrial epithelial cells in vitro.In normal endometrium, stromal factors regulate the growth of epithelial cells. However, epithelial cells in endometriotic lesions display increased proliferation and decreased apoptosis. This work tested the hypothesis that in endometriosis stromal cells lose the ability to regulate survival signaling and cell growth in epithelial cells. Primary normal, endometriotic eutopic and ectopic epithelial cells were cultured in the presence of medium conditioned by normal, eutopic and ectopic endometriotic endometrial stromal cells. Endometriotic epithelial cells showed higher Survivin expression than normal epithelial cells. Conditioned medium (CM) from normal or eutopic endometriotic stromal cells significantly inhibited the Survivin expression and AKt phosphorylation in normal or eutopic endometriotic epithelial cells. However, CM from ectopic endometriotic stromal cells did not have an inhibitory effect on normal or ectopic endometriotic epithelial cells. Inhibition of AKt phosphorylation and Survivin expression in normal or eutopic endometriotic epithelial cells in the presence of stromal factors from normal or eutopic endometriotic stromal cells was enhanced by progesterone, whereas progesterone had little effect in the presence of stromal factors from ectopic endometriotic stromal cells. The inability of ectopic endometriotic stromal cells to regulated PI3K/AKt/Survivin signaling and mediate the progesterone response in endometriotic epithelial cells may facilitate epithelial cell proliferation in endometriosis and promote the survival of endometriotic lesions.Increased expression of importin13 in endometriosis and endometrial carcinoma.Importin13 (IPO13) is a novel potential marker of corneal epithelial progenitor cells. We investigated the expression and localization of IPO13 in endometrial, endometriotic and endometrial carcinoma tissue.IPO13 expression in endometrial, endometriotic and endometrial carcinoma tissue was examined by immunohistochemistry, qPCR and Western blot.Immunohistochemistry studies showed that IPO13 protein was expressed mainly in cytoplasm of glandular epithelial cell and stromal cells. The rate of importin13-positive cells in proliferative phase endometrium was higher (by about 6-fold) than that in secretory endometrium (P<0.05) and the rate of importin13-positive cells in endometriosis and endometrial carcinoma was higher than that in normal secretory phase endometrial tissues (by about 4- and 9-fold, respectively). Immunofluorescence microscopy revealed co-localization of IPO13 with CD34, CD45, c-kit, telomerase, CD90 and CD146. QPCR revealed significantly increased IPO13 mRNA in endometriosis and endometrial carcinoma versus secretory phase endometrium (by about 2- and 10-fold, respectively). Western blot analysis showed that IPO13 protein is enhanced in endometriosis and endometrial carcinoma versus secretory phase endometrium (p<0.05).These results demonstrate an increased expression of IPO13 in endometriosis and endometrial carcinoma, which could be involved in the pathogenesis of endometriosis and endometrial carcinoma; IPO13 can serve as an endometrial progenitor/stem cell marker.IL-22 in the endometriotic milieu promotes the proliferation of endometrial stromal cells via stimulating the secretion of CCL2 and IL-8.Interleukin-22 (IL-22) is a member of the IL-10 cytokine family and plays critical roles in inflammation, immune surveillance, and tissue homeostasis. However, whether IL-22 regulates the growth of endometrial stromal cells (ESCs), and participates in the pathogenesis of endometriosis remain unclear. In this study, we found that the expression of IL-22 and it receptors (IL-22R1 and IL-10R2) in eutopic endometrium and ectopic lesion of women with endometriosis was higher than that from healthy control. Recombinant human IL-22 (rhIL-22) stimulated the proliferation of ESCs in a dosage-dependent manner. On the contrary, anti-human IL-22 neutralizing antibody inhibited the proliferation of ESCs in vitro. The stimulatory effect of IL-22 on the proliferation of ESCs could be reversed by inhibitor of STAT5, ERK1/2 or AKT signal pathway. However, blocking STAT3, JNK or P38 signal pathway had no these effects. By Enzyme-linked immunosorbent assay (ELISA) and flow cytometry assay, we demonstrated the rhIL-22 not only stimulate the secretion of CCL2 and IL-8, but also significantly up-regulate the expression of IL-8 receptor CXCR1 on ESCs. Meanwhile, STAT5, ERK1/2 and or AKT signal inhibitors could abrogate the increase of CCL2, IL-8 and CXCR1 levels induced by rhIL-22. However, rhIL-22 had not similar influence on CCL2 receptor CCR2. Our current results suggested that the higher level of IL-22 and it receptors in eutopic endometrium may stimulate the expression of CCL2, IL-8/CXCR1, and further promote the growth of ESCs possibly through activating STAT5, MAPK/ERK1/2 and or AKT signal pathways, which may be involved in the occurrence and development of endometriosis. G protein-coupled estrogen receptor (GPER) expression in normal and abnormal endometrium.Rapid estrogen effects are mediated by membrane receptors, and evidence suggests a role for both a membrane-associated form of estrogen receptor alpha (ESR1; ERα) and G-protein coupled receptor 30 (GPER; GPR30). Considering estrogen's importance in endometrial physiology and endometriosis pathophysiology, we hypothesized that GPER could be involved in both cyclic changes in endometrial estrogen action and that aberrant expression might be seen in the eutopic endometrium of women with endometriosis. Using real-time reverse transcriptase-polymerase chain reaction (RT-PCR) and immunohistochemical analysis of normal endometrium, endometrial samples demonstrated cycle-regulated expression of GPER, with maximal expression in the proliferative phase. Eutopic and ectopic endometrium from women with endometriosis overexpressed GPER as compared to eutopic endometrium of normal participants. Ishikawa cells, an adenocarcinoma cell line, expressed GPER, with increased expression upon treatment with estrogen or an ESR1 agonist, but not with a GPER-specific agonist. Decreased expression was seen in Ishikawa cells stably transfected with progesterone receptor A. Together, these data suggest that normal endometrial GPER expression is cyclic and regulated by nuclear estrogen and progesterone receptors, while expression is dysregulated in endometriosis.Increased nuclear expression of nuclear factor kappa-B p65 subunit in the eutopic endometrium and ovarian endometrioma of women with advanced stage endometriosis.We evaluated whether the expression of NF-кB p65 subunit is increased in the eutopic endometrium and/or in the ovarian endometrioma of women with advanced stage endometriosis, and ascertained in vitro effects of proinflammatory cytokines on the expression and DNA binding of NF-кB p65 subunit in endometrial cells.Immunohistochemistry was performed to compare the nuclear NF-кB p65 subunit immunoreactivity between women with and without advanced stage endometriosis. The nuclear NF-кB p65 subunit expression and DNA binding were also analyzed in endometrial cells treated with tumor necrosis factor-alpha (TNF-α) or interleukin-1beta (IL-1β) utilizing Western blot analysis, enzyme-linked immunosorbent assay, and electrophoretic mobility shift assay.The immunoreactivity of the nuclear NF-кB p65 subunit was significantly increased in the eutopic endometrium as well as in the ovarian endometrioma of women with endometriosis compared with the controls. In vitro treatment of endometrial cells with TNF-α and IL-1β led to a significant increase in nuclear NF-кB p65 subunit expression and DNA binding.The nuclear expression of NF-κB p65 is increased in the eutopic endometrium and ovarian endometrioma of women with advanced stage endometriosis, which strongly suggests that NF-кB signaling plays a crucial role in the pathogenesis and/or pathophysiology of endometriosis.Immunohistochemical localization of granulocyte-macrophage colony-stimulating factor in matched endometriosis and endometrial tissues.Murine endometrial granulocyte-macrophage colony-stimulating factor has been related to macrophage recruitment and activation and postulated to mediate reproductive events. This study was designed to determine whether granulocyte-macrophage colony-stimulating factor is present in normal human endometrium or endometriosis.Granulocyte-macrophage colony-stimulating factor was immunohistochemically evaluated in matched endometrial and endometriosis biopsy specimens (n = 19) and endometrial biopsy specimens from disease-free patients (n = 8). Staining differences were determined with McNemar's, Fisher's, and Wilcoxon's tests.Granulocyte-macrophage colony-stimulating factor was primarily localized in endometrial and endometriotic epithelial cells. Expression (p = 0.71) and staining intensity (p = 0.37) was similar in matched proliferative-phase endometrium and endometriosis. Matched secretory-phase endometrium and endometriosis also expressed granulocyte-macrophage colony-stimulating factor in similar proportions (p = 0.12), but staining intensity was enhanced in secretory endometriosis compared with secretory endometrium (p = 0.05). Endometrial granulocyte-macrophage colony-stimulating factor did not vary throughout the menstrual cycle, but endometriotic expression (p = 0.013) and staining intensity (p = 0.008) were significantly greater in the secretory phase.Granulocyte-macrophage colony-stimulating factor is localized in endometrial and endometriotic epithelial cells with increased expression in secretory-phase endometriosis. Granulocyte-macrophage colony-stimulating factor may elicit migration, proliferation, and activation of endometrial and peritoneal macrophages.Integrin adhesion molecules in the endometrial glandular epithelium in patients with endometriosis or adenomyosis.To assess the role of beta 1-integrin and E-cadherin molecules in the eutopic glandular epithelium in patients with endometriosis or adenomyosis.Twenty-four patients with endometriosis, and 22 patients with adenomyosis diagnosed histologically were selected as subjects. The controls consisted of 29 fertile women. Eutopic endometria were obtained by curettage or immediately after the operation. The samples were immunohistochemically examined for the expression of very late activation antigen-2 (VLA-2), VLA-3, VLA-4, VLA-5, VLA-6, and E-cadherin.The expression of each VLA molecule and E-cadherin except VLA-4, VLA-5, and VLA-6 was significantly increased throughout the menstrual cycle in endometria in both the endometriosis and adenomyosis groups. In contrast, the expression of VLA-4 in the adenomyosis group was significantly reduced in the secretory phase.Altered expression of beta 1-integrins and E-cadherin was observed throughout the menstrual cycle in patients with endometriosis and adenomyosis, suggesting the defective microenvironment of the endometrium.Endometrium from women with endometriosis shows increased proliferation activity.Examination of 631 infertile women, including 434 women with endometriosis and 197 without endometriosis, revealed an increasing incidence of endometrial polyps, especially in the test subjects with endometriosis, and advanced stages of endometriosis. Expression of Ki-67 and Bcl-2 proteins and MTT assay results were significantly higher in endometrium of patients with endometriosis than in patients without endometriosis. These showed increased proliferation activity and cell proliferation markers not only clinically but also pathologically.HOXA-11 mediated dysregulation of matrix remodeling during implantation window in women with endometriosis.To investigate the Homeobox genes HOXA-10 and HOXA-11 mediated endometrial molecular defects during implantation window in endometriosis-associated infertility cases.Endometrial biopsies were obtained during implantation window from 31 infertile women with endometriosis (age < 35 years) and 26 age and BMI-matched infertile women without endometriosis were included in the study for comparison purposes. Endometrial expression of HOXA-10 and HOXA-11 genes, MMP-2, -9, α(v)β(3) integrin, leukemia inhibitory factor and surface characteristics including average roughness and topology were assessed.A significantly lower expression of HOXA-10 and HOXA-11 were observed in endometriotic women compared to non-endometriotic controls. Further, a significantly higher endometrial expression of MMP-2 and -9 were observed in women with endometriosis when compared with controls. Interestingly, endometrial surface were observed to be grossly affected in terms of average roughness and topology in women with endometriosis compared to controls.The findings suggest that aberrant expression of HOXA-10 and -11 genes adversely affects endometrial remodelling and expression of receptivity markers.Activin A, activin receptor type II, nodal, and cripto mRNA are expressed by eutopic and ectopic endometrium in women with ovarian endometriosis.Activin A is a dimeric protein that regulates endometrial functions by signaling at its receptors, namely type I (ActRI) and type II (ActRII). Nodal is an activin competitor that requires the coreceptor cripto to assemble its signaling pathway through ActRI and ActRII. In the current study, we evaluated the expression of activin A, ActRII, nodal, and cripto in eutopic and ectopic endometrium collected from women with ovarian endometrioma (n = 15) and in eutopic endometrium of healthy participants (n = 15). Eutopic endometrial samples were evaluated according to the stage of menstrual cycle. Total RNA was extracted from tissue homogenates and analyzed by real-time polymerase chain reaction (PCR). Activin A messenger RNA (mRNA) expression in eutopic endometrium of patients with endometriosis was significantly higher than in controls (P < .001) with a 10.2-fold and 7.3-fold increase in the proliferative and secretory phases, respectively. ActRII and nodal mRNA expression were found to be similar in patients with and without endometriosis, while cripto mRNA was markedly lower in eutopic (fold change = 0.03 at proliferative phase, P < .001) and ectopic endometrium (fold change = 0.14, P < .001) of women with endometriosis compared with eutopic endometrium from healthy controls. In conclusion, the altered endometrial expression of activin A and cripto during the menstrual cycle and the differences observed in the endometriotic tissue support the involvement of the activin system in endometrial changes of women with endometriosis.Neuroendocrine cells in eutopic endometrium of women with endometriosis.Endometriosis is a common gynaecological disease, but the pathogenesis of endometriosis and pathophysiological basis for endometriosis-associated painful symptoms are still uncertain. Little is known about neuroendocrine (NE) cells in the uterus.For this study, 38 premenopausal women with histologically diagnosed ovarian endometrioma or peritoneal endometriosis and 24 women without endometriosis were selected. Biopsy samples from eutopic endometrium were used for immunohistochemical staining to detect synaptophysin (SYN) and neuron-specific enolase (NSE) expression in women with and without endometriosis.There were substantially more NE cells of eutopic endometrium stained with SYN and NSE in women with endometriosis than in those without endometriosis (3.8 +/- 1.8 versus 0.5 +/- 0.7/mm2, P < 0.001, and 2.8 +/- 2.1 versus 0.4 +/- 0.6/mm2, respectively, P < 0.001). These cells were scattered in the epithelium of endometrial glands. At all stages of the menstrual cycle, the densities of NE cells stained with SYN and NSE were greater in women with endometriosis than in those without endometriosis (P < 0.05).These results suggest that NE cells in eutopic endometrium probably play some role in the pathogenesis or symptoms of endometriosis.Augmented cell survival in eutopic endometrium from women with endometriosis: expression of c-myc, TGF-beta1 and bax genes.Endometriosis is a common gynaecological disorder characterized by the presence of endometrial tissue outside of the uterus. The fragments in normal menstruation are composed of necrotic and living cells, which do not survive in ectopic locations because of programmed cell death. The aim of this study was to evaluate if the balance between cell proliferation and apoptosis is changed in eutopic endometrium from women with endometriosis throughout the menstrual cycle by studying bax (pro-apoptotic), c-myc (regulator of cell cycle) and TGF-beta1 (involved in cell differentiation) genes.Eutopic endometrium was obtained from: 30 women with endometriosis (32.8 +/- 5 years) and 34 fertile eumenorrheic women (36 +/- 5.3 years). We analyzed apoptosis (TUNEL: DNA fragmentation); cell proliferation (immunohistochemistry (IHC) for Ki67); c-myc, bax and TGF-beta1 mRNA abundance (RT-PCR) and TGF-beta1 protein (IHC) in endometrial explants.Cell proliferation strongly decreased from proliferative to late secretory phases in glands, but not in stroma, in both endometria. Positive staining in glands and stroma from proliferative endometrium with endometriosis was 1.9- and 2.2-fold higher than control endometrium, respectively (p < 0.05). Abundance of c-myc mRNA was 65% higher in proliferative endometrium from endometriosis than normal tissue (p < 0.05). TGF-beta1 (mRNA and protein) augmented during mid secretory phase in normal endometrium, effect not observed in endometrium with endometriosis. In normal endometrium, the percentage of apoptotic epithelial and stromal cells increased more than 30-fold during late secretory phase. In contrast, in endometrium from endometriosis, not only this increase was not observed, besides bax mRNA decreased 63% versus normal endometrium (p < 0.05). At once, in early secretory phase, apoptotic stromal cells increased 10-fold with a concomitant augment of bax mRNA abundance (42%) in endometria from endometriosis (p < 0.05).An altered expression of c-myc, TGF-beta1 and bax was observed in eutopic endometrium from endometriosis, suggesting its participation in the regulation of cell survival in this disease. The augmented cell viability in eutopic endometrium from these patients as a consequence of a reduction in cell death by apoptosis, and also an increase in cell proliferation indicates that this condition may facilitate the invasive feature of the endometrium.Vascular endothelial growth factor (VEGF) in endometriosis.Angiogenesis is likely to be involved in the pathogenesis of endometriosis. According to the transplantation theory, when the exfoliated endometrium is attached to the peritoneal layer, the establishment of a new blood supply is essential for the survival of the endometrial implant and development of endometriosis. From the known angiogenic factors, vascular endothelial growth factor (VEGF) has emerged as a pivotally important regulator of normal angiogenesis and pathological neovascularization. The VEGF protein was evaluated immunohistochemically in the eutopic endometrium of 10 women without endometriosis (group I) at laparoscopy and the eutopic endometrium and peritoneal endometriotic lesions of 43 women with endometriosis (group II). VEGF histological scores were 9.7 +/- 4.3 and 4.0 +/- 2.6 respectively in the epithelium and stroma of the eutopic endometrium of group I women, and 10.3 +/- 2.3 and 3.6 +/- 2.3 respectively in women of group II. In red lesions, the VEGF scores were 11.1 +/- 3.0 in the epithelium and 5.1 +/- 3.0 in the stroma, and in black lesions were 8.6 +/- 2.7 and 1.6 +/- 1.6, respectively. Significantly lower values were observed in black lesions as compared with eutopic endometrium and red lesions, the values of which were similar. Scores were also evaluated according to the phase of the cycle. In eutopic as well as ectopic endometrium, no significant cyclic variations were observed throughout the cycle. However, VEGF content was found to be higher in the eutopic glandular epithelium of women with endometriosis during the late secretory phase, possibly suggesting a more likely tendency to implant. In contrast, significantly higher VEGF content was noted in red lesions as compared with black lesions. During all phases of the cycle, the VEGF content in stromal cells of red lesions was higher than in black lesions. Similarities in VEGF content were observed in the glandular epithelium of the eutopic endometrium of women with endometriosis and red lesions, suggesting that endometriosis probably arises from the peritoneal seeding of viable endometrial cells during retrograde menstruation and that red lesions can be considered as the first stage of implantation. After the attachment phase, the high VEGF levels could provoke an increase in the subperitoneal vascular network and facilitate implantation and viability in the retroperitoneal space. Lower VEGF levels in black lesions explain the decrease in both stromal vascularization, followed by fibrosis and inactivation of the implant.[Expressions of matrix metalloproteinase-9 and tissue inhibitor of metalloproteinase-1 mRNA in endometriosis].To investigate mRNA expression of matrix metalloproteinase (MMP-9) and tissue inhibitor of metalloproteinase (TIMP-1) in ectopic endometriosis tissue and uterine endometrium from women with and without endometriosis.Thirty-eight women with endometriosis (Revised American Fertility Society classification, RAFSI-IV) were selected as study group. Thirty-eight specimens of ovarian endometrioma (ovarian chocolate cysts, OCC), 16 red peritoneal endometriotic lesions (RPL), and 35 matched eutopic endometrium (Eu) were collected from them simultaneously at the time of surgery. Twenty specimens of endometrium from reproductive women undergoing laparoscopic surgery without endometriosis were obtained as control group. The mRNA expressions of MMP-9 and TIMP-1 were detected by reverse transcription polymerase chain reaction (RT-PCR).Expression of TIMP-1 mRNA was detected in all samples. The level from endometriosis patients and control group was similar (2.31 +/- 1.21, 2.40 +/- 0.89). However, ectopic endometrium expressed significantly fewer TIMP-1 mRNA (OCC 1.67 +/- 0.79, RPL 1.45 +/- 0.68) compared with eutopic endometrium from both endometriosis and endometriosis-free patients (P < 0.05). The positive expression rate of MMP-9 mRNA was not distinctively different among all samples. The density of MMP-9 mRNA expression in endometrium (0.49 +/- 0.28) from endometriosis patients was similar to that in ectopic endometriosis (OCC 0.46 +/- 0.22, RPL 0.33 +/- 0.12), but was significantly higher compared with endometrium (0.29 +/- 0.12) without endometriosis (P < 0.05).An increase of MMP-9 mRNA expression of eutopic endometrium with endometriosis might enhance the endometrial implantation ability, thus facilitate the ectopic implantation of endometrium. Ectopic lesions express significantly less TIMP-1 mRNA, indicating they have increased invasive ability, which might facilitate the development of endometriosis.Mild endometriosis and luteal function.The luteal function of 27 patients with mild endometriosis and infertility was compared with that of 50 infertile patients without endometriosis. The incidence of endometrial luteal phase deficiency was similar in both groups of patients. Luteal phase length and plasma levels of progesterone (P), estradiol (E2) and prolactin (PRL) in infertile patients (both groups) were similar to those in a group of 10 fertile women. We conclude that luteal phase defects should not be considered as a primary cause of infertility in mild endometriosis.Indoleamine 2,3-dioxygenase-1 (IDO1) enhances survival and invasiveness of endometrial stromal cells via the activation of JNK signaling pathway.Evidence for an immunosuppressive function of indoleamine 2,3-dioxygenase (IDO) has been accumulating. However, the unusual distribution of IDO1 in gynecologic cancer cells suggests that modulating immunity may not its only function. To clarify the physiological importance of IDO1 in endometriosis, a tumor-like benign disease, we have investigated the potential mechanism by which IDO1 modulated endometrial stromal cells (ESCs) proliferation and invasion. ESCs were obtained from 16 control women (normal) and 14 patients with ovarian endometrioma, then the normal ESCs were treated with plasmid pEGFP-N1-IDO1 or SD11-IDO1 short hairpin RNA (shRNA) alone, or in combination with c-Jun N-terminal kinase (JNK) inhibitor (SP600125), and subjected to cell viability, proliferation, apoptosis assay and Matrigel invasion assay. IDO1 mRNA expression was evaluated by quantitative real-time reverse transcription-polymerase chain reaction (real-time PCR), and protein levels of IDO1, survivin, protein 53 (p53), matrix metalloproteinase (MMP)-2, MMP-9, tissue-inhibitor of metalloproteinase-1 (TIMP-1) and cyclooxygenase-2 (COX-2) in IDO1-overexpressing and IDO1-deficiency ESCs were analyzed by in-cell Western. We found that IDO1 expression was higher in endometriosis-derived eutopic and ectopic ESCs, compared with endometriosis-free normal ESCs. As a result, IDO1-overexpression in ESCs was markedly linked to reduction of apoptosis and p53 expression, and upregulation of survival, proliferation, invasion, as well as expression of MMP-9, COX-2 expression, rather than expression of survivin, MMP-2 and TIMP-1. Reversely, JNK blockage could abrogate these alterations of ESCs in IDO1-overexpressing milieu, suggesting that JNK signaling pathway was indispensable for ESCs survival, proliferation and invasion enhanced by IDO1, which may contribute to the pathophysiology of endometriosis.Unique transcriptome, pathways, and networks in the human endometrial fibroblast response to progesterone in endometriosis.Eutopic endometrium in endometriosis has molecular evidence of resistance to progesterone (P(4)) and activation of the PKA pathway in the stromal compartment. To investigate global and temporal responses of eutopic endometrium to P(4), we compared early (6-h), intermediate (48-h), and late (14-Day) transcriptomes, signaling pathways, and networks of human endometrial stromal fibroblasts (hESF) from women with endometriosis (hESF(endo)) with hESF from women without endometriosis (hESF(nonendo)). Endometrial biopsy samples were obtained from subjects with and without mild peritoneal endometriosis (n = 4 per group), and hESF were isolated and treated with P(4) (1 μM) plus estradiol (E(2)) (10 nM), E(2) alone (10 nM), or vehicle for up to 14 days. Total RNA was subjected to microarray analysis using a Gene 1.0 ST (Affymetrix) platform and analyzed by using bioinformatic algorithms, and data were validated by quantitative real-time PCR and ELISA. Results revealed unique kinetic expression of specific genes and unique pathways, distinct biological and molecular processes, and signaling pathways and networks during the early, intermediate, and late responses to P(4) in both hESF(nonendo) and hESF(endo), although a blunted response to P(4) was observed in the latter. The normal response of hESF to P(4) involves a tightly regulated kinetic cascade involving key components in the P(4) receptor and MAPK signaling pathways that results in inhibition of E(2)-mediated proliferation and eventual differentiation to the decidual phenotype, but this was not established in the hESF(endo) early response to P(4). The abnormal response of this cell type to P(4) may contribute to compromised embryonic implantation and infertility in women with endometriosis.Plasminogen activators in ectopic and uterine endometrium.To investigate the expression of the plasminogen activator (PA)-plasmin system components in ectopic endometrium and in uterine endometrium from women with and without endometriosis.Plasminogen, PAs (urokinase and tissue plasminogen activator), and PA inhibitors (1 and 2) were detected by immunohistochemistry using a alkaline phosphatase staining method.No differences in staining were found between uterine endometrium of women with endometriosis and women without endometriosis with any of the antibodies used. However, we did find differences between uterine and ectopic endometrium. Although the expression of the components of the PA-plasmin system reflected the cyclic changes in the hormonal levels in uterine endometrium, ectopic endometrium maintained a very high level of plasminogen and urokinase in every sample. We were unable to detect the presence of PA inhibitors in either uterine or ectopic endometrium.There is no evidence that uterine endometrium from women with endometriosis is originally more able to implant than that of women without the disease because of an increase in their PA expression. The high levels of urokinase and plasminogen in ectopic endometrium may reflect a more invasive nature of the endometriotic implants in the peritoneal cavity.Immunoexpression of hepatocyte growth factor and c-Met receptor in the eutopic endometrium predicts the activity of ectopic endometrium.To investigate the mitogenic and angiogenic activity of the eutopic and ectopic endometrium throughout the menstrual cycle and to examine whether the activity of the eutopic endometrium is useful to predict greater activity of the ectopic endometrium.Controlled clinicopathologic study using intact tissue.Nagasaki University School of Medicine, Nagasaki, Japan.Fifteen infertile women with pelvic endometriosis and 10 women without endometriosis undergoing laparoscopy.Biopsies from the ectopic endometrium and the corresponding eutopic endometrium were collected. Immunohistochemical staining was performed using respective antibodies, and a computer analyzed modified quantitative-histogram (Q-H) score was used to quantify immunostaining.The immunoreactions of hepatocyte growth factor (HGF), its receptor, c-Met, vascular endothelial growth factor (VEGF), proliferating cell nuclear antigen (PCNA), and von Willebrand factor (VWF) in eutopic and ectopic endometrium were examined, and their relation with different revised American Society for Reproductive Medicine (r-ASRM) stages and the morphology of endometriosis was evaluated.The immunoexpressions of HGF and c-Met were significantly higher in the eutopic endometrium of patients with endometriosis than in that of controls. The Q-H scores of HGF, c-Met, VEGF, PCNA, and microvessel density (MVD) were markedly higher in red peritoneal lesions when compared with other lesions. The Q-H scores did not reveal r-ASRM stage-dependent variation in any of these markers. We observed a significant correlation between the immunoexpressions of HGF, c-Met, and PCNA or microvessel counts. When we combined the Q-H scores of the glandular epithelium and stroma, we found that increased activity of the eutopic endometrium as measured by the immunoreaction of HGF, c-Met, VEGF, PCNA, and MVD was similar to highly active red lesions and was significantly higher than that of controls and other lesions.Immunoexpression of HGF and c-Met in the eutopic endometrium of patients with pelvic endometrioisis is possibly useful to predict greater activity of the ectopic endometrium.Evaluation of endometrial biomarkers for semi-invasive diagnosis of endometriosis.To test the hypothesis that specific proteins and peptides are expressed differentially in eutopic endometrium of women with and without endometriosis and at specific stages of the disease (minimal, mild, moderate, or severe) during the secretory phase.Patients with endometriosis were compared with controls.University hospital.A total of 29 patients during the secretory phase were selected for this study on the basis of cycle phase and presence or absence of endometriosis.Endometriosis was confirmed laparoscopically and histologically in 19 patients with endometriosis of revised American Society for Reproductive Medicine stages (9 minimal-mild and 10 moderate-severe), and the presence of a normal pelvis was documented by laparoscopy in 10 controls.Protein expression of endometrium was evaluated with use of surface-enhanced laser desorption/ionization time-of-flight mass spectrometry. The differential expression of protein mass peaks was analyzed with use of support vector machine algorithms and logistic regression models.Data preprocessing resulted in differential expression of 73, 30, and 131 mass peaks between controls and patients with endometriosis (all stages), with minimal-mild endometriosis, and with moderate-severe endometriosis, respectively. Endometriosis was diagnosed with high sensitivity (89.5%) and specificity (90%) with use of five down-regulated mass peaks (1.949 kDa, 5.183 kDa, 8.650 kDa, 8.659 kDa, and 13.910 kDa) obtained after support vector machine ranking and logistic regression classification. With use of a similar analysis, minimal-mild endometriosis was diagnosed with four mass peaks (two up-regulated: 35.956 kDa and 90.675 kDa and two down-regulated: 1.924 kDa and 2.504 kDa) with maximal sensitivity (100%) and specificity (100%). The 90.675-kDa and 35.956-kDa mass peaks were identified as T-plastin and annexin V, respectively.Surface-enhanced laser desorption/ionization time-of-flight mass spectrometry analysis of secretory phase endometrium combined with bioinformatics puts forward a prospective panel of potential biomarkers with sensitivity of 100% and specificity of 100% for the diagnosis of minimal to mild endometriosis.The roles of thioredoxin and thioredoxin-binding protein-2 in endometriosis.Oxidative stress is considered to be involved in the establishment and development of endometriosis. Thioredoxin (TRX) is an endogenous redox regulator that protects cells against oxidative stress, and TRX-binding protein-2 (TBP-2) is a negative regulator of TRX in the biological function and expression. The aim of this study was to investigate the roles of TRX and TBP-2 in the pathophysiology of endometriosis.A total of 35 patients with histologically confirmed endometriosis and 31 patients without endometriosis participated in this study. Real-time polymerase chain reaction was used to quantify TRX and TBP-2 mRNA levels, and immunohistochemistry (IHC) was used to assess TRX and TBP-2 protein localization in the endometrium. Serum and peritoneal fluid levels of TRX and TBP-2 were measured using a specific commercial ELISA.There were no significant differences in TRX mRNA levels in the endometrium of patients with endometriosis and the control groups. However, TBP-2 mRNA levels in the endometrium were lower, and the TRX to TBP-2 ratio was higher in patients with endometriosis than in the control group. In particular, the TRX to TBP-2 ratio was significantly higher during late secretory and menstrual phase in patients with endometriosis compared with the control group. IHC studies also showed the decreased TBP-2 immunoreactivity in patients with endometriosis compared with the control group. There was no correlation between TRX and TBP-2 mRNA levels in patients with endometriosis, whereas TRX mRNA levels were positively correlated with TBP-2 mRNA levels in the control group. There were no significant differences between the two groups in TRX and TBP-2 levels in serum or peritoneal fluid.Aberrant expression of TRX and TBP-2 in the endometrium may be associated with the establishment of endometriosis.Bone marrow-derived cell populations in uterine and ectopic endometrium.Uterine endometrium contains numerous bone marrow-derived cells. The spectrum of cell types is different from that of any other tissue, and the differences in endometrium from women with endometriosis may reflect a different endometrial phenotype in these women. The cell types of bone marrow origin found in ectopic endometrium may indicate the degree of differentiation of the tissue. It was found that, in normal endometrium, the CD45+ cell population comprised T cells, macrophages, CD56+ large granular lymphocytes, some CD16+ cells and a few B cells. Changes in these cell populations during the menstrual cycle were similar in endometrium from both controls and patients with endometriosis, and resembled that reported previously by others. In ectopic endometrium, the frequency of CD45+ cells remained within the same range as that of uterine endometrium but without any obvious pattern of change during the menstrual cycle. CD56+ large granular lymphocytes, an immune cell type characteristic of uterine endometrium, were also found in ectopic endometrium. Our results indicate that ectopic endometrium, as well as comprising both glandular and stromal cells, contains bone marrow-derived cell populations similar to those of uterine endometrium. This suggests that the same processes of cell migration and/or differentiation occur in ectopic and uterine endometrium.MiR-199a attenuates endometrial stromal cell invasiveness through suppression of the IKKβ/NF-κB pathway and reduced interleukin-8 expression.MicroRNAs have recently been identified as regulators that modulate target gene expression and are suggested to be involved in the development and progression of endometriosis. This study was undertaken to analyze the expression level of microRNA-199a (miR-199a) in paired ovarian endometrioma and eutopic endometrium from women with endometriosis, and to investigate the contribution of miR-199a to the invasive capability of endometrial stromal cells (ESCs). Cell adhesion, migration and Matrigel invasion assays were carried out to measure the invasiveness of ESCs. Bioinformatics prediction, reporter gene assay, PCR, western blotting and ELISA were performed to identify miR-199a targets and related signaling pathways. The results showed that the expression level of miR-199a was lower in the eutopic endometrium from women with endometriosis, and even lower in the paired ovarian endometrioma, compared with the expression in normal controls. Moreover, ectopic expression of miR-199a attenuated ESC adhesion, migration and invasiveness. MiR-199a targeted and inhibited IkappaB kinase beta (IKKβ) in ESCs. Accompanied by IKKβ reduction, miR-199a suppressed nuclear factor-kappa B (NF-κB) pathway activation and interleukin-8 (IL-8) production in ESCs. All these findings suggest that miR-199a, down-regulated in endometriosis, attenuates the invasive capability of ESCs in vitro partly through IKK/NF-κB pathway suppression and reduced IL-8 expression. In conclusion, miR-199a could be involved in the pathogenesis of endometriosis.Hexane extract of aged black garlic reduces cell proliferation and attenuates the expression of ICAM-1 and VCAM‑1 in TNF-α-activated human endometrial stromal cells.Increasing evidence indicates the potentially crucial roles of intercellular adhesion molecule-1 (ICAM-1) and vascular cell adhesion molecule-1 (VCAM-1) in the pathological process underlying endometriosis. The present study aimed to investigate the effects of a hexane extract of aged black garlic (HEABG) on the proliferation and expression of ICAM-1 and VCAM-1 in tumor necrosis factor-α (TNF-α)-activated human endometrial stromal cells (HESCs) isolated from patients with endometriosis. HESCs were isolated from endometriotic tissues obtained from women with advanced endometriosis who underwent laparoscopic surgery for ovarian endometrioma (n=18). Cell proliferation and cell cycle analysis were assessed by WST-1 assay and flow cytometry, respectively. The expression of ICAM-1 and VCAM-1 was measured by flow cytometry, immunofluorescence staining, immunoblotting and quantitative reverse transcriptase-PCR. The secretion of interleukin-6 (IL-6) was determined by enzyme-linked immunosorbent assay (ELISA). The activation of nuclear factor-κB (NF-κB) and activator protein-1 (AP-1) was detected by electrophoretic mobility shift assay (EMSA) and the activation of c-Jun N-terminal kinase (JNK), extracellular signal-regulated kinase (ERK) and p38 MAPK was analyzed by immunoblotting. Cell proliferation and cell cycle progression were significantly suppressed by HEABG in the TNF-α-induced HESCs through the inhibition of the ERK and JNK signaling pathways. Remarkably, the treatment of the HESCs with HEABG potently suppressed the TNF-α-induced ICAM-1 and VCAM-1 transcript and protein expression by inhibiting the activation of NF-κB and AP-1 transcription factors. Our results suggest that HEABG may be effective in the prevention and treatment of endometriosis in humans.[Expression of hepatocyte growth factor and its receptor c-met gene in the endometrium of women with endometriosis].To study the role of hepatocyte growth factor (HGF) and its receptor (c-Met) in the pathogenesis of endometriosis.In situ hybridization and immunohistochemistry method was used to examine HGF mRNA and protein expression in eutopic and ectopic endometrium obtained from 54 women in reproductive age with endometriosis confirmed by laparoscopy and histological examination (including 28 cases of stages I/II and 26 of stages III/IV) and from the endometrium of 24 healthy fertile women.In patients with endometriosis, the positivity rate of HGF/c-Met expression was similar in the eutopic and ectopic endometria, but the number of positive cells and expression intensity were much higher in ectopic endometrium. The positive expression rate varied little between the proliferative and secretory stages of the endometrium. Compare with the healthy controls, patients with endometriosis of stages I/II and III/IV had significantly elevated positivity rate of HGF and c-Met expressions in either eutopic and ectopic endometrium, but without significant difference between the two patient groups (P<0.01). The rate of strong c-Met protein expression was significantly higher in III/IV endometriosis than in the controls, without statistical difference between other groups.The expressions of HGF and c-met gene are correlated with the pathogenesis of endometriosis, which is preceded by eventful changes in the biological behavior of the eutopic endometrium.Molecular evaluation of proliferative-phase endometrium may provide insight about the underlying causes of infertility in women with endometriosis.To determine if endometrial gene expression is different in women with endometriosis-related infertility and fertile women.Prospective study of mid-follicular phase endometrium in 47 subjects in two phases: microarray study of 10 infertile women with endometriosis and five fertile controls, and a quantitative real-time PCR (qRT-PCR) study of 27 infertile women with endometriosis and 15 fertile controls. Gene expression was determined by DNA microarray, and qRT-PCR used for 12 "promising" genes based on the microarray analysis.Compared to fertile controls, women with stage I-II endometriosis had 23, and women with stage III-IV had 35 genes that were significantly up- or down-regulated by microarray. However, using qRT-PCR, only chemokine ligand (CXCL) 13 was significantly down-regulated and somatostatin was significantly up-regulated with early endometriosis, and only CXCL 14 was significantly down-regulated with advanced endometriosis compared to fertile controls.Our findings indicate that the pattern of gene expression in proliferative-phase endometrium is different when comparing tissue from patients with endometriosis versus fertile controls. Recognition of these endometrial alterations could be helpful to diagnose and stage endometriosis, and may provide insight to explain why conception rates are low in women with endometriosis.c-fos gene and protein expression in pelvic endometriosis: a local marker of estrogen action.Endometriosis is an estrogen-dependent disease, causing pelvic pain and infertility. c-fos is an early transcription factor that has been reported to be related to estradiol-dependent cell proliferation. The aim of the present study was to assess the c-fos gene and protein expression in pelvic endometriotic implants in comparison to normal endometrium from infertile women. An open, prospective and controlled study included 15 infertile women with endometriosis and 19 control infertile women. Endometrial and endometriotic biopsies were performed at the follicular phase and the samples were processed for RT-PCR and immunohistochemistry. ERalpha mRNA levels were similar in the endometriotic implants/eutopic endometrium from women with endometriosis and in normal tissue (P = 0.649). The aromatase gene, however, was not expressed in the eutopic endometrium from either control or endometriosis groups, and was only expressed in 50% of endometriotic implants (P = 0.044). c-fos gene expression was higher in endometriotic implants (1.32 +/- 0.13; P = 0.011) than in eutopic endometrium from patients with endometriosis (0.97 +/- 0.11) or from the control group (0.91 +/- 0.05). In addition, immunohistochemistry showed a more abundant distribution of c-Fos in the stroma of endometriotic tissue compared to eutopic endometrium. These data suggest that c-fos may play a role in the molecular mechanisms of estrogen action on the induction, promotion or progression of endometriosis.Immunohistochemical characterization of stromal leukocytes in ovarian endometriosis: comparison of eutopic and ectopic endometrium with normal endometrium.To compare stromal leukocyte subpopulations in different phases of the menstrual cycle in eutopic and ectopic endometrium from women with ovarian endometriosis and in control endometrium.Retrospective immunohistochemical study.Department of Pathology, Royal Victoria Infirmary, Newcastle-upon-Tyne, United Kingdom.Paraffin-embedded tissue blocks from 30 patients with endometriosis and 30 control blocks from patients undergoing hysterectomy for nonendometrial pathology were retrieved from archive files.Quantitative assessment of defined stromal leukocyte subpopulations in eutopic, ectopic and control endometrium at different stages of the menstrual cycle.In the proliferative and early secretory phases, ectopic endometrium contained elevated numbers of CD45+, CD3+, and CD43+ cells but reduced percentages of CD68+ macrophages. The proportions of granulated cells were reduced in ectopic endometrium throughout the cycle. No differences were noted between eutopic endometrium from women with endometriosis and control endometrium.Differences between eutopic and ectopic leukocyte subpopulations with the exception of large granular lymphocytes may be due to the lack of cyclicity demonstrated by endometriotic lesions.Pleiotrophin (PTN) and midkine (MK) mRNA expression in eutopic and ectopic endometrium in advanced stage endometriosis.Endometriosis is characterized by the ectopic implantation of endometrium on peritoneal surfaces. Angiogenic and growth factors may play a significant role in the pathogenesis of endometriosis. Midkine (MK) and pleiotrophin (PTN) are two related peptides associated with carcinogenesis and angiogenesis. To test the hypothesis that a higher expression of MK and PTN in ectopic and eutopic endometrium from women with endometriosis might favour increased angiogenesis and growth with subsequent ectopic implantation, we investigated PTN and MK expression by quantitative competitive PCR (QC-PCR) in endometrium from 30 women with severe, stages III and IV endometriosis and from 30 women without endometriosis. Total RNA was extracted and reverse transcribed into cDNA, and QC-PCR was performed to evaluate PTN and MK mRNA expression. Results were analysed by analysis of variance. Eutopic endometrium from endometriosis patients showed increased expression of MK and PTN mRNA compared with endometrium from normal women in the luteal phase (P < 0.05). MK and PTN mRNA expression in ectopic endometrium was significantly lower than that in eutopic endometrium from women with and without endometriosis (P < 0.05). Our results suggest increased MK and PTN expression may be related to the initiation of ectopic endometrial implants and peritoneal invasion.Prokineticin 1 mRNA expression in the endometrium of healthy women and in the eutopic endometrium of women with endometriosis.To examine prokineticin 1 (PROK1) mRNA expression in eutopic endometrial glands obtained from patients with or without endometriosis, to investigate the presence of additional endometrial abnormalities in women with endometriosis.Prospective laboratory study.University hospital.Twelve control women and 12 patients affected by endometriosis in the secretory phase of the menstrual cycle.Endometrial specimens were obtained from women affected (cases) or not (control group) by endometriosis. Endometrial glands were freshly isolated from endometrial biopsies.PROK1 mRNA expression levels by real-time polymerase chain reaction analysis.PROK1 mRNA was detectable in 4 of 12 (33%) samples obtained from women affected by endometriosis, whereas 10 of 12 (83%) samples obtained from normal women were positive for PROK1 detection by real-time polymerase chain reaction. Moreover, detectable PROK1 mRNA levels were 10 times lower in samples obtained from women with endometriosis than in samples obtained from control women.PROK1 is a newly discovered angiogenic factor implicated in the vascular function of peri-implantation endometrium and early pregnancy. An altered expression of PROK1 could be one of the several biochemical abnormalities characterizing eutopic endometrium in endometriosis.Differentially expressed genes in eutopic and ectopic endometrium of women with endometriosis.To elucidate the potential mechanisms involved in the physiopathology of endometriosis. We analyzed the differential gene expression profiles of eutopic and ectopic tissues from women with endometriosis.Prospective laboratory study.University hospital.Seventeen patients in whom endometriosis was diagnosed and 11 healthy fertile women.Endometrial biopsy specimens from the endometrium of healthy women without endometriosis and from the eutopic and ectopic endometrium tissues of patients with endometriosis were obtained in the early proliferative phase of the menstrual cycle.Six paired samples of eutopic and ectopic tissue were analyzed by subtractive hybridization. To evaluate the expression of genes found by rapid subtraction hybridization methods, we measured CTGF, SPARC, MYC, MMP, and IGFBP1 genes by real-time polymerase chain reaction in all samples.This study identified 291 deregulated genes in the endometriotic lesions. Significant expression differences were obtained for SPARC, MYC, and IGFBP1 in the peritoneal lesions and for MMP3 in the ovarian endometriomas. Additionally, significant differences were obtained for SPARC and IGFBP1 between the peritoneal and ovarian lesions. No significant differences were found for the studied genes between the control and the eutopic endometrium.This study identified 291 genes with differential expression in endometriotic lesions. The deregulation of the SPARC, MYC, MMP3, and IGFBPI genes may be responsible for the loss of cellular homeostasis in endometriotic lesions.Reduced expression of HOXA10 in the midluteal endometrium from infertile women with minimal endometriosis.Recent human and animal studies have suggested that reduced HOXA10 expression in the implantation window of eutopic endometrium may contribute to infertility in women with endometriosis. Therefore, we examined the HOXA10 transcript, protein and HOXA10 promoter methylation levels in midluteal eutopic endometrium from 17 infertile women with minimal endometriosis and 15 healthy fertile women from a Polish cohort. Real-time quantitative PCR (RQ-PCR) and western blotting analysis revealed significantly lower levels of HOXA10 transcript (P=0.019) and protein (P=0.048) levels in eutopic endometrium from infertile women with endometriosis as compared to healthy fertile women. Moreover, sodium bisulfite sequencing of three HOXA10 CpG islands showed significantly higher methylation levels of genomic DNA from midluteal eutopic endometrium from infertile women with endometriosis as compared to healthy fertile women (P=0.006). We confirmed that DNA hypermethylation can be one of the potential molecular mechanisms silencing HOXA10 expression in the midluteal endometrium associated with infertility in women with endometriosis.Evidence for an increased release of proteolytic activity by the eutopic endometrial tissue in women with endometriosis and for involvement of matrix metalloproteinase-9.For the implantation of endometrium in ectopic locations, remodelling of the extracellular matrix (ECM) is necessary. Many studies have shown an increased expression of various proteases in the ectopic endometrium of women with endometriosis. Few, however, have addressed possible changes in protease expression in the eutopic endometrium.Herein, we reveal an increased release of proteolytic activity by the eutopic endometrium of women with endometriosis compared with normal women (P < 0.01). Using zymography and western blotting, we identified matrix metalloproteinase (MMP)-2 and MMP-9 in the culture medium, and further found that MMP-9 secretion, as assessed by zymography and enzyme-linked immunosorbent assay (ELISA), was elevated in women with endometriosis compared with normal women (P < 0.05). No statistically significant difference in MMP-2 secretion between women with and without endometriosis was noted. However, a significant difference in the levels of the tissue inhibitor of metalloproteinases (TIMP)-1, a known MMP-9 inhibitor, was found (P < 0.05).The endometriosis-associated increase in proteolysis and imbalance between the secretion of MMP-9 and that of its natural inhibitor, TIMP-1, revealed in the culture medium of endometrial tissue may reflect in vivo the enhanced capacity of this tissue to break down the ECM in host tissues, thereby favouring its ectopic implantation and development.Tumor-associated glycoprotein (TAG-72) in endometriotic implants.Tumor-associated glycoprotein (TAG-72) is an antigen detected by the monoclonal antibody B72.3 that is expressed by a wide variety of human malignancies and in normal secretory endometrium. Serum TAG-72 may be elevated in women with endometriosis, but the distribution of TAG-72 in this disorder has not been well studied. Accordingly, TAG-72 was assayed by immunohistochemical staining in 26 endometriotic implants collected at various times of the menstrual cycle and compared to that in 56 samples of normal endometrium, in 8 cases from the same patient. TAG-72 expression was markedly discordant between normal and ectopic endometrium. Unlike proliferative phase endometrial samples, which were uniformly negative, endometriotic implants were TAG-72 positive in 50% of the cases. Like normal endometrium, all except very early secretory phase endometriosis was positive. Based on our current understanding of TAG-72 expression, this unique estrogen-repressed glycoprotein may be a useful probe to study the basis for phenotypic alterations noted in endometriosis, some of which probably contribute to the infertility associated with this disease. Moreover, the presence of B72.3 in nonmalignant tissues puts in question it usefulness in screening for malignancies.Eutopic endometrium and peritoneal, ovarian and bowel endometriotic tissues express a different profile of matrix metalloproteinases-2, -3 and -11, and of tissue inhibitor metalloproteinases-1 and -2.Endometriosis is subsequent to the ability of endometrial glands to invade normal tissues. Matrix metalloproteinases (MMPs)--enzymes that mediate normal tissue turnover, including endometrial breakdown during menstruation-appear to be involved in this invasive process. Here, we examined the immunohistochemical expression of MMP-2, MMP-3, MMP-11, tissue inhibitor metalloproteinase (TIMP)-1 and TIMP-2 in endometrium from women with (n=9) or without endometriosis (n=18) in comparison with peritoneal (n=20), ovarian (n=20) and colorectal endometriosis (n=20). Women with endometriosis showed decreased endometrial MMP-2 expression compared with women without endometriosis (mean+/-SD positive cells: 24.3+/-28.3% and 69.3+/-12.1%), together with loss of MMP-3 expression (0 versus 17.5%+/-20.2). MMP-11, TIMP-1 and TIMP-2 expression was similar in the two groups. Endometrial MMP-2, -3 and -11 expression and TIMP-1 and -2 expression were similar in women with endometriosis and in those with peritoneal endometriosis. MMP-2, -3 and -11 expression was higher in colorectal endometriosis than in ovarian and peritoneal endometriosis. TIMP-2 expression was lower in colorectal endometriosis (P=0.0002) and ovarian endometriotic cysts (P=0.003) than in peritoneal endometriosis. TIMP-1 expression did not vary according to the location of endometriotic lesions. These results suggest that MMP-2 and -3 and TIMP-2 may be involved in the pathogenesis of endometriosis. Interestingly, MMP-2 and -3 overexpression was related to the infiltrative nature of endometriotic lesions, with possible sequential expression from peritoneal to colorectal endometriosis.Immunohistochemical characterization of proliferation, oestrogen receptor and progesterone receptor expression in endometriosis: comparison of eutopic and ectopic endometrium with normal cycling endometrium.Recent studies examining oestrogen and progesterone receptor status and the proliferative activity of endometriotic lesions have produced conflicting reports. This study aimed to clarify the receptor status and proliferative activity of eutopic and ectopic endometrium from women with endometriosis and endometrium from normal women. Progesterone and oestrogen receptor expression and proliferative activity were studied in eutopic and ectopic endometrium from 30 women with endometriosis and in endometrium from 30 normal cycling women using microwave-pretreated paraffin-embedded sections stained with an avidin-biotin peroxidase technique. Progesterone and oestrogen receptor expression in the control endometrium did not differ from that of eutopic endometrium from women with endometriosis. Oestrogen receptor expression in ectopic endometrium increased from the proliferative to the late secretory phase. Epithelial progesterone receptor expression decreased during the cycle. Oestrogen receptor expression in both epithelium and stroma of ectopic endometrium was significantly higher than in eutopic endometrium throughout the cycle. In contrast, stromal progesterone receptor expression tended to be reduced in ectopic endometrium compared with eutopic tissue. Epithelial progesterone receptor expression was increased in ectopic endometrium but only in the late secretory phase. Although proliferative activity in the epithelium of control and eutopic endometrium was reduced from the proliferative to the late secretory phase, stromal activity did not vary. The proliferative activity in ectopic endometrium remained low and constant throughout the cycle. In the proliferative and early secretory phases, the proliferative activity of eutopic endometrium was increased compared with ectopic endometrium, but in the late secretory phase, levels were comparable. These findings challenge previous reports which have suggested that oestrogen receptors are reduced in ectopic tissue. This may have clinical implications for the development of novel treatments for endometriosis.Cyclooxygenase-2 expression in deep endometriosis and matched eutopic endometrium.To identify any relationship between cyclooxygenase-2 expression and the intensity of severe, endometriosis-related dysmenorrhea.Prospective study.University hospital.Patients with deep endometriosis.During surgery, paired samples of tissue representing deep endometriosis and eutopic endometrium were obtained from 46 patients. Control endometrial tissue samples were obtained from 34 fertile women who underwent laparoscopic tubal ligation or reversal of tubal sterilization. Pain assessment for dysmenorrhea was done with a 10-point linear analogue scale.The percentage of surface immunostained for Cox-2 was determined by an immunohistochemical technique. Relationships between pain score for dysmenorrhea and Cox-2 expression were analyzed.Cox-2 expression was significantly higher in eutopic endometrial stromal cells from patients with deep endometriosis than in stroma from controls during the early, mid, and late secretory phases. In endometriosis patients, Cox-2 expression in eutopic endometrial stromal cells was significantly higher in women with more severe dysmenorrhea (pain score > or =7 vs. <7) during early and mid secretory phases.Elevated Cox-2 expression in stromal cells in eutopic endometrium from patients with deep endometriosis may play a role in severe, endometriosis-related dysmenorrhea.Augmented epithelial multidrug resistance-associated protein 4 expression in peritoneal endometriosis: regulation by lipoxin A(4).To compare the expression of the prostaglandin (PG) E(2) transporter multidrug resistance-associated protein 4 (MRP4) in eutopic and ectopic endometrial tissue from endometriosis patients with that of control subjects and to examine whether MRP4 is regulated by the antiinflammatory lipid lipoxin A(4) (LXA(4)) in endometriotic epithelial cells.Molecular analysis in human samples and a cell line.Two university hospitals and a private clinic.A total of 59 endometriosis patients and 32 age- and body mass index-matched control subjects undergoing laparoscopy or hysterectomy.Normal, eutopic, and ectopic endometrial biopsies as well as peritoneal fluid were obtained during surgery performed during the proliferative phase of the menstrual cycle. 12Z endometriotic epithelial cells were used for in vitro mechanistic studies.Tissue MRP4 mRNA levels were quantified by quantitative reverse-transcription polymerase chain reaction (qRT-PCR), and localization was analyzed with the use of immunohistochemistry. Cellular MRP4 mRNA and protein were quantified by qRT-PCR and Western blot, respectively. PGE(2) was measured in peritoneal fluid and cell supernatants using an enzyme immunoassay (EIA).MRP4 was expressed in eutopic and ectopic endometrium, where it was overexpressed in peritoneal lesions and localized in the cytoplasm of glandular epithelial cells. LXA(4) attenuated MRP4 mRNA and protein levels in endometriotic epithelial cells in a dose-dependent manner, while not affecting the expression of enzymes involved in PGE(2) metabolism. Investigations employing receptor antagonists and small interfering RNA revealed that this occurred through estrogen receptor α. Accordingly, LXA(4) treatment inhibited extracellular PGE(2) release.We report for the first time that MRP4 is expressed in human endometrium, elevated in peritoneal endometriosis, and modulated by LXA(4) in endometriotic epithelial cells.Sustained replication in endometrium of women with endometriosis occurs without evoking a DNA damage response.To test our hypothesis that eutopic secretory phase endometrium from women with endometriosis is similar to proliferative phase endometrium from fertile women without endometriosis, we explored the expression of regulators of cell fate across the menstrual cycle.Endometrial biopsies were taken from 73 women, comprising 38 women with surgically diagnosed active peritoneal endometriosis (Group 1) and 35 fertile women without endometriosis (Group 2). Nucleolin, proliferating cell nuclear antigen (PCNA), telomerase and histone gamma-H2AX expression was evaluated by immunohistochemistry and mean telomere length (TL) by quantitative PCR.We have immunolocalized nucleolin and gamma-H2AX in the benign premenopausal endometrium for the first time. All markers were present in the proliferative phase endometrium of all women. In Group 2, during the secretory phase, proliferative markers declined with a paradoxical increase in stromal gamma-H2AX. Women in Group 1, however, showed a persistent immunoreactivity for the proliferative markers, while the staining for gamma-H2AX decreased in secretory endometrium (P < 0.05). This difference between groups was significant in both stroma and glands for nucleolin (P < 0.0001), PCNA (P < 0.01) and gamma-H2AX (P < 0.05) in the secretory phase. We showed a positive correlation between mean TL and nucleolin expression (glandular r = 0.37, P = 0.002; stromal r = 0.4, P = 0.001), telomerase immunoreactivity (glandular r = 0.33, P = 0.009; stromal r = 0.4, P = 0.001) and glandular PCNA (r = 0.35, P = 0.004), whereas a negative correlation was seen between mean TL and gamma-H2AX (r = -0.28, P = 0.04).These findings demonstrate that the state of replication seen in secretory phase endometrium from women with active peritoneal endometriosis is not a simple extension of the proliferative phase.Global gene analysis of late secretory phase, eutopic endometrium does not provide the basis for a minimally invasive test of endometriosis.Endometriosis occurs in 10% of women and is currently diagnosed by invasive laparoscopic testing. We tested the hypothesis that endometrial gene expression in late secretory phase endometrium differs between patients with and without endometriosis.Ten patients with laparoscopically proven endometriosis (minimal/mild n = 5 and moderate/severe n = 5) and six controls, underwent endometrial biopsy in the late secretory phase (Day 23 onwards). Microarray interrogation of eutopic endometrial gene expression was performed.Microarray data were obtained for all control samples and eight samples from the endometriosis patients (n = 4 minimal/mild, n = 4 moderate/severe disease). Eight genes were identified as up-regulated and one gene was down-regulated in all endometriotic samples (more than 1.75-fold, P < 0.01). Real-time PCR analysis of protocadherin-17 (PCDH17), protein tyrosine phosphatase, receptor type, R (PTPRR) and interleukin-6 signal transducer (IL6ST) expression validated the microarray findings.Expression of very few transcripts differs, in late secretory eutopic endometrium, between controls and patients with endometriosis. The median fold changes of these genes are small. No transcripts were identified that could discriminate between minimal/mild and moderate/severe endometriosis. Therefore, interrogation of the late secretory endometrial transcriptome is not likely to form the basis of a minimally invasive diagnostic test for endometriosis.Estrogen and progesterone receptor expression in macrophages and regulation of hepatocyte growth factor by ovarian steroids in women with endometriosis.Information regarding macrophage-mediated regulation of hepatocyte growth factor (HGF) by ovarian steroid hormones in women with endometriosis is limited. Therefore, we investigated the regulation of HGF by steroid hormones in isolated macrophages and stromal cells derived from women with or without endometriosis.We isolated CD68 immunoreactive adherent macrophages in vitro from 46 women with endometriosis and 30 women without endometriosis. Estrogen receptor (ER) and progesterone receptor (PR) expression in macrophages was demonstrated by immunohistochemistry and RT-PCR. Production of HGF in the culture media of basal and ovarian steroid-stimulated macrophages was examined by enzyme-linked immunosorbent assay. Expression of mRNA for HGF and its receptor, c-Met in macrophages and stromal cells in response to ovarian steroid was investigated by RT-PCR. The single and combined effect of HGF and estrogen on the growth of macrophages and stromal cells was analysed by bromodeoxyuridine (BrdU) incorporation.ER and PR were expressed in isolated macrophages and intact tissue at the protein and mRNA levels. Macrophages derived from women with endometriosis produced significantly higher concentration of HGF (352.2 +/- 4.9 pg/ml) in conditioned media after treatment with estradiol (10(-8) mol/l) than that of basal macrophages (221.5 +/- 32.8 pg/ml, P<0.05) or women without endometriosis (170.6 +/- 2.6 pg/ml, P<0.05). These effects were less evident after treatment with progesterone. Treatment with tamoxifen (10(-6) mol/l) reversed the production of HGF and other macromolecules. Secretion of HGF in response to ovarian steroids was further enhanced after activation with lipopolysaccharide. The mRNA expressions of HGF and its receptor, c-Met, were also detected in macrophages and stroma in response to estrogen, suggesting an autocrine regulation. HGF mRNA expression was higher in cells of women with endometriosis than non-endometriosis women. Bromodeoxyuridine incorporation indicated that exogenous stimulation with HGF and estrogen, either alone or in combination, significantly increased the cell proliferation of both endometrial stroma and macrophages compared to that of non-endometriosis or non-treated cells.These results suggest that besides other inflammatory mediators, ovarian steroids also participate in the production of HGF by peritoneal macrophages which may be involved in the growth of endometriosis either alone or in combination with estrogen.Altered expression of a cell-cycle suppressor gene, Tob-1, in endometriotic cells by cDNA array analyses.Interleukin (IL)-1beta, a product of activated peritoneal macrophages, is a central cytokine coordinating neovascularization and monocyte chemotaxis in endometriotic implants. To evaluate the effects of this cytokine on normal endometrial stromal cells and endometriotic stromal cells we performed cDNA expression array analyses before and after exposure to IL-1beta.Nested case-control study of women with and without laparoscopic evidence of endometriosis.Reproductive endocrinology clinic at a university hospital.Endometriosis and normal endometrial biopsies from eight patients were used to prepare stromal cell cultures from which mRNA was extracted.None.Commercially available expression arrays (Atlas Human cDNA Expression Array, Clontech, representing 597 individual genes) were used to screen for mRNAs whose expression was affected by 12 hours of exposure to IL-1beta (10 ng/mL). Northern blotting and subsequent quantitative densitometric evaluation was done to confirm steady-state levels of Tob-1 mRNA transcripts.Array analyses revealed a cell-cycle regulatory gene, Tob-1, which was differentially expressed by the two cell types after incubation with IL-1beta. Tob-1 was reduced 48% in endometriotic stromal cells exposed to IL-1beta, but there was only a 16% reduction in normal endometrial stromal cells. Replicate Northern analyses (n = 4) showed that exposure to IL-1beta for 12 hours resulted in a 25% +/- 5% diminution of Tob-1 mRNA in endometriotic stromal cells. In contrast, no significant decrease (<3%) was observed in IL-1beta exposed normal endometrial stromal cells.Tob-1, a cell-cycle inhibitor gene is differentially responsive to IL-1beta in endometriotic stromal cells compared to normal endometrial stromal cells. IL-1beta down-regulated Tob-1 in endometriotic stromal cells, but had no significant effect on normal endometrial stromal cells. Our results suggest that IL-1beta promotes growth of endometriotic lesions through inhibition of Tob-1. These findings are the first to associate IL-1beta with an alteration of cell-cycle gene expression in cells derived from endometriotic implants.Relationship between apoptosis and the number of macrophages in eutopic endometrium from women with and without endometriosis.To investigate the relationship between apoptotic cells and macrophages in the eutopic endometrium of women with and without endometriosis.Retrospective analysis of archival uterine endometrial biopsy specimens.Institute for the Study and Treatment of Endometriosis, and university-based pathology and research laboratories.Fifty-one women with endometriosis and 24 healthy control subjects without endometriosis.None.The number of TUNEL+ (terminal deoxynucleotide transferase [TdT]-mediated deoxyuridine triphospate [dUTP] nick end-labeling-positive) (apoptotic) cells and CD68+ (CD68 positive) (macrophages).Apoptotic cells and macrophage numbers were positively correlated in the eutopic endometrium of women with and without endometriosis. However, the number of apoptotic cells and the macrophage content in the endometrium of women with endometriosis was significantly reduced compared with that of healthy control subjects without endometriosis. Differences between apoptosis and macrophage numbers between the two populations were observed predominantly during the early proliferative phase of the menstrual cycle.The reduction in apoptosis described for endometrial cells in women with endometriosis may be related to reduced macrophage trafficking into the eutopic endomtrium during the early-proliferative phase of the menstrual cycle.Aromatase P450 messenger RNA expression in eutopic endometrium is not a specific marker for pelvic endometriosis.To determine whether expression of aromatase P450 mRNA in eutopic endometrium is predictive of the presence of pelvic endometriosis.A prospective, multicenter, observational study.Four tertiary centers for reproductive medicine.Sixty subjects of reproductive age undergoing laparoscopy for subfertility exploration, pain assessment, or sterilization.Endometrial biopsy at time of laparoscopy.The expression of aromatase P450 mRNA in endometrial specimens was determined by single-tube reverse transcription-polymerase chain reaction (RT-PCR). Glyceraldehyde-3-phosphate dehydrogenase (GAPDH) mRNA was amplified in parallel to exclude amplification failure.The RT-PCR amplification was successful in 56 of the 60 biopsies (93%). Pelvic endometriosis was diagnosed in 34 patients (61%) and was strongly associated with aromatase P450 mRNA expression in eutopic endometrium. As a diagnostic marker for endometriosis, aromatase P450 mRNA expression yielded a sensitivity of 82%, a specificity of 59%, a positive predictive value of 76%, and a negative predictive value of 67%. If additional uterine pathology was taken in account, the sensitivity increased to 84%, the specificity to 72%, the positive predictive value to 87%, but the negative predictive value remained unchanged (67%).Although endometrial aromatase P450 gene expression is highly predictive of the presence of pelvic disease, the relative high incidence of false-negative results and lack of specificity is likely to impair clinical application.Involvement of catalase in the endometrium of patients with endometriosis and adenomyosis.To determine the distribution of catalase in eutopic and ectopic endometria in patients with endometriosis or adenomyosis.Retrospective randomized study.Department of obstetrics and gynecology in a university hospital.Thirty-three patients with endometriosis, 36 with adenomyosis, and 47 fertile controls (total, 116 women).Semiquantitative immunostaining of endometrial cells obtained by biopsy sampling, followed by calculation of an evaluation nomogram score.The score of catalase in the glandular epithelium of controls group fluctuated during the menstrual cycle; it was lowest in the early proliferative phase and peaked in the late secretory phase. In patients with endometriosis, catalase scores did not fluctuate during the cycle, and scores were high compared with controls throughout the menstrual cycle. Catalase scores did not vary in patients with adenomyosis, and scores in this group were consistently higher than those in patients with endometriosis throughout the cycle.Abnormal expression of catalase in the eutopic and ectopic endometrium strongly suggests pathologic involvement of free radicals in endometriosis and adenomyosis.Alterations in expression of endometrial endothelial nitric oxide synthase and alpha(v)beta(3) integrin in women with endometriosis.To determine the expression of endometrial endothelial nitric oxide synthase (eNOS) protein and alpha(v)beta(3) integrin in patients with and without endometriosis.Case-control cohort study.University-based tertiary care center.Endometrial biopsy samples were obtained from 9 fertile women with regular cycles and 30 infertile women with varying severity of endometriosis. Peritoneal fluid levels of nitric oxide were determined in 13 infertile women with a normal pelvis and 12 infertile women with endometriosis.Expression of eNOS and alpha(v)beta(3) integrin protein in the endometrium and peritoneal fluid levels of nitric oxide.In patients with endometriosis, expression of eNOS was significantly increased in the glandular and luminal epithelium, with no significant changes in the stroma. Peritoneal fluid levels of nitric oxide were unchanged, and expression of alpha(v)beta(3) integrin expression in glandular and luminal epithelium was significantly decreased compared with controls. A significant negative correlation was observed between luminal expression of eNOS and alpha(v)beta(3) integrin and between glandular expression of eNOS and luminal expression of alpha(v)beta(3) integrin.The nitric oxide pathway may play a role in the pathogenesis of endometriosis.Expression of aromatase and estrogen sulfotransferase in eutopic and ectopic endometrium: evidence for unbalanced estradiol production in endometriosis.Endometriosis is an estrogen-dependent gynecological disease causing pelvic pain and infertility. Impaired estrogen metabolism is thought to play a pivotal role in the pathogenesis of the disease. While there is some information on factors involved in the synthesis of E2, information on E2-deactivating enzymes is still very limited. To elucidate the intracrinology of endometriotic tissues, the authors analyze the expression of aromatase and E2-inactivating estrogen sulfotransferase (EST) in paired biopsies obtained simultaneously from the endometrium and from endometrial lesions of each of 35 patients with peritoneal or ovarian endometriosis and in cycling endometria from 33 women without endometriosis. Protein localization was demonstrated by immunohistochemistry. Aromatase expression was found in endometriotic glands in 32 of 35 cases and was elevated in comparison to corresponding uterine endometria (25 of 35 cases, P = .021, chi(2) test). The difference was even more pronounced when uterine endometria from endometriosis patients were compared with that of healthy controls (8 of 33 cases, P < .001, chi(2) test). The EST levels were essentially unchanged. The elevated expression of aromatase in eutopic and ectopic endometrium from patients with endometriosis in the presence of comparable EST provides further evidence for unopposed local biosynthesis of estrogens in endometriosis.Different basic fibroblast growth factor and fibroblast growth factor-antisense expression in eutopic endometrial stromal cells derived from women with and without endometriosis.In all species studied, the basic fibroblast growth factor (bFGF) gene is transcribed into multiple mRNAs, one of which is an antisense RNA (1B FGF-AS) probably involved in regulating the stability of the sense transcript. In this study we investigated whether the regulatory mechanisms of bFGF expression might be altered in endometrial stromal cells derived from women with endometriosis. bFGF and 1B FGF-AS mRNA levels were quantified in primary cultures of eutopic endometrial stromal cells derived from 29 women without endometriosis and 24 patients affected by the disease. When the data were analyzed according to the phase of the menstrual cycle, endometrial stromal cells derived from patients in the late proliferative phase showed significantly higher bFGF mRNA values and significantly lower 1B FGF-AS mRNA levels compared with control samples. Furthermore, the mean bFGF/1B FGF-AS mRNA ratio was significantly higher in endometrial stromal cells derived from patients compared with that in controls (mean +/- SEM, 2.31 +/- 0,55 and 0.77 +/- 0.14, respectively; P = 0.009). Moreover, for bFGF expression the differences existing at the mRNA level were maintained at the protein level. These findings support the hypothesis that 1B FGF-AS mRNA could regulate the expression of the sense transcript and suggest that in endometrial cells derived from patients, the presence of higher bFGF levels could improve their ability to proliferate at the ectopic site.Vascular endothelial growth factor A and C gene expression in endometriosis.Angiogenesis is essential for the pathogenesis of endometriosis. Gene expression levels of vascular endothelial growth factor (VEGF) A and C in 10 eutopic endometrial, 23 normal peritoneal, and 62 endometriotic tissues surgically obtained from 47 women with endometriosis (group 2) were compared with those in 12 control eutopic endometrial and 9 normal peritoneal tissues from 15 women without endometriosis (group 1). VEGF-A mRNA expression levels in eutopic endometrium of group 2 were higher than those of group 1 throughout the menstrual cycle (P <0.01) and increased in the secretory phase. VEGF-A gene expression in peritoneal endometriotic lesion was statistically higher than that in normal peritoneum (P <0.01) and similar to that in eutopic endometrium of group 2. In contrast, gene expression levels of VEGF-C were relatively lower than those of VEGF-A in each lesion, and no cyclic variation was found. VEGF-A and C mRNA expression levels were significantly higher in ovarian endometriomas >6 cm in size than in those <6 cm in size. Immunohistochemical expression of VEGF-A and C was detected in the cytoplasm of glandular epithelial and stromal cells of ovarian endometrioma. These results suggest that endometriosis may arise from eutopic endometrium with higher levels of angiogenic activity possibly induced by VEGF-A in women with endometriosis. Moreover, VEGF-C as well as VEGF-A may be involved in the pathogenesis of ovarian endometrioma.[Application of two dimensional electrophoresis,western blot and mass spectrum to screen markers of endometriosis].To find out markers of endometriosis.The two dimensional gel images of proteins extracted from eutopic endometrium from endometriosis patients and controls were analyzed by software Phoretix 2D,and the proteins expressed differently were identified primarily by query of data base. The proteins extracted from ectopic endometrium of ovarian endometriosis were transferred from two dimensional gel onto nitrocellulose membranes, followed by incubation with sera from women with and without endometriosis. Analyzed by MALDI-TOF-MS, the proteins hybridized differently were identified through their Peptide Mass Footprints.Having compared the reproducible two dimensional gel images of proteins from eutopic endometrium of women with and without endometriosis,we obtained 11 proteins expressed differently. Through Western Blot technique,we found three proteins hybridized differently which were identified as vimentin, beta-actin and ATP synthase beta subunit respectively.The protein expression spectra of eutopic endometrium from patients with endometriosis are significantly different from those of the controls, and the anti-endometrial autoantibodies against vimentin, beta-actin and ATP synthase beta subunit may be induced.In vitro effects of a small-molecule antagonist of the Tcf/ß-catenin complex on endometrial and endometriotic cells of patients with endometriosis.Our previous studies suggested that aberrant activation of Wnt/ß-catenin signaling might be involved in the pathophysiology of endometriosis. We hypothesized that inhibition of Wnt/ß-catenin signaling might result in inhibition of cell proliferation, migration, and/or invasion of endometrial and endometriotic epithelial and stromal cells of patients with endometriosis.The aim of the present study was to evaluate the effects of a small-molecule antagonist of the Tcf/ß-catenin complex (PKF 115-584) on cell proliferation, migration, and invasion of endometrial and endometriotic epithelial and stromal cells.One hundred twenty-six patients (78 with and 48 without endometriosis) with normal menstrual cycles were recruited. In vitro effects of PKF 115-584 on cell proliferation, migration, and invasion and on the Tcf/ß-catenin target genes were evaluated in endometrial epithelial and stromal cells of patients with and without endometriosis, and in endometrial and endometriotic epithelial and stromal cells of the same patients.The inhibitory effects of PKF 115-584 on cell migration and invasion in endometrial epithelial and stromal cells of patients with endometriosis prepared from the menstrual phase were significantly higher than those of patients without endometriosis. Levels of total and active forms of MMP-9 were significantly higher in epithelial and stromal cells prepared from menstrual endometrium in patients with endometriosis compared to patients without endometriosis. Treatment with PKF 115-584 inhibited MMP-9 activity to undetectable levels in both menstrual endometrial epithelial and stromal cells of patients with endometriosis. The number of invasive cells was significantly higher in epithelial and stromal cells of endometriotic tissue compared with matched eutopic endometrium of the same patients. Treatment with PKF 115-584 decreased the number of invasive endometriotic epithelial cells by 73% and stromal cells by 75%.The present findings demonstrated that cellular mechanisms known to be involved in endometriotic lesion development are inhibited by targeting the Wnt/β-catenin pathway.Expression of the epidermal growth factor system in eutopic endometrium from women with endometriosis differs from that in endometrium from healthy women.The epidermal growth factor (EGF) system comprises four receptors, HER1-4, and several ligands, and is cyclically expressed in endometrium from healthy fertile women. Our aim is to identify differences in expression of the EGF system between endometriotic and normal endometrium.We previously examined the EGF system in endometrial samples from healthy women (n = 14). Here we examine samples from endometrium (n = 23), endometriomas (n = 10) and peritoneal endometriosis (n = 9) from women with endometriosis (n = 23). mRNA expression of receptors and ligands from the EGF system was analyzed by real-time PCR, and proteins were localized by immunohistochemistry.Endometrial mRNA for HER1-3 was high compared with our previous findings in healthy endometrium, whereas HER4 and the ligands were unchanged. Endometriomas show lower expression of HER1-3 and no HER4 expression. Significant differences were demonstrated in late secretory phase for HER1 and HER2 and in the proliferative phase for HER3 compared to healthy women. Immunohistochemically, HER2 was identified in all samples, predominately in glands and surface epithelium. In a few glands, HER2 was in both cytoplasm and cell membrane.We report quantitative and qualitative differences in the EGF system in endometriotic eutopic endometrium compared to endometrium from healthy individuals.Expression of cyclooxygenase-2 in eutopic endometrium and ovarian endometriotic tissue in women with severe endometriosis.The purpose of this study is to evaluate the level and pattern of cyclooxygenase-2 (Cox-2) expression in endometriosis and to investigate the correlation between the expression of Cox-2 and several clinicosurgical parameters.Twenty-six patients with endometriosis and 21 patients with other benign gynecological conditions were enrolled. The eutopic endometrium was sampled by pipelle, and fragments of ovarian endometrioma and non-endometriotic ovarian cysts were sampled during surgery. Total RNA isolation and semiquantitative reverse transcriptase polymerase chain reaction was performed.The expression of Cox-2 mRNA (mean +/- SEM) in eutopic endometrium and ovarian endometriotic tissue significantly increased in patients with endometriosis compared with the controls. The expression of Cox-2 increased significantly in the proliferative phase in eutopic endometrium and in the secretory phase in ovarian endometriotic tissue of patients with endometriosis compared with the controls. Cox-2 mRNA expression in the endometrium and ovarian lesions significantly correlated with serum CA-125 and the diameter of the endometrioma.Cox-2 expression increased in the eutopic endometrium and ovarian endometriotic tissue of the patients with endometriosis. These findings indicate that Cox-2 may be involved in the pathogenesis and progression of endometriosis.MicroRNA23a and microRNA23b deregulation derepresses SF-1 and upregulates estrogen signaling in ovarian endometriosis.Steroidogenic factor (SF)-1 and its downstream target genes involved in estrogen signaling are aberrantly expressed in ovarian endometriosis.Our objective was to explore the microRNA-mediated mechanism controlling aberrant SF-1 expression in ovarian endometriosis.Bioinformatics analysis predicted that microRNA23a and microRNA23b (miR23a/b) target the NR5A1 3'-untranslated region. We investigated the relative expression and spatial distribution of miR23a/b and analyzed the relationship between miR23a/b and SF-1 expression in endometriotic tissues.The study was conducted at the Department of Gynecology and Obstetrics, West China Second University Hospital of Sichuan University.We enrolled 23 women with American Fertility Society stage III-IV ovarian endometriosis and 15 disease-free control subjects.Quantitative real-time RT-PCR, in situ hybridization, cell culture, transfections, and luciferase reporter assays were used in this study.The expression of miR23a/b and SF-1, CYP19A1, and StAR mRNAs; the relationships between miRNAs and SF-1 mRNA levels; and the effect of miR23a/b on SF-1 expression were measured in normal and eutopic endometrial stromal cells (ESCs) and 293T cells.Both miR23a and miR23b were downregulated in ectopic and eutopic endometrium, compared with normal endometrium, and their expression was inversely correlated with NR5A1 mRNA levels. SF-1 expression was inhibited by miR23a/b overexpression in eutopic ESCs and upregulated by miR23a/b inhibition in normal ESCs.MiR23a and miR23b are potential biomarkers of ovarian endometriosis. This study provides a novel approach for targeting the mechanisms controlling aberrant local estrogen biosynthesis in endometriosis.Altered expression of activin, cripto, and follistatin in the endometrium of women with endometrioma.To evaluate the expression pattern of activin A, activin receptors, and activin modulators messenger RNA (mRNA) in the eutopic endometrium of patients with endometriosis at different phases of the menstrual cycle and to evaluate the mRNA expression of the same proteins in endometriomas during the menstrual cycle.Prospective study.University hospital.Women with and without endometriosis.Samples of endometrial and endometriotic tissue from women with endometrioma (n=48), and endometrial samples from women without endometriosis (controls) (n=48).Quantification of activin A, activin B, activin receptor II, nodal, cripto, inhibin α, and follistatin expression by real-time reverse-transcriptase polymerase chain reaction (RT-PCR).The eutopic endometrium of patients with endometriosis showed [1] higher activin A mRNA expression in the proliferative phase and a lack of late secretory phase peak, [2] a lack of endometrial cycle-related variations of cripto and inhibin α mRNA expression, and [3] an inverse expression pattern of follistatin mRNA. Endometriomas showed similar variations in the expression of activin-related protein mRNA during the menstrual cycle as eutopic endometrium.The disturbed expression of endometrial activin A, cripto (activin receptor antagonist), and follistatin (activin-binding protein) suggests a dysfunction of the activin pathway in endometriosis. Endometriomas showed similar changes of activin-related proteins during the menstrual cycle, which supports a common biology for eutopic and ectopic endometrium in endometriosis.CRISPLD2 is a target of progesterone receptor and its expression is decreased in women with endometriosis.Endometriosis, defined as the presence of endometrial cells outside of the uterine cavity, is a major cause of infertility and pelvic pain, afflicting more than 10% of reproductive age women. Endometriosis is a chronic inflammatory disease and lipopolysaccharide promotes the proliferation and invasion of endometriotic stromal cells. Cysteine-rich secretory protein LCCL domain-containing 2 (CRISPLD2) has high affinity for lipopolysaccharide and plays a critical role in defense against endotoxin shock. However, the function of CRISPLD2 has not been studied in endometriosis and uterine biology. Herein, we examined the expression of CRISPLD2 in endometrium from patients with and without endometriosis using immunohistochemistry. The expression of CRISPLD2 was higher in the secretory phase in human menstrual cycle compared to proliferative phase. The expression of CRISPLD2 was significantly decreased in the endometrium of women with endometriosis in the early secretory phase compared to women without endometriosis. The increase of CRISPLD2 expression at the early secretory and dysregulation of its expression in endometriosis suggest progesterone (P4) regulation of CRISPLD2. To investigate whether CRISPLD2 is regulated by P4, we examined the expression of the CRISPLD2 in the uteri of wild-type and progesterone receptor knock out (PRKO) mice. The expression of CRISPLD2 was significantly increased after P4 treatment in the wild-type mice. However, CRISPLD2 expression was significantly decreased in the (PRKO) mice treated with P4. During early pregnancy, the expression of CRISPLD2 was increased in decidua of implantation and post-implantation stages. CRISPLD2 levels were also increased in cultured human endometrial stromal cells during in vitro decidualization. These results suggest that the CRISPLD2 is a target of the progesterone receptor and may play an important role in pathogenesis of endometriosis. Identification and quantification of dopamine receptor 2 in human eutopic and ectopic endometrium: a novel molecular target for endometriosis therapy.Previous studies in an experimental mouse model of endometriosis have shown that the dopamine agonist (DA) cabergoline (Cb2) reduces angiogenesis and endometriotic lesions, hypothetically binding to the dopamine receptor type-2 (DRD2). To date, this has not been described in human endometrium and/or endometriotic lesions. Thus, we aimed to investigate the presence of DRD2 in said tissues. Endometrium fragments were implanted in nude mice treated with different doses of Cb2. Polymerase chain reaction assays and immunohistochemistry were performed to analyze the gene and protein expressions (respectively) of DRD2, VEGF, and VEGF receptor-2 (KDR). In addition, lesions and endometrium from women with mild and severe endometriosis and endometrium from healthy women were collected to analyze their gene expression profile. In experimental endometriosis, DRD2 was expressed at gene and protein levels in all three groups. VEGF gene and protein expressions were significantly lower in lesions treated with Cb2 than in controls. KDR protein expression was significantly lower in experimental lesions treated with Cb2 than in controls. In eutopic endometria, there was a significant decrease in DRD2 expression and an increase in VEGF in women with mild and severe endometriosis with respect to healthy patients. In endometriosis, KDR expression was significantly higher in red than in white and black lesions. VEGF expression was significantly lower in black than in red lesions. DRD2 is present in the human eutopic and ectopic endometrium and is regulated by DA, which provides the rationale for pilot studies to explore its use in the treatment of endometriosis.[Semiquantitative analysis of mRNA aromatase expression in eutopic endometrium as a diagnostic marker of endometriosis and estrogen dependent diseases].To determine clinical benefits of mRNA aromatase expression in entopic endometrium as a diagnostic marker of endometriosis.Prospective clinical trial.Department of Obstetrics and Gynaecology of Jessenius Medical Faculty and Faculty Hospital, Martin.The expression of mRNA aromatase of eutopic endometrium was determined among women who underwent laparoscopy or laparotomy due to pelvic pain, infertility or benign pelvic tumor. Endometriosis was confirmed histologicaly and classified by rAFS.On the basis of entering criteria 23 women were enrolled in this study and divided into two subgroups: 12 endometriotic and 11 without endometriosis. Sensitivity of aromatase expression was 75% and specificity 54.5% at the cut-off value of at least minimal aromatase activity. By the presence of estrogen-dependent diseases- endometriosis, myomas or endometrial hyperplasia 18 women were compared to 5 disease free women. In this case, sensitivity of aromatase expression was 72.2 and specificity 80%.Aromatase expression in eutopic endometrium is a good diagnostic marker for endometriosis.Expression of vascular endothelial growth factor and thrombospondin-1 mRNA in patients with endometriosis.To investigate the expression of vascular endothelial growth factor (VEGF) mRNA and thrombospondin-1 (TSP-1) mRNA in endometriosis.Molecular studies in human tissue.Department of Obstetrics and Gynecology, Peking Union Medical College Hospital, Peking Union Medical College, Chinese Academy of Medical Sciences, Beijing, P. R. China.Patients undergoing laparoscopy for infertility or other benign gynecologic conditions.Biopsies were taken from endometriotic lesions (red peritoneal lesion, ovarian endometrioma, and unterosacral ligament nudule) and eutopic endometrium during laparoscopy.mRNA expression from endometriotic lesion and eutopic endometrium was analyzed by reverse transcriptase polymerase chain reaction (PCR) and Northern blotting.Among the endometriotic lesions, red peritoneal lesions expressed higher levels of VEGF mRNA and lower levels of TSP-1 mRNA, whereas ovarian endometrioma expressed lower levels of VEGF mRNA and higher levels of TSP-1 mRNA. Eutopic endometrium of women with endometriosis had higher expression levels of VEGF mRNA and lower expression levels of TSP-1 mRNA than that of women without endometriosis.The expression of VEGF and TSP-1 in endometriotic lesions appears to be associated with the extent of their neovascularization. The imbalance in expression of VEGF and TSP-1 in the endometrium may play a role in the development of endometriosis.Immunohistochemical analysis of estrogen and progesterone receptors in endometriosis: comparison with normal endometrium during the menstrual cycle and the effect of medical therapy.Estrogen receptors (ER) and progesterone receptors (PgR) in 19 endometriotic implants from 16 normally cycling and hormonally treated women were measured using immunohistochemical techniques and compared with 34 samples of normal intrauterine endometrium. Endometriotic implants contained specific ER and PgR in both glandular epithelium and stroma. In contrast to intrauterine endometrium, receptor content among implants was noted to be more heterogeneous, and did not undergo predictable changes in response to endogenous hormones. In the endometriotic implants of patients treated with hormonal therapy, there were significant decreases in ER and PgR in both the glands and stroma relative to untreated patients. These data imply that endometriosis is unpredictable in its response to the cyclic hormonal milieu in terms of ER and PgR, but retains the ability to respond to hormonal suppression over a prolonged interval.Stromal cells from endometriotic lesions and endometrium from women with endometriosis have reduced decidualization capacity.To evaluate the phenotype, proliferative, and differentiation capacities in vitro of stromal cells derived from peritoneal, ovarian, and deeply infiltrating endometriosis.Experimental study using phase contrast microscopy, immunocytochemistry, and functional bioassays.University-based laboratory.Women with and without endometriosis undergoing surgery for benign indications.None.The stability in vitro of stromal cells derived from peritoneal (n = 18), ovarian (n = 29), and deeply infiltrating (n = 14) endometriotic lesions, as well as endometrium from women with (n = 5) and without endometriosis (n = 5) was evaluated by detection of endometrial markers. The proliferative and differentiation capacity of the cells was assessed by the use of cell doubling estimation and in vitro decidualization assays.The expression of the progesterone receptor and CD10 in stromal cells derived from the three types of endometriotic lesions is retained in culture up to passage 10. The doubling time of stromal cells from deeply infiltrating lesions is lower than that of endometrial stromal cells. Levels of prolactin and insulin-like growth factor binding protein-1 (IGFBP-1) are reduced in supernatants from stromal cells derived from the three types of lesions and from the endometrium of women with endometriosis.The peritoneal, ovarian, and deeply infiltrating endometriotic stromal cell lines we describe retain in vivo tissue markers. Loss of differentiation capacity of the endometriotic cell lines and endometrial cells from women with endometriosis may influence the capacity for proliferation and survival of these cells in the ectopic environment.A defective expression of ICAM-1 (CD54) on secretory endometrial cells is associated with endometriosis.A defect in the cytolytic activity against autologous endometrial cells refluxed in the peritoneal cavity has been hypothesized as being involved in the etiology of endometriosis, although its causes have not been definitively identified. Cell adhesion molecules are necessary not only for cell-to-cell contact but also for the binding of immune effectors to their targets. In this study, the expression of CD54, CD58 and CD106, three adhesion molecules with a crucial role in cytotoxic mechanisms, was quantitatively studied on fresh endometrial cells by immunofluorescence and flow cytometry. Samples were collected from endometriosis patients (n=10) and controls (n=12), either during the follicular or luteal phase of the cycle. While no significant differences were observed for CD58 and CD106, a significantly reduced expression of CD54 in the secretory endometrial cells of women with endometriosis was observed (-75% with respect to apparently healthy controls). These findings could account for an apparently cyclic defect in the expression of CD54 that could result in poor binding of immune effectors to secretory endometrial cells in vivo. The defective recognition and removal of refluxed endometrial cells could, at least in part, be involved in the pathogenesis of endometriosis.Glycodelin expression in the endometrium of healthy women and in the eutopic and ectopic endometrium of women with endometriosis.To analyze the expression of the glycodelin gene to better understand the molecular environment of endometriotic lesions and to elucidate the potential mechanisms that underlie the complex physiopathology of endometriosis.Prospective laboratory study.University hospital.Eleven healthy fertile women and 17 patients with endometriosis in the early proliferative phase of the menstrual cycle.Endometrial biopsy specimens were obtained from the endometrium of healthy women without endometriosis (controls) and from eutopic and ectopic endometrium tissues (pelvic and ovarian endometriotic implants) of endometriosis patients.The glycodelin relative expression level by real-time polymerase chain reaction (PCR) analysis.The glycodelin down-regulation found in the endometriotic lesions was 332.26 and 123.17-fold lower, respectively, when compared with the eutopic tissue and the control endometrium.Glycodelin may be one of the molecules that contributes to the loss of cellular homeostasis in endometriotic lesions.Endometrial leukocyte subpopulations in women with endometriosis.The aim of this study was to investigate whether the endometrium of women with endometriosis differs immunologically from the endometrium of normal fertile women. Endometrial biopsies were obtained from 18 normal fertile women who were requesting sterilisation or reversal of sterilisation and 21 infertile women who had laparoscopically diagnosed pelvic endometriosis. The endometrial biopsies were obtained from both groups during the either early, mid or late luteal phase of the menstrual cycle. A panel of 11 monoclonal antibodies and immuno-histochemical techniques were employed to characterise the endometrial stromal leukocytes in frozen sections. Image analysis was used for semi quantitation of leukocytes. In both groups, the number of endometrial granulated lymphocytes (CD56+ CD38+ cells) and macrophages (CD68+ cells) increased significantly between the early and late luteal phase of the menstrual cycle. Compared with fertile controls, women with endometriosis had fewer T-suppressor/cytotoxic (CD8+) cells and endometrial granulated lymphocytes but more T-helper/inducer (CD4+) cells, CD68+ cells and CD16+ cells. None of these differences reached a statistically significant level. This study has shown that the endometrial lymphoid tissue of women with endometriosis does not differ qualitatively or quantitively from that of normal fertile controls. However, functional differences of endometrial leukocytes between the two groups cannot be excluded.Proliferative activity of microvessels and angiogenesis in eutopic endometrium in patients with peritoneal endometriosis.Comparative analysis of the density of microvessels and angiogenic activity in eutopic endometrium during different phases of the menstrual cycle in patients with peritoneal endometriosis showed that peritoneal form of endometriosis is a paracrine disease with dysregulation of angiogenesis processes in the eutopic endometrium. Excessive angiogenesis in this condition promotes implantation of eutopic endometrium on the peritoneum. Angiogenesis in eutopic endometrium can be maintained due to high concentrations of vascular endothelial growth factor A in the peritoneal fluid.Integrins alpha 3 and alpha 6 are differentially expressed in endometrium and endometriosis.The expression of integrin subunits has been investigated in the stroma and epithelium of eutopic and ectopic endometrial tissues, using immunohistochemistry and fluorescently activated cell-sorting techniques. Integrin subunits exhibited tissue-specific expression in both eutopic and ectopic endometrium. Integrin alpha 3 subunit was up-regulated in ectopic endometrium compared with the eutopic counterpart, whereas alpha 6 integrin subunit was down-regulated in the ectopic tissues. Cycle stage-dependent expression of alpha v and beta 3, observed in eutopic endometrium, was absent in the ectopic counterpart. It is concluded that the development and regeneration of the endometrium involve complex integrin-ligand interactions and that regulation of specific adhesive events is lost in endometriosis.Caldesmon: new insights for diagnosing endometriosis.Considerable effort has been invested in searching for less invasive methods of diagnosing endometriosis. Previous studies have indicated altered levels of the CALD1 gene (encoding the protein caldesmon) in endometriosis. The aims of our study were to investigate whether average CALD1 expression and caldesmon protein levels are differentially altered in the endometrium and endometriotic lesions and to evaluate the performance of the CALD1 gene and caldesmon protein as potential biomarkers for endometriosis. Paired biopsies of endometrial tissue (eutopic endometrium) and endometriotic lesions (ectopic endometrium) were obtained from patients with endometriosis to evaluate CALD1 gene expression and caldesmon protein levels by real-time PCR and Western blot analysis, respectively. In addition, immunostaining for caldesmon to determine cellular localization was also performed. Endometrium from women without endometriosis was used as a control. Increased CALD1 expression and caldesmon levels were detected in the endometriotic lesions. The electrophoretic profile of caldesmon by Western blot analysis was clearly different between the control group (endometrium of women without endometriosis) and the group of women with endometriosis (eutopic endometrium and endometriotic lesions). Caldesmon expression as determined by immunostaining showed no variation among the cell types in endometriotic lesions and eutopic endometrium. Stromal cells marked positively in eutopic endometrium from control patients and in the endometriotic lesions. The presence of caldesmon in the endometrium of patients with and without endometriosis permitted diagnoses with 95% sensitivity (specificity 100%) and 100% sensitivity (specificity 100%) for the disease and for minimal to mild endometriosis in the proliferative phase of the menstrual cycle, respectively. In the secretory phase, minimal to mild endometriosis was detected with 90% sensitivity and 93.3% specificity. Caldesmon is a possible predictor of endometrial dysregulation in patients with endometriosis. A potential limitation of our study is the fact that other endometrial diseases were not excluded, and therefore prospective studies are needed to confirm the potential of caldesmon as a biomarker exclusively for endometriosis.MicroRNAs expression profiling of eutopic proliferative endometrium in women with ovarian endometriosis.The eutopic endometrium of women with endometriosis, compared with disease-free individuals, contains certain molecular alterations, including the differential expression of microRNA (miRNA). The aim of the study was to compare the expression of the most relevant miRNAs in the eutopic endometrium of women with and without ovarian endometriosis.A total of 46 regularly menstruating patients, 21 patients with ovarian endometriosis and 25 controls, underwent surgery in the proliferative phase of the cycle. The eutopic endometrium was collected through aspirating biopsy prior to laparoscopy. Only patients with advanced (stage III and IV) histopathologically confirmed ovarian endometriosis were included. TaqMan MicroRNA Array Cards were applied to examine the expression of 667 human miRNAs in 10 patients with endometriosis and 10 controls. Custom-made, low-density real-time PCR arrays were used to confirm the expression of 15 selected molecules in 21 endometriosis patients and 25 disease-free individuals.Of 667 miRNAs, 2 were highly likely to be upregulated and 13 were downregulated in the eutopic endometrium of patients with endometriosis compared with the controls. Validation using real-time PCR showed that hsa-miR-483-5p (p = 0.012) and hsa-miR-629* (p = 0.02) are significantly downregulated in patients with endometriosis.Changes in the expression of select miRNAs might lead to or be a consequence of an early defect in the physiological activity of the proliferative endometrium, ultimately resulting in the overgrowth of this tissue outside the uterus.Expression profiling of endometrium from women with endometriosis reveals candidate genes for disease-based implantation failure and infertility.Endometriosis is clinically associated with pelvic pain and infertility, with implantation failure strongly suggested as an underlying cause for the observed infertility. Eutopic endometrium of women with endometriosis provides a unique experimental paradigm for investigation into molecular mechanisms of reproductive dysfunction and an opportunity to identify specific markers for this disease. We applied paralleled gene expression profiling using high-density oligonucleotide microarrays to investigate differentially regulated genes in endometrium from women with vs. without endometriosis. Fifteen endometrial biopsy samples (obtained during the window of implantation from eight subjects with and seven subjects without endometriosis) were processed for expression profiling on Affymetrix Hu95A microarrays. Data analysis was conducted with GeneChip Analysis Suite, version 4.01, and GeneSpring version 4.0.4. Nonparametric testing was applied, using a P value of 0.05, to assess statistical significance. Of the 12,686 genes analyzed, 91 genes were significantly increased more than 2-fold in their expression, and 115 genes were decreased more than 2-fold. Unsupervised clustering demonstrated down-regulation of several known cell adhesion molecules, endometrial epithelial secreted proteins, and proteins not previously known to be involved in the pathogenesis of endometriosis, as well as up-regulated genes. Selected dysregulated genes were randomly chosen and validated with RT-PCR and/or Northern/dot-blot analyses, and confirmed up-regulation of collagen alpha2 type I, 2.6-fold; bile salt export pump, 2.0-fold; and down-regulation of N-acetylglucosamine-6-O-sulfotransferase (important in synthesis of L-selectin ligands), 1.7-fold; glycodelin, 51.5-fold; integrin alpha2, 1.8-fold; and B61 (Ephrin A1), 4.5-fold. Two-way overlapping layer analysis used to compare endometrial genes in the window of implantation from women with and without endometriosis further identified three unique groups of target genes, which differ with respect to the implantation window and the presence of disease. Group 1 target genes are up-regulated during the normal window of implantation but significantly decreased in women with endometriosis: IL-15, proline-rich protein, B61, Dickkopf-1, glycodelin, N-acetylglucosamine-6-O-sulfotransferase, G0S2 protein, and purine nucleoside phosphorylase. Group 2 genes are normally down-regulated during the window of implantation but are significantly increased with endometriosis: semaphorin E, neuronal olfactomedin-related endoplasmic reticulum localized protein mRNA and Sam68-like phosphotyrosine protein alpha. Group 3 consists of a single gene, neuronal pentraxin II, normally down-regulated during the window of implantation and further decreased in endometrium from women with endometriosis. The data support dysregulation of select genes leading to an inhospitable environment for implantation, including genes involved in embryonic attachment, embryo toxicity, immune dysfunction, and apoptotic responses, as well as genes likely contributing to the pathogenesis of endometriosis, including aromatase, progesterone receptor, angiogenic factors, and others. Identification and validation of selected genes and their functions will contribute to uncovering previously unknown mechanism(s) underlying implantation failure in women with endometriosis and infertility, mechanisms underlying the pathogenesis of endometriosis and providing potential new targets for diagnostic screening and intervention.Identification of local angiogenic and inflammatory markers in the menstrual blood of women with endometriosis.The aim of this study was to evaluate the presence of myeloperoxidase (MPO), N-acetyl-β-D-glucosaminidase (NAG), tumor necrosis factor alpha (TNF-α) and vascular endothelial growth factor (VEGF) in peripheral and menstrual blood in women with (n=10) and without (n=7) endometriosis. NAG and MPO activities were evaluated by enzymatic methods, whereas TNF-α and VEGF by immunoassay. No significant differences were found for these markers, neither in menstrual nor in peripheral blood between groups. Menstrual blood NAG (P=0.039) and MPO (P=0.0117) activities in the endometriosis group were significantly higher than in peripheral blood. NAG and MPO presented positive linear correlation in peripheral (P=0.07; r=0.641) and menstrual blood (P=0.01; r=0.603). These findings point to the existence of an increased local inflammatory activity in women with endometriosis. Interleukin-6- and tumour necrosis factor alpha-mediated expression of hepatocyte growth factor by stromal cells and its involvement in the growth of endometriosis.We investigated the expression of the hepatocyte growth factor (HGF) gene and protein by the stromal cells derived from women with or without endometriosis and its regulation by interleukin-6 (IL-6) and tumour necrosis factor alpha (TNFalpha).Stromal cells immunoreactive to vimentin were isolated from the eutopic and ectopic endometrium of 18 infertile women with endometriosis and 12 women without endometriosis. The production of HGF in the culture media of basal and IL-6- or TNFalpha-stimulated stromal cells was examined with an enzyme-linked immunosorbent assay. The mRNA expression of HGF and its receptor c-Met in the stroma was investigated by RT-PCR. The localization of HGF and c-Met in isolated stromal cells and in intact tissue was examined by immunohistochemistry. The effect of HGF on the growth of stromal cells alone or in combination with IL-6 or TNFalpha was examined in a bromodeoxyuridine (BrdU) incorporation study.The production of HGF in the culture medium of stromal cells was significantly increased after single or combined treatment with either IL-6 or TNFalpha when compared with non-treated cells. The production of HGF by stromal cells derived from the eutopic endometrium of women with endometriosis was significantly higher than that of cells from women without endometriosis. This effect was paralleled by increased expression of HGF and c-Met mRNA, as demonstrated by RT-PCR. The BrdU incorporation study indicated that the addition of HGF enhanced the growth of endometrial and endometriotic stroma alone or in combination with IL-6 or TNFalpha.IL-6 and TNFalpha are involved in the production of HGF by endometrial stromal cells and may be involved in the growth of endometriosis by an autocrine mechanism.Endometrial osteopontin mRNA expression and plasma osteopontin levels are increased in patients with endometriosis.The aim of this study was to evaluate osteopontin (OPN) mRNA expression in eutopic endometrium and plasma OPN levels in patients with endometriosis.A total of 79 patients with histologically confirmed endometriosis and 43 patients without endometriosis participated in this study. OPN mRNA expression in endometrial tissues was measured by real-time quantitative polymerase chain reaction (PCR) and plasma concentrations of OPN were quantified using a specific commercial sandwich enzyme-linked immunosorbent assays (ELISA).Osteopontin mRNA expression in endometrial tissue was significantly higher in women with endometriosis than in controls (P = 0.010). The mean plasma levels of OPN (mean +/- S.E.M.) in patients with endometriosis and controls were 407.31 +/- 37.80 ng/mL and 165.84 +/- 19.29 ng/mL, respectively (P < 0.001). Receiver operating characteristic (ROC) analysis for plasma OPN revealed an area under the curve (AUC) of 0.894, with a sensitivity of 93.0%, specificity of 72.4%, positive likelihood ratio of 3.37, and negative likelihood ratio of 0.1 using a cut-off value of 167.68 ng/mL.Osteopontin may be involved in the pathogenesis of endometriosis and plasma OPN may be a useful non-invasive marker for the diagnosis of endometriosis.Identification of biomarkers for endometriosis in eutopic endometrial cells from patients with endometriosis using a proteomics approach.Endometriosis is a gynecological disease defined as the presence of endometrial tissue outside the uterine cavity, which is caused by various factors. Proteomic analysis of two sets of eutopic endometrial cells collected from the menstrual blood of females with (n=6; n=3) or without (n=6; n=3) endometriosis was performed to identify novel potential biomarkers for endometriosis. The data revealed that samples from endometriosis patients had stem cell characteristics, as they had higher mRNA expression levels of octamer-binding transcription factor 4 (Oct-4), C-X-C chemokine receptor type 4 (CXCR4), SRY-box containing gene 2 (SOX2) and mesenchymal-epithelial transition factor (MET) compared with that of the normal controls. Three proteins, collapsin response mediator protein 2 (CRMP2), ubiquitin carboxyl-terminal hydrolase isozyme L1 (UCH-L1) and myosin regulatory light polypeptide 9 (MYL9), were simultaneously identified from the two sets of samples from females with or without endometriosis by two-dimensional electrophoresis (2-DE). A difference in CRMP2 expression was confirmed with western blotting. Taken together, the results suggest that CRMP2 plays a role in the pathogenesis of endometriosis.[Expressions of matrix metalloproteinase-9 and tissue inhibitor of metalloproteinase-1 in ectopic and eutopic endometrium].To study the expression of matrix metalloproteinase-9(MMP-9) and tissue inhibitor of metalloproteinase-1 (TIMP-1) in ectopic and eutopic endometrium in patients with endometriosis.The expressions of MMP-9 and TIMP-1 in ectopic and eutopic endometrium were detected by immunohistochemistry streptavidin-biotin peroxidase (SP) method in 45 patients with endometriosis (study group) and in 32 patients with uterine fibroid (control group).In the ectopic and eutopic endometrium of group and in the control group endometrium, the expression of MMP-9 was respectively 0.381, 0.336 and 0.276; the expression of TIMP-1 was respectively 0.239, 0.253, 0.267. As a result, the ratio of MMP-9/TIMP-1 in ectopic and eutopic endometrium of study group and in the control group endometrium was respectively 1.594, 1.293, 1.034. The difference of MMP-9, MMP-9/TIMP-1 in ectopic and eutopic and the control group endometrium was markedly significant (P < 0.01 or P < 0.05). The difference of the expression of TIMP-1 between ectopic and the control group endometrium was also markedly significant (P < 0.01). Higher expression of MMP-9 and lower expression of TIMP-1 in ectopic endometrium and higher expression of MMP-9 in eutopic endometrium occurred in the whole menses period, in which higher expression of MMP-9 in ectopic endometrium than in eutopic endometrium only took place in proliferative phase.The change of expression of MMP-9 and TIMP-1 in ectopic endometrium may be related to the pathogenesis of endometriosis.High density of small nerve fibres in the functional layer of the endometrium in women with endometriosis.Endometriosis is a common gynaecological disease and is frequently associated with recurrent and serious pelvic pain such as dysmenorrhoea and dyspareunia, but the mechanisms by which these symptoms are generated are not well understood.Histological sections of endometrial tissue were prepared from endometrial curettings and hysterectomies performed on women with endometriosis (n=25 and n=10, respectively) and without endometriosis (n=47 and n=35, respectively). These were stained immunohistochemically for the highly specific polyclonal rabbit anti-protein gene product 9.5 (PGP9.5) and monoclonal mouse anti-neurofilament protein (NF) to demonstrate both myelinated and unmyelinated nerve fibres.Small nerve fibres were identified throughout the basal and functional layers of the endometrium in all endometriosis patients, but were not seen in the functional layer of the endometrium in any of the women without endometriosis (P<0.001). NF-immunoreactive nerve fibres were present in the basal layer in all endometriosis patients but not in non-endometriosis patients, with one exception (P<0.001).Small nerve fibres detected in the functional layer in all women with endometriosis may have important implications for understanding the generation of pain in these patients. The presence of nerve fibres in an endometrial biopsy may be a novel surrogate marker of clinical endometriosis.The expression profile of micro-RNA in endometrium and endometriosis and the influence of ovarian steroids on their expression.MicroRNAs (miRNAs), through mRNA degradation or repression, act as key regulator of gene expression. Our aim was to identify specific miRNAs that are expressed in endometrium of women with and without endometriosis. We profiled the expression of 287 miRNAs in paired eutopic and ectopic endometrium and isolated endometrial cells using microarray and validated the expression of selected miRNAs using real-time PCR. On the basis of global normalization, 65 of these miRNAs were identified to be expressed above the threshold levels set during the analysis in the endometrium of women without endometriosis with a progressive decline in expression in paired eutopic and ectopic endometrium. Statistical analysis (ANOVA) identified 48 of these miRNAs as differentially expressed among these tissues and 32 miRNAs between isolated endometrial stromal cell (ESC) and glandular epithelial cell (GEC) (P < 0.05). The expression of hsa-miR20a, hsa-miR21, hsa-miR26a, hsa-miR18a, hsa-miR206, hsa-miR181a and hsa-miR142-5p, predicted to target many genes, including TGF-betaR2, ERalpha, ERbeta and PR, respectively, was validated in these tissues and cells using real-time PCR. Treatment of ESC and GEC with 17beta-estradiol and medroxyprogesterone acetate (10(-8) M) differentially regulated the expression of hsa-miR20a, hsa-miR21 and hsa-miR26a, which in part reversed following co-treatment with ICI-182780 and RU-486 (10(-6) M), respectively (P < 0.05). In conclusion, we provided evidence for the expression of a number of differentially expressed miRNAs in eutopic/ectopic endometrium and isolated endometrial cells, opening up the possibility that aberrant/altered expression of some miRNAs whose expression is regulated by the ovarian steroids may influence the expression of specific target genes with central roles in normal endometrial cellular activities and pathogenesis of endometriosis.[Expression of vascular endothelial growth factor receptors in the ectopic and eutopic endometrium of women with endometriosis].To study the localization and expression of the vascular endothelial growth factor receptors (VEGFR) Fms-like tyrosine kinase (Flt-1) and kinase insert domain-containing receptor (KDR) in human ectopic and eutopic endometrium of patients with endometriosis.Specimens of endometriosis patients, aged (38 +/- 8) years, including 37 specimens of entopic endometrium, 34 specimens of ovarian chocolate cyst, 34 specimens of ovarian chocolate cyst, 15 specimens of red peritoneal endometriosis lesions, and 4 abdominal wall endometriosis lesions were collected. Specimens of endometrium of 33 patients with other gynecological diseases, aged (36 +/- 8) years, were collected during operation and used as controls. Immunohistochemistry was used to detect the location and expression of Flt-1 and KDR protein in different tissues. Western blotting was used to detect the protein expression of Flt-1 and KDR protein in different tissues. The mRNA expressions of Flt-1 and KDR were detected by RT-PCR.Flt-1 and KDR were expressed in the endometrial glandular epithelium and stromal cells besides the endometrial blood vessels. The positive expression rate of Flt-1 and KDR in the ectopic endometrium of endometriosis patients were 94.3% and 91.4% respectively, both significantly higher than those in the ovarian endometrial cyst (74.3% and 77.1% respectively, both P < 0.05), and similar to those in the eutopic endometrium of the endometriosis patients (93.8% and 90.6% respectively, both P > 0.05). In the eutopic endometrium of the endometriosis patients, the Flt-1 mRNA expression level was 2.4 +/- 1.2 and the Flt-1 protein expression level was 31 +/- 17, and the KDR mRNA expression level was 3.0 +/- 1.4 and the KDR protein expression level was 36 +/- 24, all significantly higher than those in the ovarian endometrial cyst (1.5 +/- 0.9 and 1.8 +/- 1.0 for the Flt-1 and KDR mRNA expressions, and 17 +/- 6 and 20 +/- 11 for the Flt-1 and KDR protein expressions, all P < 0.05), and similar to those in the eutopic endometrium of the non-endometriosis patients (1.9 +/- 0.8 and 2.3 +/- 1.3 for the Flt-1 and KDR mRNA expressions, and 24 +/- 18 and 25 +/- 16 for the Flt-1 and KDR protein expressions, all P > 0.05)VEGF may play certain biological role in the development of endometriosis through VEGFR (Flt-1 and KDR). The expression of Flt-1 and KDR in the endometriotic lesion appears to be associated with neovascualization.Alteration of focal adhesion kinase expression in eutopic endometrium of women with endometriosis.To investigate whether focal adhesion kinase (FAK) expression is altered in eutopic endometrium of women with endometriosis.Experimental study using human endometrial tissue.Academic research center.Women with or without endometriosis who were undergoing surgery for benign indications.Endometrial biopsy.Expression of FAK was assessed by immunohistochemistry, Western blotting analysis, and reverse-transcription polymerase chain reaction.At secretory phase, the average level of endometrial FAK expression of women with endometriosis was significantly higher than that of controls, but no significant difference was found between the two groups at proliferative phase. There was a positive correlation between FAK expression in secretory endometrial tissues and disease stage and pelvic pain in women with endometriosis. Furthermore, the endometrial FAK protein expression varied with the serum E(2) at proliferative phase and with the ratio of E(2) to P at secretory phase.The study showed a significant increase of FAK expression in the secretory endometrial tissues of women with endometriosis, a relationship between FAK expression and disease stage, pelvic pain, and serum steroid hormones. Those results suggest that FAK may play a role in the pathogenesis of endometriosis and be regulated by steroid hormones.Expression of neuronal markers in the endometrium of women with and those without endometriosis.How do the expression patterns of neuronal markers differ in the endometrium of women with and without endometriosis?The neuronal markers, PGP9.5, NGFp75 and VR1, are expressed in the endometrium at levels that do not differ between women with and without endometriosis.Aberrant neuronal growth within the uterus may contribute to abnormal fertility and uterine dysfunction. However, controversy still exists as to whether aberrant innervation in the endometrium is associated with gynaecological pathology such as endometriosis. This may reflect the use of subjective methods such as histology to assess the innervation of the endometrium. We, therefore, employed a quantitative method, western blotting, to study markers of endometrial innervation in the presence and absence of endometriosis.This study included 45 women undergoing laparoscopic examination for the diagnosis of endometriosis. Endometrial samples were analysed by western blot for the expression of neuronal and neurotrophic markers, PGP9.5, VR1 and NGFp75.Endometrial pipelle biopsies were obtained from patients with (n = 20, study group) and without (n = 25, control group) endometriosis. Tissue was analysed by immunohistochemistry and western blot analysis for the expression of pan-neuronal marker, PGP9.5, sensory nociceptive marker, TPVR1, and low-affinity neurotrophic growth factor receptor, NGFRp75.PGP9.5, NGFp75 and VR1 were expressed in the endometrium of women, independent of the presence of endometriosis. Furthermore, the expression level of PGP9.5, VR1 and NGFp75 did not alter between the two cohorts of women.Studies of this nature are subject to the heterogeneous nature of patient population and tissue samples despite attempts to standardize these parameters. Hence, further studies using similar methodology will be required to confirm our results.Our results highlight that sensory neuronal markers are present in women with and without endometriosis. Future work will assess what the targets of the endometrial nerves are and investigate their function, their impact on endometrial biology and, in particular, whether aberrant neuronal function, rather than the mere presence of neuronal function, could be the root cause of subfertility and/or pain affecting many endometriosis sufferers. Our results do not, however, confirm the previous paradigm of increased innervation in the endometrium of women with endometriosis, nor the use of nerve cell detection from pipelle biopsies to diagnose endometriosis.Localization of matrix metalloproteinase-2 in uterine endometrium and ectopic implants.We performed an immunohistochemical study on paraffin-embedded tissues to evaluate the invasion pattern of endometriotic implants by determination of matrix metalloproteinase (gelatinase A) expression. Endometriotic tissues (n=32) and uterine endometria (n=18) of patients with endometriosis and uterine endometria of normal-menstruating women without endometriosis (n=11) were examined. Endometriotic tissues showed statistically significantly stronger staining compared with uterine endometria. However, we did not find differences in staining between uterine endometrium of women with endometriosis and normal controls. Compared to uterine endometrium, ectopic endometrium has a significantly higher capacity to produce the latent forms (72 kD) of gelatinase A. This leads to the conclusion that endometriotic implants express the protease enabling the invasion of surrounding tissue.Inflammatory changes of the endometrium in patients with minimal-to-moderate endometriosis.To investigate the endometrium of normal patients for chemotactic activity to neutrophils and macrophages and compare these findings with those of patients with endometriosis.Endometrial biopsies from patients with and without endometriosis were analyzed for chemotactic activity throughout the menstrual cycle. Glands and stroma of luteal samples were isolated to determine the source of this activity. Infiltrating cells to the endometrium were identified by immunohistochemistry with the use of the monoclonal antibody OKM1.Luteal endometrial samples from normal patients had higher chemotactic activity than samples from the proliferative phase; this was true for both cells types studied: macrophages, 84 versus 10 and neutrophils, 74 versus 11. Patients with endometriosis had high chemotactic activity in both proliferative and luteal biopsies: macrophages, 73 +/- 9 versus 78 +/- 1 and neutrophils, 41 +/- 18 versus 63 +/- 26. Stromal cells from luteal biopsies demonstrated a higher chemotactic activity than the epithelial component. Immunohistochemistry staining identified the infiltrating cells as macrophages.Extracts from endometrium of normal patients contain chemotactic activity for neutrophils and macrophages; this activity is higher in the secretory phase of the cycle. Endometriosis patients had high chemotactic activity throughout the menstrual cycle. Separation of the endometrial tissue into stroma and the glandular epithelium indicated that the stromal cells are the source of this factor.Calpain5 expression is decreased in endometriosis and regulated by HOXA10 in human endometrial cells.Calpains have been implicated in the regulation of apoptosis. Here, we identified Calpain5 as a target of HOXA10 transcriptional regulation in endometrial cells as well as its aberrant regulation in endometriosis. Histologically confirmed biopsies of endometriosis were obtained from 20 women. Eutopic endometrium was collected by endometrial biopsy from 30 controls and from the 20 subjects with endometriosis. First trimester decidual samples were obtained from five subjects at the time of pregnancy termination. Immunohistochemistry was used to identify Calpain5 expression. Calpain5 was expressed in endometrial stromal and glandular cells throughout the menstrual cycle and in decidua. Calpain5 protein expression was decreased in both stromal and glandular cells from women with endometriosis compared with that of fertile controls. Human endometrial stromal and epithelial cell lines were transfected with pcDNA/HOXA10, HOXA10 siRNA or respective controls. Quantitative real-time RT-PCR was performed to determine expression of HOXA10 and Calpain5 in each group. Transfection of HESC cells with an HOXA10 expression construct led to increased Calpain5 expression, whereas transfection with siRNA resulted in decreased expression. In conclusion, Calpain5 expression is regulated by HOXA10. Calpain5 expression was decreased in endometriosis likely as a result of decreased HOXA10 expression. Decreased apoptosis in endometrial cells may promote the development of endometriosis through a pathway involving HOXA10, Calpain5 and caspase.Detection of mitochondrial biomarkers in eutopic endometria of endometriosis using surface-enhanced laser desorption/ionization time-of-flight mass spectrometry.To detect specific mitochondrial proteins in eutopic endometrial samples from women with and without endometriosis and to build diagnostic models.Eutopic endometrial samples from women with endometriosis (excluding adenomyosis) and women with benign indications as control were studied by using surface-enhanced laser desorption/ionization time-of-flight mass spectrometry protein-chip technology. After finding the biomarkers, the diagnostic model was evaluated and validated by leave-one cross-validation.Collaborative investigation in an academic research environment.Twenty-four patients with endometriosis (excluding adenomyosis) and 29 patients with benign indications as control.Surgical excision of eutopic endometrial biopsy of patients with endometriosis and controls.Mitochondrial protein expression.Seventy-eight qualified mitochondrial protein peaks were detected, ten of them had a significant difference. Three combined potential biomarkers, with mass-to-charge ratios (m/z) of 15,334, 15,128, and 16,069, were found, and the diagnostic system distinguished endometriosis from control samples with a specificity of 86.2% and a sensitivity of 87.5%.We discovered potential mitochondrial biomarkers of eutopic endometrium in endometriosis and set up a diagnostic model. Further identification of the proteins we found will help to explain pathology, new diagnoses, and therapeutic approaches for endometriosis.Macrophage migration inhibitory factor expression in the intrauterine endometrium of women with endometriosis varies with disease stage, infertility status, and pelvic pain.To evaluate the concentrations of macrophage migration inhibitory factor (MIF) in the eutopic endometrial tissue of women with and without endometriosis.Retrospective study using ELISA to measure MIF concentrations in total endometrial tissue proteins extracts.Gynecology clinic and human reproduction research laboratory.Forty-five women with endometriosis and 25 normal women.Endometrial biopsies were obtained a few days before laparoscopy.Concentrations of MIF in tissue protein extracts.Levels of MIF were significantly higher in women with endometriosis, increased with disease stage, and were cycle phase dependent. Of note is the significant increase in MIF levels occurring in the midsecretory phase in women with endometriosis as compared with controls, particularly in infertile patients, as well as in the late secretory phase preceding menstruation. Furthermore, MIF levels seemed to be particularly elevated in women with endometriosis who were infertile and who suffered from pelvic pain.This study showed a significant increase in MIF concentrations in the intrauterine endometrial tissue of women with endometriosis, occurring at specific phases of the menstrual cycle, a relationship between MIF concentrations and disease stage, and a possible role for this factor in endometriosis-associated pain and infertility.Aberrant expression of glutathione peroxidase in eutopic and ectopic endometrium in endometriosis and adenomyosis.To determine the expression of glutathione peroxidase (GPx) in the eutopic and ectopic endometria during the menstrual cycle in endometriosis and adenomyosis.Immunohistochemical identification of GPx in endometrial tissues identified using the polyclonal antibody.Department of obstetrics and gynecology in a university hospital.One hundred fourteen women divided into three groups: 33 patients with endometriosis, 34 patients with adenomyosis, and 47 fertile control subjects.Endometrium biopsied throughout the menstrual cycle.Endometrial cells: semiquantitative immunostaining (evaluation nomogram) score.The analyses revealed phase-dependent changes of GPx expression in the surface and glandular epithelia in the eutopic endometrium during the menstrual cycle in the fertile controls, i.e., the expression was weak in the early proliferative phase, gradually increased, was most marked in the early secretory phase, and decreased thereafter. The expression of GPx in the eutopic endometrium in endometriosis lost the variation during the menstrual cycle. The expression of GPx in adenomyosis was persistently marked over the control levels throughout the menstrual cycle.The aberrant expression of GPx in the eutopic endometrium throughout the cycle suggests a pathological role in endometriosis and adenomyosis.Analysis of aromatase and 17beta-hydroxysteroid dehydrogenase type 2 messenger ribonucleic acid expression in deep endometriosis and eutopic endometrium using laser capture microdissection.To investigate mRNA expression of aromatase and 17beta-hydroxysteroid dehydrogenase type 2 (17betaHSD2) in epithelial and stromal cells from eutopic and ectopic endometrium of patients with deep endometriosis.Prospective study.University hospital.Patients with deep endometriosis and fertile women with macroscopically normal pelvic cavities.During surgery, 30 endometrial and 16 endometriotic samples were obtained from 30 patients with deep endometriosis. Control endometrial samples were obtained from 24 fertile women with macroscopically normal pelvic cavities who underwent laparoscopic tubal ligation or reversal of tubal sterilization. Epithelial cells and stromal cells from endometrial or endometriotic tissues were microdissected using laser capture microdissection.Expression levels of aromatase and 17betaHSD2 mRNA in microdissected epithelial and stromal cells were determined using quantitative real-time reverse transcriptase polymerase chain reaction.Aromatase mRNA expression was significantly higher in epithelial cells than in stromal cells in both eutopic and ectopic endometrium obtained from endometriosis patients. In the ectopic endometrium of 8 patients (8/16, 50%), 17betaHSD2 expression was not detected in either epithelial or stromal cells. In eutopic endometrium from endometriosis patients, 17betaHSD2 expression in epithelial cells was significantly increased during the early, middle, and late secretory phases compared with the late proliferative phase, whereas no significant cyclical difference was detected in control endometrium.Local estrogen concentration may be much higher in epithelial cells than in stromal cells in deep endometriotic tissue.A predictive model for endometriosis.Aromatase is the key enzyme in the process of estrogen biosynthesis from the precursor androgen. Recently, aromatase has been found to be aberrantly expressed in eutopic endometrium of patients suffering from endometriosis. This finding has prompted speculation about the contribution of this enzyme to the prediction of this disease.We prospectively aimed to evaluate whether endometrial biopsy, prior to laparoscopy in symptomatic women to screen for the presence of aromatase by real-time RT-PCR and immunohistochemistry, combined with select patients' characteristics, is of value to predict endometriosis.Of 48 consecutive symptomatic and eligible patients, 25 (52.1%) exhibited endometriosis and 23 (47.9%) were disease-free. A multiple logistic regression model revealed that 95.5% of patients whose eutopic endometrium was found to be positive for aromatase mRNA as well as immunohistochemically detected protein and who were additionally suffering from moderate to severe dysmenorrhoea (visual analogue scale score >4/10) exhibited endometriosis at laparoscopy.These findings provide direct evidence that screening for eutopic endometrial aromatase in combination with clinical data could be of discriminative value in the prediction of disease.Increased telomerase activity and human telomerase reverse transcriptase mRNA expression in the endometrium of patients with endometriosis.Endometriosis is considered a frequent, benign disease with the ability to undergo neoplastic processes. The aim of this study was to evaluate the limitless replication potential of the endometrium in patients with endometriosis by examining human telomerase reverse transcriptase (hTERT) mRNA expression and telomerase activity.Endometrium samples from 30 endometriosis patients and 30 patients without endometriosis were obtained via endometrial biopsy. The expression of hTERT mRNA was determined by real-time RT-PCR assay, and telomerase activity was measured by telomerase repeat amplification protocol (TRAP) assay.The mean normalized hTERT (N hTERT) mRNA level was significantly higher in the endometriosis than in the control group (P = 0.013). The mean hTERT mRNA levels during the proliferative phase and during the secretory phase were higher in the endometriosis group than in the control group, although the difference was only significant for the secretory phase (P = 0.036). We found a prominent difference in endometrial telomerase activity between moderate-to-severe endometriosis and the control group (P = 0.048). The levels of hTERT mRNA and telomerase activity increased as the disease became more severe (P = 0.038, P = 0.016).This study showed the overexpression of hTERT mRNA and telomerase activity in the endometrium of endometriosis patients. These finding suggest that replication potential of endometrial cells may have an important role in the pathogenesis of endometriosis.Adenosine triphosphate-binding cassette transporter G2 expression in endometriosis and in endometrium from patients with and without endometriosis.To investigate adenosine triphosphate (ATP)-binding cassette transporter G2 (ABCG2) expression in endometriosis and in samples of endometrium from patients with and without endometriosis.Prospective study.University hospital.Patients with and without endometriosis.Endometrial and endometriotic tissues obtained throughout the menstrual cycle.Density of ABCG2(+) microvessels, density of CD31(+) microvessels.No statistically significant differences in the density of ABCG2(+) microvessels were observed between endometrium of patients with and without endometriosis in the proliferative phase and early, middle, and late secretory phases. The density of ABCG2(+) microvessels was statistically significantly higher in the menstrual endometrium of patients with endometriosis compared with patients without endometriosis. The density of ABCG2(+) microvessels was reduced in the ectopic endometrium compared with matched eutopic endometrium except in cases of deep infiltrating endometriosis. The density of ABCG2(+) microvessels was statistically significantly higher in deep infiltrating endometriosis compared with ovarian endometriosis and red and black peritoneal lesions throughout the menstrual cycle.ABCG2 is strongly expressed in the endothelial cells of microvessels of eutopic endometrium, and the density of ABCG2(+) microvessels is reduced in ectopic endometrium except in cases of deep infiltrating endometriosis. ABCG2(+) microvessels may represent an integral part of the pathophysiology of deep infiltrating endometriosis.The depolarized expression of the alpha-6 integrin subunit in the endometria of women with endometriosis.The current study sought to compare the endometrial localization of the integrin subunit alpha-6 in women with endometriosis and women without the disease. Alpha-6 integrins have an important function, not only in the attachment of cells to the extracellular matrix and laminin, but they also serve as inductors of cell migration and invasion, depending on their pattern of expression in the cell membrane.The endometriosis group consisted of 32 women with a confirmed diagnosis of endometriosis by laparoscopy or laparotomy. The control group consisted of 20 women not having endometriosis or any other gynecologic disease at laparoscopy. Endometria were obtained by biopsy. Immunohistochemical techniques were used to assess alpha-6 localization. In each section, the percentage of positive cells and the localization of expression were evaluated.All glandular cells expressed alpha-6 in all of the samples but presented two different patterns, either only in the basal side of the cells (polarized) or also in other sides of the cells (depolarized). The percentage of samples showing depolarized expression was significantly higher in the endometriosis group (66.6% vs 15.8%, chi2 =12.09, P = .001).The endometria of women with endometriosis more frequently show a depolarized expression of integrin subunit alpha-6, a characteristic usually found in highly proliferating cells with migrating and invasive abilities.[Study on expression of estrogen receptor isoforms in eutopic and ectopic endometrium of ovarian endometriosis].To investigate the distribution of ER isoforms in endometriosis and eutopic endometrium.Tissue samples of patients with ovarian endometriosis, treated in People's Liberation Army General Hospital from January 2004 to December 2006, were retrieved. A total of 60 cases of ovarian endometriotic cysts with their corresponding eutopic endometrium (30 cases of proliferation phase and 30 of secretary phase eutopic endometrium) and 30 cases of normal endometrium (15 proliferative and 15 secretary phase endometrial samples respectively) were included. Expressions of ERalpha and ERbeta were analyzed using immunohistochemistry and the expression ratio was statistically analyzed by using SPSS 12.0 software.Expressions of both ERalpha and ERbeta in epithelial cells were positively correlated with that of the stromal cells. The expression of ERalpha in eutopic endometrium (73.3% in epithelium and 76.7% in stroma) was significantly higher than that in ovarian endometriotic cysts (43.3% in epithelium and 46.7% in stroma), or normal control (56.7% in epithelium and 50.0% in stroma, respectively, each P < 0.05. However, the expression of ERbeta (90.0% in epithelium and 76.7% in stroma) was higher in ovarian endometriotic cysts than that in the eutopic endometrium (68.0% in epithelium and 63.3% in stroma respectively, P < 0.05), and ERbeta expression in eutopic endometrium was higher than that in the normal control endometrium (36.7% in epithelium and 26.7% in stroma, respectively, P < 0.05). The expressions of both ERalpha and ERbeta changed periodically in eutopic and normal endometrium, whereas ERalpha and ERbeta level were less variable in the ectopic endometrium. The expression of ERbeta was statistically higher than that of ERalpha (P < 0.05) in ectopic endometrium, whereas no significant difference was seen between the two isoforms in the eutopic or normal endometrium.Both ERalpha and ERbeta have higher expression levels in eutopic endometrium of patients with ovarian endometriotic cysts. ERbeta is predominantly expressed in endometriotic cysts, where the expression of ERalpha is limited. The different distribution of ERalpha and ERbeta may play an important role in the development of ovarian endometriosis.Analysis of matrix metalloproteinase-7 expression in eutopic and ectopic endometrium samples from patients with different forms of endometriosis.The objective of the present study was to expand our understanding of the role of matrix metalloproteinase-7 (MMP-7) in the pathophysiology of endometriosis.Expression levels of MMP-7 mRNA and protein in the eutopic endometrium and ectopic endometrium of patients with different forms of endometriosis were measured with immunohistochemistry and real-time RT-PCR. Endometrial tissues from patients with uterine myomas and those with macroscopically normal pelvic cavities were included as comparison groups. The real-time RT-PCR utilized endometrial cells isolated by laser capture microdissection. MMP-7 immunostained cells were quantified using a computerized image analysis system.MMP-7 expression levels were significantly higher in the endometrial epithelial cells from patients with deep infiltrating endometriosis compared with those isolated from the endometria of patients with only superficial peritoneal endometriosis, uterine myomas or normal endometrium, in the proliferative, late secretory and menstrual phases. MMP-7 protein expression was detected in the ectopic endometrial epithelial cells of 13 samples of deep infiltrating endometriosis (24.5%), 11 samples of ovarian endometriosis (28.6%), 23 samples of black peritoneal lesions (76.7%) and 24 samples of red peritoneal lesions (100%). MMP-7 protein expression in epithelial cells was significantly higher in red peritoneal lesions compared with that of deep infiltrating endometriosis, ovarian endometriosis and black peritoneal lesions, in all phases of the menstrual cycle.These findings suggest that MMP-7 expression levels vary significantly among the different forms of endometriosis.Pyrrolidine dithiocarbamate inhibits nuclear factor-κB pathway activation, and regulates adhesion, migration, invasion and apoptosis of endometriotic stromal cells.The activation of nuclear factor-κB (NF-κB) has been implicated in the development and progression of endometriosis. The aim of this study is to investigate the potential application of pyrrolidine dithiocarbamate (PDTC), a potent NF-κB inhibitor, in the treatment of endometriosis. NF-κB-DNA-binding activity, IκB phosphorylation and expression of nuclear p65 protein in endometriotic ectopic stromal cells (EcSCs), endometriotic eutopic stromal cells (EuSCs) and normal endometrial stromal cells (NESCs) were detected by electrophoretic mobility shift assay and western blot analysis. Adhesion, migration, invasion and apoptosis of EcSCs were observed by means of adhesion, migration, invasion and terminal deoxynucleotidyl transferase-mediated dUDP nick-end labeling assay, respectively. Gene and protein expressions of CD44s, matrix metalloproteinase (MMP)-2, MMP-9 and survivin in EcSCs were measured by RT-PCR and western blot analysis. The results showed that PDTC in the absence or presence of interleukin (IL)-1β showed stronger inhibitory effects on NF-κB-DNA-binding activity, IκB phosphorylation and expression of nuclear p65 protein in EcSCs than those in EuSCs or NESCs. PDTC enhanced apoptosis, and suppressed IL-1β-induced cellular adhesion, migration and invasion of EcSCs. Pretreatment of EcSCs with PDTC attenuated IL-1β-induced expressions of CD44s, MMP-2, MMP-9 and survivin at gene and protein levels. All these findings suggest that PDTC induces apoptosis and down-regulates adhesion, migration and invasion of EcSCs through the suppression of various molecules. Therefore, PDTC could be used as a therapeutic agent for the treatment of endometriosis.The endometria of patients with endometriosis show higher expression of class I human leukocyte antigen than the endometria of healthy women.To compare the expression of class I human leukocyte antigen (HLA I) in endometrial samples from patients with and without endometriosis.Cross-sectional study.Acute-care teaching hospital in Barcelona, Spain.The endometriosis group included 32 patients for whom the only diagnosis during an operation was endometriosis. The control group included 20 women who underwent a laparoscopy and in whom no evidence of endometriosis or any other genital disease was seen.Samples of endometrium were obtained by curettage and immediately frozen. A pan-HLA I mouse antihuman IgG2a monoclonal antibody was used for immunohistochemical study.Frequency of positive glandular and stromal cells was evaluated in each section.A significantly higher expression of HLA I in the endometriosis group than in controls, both in the glandular cells (median 100% vs. 80%) and in the stromal cells (median 60% vs. 20%), was observed.Patients with endometriosis had a significantly higher expression of HLA I molecules in endometrial cells than did the controls. This could be a possible explanation for their higher resistance to natural killer cytolysis.Post-translational modifications and protein-specific isoforms in endometriosis revealed by 2D DIGE.Endometriosis is a chronic disorder affecting approximately 10% of women in whom endometrial tissue forms painful lesions outside the uterus. It has a major impact on their physical, mental and social well-being but has no known cure, and there is no nonsurgical means of diagnosis. We have used a proteomic approach to identify proteins with altered abundance in the eutopic endometrium of endometriosis patients in the midsecretory phase of the menstrual cycle. 2D-differential in gel electrophoresis (DIGE) and mass spectrometry identified 20 proteins that were present at different levels in endometriosis patients (p < 0.05), many of which have not previously been associated with endometriosis. Protein abundance changes did not correlate well with published gene array data, emphasizing the extensive post-translational modification that occurs in this tissue. Abundance or localization changes in endometrial tissue were validated by immunohistochemistry and Western blotting for three proteins, vimentin (VIM), peroxiredoxin 6 (PRDX6), and ribonuclease/angiogenin inhibitor 1 (RNH1), while observed changes could not be confirmed for coronin 1A (CORO1A) or transgelin (TAGLN2). In addition, multiple charge and size isoforms were observed for PDRX6 and vimentin (VIM), and an additional PDRX6 isoform was observed in endometriosis patients that was below the level of detection in healthy women. Biological pathway analysis identified that cytoskeletal remodeling via keratin intermediate filaments, processing of the cystic fibrosis transmembrane receptor (CFTR), the glucocorticoid receptor subunit alpha (GCR), and heat shock factor 1 (HSF1) were all significantly over-represented features in endometriosis patients. This study highlights the highly dynamic nature of endometrial tissue and suggests that considerable post-translational modification of proteins is a key factor in the pathology of endometriosis.Diagnosis of endometrial nerve fibers in women with endometriosis.Recent studies indicated that there is a high density of small nerve fibers in the functional layer of the endometrium in women with endometriosis and that it can be used as a marker to detect endometriosis. In this study, the efficacy assessment of small nerve fibers' density as a diagnostic marker was compared in patients with and without endometriosis.In this study, women with history of pelvic pain and/or infertility who were candidates for laparoscopy or laparotomy in Rassoul hospital (2007-2009) were enrolled. Histological sections of endometrial tissue were prepared from endometrial biopsy from women with endometriosis (n = 12) (1) and without endometriosis (n = 15) (2). Protein gene product 9.5 and neurofilament were evaluated as marker from endometrial biopsies by immunohistochemical methods.There was no statistically significant difference between two groups according to age, body mass index. Nerve fibers were detected in all endometrial biopsies from all women with endometriosis but detected only in three women without endometriosis. The mean density of nerve fibers was 2.2 ± 4.7 mm(-2) in group without endometriosis and) 13.1 ± 3.3 (in group with endometriosis (p < 0.001). Women with endometriosis had significantly higher nerve fiber density in comparison with women without endometriosis.Our findings indicated that endometrial biopsy for detecting density of nerve fibers by usage of protein gene product 9.5, provided a reliable marker for diagnosis of endometriosis.Determination of cathepsins B, D and G concentration in eutopic proliferative endometrium of women with endometriosis by the surface plasmon resonance imaging (SPRI) technique.To determine the concentrations of cathepsins B, D and G in proliferative eutopic endometrium of patients with and without endometriosis, by use of the surface plasmon resonance imaging (SPRI) technique.A total of 55 patients were recruited in the study: 31 patients with endometriosis (stages I-IV) and 24 controls. Endometrial samples were obtained in the first phase of the menstrual cycle from regularly menstruating premenopausal women, prior to laparoscopy, by the use of aspiration biopsy. Endometriosis was appropriately classified according to the Revised American Fertility Society classification and confirmed by histopathology in every case. The SPRI technique was used to determine the concentration of cathepsins B, D and G. To compare the two groups for quantitative data, Mann-Whitney-Wilcoxon's test was used due to the non-normal distribution of the tested variables and normality of distribution was assessed using Shapiro-Wilk W test.The concentration of the three examined cathepsins was higher in the proliferative eutopic endometrium of patients with endometriosis, especially in advanced stages, e.g. III and IV, when compared to healthy individuals. Corresponding median values were, for cathepsin B: [7.93 pmol/mg (min-max 2.82-15.71) vs 1.2 pmol/mg (min-max 0.7-15.49) p=0.0014], for cathepsin D: [1.86 pmol/mg (min-max 0.51-5.4) vs 1.03 pmol/mg (min-max 0.4-2.72) p=0.00041] and for cathepsin G: [0.6 pmol/mg (min-max 0.33-2.51) vs 0.3 pmol/mg (min-max 0.16-1.29) p=0.00051].Increased concentrations of cathepsins B, D and G in the proliferative eutopic endometrium may play a role in the implantation of endometrial tissue outside the uterine cavity.Impaired down-regulation of E-cadherin and beta-catenin protein expression in endometrial epithelial cells in the mid-secretory endometrium of infertile patients with endometriosis.Only a few, small, human studies on E-cadherin and beta-catenin expression in normal cycling human endometrium have been reported. It remains unclear whether expression of these molecules might be altered in the endometrium of infertile patients with endometriosis.The aim of the present study was to investigate E-cadherin and beta-catenin expression in the endometrium of infertile patients with endometriosis, those with uterine fibromas, and patients with unexplained infertility.Expression levels of E-cadherin and beta-catenin mRNA and/or protein in the endometrium of infertile patients with endometriosis (n = 151), those with uterine fibromas (n = 41), patients with unexplained infertility (n = 9), as well as healthy fertile controls (n = 57) were measured. This study utilized laser capture microdissection, real-time RT-PCR, and immunohistochemistry.No significant differences in E-cadherin or beta-catenin mRNA expression in microdissected epithelial cells were observed among the different groups throughout the menstrual cycle. However, very low or no protein expression of E-cadherin, total beta-catenin, or dephosphorylated beta-catenin in luminal and glandular epithelial cells was detected in the mid-secretory endometrium of healthy fertile controls. E-cadherin, total beta-catenin, and dephosphorylated beta-catenin protein expression in the mid-secretory endometrium of infertile patients with endometriosis or unexplained infertility was significantly higher compared to that of healthy fertile controls in both luminal and glandular epithelial cells.These findings suggest that impaired down-regulation of E-cadherin and beta-catenin protein expression, along with Wnt/beta-catenin signaling pathway activation during the window of implantation, might be one of the potential molecular mechanisms of infertility in patients with endometriosis.Epidermal growth factor receptor expression in normal endometrium and endometriosis: an immunohistochemical study.To study epidermal growth factor (EGF) receptor expression in endometrium throughout the menstrual cycle and to compare EGF-receptor expression in endometrium from patients with endometriosis with receptor expression in synchronously sampled endometriosis and in endometrium from healthy women.An immunohistochemical study of receptor expression using murine monoclonal antibodies and timed endometrial and endometriotic biopsies.25 healthy women and 27 patients with a diagnosis of endometriosis.Positive staining for EGF receptors was observed in 24 of 25 samples from normal women and in 26 of 27 endometrial samples from patients with endometriosis. In neither group was there any variation in the intensity of staining throughout the menstrual cycle and both glands and stroma were stained. EGF-receptor expression was observed in the glands of 15 out of 17 endometriotic lesions and in 12 of these biopsies positive staining was also present within endometriotic stroma.This study shows no difference in the intensity of staining of EGF receptors in endometrium throughout the menstrual cycle or between the glands of normal endometrium and those of endometriosis.Nitric oxide synthesis is increased in the endometrial tissue of women with endometriosis.Previous studies have shown that peritoneal macrophages from women with endometriosis produce excess nitric oxide (NO). This study was designed to quantify the amount of NO and determine the expression of endothelial (eNOS) and inducible NO synthases (iNOS) in women with and without endometriosis.An enzyme-linked immunosorbent assay (ELISA) was performed on endometrial tissues obtained from controls (myoma, n = 30) and on eutopic/ectopic endometrial tissues from endometriosis patients (n = 34) to evaluate eNOS and iNOS protein concentrations in these endometrial tissues. A rapid-response chemiluminescence analyser was used to measure NO directly in fresh endometrial tissues.Mean (+/- SEM) levels of NO were significantly increased in the endometrial tissues of women with endometriosis (13.2 +/- 7.8 versus 19.8 +/- 12.6 nmol/g tissue; P = 0.016). Apparently higher levels of NO were found in ectopic compared with eutopic endometrium (P = 0.057). Endometrial tissues of women with endometriosis appeared to contain more iNOS than those of controls (3.6 +/- 2.2 versus 8.6 +/- 12.2 pg/ microg protein; P = 0.06), but no significant difference was found in eNOS levels.Greater amounts of NO and NOS are present in the endometrial tissues of women with endometriosis, implying a possible role for NO in the pathogenesis of endometriosis.Increased expression of stathmin in eutopic endometrium of patients with endometriosis.Stathmin was identified as an endometriosis-related protein by comparative proteomics in our previous study. As a microtubule-destabilizing factor, stathmin was shown to participate in the relay and integration of diverse intracellular signaling pathways involved in cell proliferation, differentiation, and many other cellular activities. To investigate whether stathmin is involved in the pathogenesis of endometriosis, we examined the expression of stathmin in eutopic endometrium of women with or without endometriosis.Eutopic endometrium samples were collected from thirty-six patients who were diagnosed as endometriosis and the nineteen age-matched patients who were confirmed to be free of endometriosis surgically and histologically. The expression of stathmin mRNA was detected by real-time PCR, and its protein was detected by Western blotting and immunohistochemistry.Stathmin was overexpressed in eutopic endometrium of women with endometriosis detected by real-time PCR in mRNA levels and by Western blotting in protein levels, without significant difference between proliferative and secretory phase. Immunohistochemistry showed that stathmin protein was localized in both endometrial glandular and stromal cells throughout the menstrual cycle.Stathmin is overexpressed in endometrium of patients with endometriosis and may play a role in the pathogenesis of endometriosis.Activin-A secretion is increased in the eutopic endometrium from women with endometriosis.Activin is a well-characterised growth and differentiation factor and an important inflammatory mediator. Activin is secreted by normal endometrial glands and stroma and is expressed by endometrial leucocytes. It is also known that the eutopic endometrium from women with endometriosis is functionally different to that from women without endometriosis. In this study, we hypothesise that the endometrial secretion of activin is altered in women with endometriosis.To determine whether the expression of inhibin/activin subunits and the secretion of activin-A is different in eutopic endometrium from women with and without endometriosis.Endometrial biopsies were obtained from premenopausal, regularly menstruating women with and without endometriosis. Staining intensity for the different inhibin/activin subunits was compared in endometrial and endometriotic biopsies. Activin-A secretion was studied using endometrial explants and endometrial glandular and stromal monolayer cell cultures.The alpha- and betaA-subunits of inhibin/activin were more abundant in eutopic glandular cells from patients with minimal to mild endometriosis compared to women without endometriosis. In patients with endometriosis, the betaB-subunit was more abundant in eutopic stromal cells and endometrial leucocytes. Comparison of paired endometrial and endometriotic biopsies from the same patient did not reveal significant differences for any of the inhibin/activin subunits or activin receptors. Activin-A secretion by glandular and stromal endometrial cells was sevenfold and threefold higher, respectively, in women with endometriosis compared to women without endometriosis.The expression of inhibin/activin subunits in eutopic endometrium is altered in women with endometriosis, leading to higher levels of activin-A secretion by both glandular cells and stromal cells.[P450Arom and estrogenic microenvironment of eutopic endometria in endometriosis].Endometriosis, a common gynecologic disorder characterized by endometrial glands and stroma outside the uterus, is diagnosed by direct visualization of peritoneal and ovarian implants during laparoscopy.To study the estrogenic microenvironment in eutopic endometria of women with and without endometriosis.Eutopic endometria, obtained during laparoscopy from 23 women with endometriosis and 20 fertile cyclic women undergoing tubal sterilization, was studied. P450Arom mRNA expression (RT-PCR) was measured. Also, P450Arom activity was assessed measuring testosterone conversion to estradiol and the concentration of this last hormone in cultured endometrial explants.Age and body mass index was similar in both groups studied. Seventy nine percent of endometria from women with endometriosis and in 29.4% from control group expressed P450Arom mRNA (p <0.01). The intensity of the band was higher in secretory endometria from women with endometriosis when compared to controls (p <0.01), but it was similar during the proliferative phase. Estradiol secretion to the culture media by proliferative endometria explants from women with endometriosis was 3-fold higher than secretory endometria (p <0.01) and endometria from control women in both phases. P450Arom activity, in the presence of testosterone, was 7-fold higher in endometrial cultures from women with endometriosis, when compare with the basal culture (p <0.01). However, in endometrial explant cultures from control women, this activity was not statistical different.These results indicate that in women with endometriosis, the microenvironment in the endometria is estrogenic as a consequence of an increased expression and activity of the P450Arom.Immunohistochemical localization of insulin-like growth factor-binding protein-3 in eutopic and ectopic endometrial tissues.To evaluate the expression of insulin-like growth factor-binding protein-3 (IGFBP-3) in the eutopic endometrium and in endometriotic lesions.Retrospective immunohistochemical study.Twenty-five normal women and 39 women with endometriosis.Endometrial and endometriotic tissue biopsies obtained at laparoscopy.Expression of IGFBP-3 assessed by immunohistochemistry.In the endometrium, positive immunostaining of IGFBP-3 was observed both in the stroma and the epithelial glands. The intensity of staining in the glands during the secretory phase was significantly higher in women with endometriosis compared with controls (P = .018). An increased expression of IGFBP-3 over controls was found in stages I and II of the disease (P = .018), whereas in stages III and IV, the difference between controls and women with endometriosis was not significant (P = .300). In endometriotic tissues, a much-marked immunostaining of IGFBP-3 was noted in 90% of the glands and 67% of the stroma without apparent differences related to cycle phase.These data show intense staining of IGFBP-3 in endometriosis lesions and increased expression of the protein in the endometrium of patients with endometriosis compared to controls. This marked expression of IGFBP-3 could be related to its previous finding in the peritoneal fluid and to its potential involvement in the pathophysiology of endometriosis.Detection of aromatase cytochrome P-450 in endometrial biopsy specimens as a diagnostic test for endometriosis.To evaluate the clinical usefulness of examining endometrial biopsy specimens for aromatase cytochrome P-450 as a diagnostic test for endometriosis.Retrospective, case-controlled study.Department of Obstetrics and Gynecology, Kyoto Prefectural University of Medicine, Kyoto, Japan.One hundred five women of reproductive age with normal menstrual cycles underwent endometrial biopsy laparotomy or laparoscopy, and examination of their tissue revealed endometriosis, adenomyosis, and/or leiomyomas. Patients who had cervical carcinoma in situ but no other gynecologic disease were considered to be disease-free.Endometrial biopsy specimens were collected.The expression of aromatase cytochrome P-450 was examined by reverse transcription-polymerase chain reaction and immunohistochemical analysis. The distribution and intensity of the immunostaining was assessed using a semiquantitative index designed H-score.Immunostaining for aromatase cytochrome P-450 was detected in biopsy specimens obtained from patients with endometriosis, adenomyosis, and/or leiomyomas but not in specimens obtained from disease-free patients (H-score <20), with a sensitivity and specificity of 91% and 100%, respectively.The expression of aromatase cytochrome P-450 in biopsy specimens of eutopic endometrium distinguishes between disease-free women and women with endometriosis, adenomyosis, and/or leiomyomas. This technique can be used at outpatient infertility clinics as an initial screening procedure to rule out the presence of estrogen-dependent disease.Aberrant integrin expression in the endometrium of women with endometriosis.Integrins are ubiquitous cell adhesion molecules that undergo dynamic alterations during the normal menstrual cycle in the human endometrium. The alpha v beta 3 vitronectin receptor integrin is expressed in endometrium at the time of implantation, but its presence is delayed in endometrium that is assessed to be out of phase using classical histological features. To investigate the expression of this integrin in women with endometriosis, we assessed the presence of the beta 3-subunit throughout the menstrual cycle in 268 "in-phase" endometrial biopsies, using immunohistochemistry. The beta 3-subunit was expressed on endometrial epithelium after days 19-20 of the menstrual cycle. In 241 women whose biopsies were obtained after day 19, a lack of beta 3 expression was found to be closely related to the diagnosis of endometriosis (by Wilcoxon test, P = 0.02). This defect in integrin expression was associated with nulliparity, inversely related to the stage of disease, and occurred despite the presence of in-phase histological features. In a prospective double blind assessment of this integrin, we found endometrial beta 3 analysis to have a high specificity and positive predictive value as a nonsurgical diagnostic test for minimal and mild endometriosis. In conclusion, aberrant integrin expression in the native endometrium is associated with the finding of endometriosis and may identify some women with decreased cycle fecundity due to defects in uterine receptivity.Proliferative activity of the endometrium throughout the menstrual cycle in infertile women with and without endometriosis.To assess whether changes in endometrial proliferation in patients with endometriosis contribute to ectopic endometrial implantation.Endometrial biopsies from patients with endometriosis were stained immunohistochemically and compared with endometrium of a control group (n = 111). The newly developed monoclonal antibody Ki-S3 was used as a marker of cellular proliferation in surface and glandular epithelia and in stromal cells.Female Infertility Clinic, Research Centre of Obstetrics, Gynecology, and Perinatology, Moscow, Russia, and Institute of Pathology, Christian-Albrechts-University, Kiel, Germany.One hundred thirty-nine women with endometriosis and 111 women without endometriosis, all being infertile.Collecting endometrial samples during diagnostic and therapeutic laparoscopy.Number of proliferating cells in endometrial stroma, glandular, and surface epithelia.Endometrial proliferation showed a characteristic cyclic dependency with greatest activity in the follicular phase. Although epithelial proliferation ceased completely during the luteal phase, the number of proliferating cells in the stroma increased again toward the end of the menstrual cycle after its maximum at ovulation. No significant differences could be found between both investigated groups.Endometriosis is not due to an altered proliferative activity in eutopic endometrium. Proliferating stromal cells at the end of the menstrual cycle may reflect increasing numbers of immunocompetent cells. Endometrium of patients with endometriosis reveals almost the same cyclical changes as endometrium of patients without endometriosis does. Further attention to cells and cell-mediated reactions in the extrauterine milieu is required to elucidate the pathogenesis of endometriosis.Expression of membrane-type 5 matrix metalloproteinase in human endometrium and endometriosis.The metalloproteinases (MMPs) are a family of proteolytic enzymes involved in tissue remodeling and cell migration. Endometrial tissue remodeling proceeds during the menstrual cycle and requires a temporary and spatially balanced expression of several different MMPs. Various members of the MMPs also seem to play an important role in the invasion process of endometriosis; however, so far only a limited number of studies have focused on membrane-associated MMPs.The present study investigated the expression of membrane-type 5 metalloproteinase (MT5-MMP) in the human endometrium and endometriotic lesions by microarray hybridization, real-time polymerase chain reaction (PCR) and immunofluorescence.Both the gene chip expression analyses as well as PCR indicated expression of MT5-MMP in normal human endometrium and strongly elevated transcript levels in most peritoneal endometriosis lesions analyzed. Moreover we detected enhanced MT5-MMP expression in the eutopic endometrium from patients suffering from endometriosis, further supporting a role of MT5-MMP in the formation of endometriosis. Immunohistochemical analysis was used to determine the intracellular localization and tissue distribution of MT5-MMP. While the MT5-MMP antigen expression could be clearly attributed to the membrane of epithelial cells, a highly complex differential immunohistochemical staining of MT5-MMP in the various compartments of endometrial tissue was observed. The strongest staining was seen in luminal epithelial cells, whereas endometrial glands frequently showed partial expression of MT5-MMP.Our microarray analysis and real-time PCR of MT5-MMP transcripts may point to an elevated tissue remodeling and cell migration in endometrium from endometriosis patients as implied by the function of related MMPs.Identification of endometriosis-related genes by representational difference analysis of cDNA.Accumulated evidence reveals that abnormally expressed genes in eutopic endometrium of endometriosis play a critical role in the pathogenesis of endometriosis.Identification of endometriosis-related genes for further revealing the pathogenesis of endometriosis and offering the basis for developing the molecular-targeted diagnosis and therapy of endometriosis.Forty women with endometriosis and forty control women without endometriosis during their secretory phase were selected for this study. cDNA representational difference analysis (cDNA-RDA) was performed to screen the up-regulated genes in eutopic endometrium samples of endometriosis (n = 10) compared with the controls (n = 10). To validate the results, MAT2A, the most abundantly expressed gene, was selected to detect mRNA and protein levels between eutopic endometrium of endometriosis (n = 40) and controls (n = 40) using immunohistochemistry, real-time fluorescent quantitative PCR and Western blotting.Ten up-regulated genes were identified in eutopic endometria of endometriosis compared with controls. Among these genes, COX-2, BRAF, NRAS and CFL1 have already been reported to be associated with the endometriosis in previous studies. MAT2A, SEPT9, ATAD3A and CADM2 have been reported to be involved in other diseases but not in endometriosis. NAA15 and CCDC21 have not reported in any diseases. Further study showed that MAT2A protein was localised in both endometrial glandular and stromal cells. Compared with controls, the mRNA and protein levels of MAT2A were significantly higher in eutopic endometrium of endometriosis (P < 0.05).cDNA-RDA can be used to effectively identify the endometriosis-related genes, which can provide novel experimental data and further understand the pathogenesis of endometriosis.Endometrial estradiol and progesterone receptors in patients with luteal phase defects and endometriosis.Endometrial cytosol estrogen receptors (ERs) and progesterone receptors (PgRs) were quantitated in postovulatory endometrial biopsy samples of patients with luteal phase defect (LPD), those with endometriosis, and normal control subjects. Serum levels of estradiol (E2) and progesterone (P), obtained on the day of the biopsy, were also measured. No significant differences among endometrial ER, PgR, serum E2, and P levels were detected between the patients with endometriosis and normal control subjects. Although ER concentrations in the luteal defect group did not differ from those of control subjects, the PgR levels in day 20 to 23 endometrium were significantly higher. Mean serum E2 and P levels in the group with luteal insufficiency were significantly lower than those of the control subjects. Our data suggest that in patients with LPD the increase in PgR levels during the midluteal days is compatible with a relative deficiency of P secretion by the corpus luteum.Differential expression and localization of de-novo synthesized endometriotic haptoglobin in endometrium and endometriotic lesions.Endometriosis protein-I (ENDO-I) mRNA expression and protein localization were evaluated using in-situ hybridization and immunohistochemistry in endometriotic lesions and eutopic endometrium from women with endometriosis, and in eutopic endometrium from women without endometriosis (controls). When present, ENDO-I mRNA and protein were observed in the functionalis zone of endometrial stroma and the stroma of endometriotic lesions. Expression and localization differences were scored and statistically analysed. During the secretory stage, ENDO-I mRNA expression by endometriotic lesions and eutopic endometrium from women with disease was significantly greater than ENDO-I mRNA expression by proliferative stage eutopic endometrium from women with disease or eutopic endometrium from controls, regardless of cycle stage (P < 0.001). More ENDO-I protein was localized in endometriotic lesions and eutopic endometrium from women with disease than in eutopic endometrium from controls, regardless of cycle stage (P < 0.001). Differential expression and localization of ENDO-I may help develop minimally invasive diagnostic strategies for endometriosis. Further, as ENDO-I shares nucleotide sequence and amino acid sequence with hepatic haptoglobin-which in certain disease states is immunosuppressive and angiogenic-differences in ENDO-I expression and localization in the peritoneal cavity may contribute to the pathogenesis of endometriosis and/or facilitate development of unprecedented diagnostic or therapeutic approaches for management of this enigmatic disease.Up-regulation of p21-activated kinase 1 by in vitro treatment with interleukin 1-beta and its increased expression in ovarian endometriotic cysts.We evaluated whether the proinflammatory cytokines can regulate p21-activated kinase (Pak1) expression in endometrial cells as well as whether its expression is increased in endometriotic cysts. We found that interleukin-1β up-regulates Pak1 expression in endometrial stromal cells (ESC) and that the immunoreactivity of Pak1 is increased in the endometriotic cysts.HLA-G is expressed by the glandular epithelium of peritoneal endometriosis but not in eutopic endometrium.HLA-G is a major histocompatability antigen with documented immune-regulatory function. Various epithelial cancers and tissue allografts have been noted to express HLA-G, which is postulated to aid in their escape from immunosurveillance. We evaluated peritoneal endometriosis and eutopic endometrium for the expression of HLA-G protein and gene transcript.Two experiments were performed: (i) archived tissue blocks from peritoneal endometriotic lesions (n = 15) and eutopic endometrium (n = 12) were evaluated for extent of protein immunostaining, and (ii) eutopic endometrial biopsies from women without (n = 17) and with (n = 24) endometriosis, and peritoneal endometriotic lesions (n = 14) were evaluated for presence of RNA transcript by in situ hybridization.HLA-G protein localized in the glandular epithelium of 14 of 15 (93.3%) peritoneal endometriotic lesions, but not in stromal cells. HLA-G protein staining was absent in endometrial biopsies (n = 12). HLA-G gene transcript localized to the glandular epithelium in 13 of 14 (92.8%) peritoneal endometriotic lesions. HLA-G transcript was never observed in eutopic endometrium, regardless of cycle stage or whether from women with (n = 24) or without (n = 18) endometriosis.HLA-G is expressed by endometriotic glandular epithelium but not by eutopic endometrium under normal conditions. Differential expression of HLA-G suggests that peritoneal inflammation or cellular stress may up-regulate mechanisms to promote ectopic endometrial survival.[HOXA11 gene expression in women with and without impaired infertility].HOXA genes are receptivity markers and their altered expression can help identify women with implantation defect.The purpose of this study was to examine the expression pattern of HOXA11 and expression and localization of its protein product in the endometrium of women with endometriosis, idiopathic infertility and normal fertile patients during different phases of the menstrual cycle.We evaluated HOXA11 mRNA level in the endometrium from endometriosis (n=36), idiopathic infertility (n=48) and fertile patients (n=30) during a menstrual cycle. The amounts of mRNA were determined by real-time quantitative PCR. Using the immunohistochemical techniques we compared the localization of HOXA11 protein in the proliferative, early secretory and midsecretory endometrium in all of the studied groups. Endometrial biopsy was performed by pipelle or during hysteroscopy.We observed statistically significantly elevated HOXA11 transcripts levels in the midsecretory phase in both, the idiopathic infertility and the fertile control groups (p<0.05). Patients with endometriosis had low HOXA11 transcript level in the implantation window. Normal fertile patients showed statistically significantly decreased (p=0.003) HOXA11 mRNA level in the proliferative phase and statistically significantly increased level (p=0.018) in midsecretory phase, comparing to endometriosis patients. HOXA11 protein were localized in the nuclei of the endometrial stromal cells whereas the cytoplasm of these cells did not stain.Our results suggest that altered HOXA11 gene expression in the endometrium during a menstrual cycle may be a common phenomenon among patients with endometriosis and may cause infertility in this group of patients. Further research should explain the mechanism of altered expression of HOXA11 gene.Krüppel-like factor 9 and progesterone receptor coregulation of decidualizing endometrial stromal cells: implications for the pathogenesis of endometriosis.Endometriosis is characterized by progesterone resistance and associated with infertility. Krüppel-like factor 9 (KLF9) is a progesterone receptor (PGR)-interacting protein, and mice null for Klf9 are subfertile. Whether loss of KLF9 expression contributes to progesterone resistance of eutopic endometrium of women with endometriosis is unknown.The aims were to investigate 1) KLF9 expression in eutopic endometrium of women with and without endometriosis, 2) effects of attenuated KLF9 expression on WNT-signaling component expression and on WNT inhibitor Dickkopf-1 promoter activity in human endometrial stromal cells (HESC), and 3) PGR and KLF9 coregulation of the stromal transcriptome network.Transcript levels of KLF9, PGR, and WNT signaling components were measured in eutopic endometrium of women with and without endometriosis. Transcript and protein levels of WNT signaling components in HESC transfected with KLF9 and/or PGR small interfering RNA were analyzed by quantitative RT-PCR and Western blot. KLF9 and PGR coregulation of Dickkopf-1 promoter activity was evaluated using human Dickkopf-1-luciferase promoter/reporter constructs and by chromatin immunoprecipitation. KLF9 and PGR signaling networks were analyzed by gene expression array profiling.Eutopic endometrium from women with endometriosis had reduced expression of KLF9 mRNA together with those of PGR-B, WNT4, WNT2, and DKK1. KLF9 and PGR were recruited to the DKK1 promoter and modified each other's transactivity. In HESC, KLF9 and PGR coregulated components of the WNT, cytokine, and IGF gene networks that are implicated in endometriosis and infertility.Loss of KLF9 coregulation of endometrial stromal PGR-responsive gene networks may underlie progesterone resistance in endometriosis.Metalloproteinases, vascular endothelial growth factor, and angiopoietin 1 and 2 in eutopic and ectopic endometrium.To evaluate the expression of vascular endothelial growth factor (VEGF), angiopoietin 1 and 2 (ANGPT1/ANGPT2), and matrix metalloproteinases 1, 2, and 9 (MMP-1, MMP-2, MMP-9) in eutopic and ectopic endometrium.Experimental retrospective study.University hospital.Eutopic and ectopic endometrium samples from 30 women with endometriosis and endometrium biopsy samples from 30 healthy women.Biopsies of ovarian endometriomas and eutopic endometrium.Immunohistochemical staining to evaluate the expression of VEGF, ANGPT1, ANGPT2, MMP-1, MMP-2, and MMP-9, and real-time polymerase chain reaction analysis to quantify mRNA expression.Patients with endometriosis had higher levels of angiogenic factors and metalloproteinases in endometriotic cysts than in eutopic endometrium. These substances were also overexpressed in eutopic endometrium of patients with endometriosis when compared with normal controls.Overexpression of angiogenic factors and metalloproteinases may be the characteristic feature of endometrium with greater potential to transform into endometriotic lesions in the peritoneal cavity. Structural and/or functional differences of eutopic endometrium could have a role in the pathogenesis of endometriosis secondary to the backward passage of endometrial cells into the peritoneal cavity. Whether these local factors may induce, promote, and/or regulate this transformation remains to be determined.Aromatase expression in endometriosis.The conversion of C19 steroids to estrogens occurs in a number of tissues, such as the ovary and placenta, and is catalyzed by aromatase P450 (P450arom; the product of the CYP19 gene). P450arom expression has also been detected in a number of uterine tumors, such as leiomyomas and endometrial cancer. On the other hand, P450arom expression was undetectable in normal endometrial and myometrial tissues. The present study was conducted to determine the presence or absence of aromatase expression in peritoneal endometriotic implants and in the eutopic endometrium of women with endometriosis. Endometriotic implants in pelvic peritoneum (n = 17; e.g. posterior culdesac, bladder, and anterior culdesac) and eutopic endometrial curettings (n = 11) of 14 patients with histologically documented pelvic endometriosis were obtained at the time of laparoscopy or laparotomy. Pelvic peritoneal biopsies distal to endometriotic implants as well as normal endometrial tissues (n = 7) from disease-free women were used as negative controls. We used competitive RT-PCR technology employing an internal standard to amplify P450arom transcripts in total ribonucleic acid (RNA) isolated from these tissues. P450arom transcripts were detected in all endometriotic implants and in all eutopic endometrial tissues from patients with endometriosis. P450arom messenger RNA species were not detectable in endometrial tissues from disease-free women or in endometriosis-free peritoneal tissues. The highest levels of transcripts were detected in an endometriotic implant that involved the full thickness of the anterior abdominal wall. The P450arom transcript level within the core of this endometriotic mass was 4-fold higher than that in the surrounding adipose tissue. It has been shown recently that aromatase expression in various human tissues is regulated by the use of tissue-specific promoters via alternative splicing. To analyze promoter usage, we amplified by RT-PCR the most likely promoter-specific untranslated 5'-termini of P450arom transcripts in 2 endometriotic implants. It appears that these endometriotic implants use both the adipose-type promoter I.4 and gonadal-type promoter II for aromatase expression. The use of promoter I.4 for aromatase expression in adipose tissue has been recently observed to be regulated by members of the interleukin-6 (IL-6) cytokine family. Based on these findings, we examined by RT-PCR, IL-6 and IL-11 messenger RNA expression in 5 endometriotic tissues and 1 eutopic endometrial sample from a patient with endometriosis. We detected IL-6 and IL-11 transcripts in all endometriotic tissues and in the eutopic endometrial tissue sample studied. Our findings indicate that both eutopic endometrial tissues and endometriotic implants from patients with endometriosis are biochemically different from normal endometrial tissues of disease-free women. The presence of aromatase expression in eutopic endometrial tissues from patients with endometriosis may be related to the capability of implantation of these tissues on peritoneal surfaces. Furthermore, the possibility of estrogen production in these implants may serve to promote their growth. Increased IL-6 and IL-11 expression in these tissues suggests that P450arom expression in endometriosis may be regulated in part by these cytokines.Expression of epidermal growth factor, fibroblast growth factor-2, and platelet-derived growth factor-A in the eutopic endometrium of women with endometriosis.The objective of the present study was to compare the levels of expression of epidermal growth factor (EGF), fibroblast growth factor-2 (FGF-2), and platelet-derived growth factor-A (PDGF-A) mRNA in the eutopic endometrium of women with and without endometriosis.Thirty-five women with advanced stage endometriosis and 31 control women were recruited. Following isolation of total RNA from endometrial tissue and reverse transcription, cDNA samples were amplified to quantify the level of expression of EGF, FGF-2, PDGF-A.While the levels of mRNA of EGF and FGF-2 were not different between the two groups, the PDGF-A mRNA level was significantly lower in the endometriosis group than in the control group during the secretory phase (6.12 +/- 0.51 vs 12.50 +/- 0.99, mean +/- SEM, P < 0.05).The expression level of PDGF-A, but not EGF and FGF-2, might be decreased during the secretory phase in the eutopic endometrium of women with advanced stage endometriosis.Endometrial synthesis and secretion of complement component-3 by patients with and without endometriosis.In the present study we examined complement-3 (C3) synthesis and secretion from early proliferative endometrium of infertile patients with and without endometriosis. One gram of tissue was obtained by endometrial sampling at the time of diagnostic laparoscopy and incubated for 12 to 16 hours in the presence of radioactive methionine. Immunoprecipitation was performed with rabbit antihuman C3 immunoglobulin G and only a single 180-kDa radiolabeled protein (C3) was immunoprecipitated. This protein dissociates into 113- and 69-kDa subunits in the presence of dithiothreitol. The amount of C3 produced and secreted by the endometrium was quantitated as a percentage of counts per minute recovered by immunoprecipitation. Patients with minimal endometriosis produced significantly greater amounts of endometrial C3 than patients with no endometriosis or patients with severe endometriosis.Distribution of heat shock proteins in eutopic and ectopic endometrium in endometriosis and adenomyosis.To evaluate the pathophysiologic role of heat shock proteins and to examine the effect of danazol on these proteins in patients with endometriosis and adenomyosis.Immunohistochemical identification of human heat shock proteins 27, 60, and 70 in endometrial glandular cells identified using monoclonal antibodies.Department of obstetrics and gynecology in a university hospital.Subjects were 119 women with documented endometriosis or adenomyosis. The subjects were divided into three groups: fertile control (n = 38), with 14 in the proliferative phase and 24 in the secretory phase; endometriosis (n = 38); and adenomyosis (n = 43), including 33 who underwent hysterectomy and 10 treated with danazol.Staining of glandular cells by semiquantitative immunostaining (evaluation nomogram) score.Significantly increased expression of heat shock protein 27 was noted in eutopic endometrium from patients with endometriosis and adenomyosis as compared with controls, regardless of the menstrual phase. The scores for heat shock protein 27 and heat shock protein 70 in the ectopic endometrium of patients with endometriosis were low compared with those in eutopic endometrium, whereas in adenomyosis, the scores were similar to those of eutopic endometrium. After treatment with danazol, the expression of heat shock proteins returned to control levels.We suggest that abnormally increased expression of heat shock proteins plays a role in the pathophysiology of endometriosis and adenomyosis.miRNA-199a-5p regulates VEGFA in endometrial mesenchymal stem cells and contributes to the pathogenesis of endometriosis.It is believed that endometrial miRNAs contribute to the aetiology of endometriosis in stem cells; however, the mechanisms remain unclear. Here we collected serum samples from patients with or without endometriosis and characterized the miRNA expression profiles of these two groups. MicroRNA-199a-5p (miR-199a-5p) was dramatically down-regulated in patients with endometriosis compared with control patients. In addition, we found that the tumour suppressor gene, SMAD4, could elevate miR-199a-5p expression in ectopic endometrial mesenchymal stem cells. Up-regulation of miR-199a-5p suppressed cell proliferation, motility and angiogenesis of these ectopic stem cells by targeting the 3' untranslated region of VEGFA. Furthermore, we established an animal model of endometriosis and found that miR-199a-5p could decrease the size of endometriotic lesions in vivo. Taken together, this newly identified miR-199a-5p module provides a new avenue to the understanding of the processes of endometriosis development, especially proliferation, motility and angiogenesis, and may facilitate the development of potential therapeutics against endometriosis.Inhibition of IDO1 suppresses cyclooxygenase-2 and matrix metalloproteinase-9 expression and decreases proliferation, adhesion and invasion of endometrial stromal cells.Indoleamine 2,3-dioxygenase-1 (IDO1) is an intracellular enzyme that catalyses essential amino acid tryptophan along the kynurenine pathway. The aim of this study was to determine the impact of IDO1 expression on the biological characteristic of the endometrial stromal cells (ESCs). IDO1, cyclooxygenase-2 (COX-2) and matrix metalloproteinases (MMPs) in endometriotic ectopic stromal cells, endometriosis-derived eutopic stromal cells and normal ESCs (control) were detected by the in-cell Western analysis. After being treated with lipopolysaccharide, levo-1-methyl-tryptophan (L-1-MT) alone or a combination, a comparative analysis of the above protein expression was evaluated. The effects of IDO1 on ESCs proliferation, adhesion and invasion were detected through ELISA, adhesion assay and Matrigel invasion assay, respectively. The results showed that, contrary to healthy ESCs from control women, the expression of IDO1 was significantly higher in eutopic and ectopic ESCs obtained from women with endometriosis. Inhibition of IDO1 by L-1-MT suppressed the expression of COX-2 and MMP-9 in ESCs. It could also decrease the ESCs proliferation, adhesion and invasion, while stimulating ESCs decidualization. Thus, IDO1 is possibly involved in endometriosis pathogenesis via promoting COX-2 and MMP-9 expression and regulation of ESCs biological characteristics. The information may be useful for developing a new therapeutic strategy for endometriosis.Aberrant expression of metastasis-inducing proteins in ectopic and matched eutopic endometrium of women with endometriosis: implications for the pathogenesis of endometriosis.Endometriosis is a metastatic disease without obvious tumorigenesis. Expression of S100P, S100A4, osteopontin (OPN) or anterior gradient homologue 2 (AGR2) proteins can induce metastasis but fail to induce tumorigenesis per se. We now explore whether this group of metastasis-inducing proteins (MIPs) are associated with the pathogenesis of endometriosis.Eutopic endometrial biopsies were taken from 73 women (35 fertile women without endometriosis and 38 women with surgically diagnosed endometriosis). Ectopic endometriotic lesions were collected from eight of the women with endometriosis. The expression of MIPs at the cellular level was evaluated by immunohistochemistry and the presence of these proteins in the endometrial tissues was verified by western blotting and their gene expression was confirmed by RT-PCR.All four MIPs were immunolocated in the endometrium of control women and S100P, AGR2 and OPN showed a cyclical variation. Proliferative phase eutopic endometrium of both groups showed a similar staining pattern for all MIPs, whereas secretory phase endometrium showed a differential expression between controls and cases. The secretory phase endometrial immunostaining of controls showed weak stromal and perivascular AGR2, and decreased stromal and glandular S100P. In contrast, immunostaining for all MIPs was increased in the late secretory endometrial samples of women with endometriosis and intense immunostaining was seen for S100A4 in the stroma (P< 0.05) and for S100P (P< 0.001) and AGR2 (P< 0.0001) in both glands and stroma (P< 0.001). All active peritoneal endometriotic lesions showed strong immunostaining for each of the MIPs studied.We propose that these MIPs enhance endometrial cell invasiveness and contribute to the establishment of ectopic endometriotic deposits after retrograde menstruation.RHOC: a key gene for endometriosis.Considerable efforts have been invested in elucidating the potential mechanisms involved in the physiopathology of endometriosis. The aims of our study were to investigate whether RHOC expression is differentially altered in the endometrium and in endometriotic lesions. A total of 40 patients diagnosed with endometriosis and 15 healthy fertile women were selected for the study. Paired biopsies of endometrial tissue (eutopic endometrium) and endometriotic lesions (ectopic endometrium) were obtained from the patients with endometriosis. Endometrium from women without endometriosis was used as a control. Expression of the RHOC gene was analyzed by real-time polymerase chain reaction in autologous endometrial tissues of women with endometriosis and in the endometrium of control women. Increased RHOC expression was detected in endometriotic lesions compared to the eutopic endometrium of women with endometriosis and control women. RHOC changes may be among the key elements involved in the origin and the maintenance of endometriosis. Expression of gamma delta T cells and adhesion molecules in endometriotic tissue in patients with endometriosis and adenomyosis.Are T cell subsets including gamma delta T cells. HLA antigens or adhesion molecules, expressed in eutopic and ectopic endometria in patients with endometriosis and adenomyosis?Subjects consisted of 23 patients with adenomyosis and 21 patients with endometriosis. Controls consisted of 15 patients with adenomyoma and 42 infertile women without habitual abortion and autoimmune diseases. Staining of the glandular cells in eutopic and ectopic endometria or T lymphocyte subsets or macrophages in the stroma were analyzed immunohistochemically to localize the expression of the antigens.Immunohistochemical analysis revealed significantly increased expression of the antigens, particularly of the number of gamma delta T cells in the stroma and adhesion molecules and HLA antigens on the glandular cells in eutopic and ectopic endometria, compared with materials from patients with adenomyoma and infertile patients.It is likely that three distinct pathways of cell-cell interactions are activated in patients with endometriosis or adenomyosis.Profiling of selected angiogenesis-related genes in proliferative eutopic endometrium of women with endometriosis.To compare the expression level of the most relevant angiogenesis-related genes in the eutopic endometrium of women with and without endometriosis.32 regularly menstruating patients (18 with endometriosis and 14 controls) underwent surgery in the proliferative phase of the cycle. Eutopic endometrium was collected by the use of aspirating biopsy prior to laparoscopy. Only patients with advanced (stage III and IV) histopathologically confirmed ovarian endometriosis were studied. Real-time PCR gene arrays were applied to examine the expression of 84 human angiogenesis-connected genes. Western-blot and enzyme-linked immunosorbent assays (ELISA) were used to confirm the expression of selected proteins.We found significantly higher levels of AKT1 (p=0.003), TYMP (p=0.02), JAG1 (p=0.007), LAMA5 (p=0.005) and TIMP-1 (p=0.03) in eutopic endometrium of patients with endometriosis as compared with controls. By the use of Western blot we found clearly positive expression of AKT1 whereas ELISA assays confirmed expression of AKT1, TYMP, JAG1, LAMA5 and TIMP1.Changes in the expression of selected genes might lead to or be a consequence of an early defect in the physiological activity of proliferative endometrium ultimately resulting in its overgrowth outside the uterine cavity.CA-125 in menstrual discharge in patients with chronic pelvic pain.CA-125 levels in menstrual discharge were determined in 55 patients with chronic pelvic pain to evaluate whether this test would be useful in differentiating between pelvic pain due to endometriosis and other causes. Of the 28 women with endometriosis, 25 (89%) had CA-125 concentration greater than or equal to 72,000 units/ml. The frequencies of elevated levels in Stage I, Stage II and Stages III/IV were 85.7, 85.7 and 92.8%, respectively. When used for the detection of endometriosis, the test had a sensitivity of 89.3% and a specificity of 96.3%. These results suggest that CA-125 in menstrual discharge may be helpful in the evaluation of women with chronic pelvic pain.The role of SRC1 and SRC2 in steroid-induced SDF1 expression in normal and ectopic endometrium.To compare the expression patterns of steroid receptor coactivators (SRCs) and steroid-induced stromal cell-derived factor 1 (CXCL12 (SDF1)) in normal and ectopic endometrium and to explore the roles of NCOA1 (SRC1) and NCOA2 (SRC2) in the steroid-induced CXCL12 expression in normal and ectopic endometrial stromal cells (ESCs). The NCOA1, NCOA2, NCOA3 (SRC3), and CXCL12 (SDF1)α mRNA levels in normal and ectopic endometrium were analyzed by quantitative real-time PCR. Steroid-induced CXCL12 expression was detected by the ELISA method and the chemotactic activity of conditioned supernatant to monocyte was assessed by the Boyden chamber method before and after the silencing of NCOA1 or NCOA2 with siRNA in normal and ectopic ESCs. The expression of NCOA1 and CXCL12 in ectopic endometrium was significantly greater than that in normal endometrium in the secretory phase. Progesterone (P4) was able to significantly inhibit estradiol (E2)-stimulated CXCL12 expression in normal and ectopic ESCs. The inhibitory rate of P4 in ectopic ESCs at 72 and 96 h was significantly lower than that in normal ESCs. Silencing of NCOA1 but not NCOA2 significantly reduced the E2-induced CXCL12 expression in normal and ectopic ESCs. The ability of P4 to inhibit E2-induced CXCL12 expression and monocyte chemotaxis in normal and ectopic ESCs was significantly attenuated when NCOA2 was silenced. NCOA1 plays a necessary role in E2-induced CXCL12 expression and NCOA2 is required for P4 to inhibit the E2-induced CXCL12 production in normal and ectopic endometrium.Correlation between decreased type-II interleukin-1 receptor and increased monocyte chemotactic protein-1 expression in the endometrium of women with endometriosis.Monocyte chemotactic protein-1 (MCP-1), a potent inducer of macrophage recruitment and activation, is overexpressed in the eutopic endometrium of women with endometriosis. Eutopic endometrial cells of women with endometriosis secrete higher levels of MCP-1 than those of normal women, following stimulation with interleukin-1 (IL-1). The aim of this study was to examine whether there is any correlation between the expression of IL-1 receptor type II (IL-IRII), a specific downregulator of IL-1 activity, and that of MCP-1 in the eutopic endometrium of women with endometriosis.Endometrial biopsies of 46 women with endometriosis and 22 healthy women were evaluated simultaneously for IL-1RII and MCP-1 expression by immunohistochemistry.Our study revealed a highly significant correlation between the decreased expression of IL-1RII and the increased expression of MCP-1 in the endometrial tissue of women with endometriosis (Spearman correlation coefficient r = -0.377, P = 0.002), particularly in the initial stages of the disease (stages I and II; r = - 0.368, P = 0.020 and r = -0.480, P = 0.002, respectively). Furthermore, this correlation was observed in the proliferative (r = -0.366, P = 0.047) and the secretory phases (r = -0.321, P = 0.049) of the menstrual cycle.These results suggest that the reduced capability of endometrial tissue to downregulate IL-1 proinflammatory effects may be involved in the increased expression of MCP-1 in the endometrium of women with endometriosis and the establishment of an inflammatory state. The results also indicate a sustained process of cell activation throughout the menstrual cycle.Expression pattern of osteopontin and αvβ3 integrin during the implantation window in infertile patients with early stages of endometriosis.To study endometrial receptivity in terms of osteopontin (OPN) and αvβ3 integrin expression and co-expression in infertile women with early stages of endometriosis.We investigated the immunohistochemical expression and co-expression of OPN and αvβ3 integrin in the endometrium of 20 infertile patients with Stage I or II endometriosis as the only detectable cause of infertility, 20 infertile patients with unexplained infertility and 20 fertile women undergoing tubal sterilization. Two endometrial biopsies were performed during a single menstrual cycle (postovulatory Day +7 to +8 and 4 days later) in each subject.No statistically significant differences regarding OPN and αvβ3 integrin expression were found between infertile patients with endometriosis and the two control groups. There was no significant correlation between OPN and αvβ3 integrin staining intensity in the mid-luteal phase biopsies in any of the groups studied.Endometrial OPN and αvβ3 integrin expression or co-expression is not impaired during the window of implantation in patients with Stage I-II endometriosis. Further studies are needed to determine whether these results imply normal endometrial receptivity in such patients or add to the increasing uncertainty about the clinical value of assessing the endometrium with these markers of implantation.mRNA-binding protein TIA-1 reduces cytokine expression in human endometrial stromal cells and is down-regulated in ectopic endometrium.Cytokines and growth factors play important roles in endometrial function and the pathogenesis of endometriosis. mRNAs encoding cytokines and growth factors undergo rapid turnover; primarily mediated by adenosine- and uridine-rich elements (AREs) located in their 3'-untranslated regions. T-cell intracellular antigen (TIA-1), an mRNA-binding protein, binds to AREs in target transcripts, leading to decreased gene expression.The purpose of this article was to determine whether TIA-1 plays a role in the regulation of endometrial cytokine and growth factor expression during the normal menstrual cycle and whether TIA-1 expression is altered in women with endometriosis.Eutopic endometrial tissue obtained from women without endometriosis (n = 30) and eutopic and ectopic endometrial tissues from women with endometriosis (n = 17) were immunostained for TIA-1. Staining intensities were evaluated by histological scores (HSCOREs). The regulation of endometrial TIA-1 expression by immune factors and steroid hormones was studied by treating primary cultured human endometrial stromal cells (HESCs) with vehicle, lipopolysaccharide, TNF-α, IL-6, estradiol, or progesterone, followed by protein blot analyses. HESCs were engineered to over- or underexpress TIA-1 to test whether TIA-1 regulates IL-6 or TNF-α expression in these cells.We found that TIA-1 is expressed in endometrial stromal and glandular cells throughout the menstrual cycle and that this expression is significantly higher in the perimenstrual phase. In women with endometriosis, TIA-1 expression in eutopic and ectopic endometrium was reduced compared with TIA-1 expression in eutopic endometrium of unaffected control women. Lipopolysaccharide and TNF-α increased TIA-1 expression in HESCs in vitro, whereas IL-6 or steroid hormones had no effect. In HESCs, down-regulation of TIA-1 resulted in elevated IL-6 and TNF-α expression, whereas TIA-1 overexpression resulted in decreased IL-6 and TNF-α expression.Endometrial TIA-1 is regulated throughout the menstrual cycle, TIA-1 modulates the expression of immune factors in endometrial cells, and downregulation of TIA-1 may contribute to the pathogenesis of endometriosis.Hyperprolactinemia and luteal insufficiency in infertile patients with mild and minimal endometriosis.The objective of the present paper was to assess the presence of hormonal alterations in infertile women with stage I or II endometriosis (Group III, n = 20) compared to fertile women without endometriosis (Group I, n = 14) and to fertile women with endometriosis (Group II, n = 7). Serum levels of FSH, LH, estradiol, TSH, and PRL were measured between days 1 and 5 of the early follicular phase; in the luteal phase, three serum samples were collected for progesterone measurement, and endometrial biopsies were performed. Serum estradiol levels were lower (p = 0.035) in infertile patients with endometriosis than in fertile patients without endometriosis. Six infertile patients with endometriosis presented prolactin levels above 20 ng/ml. This was not observed in the other groups. Luteal insufficiency was more frequent in infertile patients with endometriosis (78.9%) than in fertile patients with (42.9%) or without endometriosis (0%). In a multiple logistic regression analysis, only the presence of endometriosis and infertility was significantly associated with luteal insufficiency. The serum levels of LH, FSH, and TSH were not significantly different among the groups. Luteal insufficiency and altered prolactin secretion were associated with endometriosis, and could be important mechanisms causing infertility in this group of patients.Increased expression of macrophage colony-stimulating factor and its receptor in patients with endometriosis.To investigate the expression and regulation of colony-stimulating factor 1 (CSF-1) and its receptor, C-FMS, in endometriosis.In vivo and vitro study.University-based academic medical center.Reproductive-age women undergoing surgery for benign conditions.Peritoneal and endometrial tissue samples were obtained.CSF-1 and C-FMS expression.Significantly higher CSF-1 levels were found in peritoneal fluid of patients with endometriosis compared with control subjects. Ectopic endometriotic tissue had 3.5-fold and 1.7-fold increases in CSF-1 and C-FMS expression, respectively, compared with eutopic tissue. Coculture of endometrial cells from either established cell lines or patient samples with peritoneal mesothelial cells (PMCs) led to increased expression of CSF-1 and C-FMS. A higher but nonsignificant increase in levels of C-FMS and CSF-1 was found in cocultures of endometrial epithelial cells from patients with endometriosis compared with those without endometriosis.Increased CSF-1 levels may contribute to endometriosis lesion formation and progression. Elevation in CSF-1 after coculture of endometrial cells with PMCs suggests that endometrial tissue may be a source of peritoneal CSF-1. Increased C-FMS expression in endometrial cells from women with endometriosis cocultured with PMCs suggests that endometrial tissue involved in lesion formation is highly responsive to CSF-1 signaling.Clinical usefulness of determination of CA 125 levels in the serum and menstrual blood.We measured CA 125 levels in sera and menstrual blood of subjects with a normal ovulatory cycle and in those with endometriosis. Serum CA 125 levels were higher in the latter, in each phase of the menstrual cycle. The CA 125 levels in patients with endometriosis, particularly those with adenomyosis, tend to be higher than in those with a normal ovulatory cycle. We propose that measurement of CA 125 in the menstrual blood may be able to help distinguishing adenomyosis from myoma uteri and may also help in assessing clinical endometriosis.Physiologic activation of nuclear factor kappa-B in the endometrium during the menstrual cycle is altered in endometriosis patients.To evaluate nuclear factor kappaB (NF-κB) activation and NF-κB-p65 subunit activation, immunolocalization, and expression in the endometrium of healthy women and endometriosis patients throughout the menstrual cycle.Prospective observational study.Affiliated hospital and university research laboratory.Twenty-four healthy women and 24 endometriosis patients.Menstrual, proliferative, and secretory endometrial biopsies.Assessment of NF-κB and p65 activation by protein-DNA binding assays and p65 localization and expression by immunohistochemistry.Total NF-κB-DNA binding was constitutive and variable in human endometrium accross the menstrual cycle. Healthy women (physiologic conditions) showed higher p65-DNA binding in proliferative than in menstrual and secretory endometrium. Conversely, in endometriosis patients, p65-DNA binding was higher in proliferative and secretory endometrium than in menstrual endometrium. Endometrial epithelial cells showed higher p65 expression level score than endometrial stromal cells.NF-κB activity is constitutive, physiologic, and variable in human endometrium. The physiologic cyclic p65 activation pattern was altered in endometriosis patients, showing no cyclic variation between the proliferative and secretory phase of the menstrual cycle. The absence of decreased p65 activity in secretory endometrium from endometriosis patients is concurrent with progesterone resistance and could participate in endometrial biologic alterations during the implantation window in endometriosis patients.Different types of small nerve fibers in eutopic endometrium and myometrium in women with endometriosis.To investigate types of nerve fibers in endometrium and myometrium in women with endometriosis.Laboratory study using human tissue.University-based laboratory.Women with and without endometriosis undergoing hysterectomy.Histologic sections of contiguous endometrial and myometrial tissues were prepared from hysterectomies performed on women with and without endometriosis.Types and density of nerve fibers in endometrium and myometrium in women with and without endometriosis were determined using a series of specific markers for neuronal structure and function: PGP9.5, NF, SP, CGRP, TH, VAChT, VIP, and NPY.Nerve fibers stained with PGP9.5 and NF in endometrium and myometrium were significantly increased in women with endometriosis compared with women without endometriosis. Nerve fibers in the functional layer of endometrium in women with endometriosis were likely to be sensory C, a mixture of sensory A delta, sensory C, and adrenergic fibers in the basal layer of the endometrium, a mixture of sensory A delta, sensory C, adrenergic and cholinergic fibers in the myometrium.Increased nerve fiber density in endometrium and myometrium, and sensory C fibers and adrenergic nerve fibers in the endometrium in women with endometriosis may play an important role in the mechanisms of pain generation in this condition.Matrix metalloproteinase-9 and tissue inhibitor of metalloproteinase-3 mRNA expression in ectopic and eutopic endometrium in women with endometriosis: a rationale for endometriotic invasiveness.To investigate mRNA expression of metalloproteinase-9 (MMP-9) and tissue inhibitor of metalloproteinase-3 (TIMP-3) in ectopic endometriosis tissue and uterine endometrium from women with and without endometriosis throughout the menstrual cycle.Molecular studies in human tissue.Department of Gynecology and Obstetrics, Reproductive Immunology Laboratory, Stanford University Medical Center.Fifty-three premenopausal woman (23 women with endometriosis and 30 women without endometriosis undergoing laparoscopic surgery). Endometrium and ectopic endometriosis tissue were obtained at the time of surgery.None.mRNA expression from eutopic and ectopic endometrium was analyzed by quantitative, competitive PCR.Both uterine endometrium and ectopic endometriotic tissue from women with endometriosis expressed significantly (P<.05) lower levels of TIMP-3 than endometrium from normal women. Also, ectopic endometrium expressed higher levels of MMP-9 and a higher ratio of MMP-9/TIMP-3 than eutopic endometrium from normal and endometriosis patients.These results suggest that ectopic and eutopic endometrium from endometriosis patients may be more invasive and prone to peritoneal implantation because of greater MMP and less TIMP-3 mRNA expression than endometrium from women without endometriosis. Thus, increased proteolytic activity may be one of the reasons for the invasive properties of the endometrium, resulting in the development of endometriosis.Differential proteome profiling of eutopic endometrium from women with endometriosis to understand etiology of endometriosis.The identification of molecular differences in the endometrium of women with endometriosis is an important step toward understanding the pathogenesis of this condition and for developing novel strategies for the treatment of associated infertility and pain. In this study, we investigated protein expression analysis of eutopic endometrium from women with and without endometriosis. The proteomic analysis revealed molecular dysregulation of more than 70 proteins in the proliferative phase of eutopic endometrium in stage IV and secretory phase of stage II, III and IV endometriosis. Using mass spectrometry, 48 proteins spots which were consistently differentially expressed from stage II to IV endometriosis were identified. The differentially expressed proteins include structural proteins, proteins involved in stress response, protein-folding and protein-turnover, immunity, energy production, signal transduction, RNA biogenesis, protein biosynthesis, and nuclear proteins. Immunoblot and immunohistochemical analyses confirmed the observed changes in eight representative proteins. The present study provides identification of new players that have a potential role in the initiation and progression of endometriosis and also sets a framework for further investigations on mechanisms underlying the pathogenesis of endometriosis.Increased expression of matrix metalloproteinase-9 in the eutopic endometrial tissue of women with endometriosis.Endometriosis is a disease where endometrial tissue implants in ectopic locations. Remodelling of the extracellular matrix (ECM) is a prerequisite for the implantation of this tissue to be possible.In this study, we detected immunoreactive matrix metalloproteinase-9 (MMP-9) throughout endometrial tissue and identified von Willebrand factor (vWF)-positive endothelial cells, CD45-positive leukocytes, CD3-positive T lymphocytes and CD68-positive macrophages as cells expressing MMP-9 in the stroma.We found an increased expression of MMP-9 in the uterine endometrial tissue of women with endometriosis, as assessed by zymography and enzyme-linked immunosorbent assay (ELISA) (P < 0.05). However, RT-PCR did not show a statistically significant increase in MMP-9 mRNA expression in these tissues (P = 0.14). There was no significant difference between women with and without endometriosis in the expression of tissue inhibitor of MMPs (TIMP)-1, a known natural inhibitor of the pro- and active forms of MMP-9, whether tested by ELISA or by RT-PCR (P = 0.46 and 0.37, respectively). Interestingly, the ratio of MMP-9/TIMP-1 expression was significantly higher in women with endometriosis than in normal women both at the protein and the mRNA levels (P < 0.05).These findings make plausible the involvement of MMP-9/TIMP-1 imbalance in the invasiveness of the endometrial tissue of patients with endometriosis and the ectopic development of the disease.Density of small diameter sensory nerve fibres in endometrium: a semi-invasive diagnostic test for minimal to mild endometriosis.The aim of our study was to test the hypothesis that multiple-sensory small-diameter nerve fibres are present in a higher density in endometrium from patients with endometriosis when compared with women with a normal pelvis, enabling the development of a semi-invasive diagnostic test for minimal-mild endometriosis.Secretory phase endometrium samples (n = 40), obtained from women with laparoscopically/histologically confirmed minimal-mild endometriosis (n = 20) and from women with a normal pelvis (n = 20) were selected from the biobank at the Leuven University Fertility Centre. Immunohistochemistry was performed to localize neural markers for sensory C, Adelta, adrenergic and cholinergic nerve fibres in the functional layer of the endometrium. Sections were immunostained with anti-human protein gene product 9.5 (PGP9.5), anti-neurofilament protein, anti-substance P (SP), anti-vasoactive intestinal peptide (VIP), anti-neuropeptide Y and anti-calcitonine gene-related polypeptide. Statistical analysis was done using the Mann-Whitney U-test, receiver operator characteristic analysis, stepwise logistic regression and least-squares support vector machines.The density of small nerve fibres was approximately 14 times higher in endometrium from patients with minimal-mild endometriosis (1.96 +/- 2.73) when compared with women with a normal pelvis (0.14 +/- 0.46, P < 0.0001).The combined analysis of neural markers PGP9.5, VIP and SP could predict the presence of minimal-mild endometriosis with 95% sensitivity, 100% specificity and 97.5% accuracy. To confirm our findings, prospective studies are required.Expression of integrins and E-cadherin in cells from menstrual effluent, endometrium, peritoneal fluid, peritoneum, and endometriosis.To detect the expression of integrins and E-cadherin in cells from peritoneal fluid (PF), endometrium, menstrual effluent, peritoneum, and endometriotic lesions during the early follicular phase of the menstrual cycle.An immunohistochemical study.Tertiary care university medical center.Sixteen patients undergoing a diagnostic laparoscopy as part of a subfertility work-up. All patients had regular and ovulatory cycles.A laparoscopy was performed in the early follicular phase (days 2 to 5). Simultaneously, samples were taken from endometrium, menstrual effluent, and PF, and a representative biopsy of an endometriotic lesion was obtained. If endometriosis was not noted, a peritoneal biopsy was obtained instead.The expression of cell adhesion molecules, including the integrin alpha 2 beta 1, alpha 3 beta 1, alpha 4 beta 1, alpha 5 beta 1, and alpha 6 beta 1 and E-cadherin, as determined by immunohistochemistry on frozen sections.All integrins tested could be detected in the endometrium samples and in endometriotic lesions. In menstrual effluent samples, positive staining for the integrins alpha 2 beta 1 and alpha 3 beta 1 was found in epithelial cells in 13 of 16 cases. Integrin alpha 5 beta 1 was detected in 11 of 16 samples, and integrins alpha 4 beta 1 and alpha 6 beta 1 were detected in 5 of 16 samples. In PF, integrin alpha 3 beta 1 was found in epithelial cells in 12 of 16 samples, integrin alpha 5 beta 1 in 5 of 16, and integrins alpha 4 beta 1 in 2 of 16. The antibody for E-cadherin showed positive staining of epithelial cells in 6 of 16 menstrual effluent samples. All endometrial tissue samples showed positive staining for E-cadherin. In PF, E-cadherin was detected in the epithelial cells of one sample. One peritoneum biopsy revealed positive staining for E-cadherin.Integrins alpha 2 beta 1, alpha 3 beta 1, alpha 4 beta 1, alpha 5 beta 1, and E-cadherin, important cell adhesion molecules, are expressed in endometriotic lesions and in cells and tissues that are potentially involved in the development of endometriosis. These cell adhesion molecules could be involved in the shedding of endometrial tissue during menstruation and the attachment of endometrial tissue fragments to the peritoneum.[Study on microRNA expression in endometrium of luteal phase and its relationship with infertility of endometriosis].To study the different expression of microRNA(miRNA) including mir-29c, mir-200a, mir-145 in the mid-secretary endometrium and its relationship with infertility of endometriosis.From August 2011 to February 2013, 36 infertile cases with endometriosis confirmed by laparoscopy and pathology and excluded the other infertile factors in Department of Reproductive Medicine in Peking University Shenzhen Hospital were enrolled in this study, which were divided into 17 cases with stage I-II, 19 cases with stage III-IV according to the revised classification American Fertility Society. Forty-four healthy women with male factor infertility were chosen as control group. The relative expression levels of mir-29c, mir-200a, mir-145 in the endometrium of women in two groups were detected by using real-time quantitative polymerase chain reaction. Those women were followed up for pregnancy outcome of endometriosis group after assisted reproductive techniques (pregnancy and non-pregnancy group respectively).(1) The expression of miRNA between endometriosis and control groups:the average expression level of mir-29c, mir-200a, mir-145 in the endometrium of endometriosis group was 2.46 ± 1.98, 3.20 ± 2.45, 6.378 ± 3.275, which were significantly higher than 1.36 ± 1.05, 2.04 ± 1.16, 4.548 ± 1.885 in control group (P = 0.026, 0.027, 0.041, respectively). (2) The expression of miRNA between I-II stage and III-IV: the average expression level of mir-29c, mir-200a, mir-145 in the endometrium was 0.53 ± 0.51, 0.33 ± 0.26, 0.048 ± 0.021 in patients with of stage I-II, while 0.26 ± 0.18, 0.28 ± 0.12, 0.045 ± 0.016 in stage III-IV respectively, there were no statistically significant differences between the two groups (P = 0.191,0.661,0.753, respectively) . (3) The expression of miRNA between pregnancy and non-pregnancy groups:the average expression level of mir-29c, mir-200a, mir-145 in the endometrium were 0.60 ± 0.30, 1.23 ± 0.48, 0.886 ± 0.238 in pregnancy group, while 2.64 ± 1.73, 4.39 ± 2.58, 7.199 ± 3.945 in non pregnancy group, there were statistically significant differences between the two groups (P = 0.030,0.039,0.028, respectively).Up-regulation of mir-29c, mir-200a, mir-145 in the endometrial tissue might play a role in endometriosis associated infertility.ProteinChip technology is a useful method in the pathogenesis and diagnosis of endometriosis: a preliminary study.To test the feasibility of ProteinChip (Ciphergen Biosystems, Inc., Fremont, CA) technology as a proteomic tool in discovering and identifying proteins that are differentially expressed in endometrium, endometriotic tissue, and normal peritoneum from women with and without endometriosis.Differential analysis of protein expression in women with and without endometriosis.University hospital.A total of nine patients during their secretory phase (days 20-22) were selected for this study on the basis of cycle phase and presence/or absence of endometriosis.Twelve tissues used in the study included six endometrial biopsies from women with mild endometriosis (n = 3) and a normal pelvis (n = 3) as well as paired samples of peritoneal endometriotic lesions (n = 3) and macroscopically normal peritoneum biopsies (n = 3) from three women with endometriosis.Numerous expression differences were observed in the above comparisons, representing both up-regulation and down-regulation in protein and peptide expression levels.Endometrial expression for a number of proteins and peptides in the range of 2.8-12.3 kDa was 3-24 times lower in women with endometriosis than in those without endometriosis. When compared with normal peritoneum, endometriotic lesions showed an increased expression for a set of proteins and peptides in the range of 3-96 kDa, and especially an up-regulated cluster of proteins between 22 and 23 kDa, identified to be transgelin, a smooth muscle actin-binding protein.This preliminary study demonstrated that differential protein profiling by using ProteinChip array technology is feasible, reproducible, and may be developed into a powerful tool for endometriosis research.Functional microRNA involved in endometriosis.Endometriosis is a common disease seen by gynecologists. Clinical features involve pelvic pain and unexplained infertility. Although endometriosis is pathologically characterized by endometrial tissue outside the normal uterine location, endometriosis is otherwise not easily explained. Endometriomas, endometriotic cysts of the ovary, typically cause pain and distortion of pelvic anatomy. To begin to understand the pathogenesis of endometriomas, we describe the first transcriptome-microRNAome analysis of endometriomas and eutopic endometrium using next-generation sequencing technology. Using this approach, we generated a total of more than 54 million independent small RNA reads from our 19 clinical samples. At the microRNA level, we found 10 microRNA that were up-regulated (miR-202, 193a-3p, 29c, 708, 509-3-5p, 574-3p, 193a-5p, 485-3p, 100, and 720) and 12 microRNA that were down-regulated (miR-504, 141, 429, 203, 10a, 200b, 873, 200c, 200a, 449b, 375, and 34c-5p) in endometriomas compared with endometrium. Using in silico prediction algorithms, we correlated these microRNA with their corresponding differentially expressed mRNA targets. To validate the functional roles of microRNA, we manipulated levels of miR-29c in an in vitro system of primary cultures of human endometrial stromal fibroblasts. Extracellular matrix genes that were potential targets of miR-29c in silico were significantly down-regulated using this biological in vitro system. In vitro functional studies using luciferase reporter constructs further confirmed that miR-29c directly affects specific extracellular matrix genes that are dysregulated in endometriomas. Thus, miR-29c and other abnormally regulated microRNA appear to play important roles in the pathophysiology of uterine function and dysfunction.Clinical usefulness of CA-125 levels in the menstrual discharge in patients with endometriosis.Altered expression of interleukin-18 in the ectopic and eutopic endometrium of women with endometriosis.This study has investigated the expression of interleukin (IL)-18 in the eutopic and ectopic endometrium of women with endometriosis and the role of IL-18 on the pathogenesis of endometriosis.Endometriotic tissue specimens and endometrium specimens were obtained from patients with endometriosis. IL-18 protein was determined by immunohistochemical analysis. Expression levels of IL-18 mRNA were analyzed by reverse transcriptase (RT)-PCR.IL-18 was detected in the glandular epithelial and stromal cells of eutopic and ectopic endometrium. RT-PCR analysis showed that endometrial IL-18 mRNA expression levels were significantly higher at the secretory phase than the proliferative phase in normal women, but not in patients with endometriosis. IL-18 mRNA expression levels were lower in the ectopic endometrium than in the eutopic endometrium of women with endometriosis. IL-18 mRNA levels in both ectopic and eutopic endometrium of patients with endometriosis were lower than in endometrium of women without endometriosis.Ectopic and eutopic endometrial IL-18 was down-regulated in women with endometriosis, suggesting that IL-18 might play a pathogenic role in the formation of endometriosis.A pilot study to evaluate the relative efficacy of endometrial biopsy and full curettage in making a diagnosis of endometriosis by the detection of endometrial nerve fibers.The purpose of this study was to evaluate endometrial biopsy and curettage in detecting small nerve fibers in eutopic endometrium for diagnosis of endometriosis.Endometrial biopsies with precise, consistent technique and curettings were taken from 37 women (20 with endometriosis and 17 without endometriosis). Sensitivity, specificity, and positive and negative predictive value were formally calculated. Endometrial nerve fibers were immunohistochemically detected using the pan-neuronal marker PGP9.5.Small nerve fibers were detected in all endometrial biopsies and curettings from all 20 women with endometriosis, but were not detected in endometrium taken from 17 women without endometriosis. Mean (+/-SD) nerve fiber density in the endometrial biopsies was 26.8 per mm(2) +/- 55.9 (range, 1.6-125) and for curettings was 21.6 per mm(2) +/- 33.1 (range, 0.8-250), with 100% specificity, sensitivity, and positive and negative predictive value.Careful endometrial biopsy combined with immunohistochemical staining for nerve fibers may be a reliable means of diagnosing or excluding endometriosis.Apoptosis pattern in human endometrium in women with pelvic endometriosis.In the present study we aimed to describe apoptosis patterns in eutopic endometrium in women suffering from endometriosis in order to assess its value as a marker of early forms of endometriosis, and also to try to answer whether endometriosis is caused by changes within the eutopic endometrium or whether endometriotic lesions change the characteristics of eutopic endometrium.The study was performed on 125 women treated in Division of Reproduction. In 52 patients peritoneal endometriosis was diagnosed (I(0)-23; II(0)-29). Seventy-three patients in whom no endometriotic foci could be found at laparoscopy were qualified as the control group. Endometrial biopsy 7-9 days after ovulation was taken for assessment of apoptosis (TUNEL) and routine histology.Apoptosis indices in the eutopic endometrium of women with endometriosis were lower compared to women without endometriosis. In the endometrial glands apoptosis indices were 2.94+/-1.66 versus 5.23+/-2.06 (p<0.01) in the group of women with and without endometriosis, respectively. In the endometrial stroma apoptosis indices were estimated at 2.04+/-1.72 in women with endometriosis and 4.12+/-1.62 in the control group (p<0.01).The observed changes could support the hypothesis of the different properties of eutopic endometrium in endometriotic women as a causing factor of peritoneal endometriosis.Expression of the transmembrane mucins, MUC1, MUC4 and MUC16, in normal endometrium and in endometriosis.Are the transmembrane mucins, MUC1, MUC4 and MUC16, differentially expressed in endometriosis compared with normal endometrium?This study revealed that transmembrane mucin expression does not vary significantly in normal endometrium during the menstrual cycle and is not altered in endometriosis relative to the epithelial marker, cytokeratin-18 (KRT18).Increased serum levels of the transmembrane mucin fragments MUC1, MUC4 and MUC16 that normally dominate the apical surface of simple epithelia are found in several pathological conditions, including endometriosis. Altered mucin expression in gynecologic diseases may promote infertility or endometrial pathologies.This was a laboratory-based study of samples from 12 endometriosis patients as well as non-endometriosis control samples obtained from 31 patients.Total RNA was isolated from endometrial biopsies of ectopic and eutopic endometrium from women with endometriosis and control patients from different stages of the menstrual cycle. Quantitative (q)-RT-PCR analyses were performed for the mucins, MUC1, MUC4 and MUC16, relative to the epithelial marker, cytokeratin-18 (KRT18), or β-actin (ACTB). Frozen sections from endometrial biopsies of proliferative and mid-secretory stage women with endometriosis were immunostained for MUC1, MUC4 and MUC16.qRT-PCR analyses of MUC1 and MUC16 mRNA revealed that these mucins do not vary significantly during the menstrual cycle nor are they altered in women with endometriosis relative to the epithelial marker, KRT18. MUC4 mRNA is expressed at very low levels relative to MUC1 and MUC16 under all conditions. There was little difference in MUC1 and MUC16 expression between eutopic endometrial and ectopic endometriotic tissues. MUC4 expression also was not significantly higher in the ectopic endometriotic tissues. Immunostaining for all three mucins reveals robust expression of MUC1 and MUC16 at the apical surfaces of endometrial epithelia, but little to no staining for MUC4.qRT-PCR analysis was the main method used for mucin detection. Additional studies with stage III-IV endometriotic tissue would be useful to determine if changes in MUC1 and MUC16 expression occur, or if MUC4 expression increases, at later stages of endometriosis.We report a comprehensive comparative profile of the major transmembrane mucins, MUC1, MUC4 and MUC16, relative to the epithelial marker, KRT18, in normal cycling endometrium and in endometriosis, and indicate constitutive expression. Previous studies have profiled the expression of individual mucins relative to β-actin and indicate accumulation in the luteal phase. Thus, these differences in interpretation appear to reflect the increased epithelial content of endometrium during the luteal phase.This study was supported by: NIH R01HD29963 to D.D.C.; NIH U54HD007495 to S.M.H.; and NIH R01HD067721 to S.L.Y. and B.A.L. The authors have no competing interests to declare.The ferroimmunomodulatory role of ectopic endometriotic stromal cells in ovarian endometriosis.To understand the role of ectopic endometriotic stromal cells in ovarian endometriosis (OEM) and the associated risks for infertility and carcinogenesis.Analyses of secreted proteins and gene expression using immortalized eutopic/ectopic endometrial(-otic) stromal cells from OEM.University.Women with and without OEM.Samples of endometrial(-otic) tissue from women with or without OEM.Immunohistochemical analysis of oxidative stress in OEM, gene expression profiles, and the identification of secreted proteins by mass spectrometry in immortalized endometrial(-otic) stromal cells.4-Hydroxy-2-nonenal-modified proteins and carboxymethyllysine were abundant in the stroma, rather than epithelia, of OEM patients, indicating the presence of oxidative stress. Immortalized ectopic endometriotic stromal cells exhibited high IRP1/IRP2/HIF-1β expression and contained lower amounts of iron and copper than their eutopic counterparts. Expression profiles, in combination with protein identification, revealed that complement component 3 (C3) and pentraxin-3 (PTX3) are the major proteins secreted from immortalized ectopic endometriotic stromal cells. Complement-3/PTX3 promoted the secretion of various cytokines by THP1 macrophage cells and thus supported M1 differentiation.Immortalized ectopic endometriotic stromal cells in OEM predominantly secrete C3 and PTX3 and exhibit a differential regulation of iron metabolism.Additive effects of inflammation and stress reaction on Toll-like receptor 4-mediated growth of endometriotic stromal cells.Is there any combined effect between inflammation and stress reaction on Toll-like receptor 4 (TLR4)-mediated growth of endometriotic cells?A combined effect of local inflammation and stress reaction in the pelvic environment may be involved in TLR4-mediated growth of endometriotic stromal cells.In endometriosis, higher endotoxin levels in the menstrual fluid (MF) and peritoneal fluid (PF) and higher tissue concentrations of human heat shock protein 70 (HSP70) in the eutopic and ectopic endometria promote TLR4-mediated growth of endometriotic cells.This is a case-controlled research study with prospective collection and retrospective evaluation of sera, MF, PF and endometrial tissues from 43 women with and 20 women without endometriosis.PF was collected from 43 women with endometriosis and 20 control women during laparoscopy. Sera and endometrial biopsy specimens were collected from a proportion of these women. MF was collected from a separate population of 20 women with endometriosis and 15 control women. HSP70 concentrations in sera, MF, PF and in culture media were measured by ELISA. Gene expression of HSP70 by endometrial cells in response to lipopolysaccharide (LPS) was examined by qRT-PCR. The individual and combined effects of LPS and HSP70 on the secretion of interleukin-6 (IL-6) and tumor necrosis factor α (TNFα) by PF-derived macrophages (M[Symbol: see text]) were examined by ELISA, while their effects on endometrial cell proliferation were examined by bromodeoxyuridine and [(3)H]-thymidine incorporation assay.Concentrations of HSP70 were maximal in MF, intermediate in PF and the lowest in sera. In MF and PF, HSP70 levels were higher in women with endometriosis than in controls. LPS stimulated gene expression and secretion of HSP70 by eutopic endometrial stromal cells (ESCs) and this effect was abrogated after pretreatment of cells with an anti-TLR4 antibody. This effect was significantly higher for ESCs derived from women with endometriosis than for ESCs from control women. Exogenous treatment with either HSP70 or LPS significantly stimulated the production of IL-6 and TNFα by M[Symbol: see text] and promoted the proliferation of ESCs, and a significant additive effect between LPS and HSP70 was observed. While individual treatment with either polymyxin B, an LPS antagonist, or anti-HSP70 antibody was unable to suppress the combined effects of LPS and HSP70 on cytokine secretion or ESC proliferation, pretreatment of cells with the anti-TLR4 antibody was able to significantly suppress their combined effects.Further studies are needed to examine the mutual role between other secondary inflammatory mediators and endogenous stress proteins in promoting pelvic inflammation and growth of endometriotic stromal cells.Our findings suggest that endotoxin and HSP70 are mutually involved in a stress reaction and in inflammation. A combined effect between local inflammation and a stress reaction in pelvic environment may be involved in TLR4-mediated growth of endometriotic cells. Since endometriosis is a multi-factorial disease, it is difficult to explain uniformly its growth regulation by a single factor. Our findings may provide some new insights in understanding the physiopathology or pathogenesis of endometriosis and may hold new therapeutic potential.This work was supported by Grants-in-Aid for Scientific Research (grant no. 16591671 and 18591837) from the Ministry of Education, Sports, Culture, Science and Technology of Japan (to K.N.K.). There is no conflict of interest related to this study.Not applicable.Expression of vascular endothelial growth factor (VEGF) and its soluble receptor-1 in endometriosis.The aim of this study is to evaluate the expression of vascular endothelial growth factor (VEGF) and its soluble receptor (sFlt-1) in peritoneal fluid (PF), peritoneal endometriotic lesions and eutopic endometrial tissues of patients with endometriosis. Peritoneal fluid, peritoneal endometriotic lesions and eutopic endometrial samples from patients with endometriosis, and peritoneal fluid, peritoneal tissue and endometrial samples from patients without endometriosis were obtained during an operative laparoscopy. The mean PF concentrations of VEGF and sFlt-1 were significantly higher in patients with endometriosis than in the controls. In the peritoneal tissue, the expressions of VEGF and sFlt-1 were significantly higher, where the expression of sFlt-1 in endometrium was significantly lower in patients with endometriosis. These findings indicate that not only abnormal expressions of angiogenic factors, but also aberrant expressions of antiangiogenic factors in the peritoneal and endometrial environment seem to be involved in the pathogenesis of endometriosis.[Expression of integrin beta 3 and intracellular adhesion molecule in endometrium and endometriotic tissue].To study the relationship between integrin beta 3, intracellular adhesion molecule (ICAM) and endometriosis.The expression of integrin beta 3 and ICAM protein were determined in 3 batches by immunoblotting method in 15 endometrium and 15 endometriotic tissues of patients with endometriosis and 30 endometrium from non-endometriosis subjects during the same menstrual phase. The results were scanned and semi-quantified, and then analysed by F test and t test.The results from 3 measurements showed the same trend. Endometrium from patients with endometriosis expressed significantly fewer integrin beta 3 and ICAM protein than those without endometriosis. On the other hand, the expression of integrin beta 3 in endometriotic tissue was significantly lower while the ICAM expression was significantly higher than those in controls.In patients with endometriosis, integrin beta 3 and ICAM expression changed significantly from eutopic to ectopic endometrium which may be related to the development of endometriosis and infertility.Endometrial vascular and glandular expression of integrin alpha(v)beta3 in women with and without endometriosis.The integrin alpha(v)beta3 functions in both cell-cell and cell-extracellular matrix adhesion, and has reported roles in platelet aggregation, immune function, tissue repair, tumour invasion, angiogenesis and uterine receptivity. The aim of this study was to use immunohistochemistry to describe the vascular and glandular expression of integrin alpha(v)beta3 in formalin fixed, paraffin embedded endometrium obtained from women with (n = 29) and without (n = 24) endometriosis. The results showed a significant increase in the percentage of vessels expressing alpha(v)beta3 in the endometrium of women with endometriosis compared with controls (P = 0.0001). This difference was more pronounced in the secretory phase (P = 0.001) than the proliferative phase (P = 0.016). There was no correlation between vascular alpha(v)beta3 expression and the endothelial cell proliferation index (P > 0.05). Vascular sprouts were not observed in any of the 53 endometrial tissues obtained from women with or without endometriosis throughout the menstrual cycle. Results from semi-quantitative scoring of gland immunostaining showed that neither controls (P = 0.3329) nor the endometriosis group (P = 0.2260) had any significant changes in terms of alpha(v)beta3 expression between the different stages of the menstrual cycle. There was also no difference in glandular alpha(v)beta3 expression between women with and without endometriosis (P = 0.4302). These results provide evidence for increased endometrial angiogenesis in women with endometriosis compared with controls, and suggest that glandular expression of alpha(v)beta3 is not related to uterine receptivity per se.Transcriptional changes in the expression of chemokines related to natural killer and T-regulatory cells in patients with deep infiltrative endometriosis.To evaluate the expression of chemokines that regulate natural killer (NK) and T-regulatory (T-reg) cell activity in eutopic and ectopic endometrial tissue samples from endometriosis patients.Case-control study (Canadian Task Force classification II-2).Tertiary referral hospital.Sixty-four consecutive patients with and without endometriosis.After videolaparoscopy, patients were divided into three groups: bowel endometriosis (n = 22), retrocervical endometriosis (n = 10), and endometriosis-free women (n = 32).Gene expression of the chemokines that regulate NK (CXCL9, CXCL10, CXCL11, CXCL12, XCL1, and CX3CL1) and T-reg cell activity (CCL17 and CCL21) evaluated by real-time polymerase chain reaction.Of the chemokines associated with NK cells, CX3CL1 and CXCL12 expression was statistically significantly greater in the foci of endometriosis compared with the eutopic endometrium in patients and controls. From the chemokines associated with T-reg cells, CCL17 expression was statistically significantly greater in the eutopic endometrium of the patients with rectosigmoid endometriosis compared with the foci of endometriosis or eutopic endometrium of the patients with retrocervical endometriosis or the disease-free women.Both T-reg and NK cells mediate inflammatory response and may play a fundamental role in endometriosis by causing an impaired clearing of endometrial cells. Establishing how CCL17, CXCL12, and CX3CL1 modulate this response is essential to understanding inflammatory responses in endometriosis.Lymphocyte subsets in the endometrium of patients with endometriosis throughout the menstrual cycle.Comparison and characterisation of different lymphocyte subsets in the endometrium of endometriosis patients and in healthy women on every day of the menstrual cycle with special emphasis on the CD4:CD8 ratio in the endometrium.Immunohistochemical staining of 253 endometrial biopsies of infertile women with and without endometriosis with Anti-Leu4 (CD3), Anti-Leu3a (CD4), Anti-Leu2a (CD8), Anti-Leu7 and Anti-Human-B-cell (CD22) using the immune peroxidase reaction. Identification and counting of positive lymphocyte were performed on cryostat sections.Endometrial lymphocyte subsets show equal quantity and distribution in endometriosis patients and in the control group. After a peak in the early proliferative phase the absolute number of T lymphocytes decreases while a predominance of T-suppressor/cytotoxic T lymphocytes (CD8) compared to T-helper/inducer lymphocytes (CD4) occurs towards the end of the menstrual cycle.Endometrium as the potential parent epithelia of endometriosis lesions seems not to be altered in its lymphatic cell content compared to healthy women. Furthermore, endometrium is clearly characterised as part of the mucosa associated lymphatic tissue (MALT). T lymphocytes show specific quantitative changes due to different phases of the menstrual cycle.Expression of Annexin-1 in patients with endometriosis.Annexin-1 was identified as an endometriosis-related protein by comparative proteomics in previous study. As an endogenous anti-inflammatory mediator, Annexin-1 has been shown to regulate the immune response, cell proliferation and apoptosis. To investigate whether Annexin-1 is involved in the pathogenesis of endometriosis, we examined the expression of Annexin-1 in eutopic endometrium of women with or without endometriosis, and detected its expression in peritoneal fluids of those with endometriosis.Eutopic endometrium samples from twenty-five women with endometriosis and those from sixteen age-matched women without endometriosis were collected. Peritoneal fluids were obtained from ten patients with endometriosis. The expression of Annexin-1 protein in eutopic endometrium was detected by immunohistochemistry and Western blotting, and mRNA detected by real-time PCR. Annexin-1 protein in the peritoneal fluids was detected by Western blotting.Annexin-1 mRNA and protein were overexpressed in eutopic endometrium of endometriosis without significant differences between the proliferative and secretory phase. Immunohistochemistry showed that Annexin-1 protein was expressed mainly in endometrial glandular cells throughout the menstrual cycle. Annexin-1 protein was detected in the peritoneal fluids of all the ten patients with endometriosis.Annexin-1 is overexpressed in eutopic endometrium and presents in the peritoneal fluids of patients with endometriosis, and may play a role in the pathogenesis of endometriosis.Menstrual effluent in endometriosis shows no difference in volume, VEGF-A, MMP2 and MMP9 or sFLT.Since retrograde menstruation is considered a key event in the aetiology of endometriosis, this study sought to determine whether the menstrual effluent of women with this condition is different from that of those with a normal pelvis. As the amount of blood lost during menstruation is thought to be higher in this group, measured objective menstrual blood loss (MBL) was measured. In addition, factors enhancing both ectopic implantation of endometrium and its subsequent growth (by establishing a neo-vasculature) were chosen for study. Our hypothesis was that they are increased in the menstrual effluent of women with endometriosis. The study showed that at the time of menstruation, there is no difference in MBL or in the volume of menstrual effluent between women with endometriosis and those with a normal pelvis at laparoscopy. In addition, vascular endothelial growth factor-A (VEGF-A) message and protein, soluble truncated receptor sVEGF-R1 (sFLT), matrix metalloproteinase (MMP) 2 and MMP9 activities were also shown to be similar between the two groups. It is concluded that the enhanced expression of VEGF-A and MMP in the peritoneal fluid and ectopic lesions of endometriotic patients may be a secondary event, resulting from an innate difference in peritoneal and systemic factors rather than in the endometrium, causing an abnormal peritoneal response to menstrual debris and facilitating its ectopic implantation.Apoptosis and bcl-2 expression in normal human endometrium, endometriosis and adenomyosis.Apoptosis has been implicated in the pathogenesis of several diseases and is partly regulated by bcl-2, which blocks the apoptotic pathway and promotes cell survival. Apoptosis and bcl-2 expression were examined in paired eutopic and ectopic endometrium from women with endometriosis (n = 30 samples) or adenomyosis (n = 15 samples) and compared with control endometrium (n = 30 samples). Apoptotic cells were detected using the dUTP nick-end labelling (TUNEL) assay for DNA fragmentation; bcl-2 expression was demonstrated with a streptavidin-biotin peroxidase immunohistochemical technique. Apoptotic cells were rare in eutopic, ectopic and control endometrium; there were no significant differences between subject groups nor between eutopic and ectopic endometrium. Stromal bcl-2 expression increased in the late secretory phase in control and eutopic endometrium in endometriosis; double labelling studies revealed that most stromal bcl-2+ cells were leukocytes. Stromal bcl-2 expression in endometriotic foci was significantly increased compared with the paired eutopic endometrium, did not vary with menstrual cycle and included a significant population of non-leukocytic bcl-2+ stromal cells. In contrast, stromal bcl-2 expression in adenomyosis remained at low levels and did not show significant cyclical variation. Glandular epithelial bcl-2 expression also varied with menstrual cycle phase and peaked in the proliferative phase; in contrast, surface epithelial bcl-2 expression increased in the late secretory phase. Elevated stromal bcl-2 expression in ovarian endometriotic lesions could have implications for the growth and survival of ectopic endometrial tissue at these sites.Decreased expression of the decoy interleukin-1 receptor type II in human endometriosis.Many of the biological changes occurring in the endometrium during the menstrual cycle bear a striking resemblance to those associated with inflammatory and reparative processes. Hence, it would not be surprising to find that cytokines known for their pro-inflammatory properties, such as interleukin-1 (IL-1), could play a key role in the physiology of this tissue and that their action would be tightly controlled by local mechanisms. In the present study, immunohistochemical and Western blot analyses show that in normal women (n = 39), the endometrial tissue expresses, in a cycle-dependent manner, the IL-1 receptor type II (IL-1RII), a molecule of which the only biological property known to date is that of capturing IL-1, inhibiting thereby its binding to the functional type I IL-1 receptor. IL-RII immunostaining was particularly intense within the lumen of the glands and at the apical side of surface epithelium. Interestingly, the intensity of staining was markedly less pronounced in the endometrium of women with endometriosis (n = 54), a disease believed to arise from the abnormal development of endometrial tissue outside the uterus, especially in the early stages of the disease (stages I and II). This study is the first to show the local expression in endometrial tissue of IL-1RII, a potent and specific down-regulator of IL-1 action and its decreased expression in women suffering from endometriosis.Cold-shock domain family member YB-1 expression in endometrium and endometriosis.The Y-box-binding protein (YB-1) is described as a potential oncogene highly expressed in tumors and associated with increased cell survival, proliferation, migration and anti-apoptotic signaling. The aim of our study was to examine the expression and role of YB-1 in human endometriosis (Eo) and its association with cell survival, proliferation and invasion.We analyzed the gene and protein expression levels of YB-1 by quantitative real-time RT-PCR and immunoassays, respectively, in peritoneal macrophages, ovarian endometrioma and eutopic endometrial tissues/cells derived from women with (n= 120) and without (n= 91) Eo. We also evaluated the functional consequences of YB-1 knockdown in the Z12 Eo cell line by measuring cell proliferation [3-(4,5-dimethylthiazol-2-yl)-2,5-diphenyltetrazoliumbromid cell proliferation assay], invasion (Matrigel invasion assay) and spontaneous and tumour necrosis factor (TNFα)-induced RANTES (regulated upon activation, normal T-cell expressed and secreted chemokine) expression and apoptosis (ELISA-based assay).YB-1 gene and protein expression was statistically significantly higher in ovarian lesions, eutopic endometrium and peritoneal macrophages of patients with Eo in comparison with the control group. Interestingly, the strongest YB-1 expression was observed in the epithelial compartment of endometrial tissues. In the Z12 cell line, YB-1 knockdown resulted in significant cell growth inhibitory effects including reduced cell proliferation and increased rates of spontaneous and TNFα-induced apoptosis. Significantly, higher RANTES expression and decreased cell invasion in vitro were also associated with YB-1 inactivation.High YB-1 expression could have an impact on the development and progression of Eo. This study suggests the role of YB-1 as a potential therapeutic target for Eo patients.Differential expression of CRH, UCN, CRHR1 and CRHR2 in eutopic and ectopic endometrium of women with endometriosis.Endometriosis is considered as a benign aseptic inflammatory disease, characterised by the presence of ectopic endometrium-like tissue. Its symptoms (mostly pain and infertility) are reported as constant stressors. Corticotropin releasing hormone (CRH) and urocortin (UCN) are neuropeptides, strongly related to stress and inflammation. The effects of CRH and UCN are mediated through CRHR1 and CRHR2 receptors which are implicated in several reproductive functions acting as inflammatory components. However, the involvement of these molecules to endometriosis remains unknown. The aim of this study was to examine the expression of CRHR1 and CRHR2 in endometriotic sites and to compare the expression of CRHR1 and CRHR2 in eutopic endometrium of endometriotic women to that of healthy women. We further compared the expression of CRH, UCN, CRHR1 and CRHR2 in ectopic endometrium to that in eutopic endometrium of women with endometriosis. Endometrial biopsy specimens were taken from healthy women (10 patients) and endometrial and endometriotic biopsy specimens were taken from women with endometriosis (16 patients). Τhe expression of CRH, UCN, CRHR1, and CRHR2 was tested via RT-PCR, immunohistochemistry and Western blotting. This study shows for the first time that CRH and UCN receptor subtypes CRHR1β and CRHR2α are expressed in endometriotic sites and that they are more strongly expressed (p<0.01) in eutopic endometrium of women with endometriosis compared to healthy women endometrium at the mRNA and protein level. CRH, UCN, CRHR1 and CRHR2 mRNA were also more highly expressed in ectopic rather than eutopic endometrium (CRH, UCN, CRHR2α: p<0.01, CRHR1β: p<0.05) and protein (CRH and UCN: p<0.05, CRHR1 and CRHR2: p<0.01) in women with endometriosis. These data indicate that CRH and UCN might play an immunoregulatory role in endometriotic sites by affecting reproductive functions such as decidualization and implantation of women with endometriosis.Expression of phosphoinositide-specific phospholipase C enzymes in normal endometrium and in endometriosis.To delineate the panel of expression of phosphoinositide-specific phospholipase C (PI-PLC) signaling enzymes in normal endometrium and in endometriosis.Clinical/experimental study.University.Healthy donor woman and endometriosis-affected woman.Normal endometrium and endometriosis surgical biopsies were analyzed using gene expression analyses methodology (reverse transcriptase-polymerase chain reaction [PCR], bioanalyses).Gene expression (messenger RNA concentration) measures of 12 PI-PLC enzymes: PI-PLC β1, PI-PLC β2, PI-PLC β3, PI-PLC β4, PI-PLC γ1, PI-PLC γ2, PI-PLC δ1, PI-PLC δ3, PI-PLC δ4, PI-PLC ε, PI-PLC η1, and PI-PLC η2.PI-PLC β1, PI-PLC β3, PI-PLC δ1, and PI-PLC δ3 enzymes were detected, although differently expressed in normal and endometriosis tissues.The involvement of PI-PLC enzymes in inflammation and the consistency of susceptible endometriosis loci with PI-PLC genes mapping corroborate the hypothesis that PI signaling might be involved in the pathogenesis of endometriosis.Inflammatory status influences aromatase and steroid receptor expression in endometriosis.Aberrant up-regulation of aromatase in eutopic endometrium and implants from women with endometriosis has been reported. Aromatase induction may be mediated by increased cyclooxygenase-2 (COX-2). Recently, we demonstrated that progesterone receptor (PR)-A and PR-B serve an antiinflammatory role in the uterus by antagonizing nuclear factor kappaB activation and COX-2 expression. PR-C, which antagonizes PR-B, is up-regulated by inflammation. Although estrogen receptor alpha (ERalpha) is implicated in endometriosis, an antiinflammatory role of ERbeta has been suggested. We examined stage-specific expression of aromatase, COX-2, ER, and PR isoform expression in eutopic endometrium, implants, peritoneum, and endometrioma samples from endometriosis patients. Endometrial and peritoneal biopsies were obtained from unaffected women and those with fibroids. Aromatase expression in eutopic endometrium from endometriosis patients was significantly increased compared with controls. Aromatase expression in endometriosis implants was markedly increased compared with eutopic endometrium. Aromatase mRNA levels were increased significantly in red implants relative to black implants and endometrioma cyst capsule. Moreover, COX-2 expression was increased in implants and in eutopic endometrium of women with endometriosis as compared with control endometrium. As observed for aromatase mRNA, the highest levels of COX-2 mRNA were found in red implants. The ratio of ERbeta/ERalpha mRNA was significantly elevated in endometriomas compared with endometriosis implants and eutopic endometrium. Expression of PR-C mRNA relative to PR-A and PR-B mRNA was significantly increased in endometriomas compared with eutopic and control endometrium. PR-A protein was barely detectable in endometriomas. Thus, whereas PR-C may enhance disease progression, up-regulation of ERbeta may play an antiinflammatory and opposing role.Regulation of P21-activated kinase-4 by progesterone and tumor necrosis factor-α in human endometrium and its increased expression in advanced-stage endometriosis.Endometriosis is a common gynecological condition characterized by enhanced proliferation, adhesiveness, invasiveness, and survival of endometrial cells after retrograde menstruation. Originally identified as a cytoskeletal regulatory kinase, p21-activated kinase 4 (Pak4) regulates diverse cellular activities that might be altered in the establishment and progression of endometriosis.The aim was to evaluate the effects of sex steroids and proinflammatory cytokines on the Pak4 expression in endometrial cells along with the functional change caused by inhibition of Pak4 expression as well as to see whether the Pak4 expression is altered in endometriosis.Pak4 expression was analyzed using immunohistochemistry and Western blot analysis. Viability and invasiveness were assayed after transfection of endometrial cells with Pak4 small interfering RNA.The Pak4 expression was significantly decreased in the stromal cells during the secretory phase as well as by in vitro treatment with progesterone. The immunoreactivity of Pak4 was significantly increased in the eutopic endometrium as well as in the ovarian endometriotic cyst of women with endometriosis compared with the control subjects. TNF-α induced a significant increase in the Pak4 expression in endometrial cells in vitro, whereas IL-1β had no effects. Transfection of endometrial cells with Pak4 small interfering RNA led to a significant decrease in viability and invasiveness in endometrial cells.These findings suggest that Pak4 is regulated by progesterone and TNF-α in endometrial cells and that the increased expression of Pak4 might lead to the establishment and progression of endometriosis by enhanced cellular viability and invasiveness in endometrial cells.Leukaemia inhibitory factor and interleukin 11 levels in uterine flushings of infertile patients with endometriosis.Exact aetiology of infertility in stage I/II endometriosis patients is not known. Interleukin 11 (IL-11) and leukaemia-inhibitory factor (LIF) are factors associated with implantation window in human eutopic endometrium. We decided to test whether there is an altered secretion of these factors, which could explain receptivity defect in patients with minimal endometriosis.Uterine flushing and endometrial samples were collected 7-9 days after ovulation (implantation window) from infertile patients with stage I/II endometriosis (n = 14) and fertile, endometriosis-free controls (n = 21). IL-11 and LIF were assessed in uterine flushings in eutopic endometria in all patients by enzyme-linked immunosorbent assay (ELISA). In eutopic endometrium, semiquantitative RT-PCR was performed for LIF and IL-11 mRNA expressions.No statistically significant differences were found in uterine flushing in women with and without endometriosis with regard to IL-11 levels (0.0 pg/ml versus 0.0 pg/ml) and LIF (25.53 pg/ml versus 36.26 pg/ml). These results were confirmed by the results of RT-PCR, where there were also no differences between studied groups.There is no receptivity defect with regard to LIF and IL-11 secretions by eutopic endometrium in infertile women with endometriosis.Xanthine oxidase in eutopic and ectopic endometrium in endometriosis and adenomyosis.To investigate the expression of xanthine oxidase in eutopic and ectopic endometrium in endometriosis and adenomyosis.Immunohistochemical identification of xanthine oxidase in endometrial tissues by using polyclonal antibody.University hospital.Thirty-four women with endometriosis, 34 women with adenomyosis, and 44 fertile control women.Biopsy samples were obtained from the endometrium throughout the menstrual cycle.Semiquantitative immunostaining (evaluation nomogram) score of endometrial cells.The level of xanthine oxidase expression in the glandular epithelium of control varied according to menstrual phase, but no such variation in expression was seen in endometriosis. Variation in xanthine oxidase expression was observed during the menstrual cycle in patients with adenomyosis; this variation differed completely from that in controls. Xanthine oxidase expression was found in ectopic endometrial tissue in all cases. The mean evaluation nomogram levels in the glandular epithelium in adenomyosis tissue were as high as those in the early secretory phase in the eutopic endometrium.Aberrant expression of xanthine oxidase in eutopic and ectopic endometrium appears to play a pathologic role in endometriosis and adenomyosis.Down-regulation of p21-activated kinase 1 by progestin and its increased expression in the eutopic endometrium of women with endometriosis.P21-activated kinase 1 (Pak1) integrates various signaling pathways that are vital to cell survival and function. This study was performed to evaluate whether sex steroids may regulate the expression of Pak1 in endometrial cells as well as whether its expression is increased in the eutopic endometrium of women with endometriosis.Following in vitro estradiol (E(2)) and/or medroxyprogesterone acetate (MPA) treatment of Ishikawa cells and endometrial stromal cells (ESCs), Pak1 protein was analyzed utilizing western blot analysis and immunocytochemistry. Immunohistochemistry was performed to evaluate Pak1 immunoreactivity semiquantitatively in women with endometriosis and in controls. To assess the role of Pak1 on endometrial cell viability, crystal violet assay was performed following transfection of Ishikawa cells with Pak1 small interfering RNA (siRNA).In vitro treatment with E(2) plus MPA or MPA alone led to a significant decrease of Pak1 protein in Ishikawa cells and ESCs (both P < 0.05 versus control). Immunohistochemistry also revealed that Pak1 protein is significantly decreased during the secretory phase in both epithelial and stromal cells in the control subjects (P < 0.001 and P < 0.01, respectively). The immunoreactivity of Pak1 in glandular cells was significantly increased in the eutopic endometrium of women with endometriosis compared with the controls during the secretory phase (P < 0.01). Crystal violet assay has shown that transfection of Ishikawa cells with Pak1 siRNA led to a significant decrease of cellular viability (P < 0.05).These findings suggest that Pak1 is down-regulated by progesterone during the secretory phase in normal endometrium and increased Pak1 activity during the secretory phase might lead to establishment of endometriosis.Steroidogenic enzyme and key decidualization marker dysregulation in endometrial stromal cells from women with versus without endometriosis.Identification of mechanisms underlying endometriosis pathogenesis will facilitate understanding and treatment of infertility and pain associated with this disorder. Herein, we investigated the expression of steroidogenic pathway enzymes and key decidualization biomarkers in endometrial tissue and in eutopic endometrial stromal fibroblasts (hESFs) from women with vs. those without endometriosis, and subsequently treated in vitro with 8-bromo-cAMP (8-Br-cAMP) or progesterone (P4). Real-time quantitative PCR, immunohistochemistry, ELISA, and radiometric aromatase activity assay were used. The results demonstrate significantly increased (14.5-fold; P=0.037) expression of aromatase in eutopic endometrium of women with disease. In 8-Br-cAMP-treated hESF from eutopic endometrium of women with endometriosis, the balance in estradiol (E2) and P4 biosynthetic and metabolizing enzymes is disturbed (decreased HSD3B1 and HSD17B2, and increased HSD17B1 and aromatase), with the equilibrium being shifted towards an E2-enriched milieu. However, hESF from the same group of women treated with P4 did not demonstrate such responsiveness. Lower expression of IGFBP1 and prolactin mRNA and protein was observed in hESF from women with vs. those without endometriosis in response to 8-Br-cAMP, but not P4, suggesting a blunted response of these decidual biomarkers to activation of the PKA pathway in eutopic endometrium in women with disease. The dichotomy of 8-Br-cAMP regulation of select steroidogenic enzymes leading to an enriched E2 milieu within the endometrium and a blunted response of decidual biomarkers to this decidualizing agent of hESF from women with endometriosis suggests resistance to full decidualization of the stromal fibroblasts and mechanisms underlying implantation failure and the pathophysiology of this disorder.Association between MMP1 and MMP9 activities and ICAM1 cleavage induced by tumor necrosis factor in stromal cell cultures from eutopic endometria of women with endometriosis.Endometriosis is a benign gynecological pathology in which immune system deregulation may play a role in its initiation and progression. In endometriotic lesions, intercellular adhesion molecule-1 (ICAM1) is released from the cell membrane by proteolytic cleavage of its extracellular domain, a process that coincides with increased expression and proteolytic activity of metalloproteinases such as MMP1 and MMP9. The objective of our study was to investigate the association between MMP1 and MMP9 activities and ICAM1 cleavage mediated by tumor necrosis factor (TNF) in eutopic endometrial stromal cells from women with and without (control) endometriosis during culture. The RNA was evaluated by RT-PCR, and the protein was determined by western blot (ICAM1, MMP1), casein or gelatin zymographies (secreted active MMP1 or MMP9 respectively), ELISA (soluble ICAM1 (sICAM1)), and fluorescence assay (secreted active MMP1). Under basal conditions, proMMP9 dimer and MMP9 were higher in endometriosis cell cultures. In stromal cultures derived from control women and those with endometriosis, TNF augmented the intracellular proMMP1 (1.2-fold in control stromal cells) and ICAM1 (1.4- and 1.9-fold), greatly increased MMP1 and proMMP9 levels, and the sICAM1 concentration (2.3- and 4.3-fold) in their media compared with basal levels. The combination of TNF and MMP9 increased the sICAM1 concentration 14-fold in the endometriosis cell media, whereas GM6001 inhibited the stimulatory effect of TNF in both cell cultures. The deregulation of MMP9, and the TNF participation in the MMP1 and proMMP9 secretions, in the MMP9 expression and in the expression and cleavage of ICAM1 may contribute to the pathophysiology of this disease.Combination of non-invasive and semi-invasive tests for diagnosis of minimal to mild endometriosis.Non-surgical diagnostic approach for endometriosis would be of great gain to both physicians and patients. The aim of this study was to evaluate the diagnostic value of serum measurement of IL-6 combined with the presence of nerve fibres in the functional layer of endometrium for diagnosis of minimal-mild endometriosis.In this prospective study 114 women who underwent laparoscopy for infertility and/or pelvic pain were divided into two groups: control cases (40 cases) with no pathologic findings; and endometriosis patients (74 cases) [subdivided into stages 1-2 or minimal-mild (MM) and stages 3-4 or moderate-severe cases]. Blood was drawn one day before laparoscopy and stored for subsequent analysis of IL-6. Endometrial biopsy was obtained prior to laparoscopy and Immunohistochemistry was performed using the pan-neuronal marker protein gene product 9.5(PGP9.5). Then laparoscopic diagnosis of endometriosis confirmed by histopathology was done.Serum IL-6 with a threshold of 15.4 pg/ml was found to be able to diagnose MM endometriosis with 89.5 % sensitivity and 82.5 % specificity, but sensitivity and specificity of presence of nerve fibres in the functional layer of endometrium were 92 % and 80 % respectively. When two diagnostic modalities were combined the sensitivity and specificity were raised to 100 and 92.5 % respectively.Combination of both serum IL-6 and presence of nerve fibres in the endometrium is more reliable method for diagnosis of MM endometriosis than in single test.[Expressions of nuclear factor-kappaB and intercellular adhesion molecule-1 in endometriosis].To investigate the association of nuclear factor-kappaB (NF-kappaB) and intercellular adhesion molecule-1 (ICAM-1) with endometriosis.Immunohistochemistry was used to examine the NF-kappaB and VEGF protein expression in 35 specimens of normal endometrium, 48 eutopic endometrium of endometriosis and 76 ectopic endometrium, and the results were analyzed statistically.The expressions of NF-kappaB and ICAM-1 were found mainly in the glandular epithelial cells of the three endometrium specimens, with the ectopic endometriotic tissues showing the highest and normal endometrium the lowest expressions (P<0.001). NF-kappaB and ICAM-1 expressions were positively correlated to normal, eutopic and ectopic endometrium (r=0.688, 0.773 and 0.777, respectively, P<0.01).NF-kappaB and ICAM-1 may participate in the process of the pathogenesis in endometriosis.DNA microarray analysis of gene expression profiles in deep endometriosis using laser capture microdissection.Endometriosis, a common gynecological disorder that causes infertility and pelvic pain, is defined as the presence of endometrial glands and stroma within extra-uterine sites. However, despite extensive studies its etiology and pathogenesis are not completely understood. Differentially expressed genes were investigated in epithelial and stromal cells from deep endometriosis and matched eutopic endometrium using cDNA microarrays and laser capture microdissection. Validation of results of several up- and down-regulated genes was performed by quantitative real-time RT-PCR. Our data showed that platelet-derived growth factor receptor alpha (PDGFRA), protein kinase C beta1 (PKC beta1) and janus kinase 1 (JAK1) were upregulated, and Sprouty2 and mitogen-activated protein kinase kinase 7 (MKK7) were downregulated in endometriosis stromal cells, suggesting the involvement of the RAS/RAF/MAPK signaling pathway through PDGFRA in endometriosis pathophysiology. In addition, two potential negative regulators of aromatase expression, chicken ovalbumin upstream promoter transcription factor 2 (COUP-TF2) and prostaglandin E2 receptor subtype EP3 (PGE2EP3), were downregulated in endometriosis epithelial cells, which might result in increased local production of estrogen in endometriosis epithelial cells. Furthermore, three potential candidate genes that might be involved in endometriosis related pain were identified: tyrosine kinase receptor B (TRkB) in endometriosis epithelial cells, and serotonin transporter (5HTT) and mu opioid receptor (MOR) in endometriosis stromal cells were all upregulated. One of the candidate genes, MOR, may be involved in a defective immune system in endometriosis. This study has provided new insights into endometriosis pathophysiology.MicroRNA 135 regulates HOXA10 expression in endometriosis.Homeo box A10 (HOXA10) regulates endometrial receptivity and its expression is decreased in women with endometriosis. Although sex steroids regulate HOXA10, these hormones are unaltered in endometriosis. We hypothesized a role for microRNA in the regulation of HOXA10.MicroRNA 135a and -b are small noncoding RNA with predicted targets that include HOXA10. We evaluated miR135a/b expression and HOXA10 regulation in endometrium from subjects with and without endometriosis.The design of the study was the measurement of miR135a/b expression by quantitative PCR and in vitro analysis of HOXA10 regulation.The study was conducted at a university medical center.Patients included 50 controls and 32 women with endometriosis.Study interventions included endometrial biopsies and in vitro transfection.miR135a/b and HOXA10 expression were measured in the study.All endometrial samples expressed miR135a and -b. miR135a expression in controls was increased during the proliferative phase, decreased at the time of ovulation, and increased during the luteal phase. Subjects with endometriosis had 3-fold higher expression of miR135a in the proliferative phase than controls. miR135b showed less variation across the menstrual cycle; however, it was significantly increased in women with endometriosis in the proliferative and secretory phases. HOXA10 expression was simultaneously repressed in the endometrium of women with endometriosis. Transfection of endometrial stromal cells with mir135a/b or miR135a/b inhibitors resulted in the altered expression of HOXA10 mRNA and protein. miR135a or -b decreased luciferase expression driven by the HOXA10 3' untranslated region containing the miR135 binding site. miR135a regulation of HOXA10 was absent in MCF-7 cells, demonstrating cell specificity.HOXA10 was aberrantly regulated in the endometrium of women with endometriosis by both miR135a and miR135b. Increased microRNA expression likely suppresses genes required for implantation.Altered expression of claudin-3 and claudin-4 in ectopic endometrium of women with endometriosis.To investigate the expression of claudin-3 and claudin-4 in the eutopic and ectopic endometrium of women with endometriosis and to evaluate the role of claudin-3 and claudin-4 in the pathogenesis of endometriosis.Cross-sectional measurement of gene expression levels of claudin-3 and claudin-4 on endometriotic tissue.Academic.Thirty-five patients with endometriosis and 35 healthy women who were free of endometriosis were recruited for the study.Expression of claudin-3 and claudin-4 were investigated with immunohistochemical analysis, Western blot, and real-time polymerase chain reaction. Morphologic change of tight junction was also observed in different kinds of endometria.The expression levels of claudin-3 and claudin-4 in epithelial cells from 35 ectopic endometrial tissues, 27 eutopic endometrial tissues from women with endometriosis, and 35 normal endometrial tissues from women without endometriosis.Expression of claudin-3 and claudin-4 was significantly lower in the ectopic endometriotic tissue than in the eutopic endometrium from women with endometriosis and normal controls at both the messenger RNA and protein levels. No significant difference was found between eutopic endometrium from women with endometriosis and normal endometrium from women without endometriosis.Down-regulated expression of claudin-3 and claudin-4 in ectopic endometrium suggests that claudin-3 and claudin-4 might play a pathogenic role in the formation of endometriosis.The expression of estrogen receptors as well as GREB1, c-MYC, and cyclin D1, estrogen-regulated genes implicated in proliferation, is increased in peritoneal endometriosis.To analyze the expression of estrogen receptors α and β as well as their target genes implicated in proliferation, c-myc, cyclin D1, and GREB1, in the endometrium of women with or without endometriosis.Expression analysis in human tissue.University hospitals and a clinic.Ninety-one premenopausal women (59 patients with endometriosis and 32 controls) undergoing laparoscopic surgery.Biopsies were obtained at time of surgery, performed during the proliferative phase of the cycle.Estrogen receptors α and β as well as c-myc, cyclin D1, and GREB1 mRNA expression levels were determined by quantitative reverse transcriptase-polymerase chain reaction. Tissue localization of these estrogen-regulated genes was analyzed by immunohistochemistry.Estrogen receptors α and β as well as c-myc, cyclin D1, and GREB1 mRNA expression levels were increased in ectopic tissue in comparison with both normal and eutopic endometrium. Estrogen receptor mRNA levels also were upregulated in the eutopic peritoneal tissue of patients with endometriosis. Cyclin D1 and GREB1 expression was augmented in eutopic endometrium. c-myc, cyclin D1, and GREB1 proteins exhibited a nuclear localization in ectopic endometrial tissue.This constitutes the first report of increased expression of GREB1, as well as cyclin D1 and c-myc, in peritoneal endometriotic lesions, implicating these proteins in estrogen-dependent growth in this context.Androgen receptor and 5alpha-reductase are expressed in pelvic endometriosis.The aim of this study was to evaluate whether androgen receptor (AR) and the enzymes that convert testosterone into the more potent androgen dihydrotestosterone, 5alpha-reductases (5alpha-R1 and 5alpha-R2) are expressed in pelvic endometriosis. The study involved 21 infertile women who underwent laparoscopy and were divided into two groups: control (n= 13) and endometriosis (n= 8) according to the histological and laparoscopic findings. Endometrial and endometriotic implant biopsies were performed. By reverse transcription polymerase chain reaction and immunohistochemistry, AR, 5alpha-R1 and 5alpha-R2 messenger RNA and protein were detected in biopsies of pelvic endometriosis, as well as in the eutopic endometrium of both groups. These findings suggest that active androgens may be formed within the endometriotic tissue and that both local and systemic androgens have the potential to act on endometriotic cells.Macrophage expression in endometrium of women with and without endometriosis.Endometriosis is an inflammatory condition, characterized by the presence of endometrial-like tissue outside the uterus. The immune system provides a defence mechanism in response to foreign pathogens, and macrophages play important roles in this response. Activation of macrophages has been reported in peritoneal fluid and ectopic endometriotic lesions; however, controversy exists regarding the composition and function of macrophage populations in eutopic endometrium of women with and without endometriosis. This study aimed to quantify macrophages in eutopic endometrium of women with and without endometriosis, during the early, mid and late proliferative and menstrual phases of the cycle.Paraffin-embedded endometrial curettage blocks were selected from pathology archives. Seventy-six specimens from women with and without endometriosis were analysed using standard immunohistochemical techniques with CD68-PGM1 (phosphoglucomutase 1) clone antibody. Macrophages were counted according to their morphology over several fields of view.A significant increase in macrophage cell numbers was shown in eutopic endometrium in women with endometriosis (mean +/- SD, 182.7 +/- 72.9/mm(2)) during all stages of the proliferative phase compared with normal controls (101.6 +/- 53.4/mm(2); P < 0.001). Significant increase in macrophage density occurred in the control group during the mid-menstrual phase, Days 3-4 (P < 0.01), which was not observed in women with endometriosis.This study further supports an association between immune changes in eutopic endometrium and presence of endometriosis. However, it remains uncertain if eutopic immune changes are primary or secondary occurrences.Endometrial expression of estrogen receptor β and its splice variants in patients with and without endometriosis.The role of estrogen receptor beta (ERβ) in pathogenesis of endometriosis remains to be elucidated. In this study, we have examined the expression of the four main ERβ transcript isoforms in human endometrial tissue in women with or without endometriosis.Total RNA was isolated from native endometrial tissue and transcript levels of ERα, β1, β2, β4, β5 were analyzed by means of RT-PCR. We compared the results with regard to menstrual cycle phase as well as to presence or absence of endometriosis. We prospectively harvested the endometrium of ten women without endometriosis (five for each cycle phase) and eight patients with endometriosis (five in the proliferative phase, three in the secretory phase).ERα, β1, β2, and β5 transcripts were detected in both cycle phases. During the proliferative phase, healthy women had a significantly higher ERα/ERβ1-ratio than patients with endometriosis. Irrespective of the cycle phase, ERα-mRNA level was significantly higher than transcript levels of ERβ isoforms.ERα, β1, β2, and β5 are expressed in human endometrium. The individual receptors differed in terms of expression strength but there was no relevant change during the cycle. The decreased ERα/ERβ1-ratio in proliferative endometrium of endometriosis patients suggest that ERβ1 might be involved in the pathogenesis of endometriosis. Further studies should be undertaken to substantiate the role of ERβ in endometrial pathology.Expression of angiogenic factors in endometriosis: relationship to fibrinolytic and metalloproteinase systems.Endometriosis is a highly prevalent, benign disease in which the angiogenic, fibrinolytic and metalloproteinase (MMP) systems may be implicated. The objective of this study is to analyse mRNA expression and protein levels of several angiogenic factors and to correlate them with several components of the fibrinolytic and MMP systems in samples from 71 women with endometriosis and 50 controls.Eutopic endometrium showed higher mRNA expression of vascular endothelial growth factor (VEGF) in patients than in controls. However, ovarian endometrioma had lower VEGF mRNA levels than did the eutopic endometrium of patients. Similar results were obtained for VEGF protein levels. On the other hand, a significant increase in thrombospondin-1 (TSP-1) levels was observed in ovarian endometrioma than in eutopic endometrium. The peritoneal fluid from women with endometriosis showed a significant increase in VEGF, urokinase-type plasminogen activator (uPA) and MMP-3 levels than that of controls. A significant correlation was observed between the levels of VEGF and uPA in endometrium and in peritoneal fluid.Endometrium and peritoneal fluid from women with endometriosis have increased levels of VEGF, uPA and MMP-3 levels. Therefore, the development of endometriotic implants at ectopic sites may be facilitated, promoting the progress of the endometriosis.Increased expression of interleukin-1 receptor type 1 in active endometriotic lesions.The establishment and progression of ectopic endometrial implants are dependent upon their interaction with and responsiveness to the stimuli present in their new environment. According to our and other previous studies, immune cells-derived cytokines, such as IL-1, may alone or in concert with estrogens, enhance the capability of ectopic endometrial cells to implant and develop into the host tissue. In the present study, immunohistochemical and dual immunofluorescence analyses showed that the functional signaling interleukin-1 receptor type 1 (IL-1RI) is expressed in endometriotic tissue, particularly in the glands, and identified endothelial cells, macrophages, and T-lymphocytes as cells having marked expression of IL-1RI. The highest concentrations of IL-1RI protein in endometriotic tissue, as evaluated using histological score (HSCORE) and measured by ELISA, were found in red endometriotic lesions as compared with typical black-blue or white lesions. Western blotting showed a significant increase in the levels of the 50 kDa band, whose apparent molecular weight corresponds to the soluble form of IL-1RI. RT-PCR analysis of IL-1 mRNA levels showed a pattern of expression comparable to that of the protein. Interestingly, IL-1RI expression was more significant in the proliferative than in the secretory phase of the menstrual cycle. Marked expression of IL-1RI, the functional signaling receptor that mediates cell activation by IL-1, in red endometriotic implants, which are highly vascularized and represent the earliest and most active forms of the disease, point to a higher cell receptivity for IL-1 in these lesions, a relationship with the activity of the disease and a possible involvement in the early steps of endometriotic tissue growth and development.NME1 suppression of endometrial stromal cells promotes angiogenesis in the endometriotic milieu via stimulating the secretion of IL-8 and VEGF.Nonmetastatic gene 23-H1 (NME1, also known as nm23-H1) is a wide-spectrum tumor metastasis suppressor gene that plays an important role in suppressing the proliferation, adhesion and invasion of endometrial stromal cells (ESCs). The present study is undertaken to explore the mechanism by which NME1 in ESCs from endometriosis modulates the angiogenesis and herein participates in the pathogenesis of endometriosis. The expression of NME1 in the primary ESCs from normal endometrium without endometriosis was higher than that from eutopic endometrium and ectopic lesion with endometriosis. Silencing NME1 stimulated the secretion of angiogenic factors interleukin-8 (IL-8) and vascular-endothelial growth factor (VEGF) of the eutopic ESCs from women with endometriosis, and these effects could be abrogated by MAPK/ERK1/2 or AKT inhibitor. In addition, the supernatant of NME1-silenced ESCs increased the expression of angiogenesis-relative molecules CD62E and CD105, and promoted angiogenesis of human umbilical vein endothelial cells (HUVECs). Anti-human IL-8 or VEGF neutralizing antibody reversed the effect on angiogenesis of HUVECs induced by NME1-silenced ESCs. Our current results suggest that the abnormal lower expression of NME1 in ESCs secrete more IL-8 and VEGF through activation of MAPK/ERK1/2 and AKT signal pathways, up-regulate the level of CD62E and CD105, and finally lead to numerous angiogenesis of vascular endothelial cells in the endometriotic milieu, which is beneficial to the origin and development of endometriosis. KISS1/KISS1R expression in eutopic and ectopic endometrium of women suffering from endometriosis.The KISS1/KISS1R system has been implicated in the physiology of reproduction and many studies have documented the stimulatory effect of kisspeptin on Gonadotropin-releasing Hormone (GnRH) and gonadotropin secretion. In addition, the KISS1/KISS1R system has been implicated in several pathophysiological processes, including cancer.We examined the pattern of KISS1 and KISS1R expression in eutopic and ectopic endometrium tissues which were obtained from 24 women suffering from endometriosis and 16 control women who underwent laparoscopic excision for other benign gynecological diseases.Significant KISS1R expression was detected in 10 out of the 24 samples of eutopic endometrial biopsies of women suffering from endometriosis, while their matched biopsies of ectopic endometrial lesions did not reveal any KISS1R expression. KISS1R expression was not detected in the endometrial biopsies of control women. In addition, KISS1 expression was not detected in practically any the endometrial tissues of either control women or women with endometriosis.The expression of KISS1R in 10/24 samples of human endometrial biopsies of women suffering from endometriosis and the loss of its expression in the samples of matched ectopic endometrial tissues, suggests that the KISS1/KISS1R system may play a role in the pathophysiology of endometriosis only for a particular group of patients. Since KISS1 is not expressed by the endometrium and endometriotic tissue, it is conceivable that the activation of KISS1R in this particular group is mediated by KISS1 expression by non-endometrial tissues (endocrine action).[Integrin expression in eutopic and ectopic endometrium].The significance of retrograde menstruation as a risk factor for endometriosis has been confirmed by numerous clinical observations. Integrins mediate both cell-cell and cell-matrix adhesion, and it is therefore suspected that integrins are involved in the development of endometriosis. Using immunohistochemistry, integrin expression in eutopic and ectopic endometrium is examined in endometriosis patients and control individuals. In nearly all cases, the glandular epithelial cells in the endometrium showed expression of alpha (2-), alpha (3)-, alpha (6)- and alpha (v)- integrin and a low percentage of expression of alpha (1)-, alpha (4)-, and alpha (5)-integrin. In comparison with eutopic endometrium, ectopic endometrium shows reduced expression of alpha (2)- and alpha (v)-integrin. Since no differences in alpha (2)- and alpha (v)-integrin expression were observed in eutopic endometrium between endometriosis patients and control individuals, it may be suspected that the reduced expression of these in ectopic endometrium is explained by influences in the altered environment -- e. g., in the peritoneal fluid -- on the ectopic endometrium.Expression patterns of Aurora A and B kinases, Ki-67 and the estrogen and progesterone receptors determined using an endometriosis tissue microarray model.The roles of cell proliferation and genomic instability in endometriosis are highly debated aspects of the pathogenesis of this disease. Aurora A and B kinases play different important roles in cell cycle control and genomic instability and have never been studied in endometriosis. The aim of this study was to compare the expression levels of Aurora kinases, Ki-67 and hormone receptor in endometriotic tissue (ET) and normal endometrium.We retrospectively analysed 438 samples obtained from 194 patients affected by endometriosis and 28 samples from 28 patients with normal endometrium, which were all collected by the Pathology Department and Gynecologic Clinic of the University Hospital of Udine. A tissue microarray model was constructed to use immunohistochemistry to analyse the expression of Aurora A and B kinases, Ki-67 and the estrogen and progesterone receptors in ET and normal endometrium.Aurora A and B kinases were expressed at a very low level in the majority of endometriosis core biopsies. Aurora A and B kinases, Ki-67 and the estrogen and progesterone receptors were expressed at a higher level in the proliferative endometrium than in the secretory endometrium and in ovarian and non-ovarian ET (P < 0.05). Additionally, Aurora B kinase, Ki-67 and the estrogen and progesterone receptors were more highly expressed in non-ovarian than ovarian ET (P < 0.05).Considering the low expression levels of Aurora A and B kinases in the majority of endometriosis core biopsies, the growth and survival of endometrial tissue outside the uterus cannot be explained by deregulation of this pathway. The analysed ectopic endometrium protein expression pattern resembled that of the secretory endometrium, and markers of proliferation and hormone receptors were expressed at lower levels in ovarian than in non-ovarian ET. The low level of hormone receptors and the consequent low levels of proliferation markers in ovarian ETs may be due to down-regulation by the ovary's hormone milieu.CXCL8 enhances proliferation and growth and reduces apoptosis in endometrial stromal cells in an autocrine manner via a CXCR1-triggered PTEN/AKT signal pathway.Chemokine CXCL8 (also known as IL-8) has been identified as a potential regulator of endometrial stromal cells (ESCs), but it is unclear how CXCL8 regulates the survival of ESCs in the pathogenesis of endometriosis.We assessed the secretion of CXCL8 by enzyme-linked immunosorbent assays and the expression of its receptors, CXCR1 and CXCR2, by in-cell Western assay and immunohistochemistry. The effects of CXCL8 on the activation or expression of various cell mediators were also investigated by in-cell Western assay. The effects of CXCL8 on the proliferation, growth and apoptosis of ESCs in vitro were assessed by BrdU assays, cell counts and annexin V labeling, respectively.Secretion of CXCL8 and expression of CXCR1 in the eutopic ESCs from women with endometriosis were significantly higher than that in control ESCs, but the expression of CXCR2 showed no significant difference between these two cell types. CXCL8 stimulated proliferation and growth and reduced apoptosis of ESCs in an autocrine manner, and these effects were abolished by anti-human CXCL8 and CXCR1 neutralizing antibodies and by a PI3K/Akt inhibitor. Moreover, CXCL8 up-regulated the expression of the anti-apoptotic proteins, survivin and Bcl-2, inhibited the expression of the Phosphatase and tensin homolog (PTEN) and activated the phosphorylation of Akt.This study suggests that CXCL8 and CXCR1 are involved in the pathogenesis of endometriosis by up-regulating proliferation and growth and restricting apoptosis in ESCs by activating the PTEN/Akt pathway and mediating the expression of survivin and Bcl-2.Endometrial fluid is a specific and non-invasive biological sample for protein biomarker identification in endometriosis.The development of non-invasive diagnostic methods for endometriosis requires sensitive and disease specific biomarkers. Here, we describe the use of aspirated endometrial fluid from women with and without endometriosis as a novel biological sample for biomarker discovery.Differential protein expression profiling of aspirates from women with early endometriosis (n = 14), advanced endometriosis (n = 32) and without evidence of the disease (n = 32) was assessed by two-dimensional gel electrophoresis (2-DE). A biomarker validation study was performed in an independent cohort (early endometriosis n = 6 and advanced endometriosis n = 14, controls n = 15).The analysis resulted in the identification of 31 proteins showing statistically significant differences in expression. The proteins identified are related to cell signalling, cell death and cell movement, processes that may be involved in the onset and/or progression of endometriosis. The differences in expression observed for 14-3-3 (signal transduction) and moesin (cytoskeletal structure) were confirmed in an independent group of endometriosis patients.Endometrial fluid represents a novel sample for proteomic analysis offering reliable, disease specific information on protein expression, facilitating the discovery of biomarkers for endometriosis. The results described here complement previous proteomic studies, providing new endometriosis-related proteins to be validated as diagnostic markers.Quantitative assessment of endometrial-peritoneal interaction in vitro: a non-invasive diagnostic test for women with endometriosis?Immunohistochemical localization of acidic and basic fibroblast growth factors in normal human endometrium and endometriosis and the detection of their mRNA by polymerase chain reaction.Growth factors play a role in the cyclical growth and vascularization of normal endometrium. Abnormal endometrial proliferation and neovascularization may result in endometriosis. This study determines the presence and localization of acidic and basic fibroblast growth factors (aFGF and bFGF respectively) in endometrium of normal women, and in normal and ectopic endometrium of women with endometriosis. Endometrium was obtained at curettage or hysterectomy for benign disease, or laparoscopy for endometriosis. aFGF- and bFGF-immunoreactivity was detected at different phases of the menstrual cycle by immunohistochemistry using primary polyclonal rabbit antibodies. Expression of mRNA for aFGF and bFGF was determined in normal endometrium by nested reverse transcriptase polymerase chain reaction (RT-PCR). aFGF- and bFGF-immunoreactivity were both detected in endometrium from normal women, and in normal and ectopic endometrium of women with endometriosis. The pattern of staining with the two different FGFs was the same: immunoreactivity was predominantly confined to glandular epithelial cells and did not change throughout the menstrual cycle. Little or only light staining was seen in stromal cells and myometrium, and the pattern of staining did not differ between endometriotic and normal tissue. The presence of mRNA for aFGF and bFGF was demonstrated in normal endometrium. The detection of aFGF and bFGF mRNA in normal endometrium and aFGF- and bFGF-immunoreactivity in normal and endometriotic tissues suggests that these peptides may play a role in the proliferation and angiogenesis of normal and ectopic human endometrium.Proteomic identification of neurotrophins in the eutopic endometrium of women with endometriosis.To evaluate neurotrophin (NT) expression in the endometrium of women with and without endometriosis.Prospective, cross-sectional, translational study.Academic hospital.Thirty-three reproductive-age women undergoing laparoscopy for infertility, pelvic pain, intramural fibroids, or tubal ligation.Endometrial biopsies, protein microarrays, reverse transcriptase-polymerase chain reaction, ELISAs, and Western blotting.Neurotrophin proteins and mRNAs in eutopic endometrial biopsies.Among seven neurotrophic proteins detected on the antibody microarrays, reverse transcriptase-polymerase chain reaction analysis confirmed nerve growth factor, NT-4/5, and brain-derived neurotrophic factor mRNAs in endometrial tissue. Quantitative ELISAs revealed that NT-4/5 (806 ± 701 vs. 256 ± 190 pg/100 mg protein) and brain-derived neurotrophic factor (121 ± 97 vs. 14 ± 11 ng/100 mg protein) concentrations were significantly higher in women with endometriosis. Nerve growth factor (100 ± 74 vs. 93 ± 83 pg/100 mg protein) levels did not differ between cases and controls.Neurotrophins are synthesized in situ within the endometrium. NT-4/5 and brain-derived neurotrophic factor proteins were more concentrated in biopsies from endometriosis cases than controls, whereas nerve growth factor levels were similar. We hypothesize that the local production of NTs induces sensory innervation of endometrium of women with endometriosis. These NTs represent novel targets for the diagnosis and treatment of endometriosis.[Diagnostic value of the detection of aromatase cytochrome P450 and CA125 for endometriosis].To evaluate the diagnostic value of examining endometrial biopsy specimens for aromatase cytochrome P450 and CA125 for endometriosis.The expression of aromatase cytochrome P450 in endometrium was detected by immunohistochemical analysis for 36 endometriosis women and 22 non-endometriosis but subfertility or pelvic pain women served as controls; the serum CA125 levels were measured by chemical radiation method.By measuring serum CA125, the sensitivity of the serum CA125 assay was 44%, the specificity was 82%, the positive predictive value was 80%, and the negative predictive value was 47%; the sensitivity of aromatase cytochrome P450 in biopsy endometrium of endometriosis was 82%, the specificity was 59%, the positive predictive value was 76%, and the negative predictive value was 67%.The combination assay of aromatase cytochrome P450 in eutopic endometrium and CA125 can be used as a diagnostic test for endometriosis, especially for the early stage of endometriosis, which is superior to the assay of CA125.Increased c-Jun N-terminal kinase activation in human endometriotic endothelial cells.Endometriosis is a common inflammatory gynecological disease characterized by the presence of endometrial tissue outside of the uterine cavity. The c-Jun N-terminal kinase (JNK) is a subfamily of the mitogen-activated protein kinases (MAPKs) involved in cellular processes ranging from cytokine expression to apoptosis, and is activated in response to inflammation and cellular stress. We hypothesized that inflammatory cytokines in the peritoneal microenvironment increase JNK MAPK activity in endometriotic endothelial cells, and that human endometrial endothelial cells (HEECs) may be involved in inflammatory pathogenesis of endometriosis. Thus, we evaluated the expression of the total- and phosphorylated-(phospho)-JNK in endometrial and endometriotic endothelial cells in vivo, and in HEECs treated with normal peritoneal fluid (NPF), endometriotic peritoneal fluid (EPF), and the inflammatory cytokines interleukin-1beta (IL-1β) and tumor necrosis factor-alpha (TNF-α) in vitro. Phospho-JNK immunoreactivity in HEECs in normal endometrium was significantly higher in the early proliferative and late secretory phases compared to other phases. Both eutopic and ectopic HEECs from the early secretory phase also revealed higher phospho-JNK immunoreactivity, compared to their respective cycle-matched normal HEECs. Moreover, HEECs treated with EPF showed significantly higher phospho-JNK levels compared to that in HEECs treated with NPF. In conclusion, our in vivo and in vitro findings suggest that increased phosphorylation of JNK in HEECs from women with endometriosis is likely due to high level of IL-1β and TNF-α in peritoneal fluid; this in turn may up-regulate inflammatory cytokine expression and thus play a role in the pathogenesis of endometriosis.Aromatase expression in endometriotic tissues and cell cultures of patients with endometriosis.Cytochrome P-450 aromatase is responsible for catalysing the conversion of androstendione into estrone, so its expression in endometriotic tissue could contribute to the development of endometriosis. The aims of this study were, on the one hand, to determine the presence of aromatase in eutopic and ectopic endometrium, healthy peritoneum, myometrium and leiomyomas from patients with (n = 61) and without endometriosis (n = 12) and, on the other hand, to determine the effect of peritoneal fluid (PF), interleukin-6 (IL-6) and tumour necrosis factor-alpha (TNFalpha) on aromatase activity from endometriotic stromal cells and subcutaneous adipocytes. After immunohistochemical analysis, aromatase expression was detected in the endometriotic tissue of 61% of patients, whereas the rest of the tissues, as well as those from disease-free women, were negative. Cell cultures were made to determine aromatase activity in endometriotic stromal cells and adipocytes. The addition of PF, TNFalpha and especially IL-6 (P < 0.05) stimulated the basal enzymatic activity observed in both cell types. Our findings confirm the presence of aromatase in endometriosis and probably the existence of a local estrogen production that may be stimulated by some factors such as cytokines present in the PF of these patients. Therefore, the use of aromatase inhibitors combined with immunomodulator agents could be a novel approach to be investigated in future clinical trials.Increased expression of monocyte chemotactic protein-1 in the endometrium of women with endometriosis.The pathogenesis of endometriosis, a disease widely believed to arise from an aberrant growth of endometrial tissue outside the uterus, is still unclear. We have previously observed that cytokine-stimulated endometrial cells of women with endometriosis secrete in vitro increased amounts of monocyte chemotactic protein-1 (MCP-1). This factor may be important in the recruitment and activation of peritoneal macrophages observed in endometriosis patients. The present study reports that, in the presence of the disease, such an up-regulation of MCP-1 expression arises in vivo and can be encountered in situ in the intrauterine endometrium. In women with endometriosis, MCP-1 expression was elevated in endometrial glands, both at the level of the protein (immunohistochemistry) and the mRNA (in situ hybridization). This was observed throughout the menstrual cycle and varied according to the stage of the disease. These findings strongly argue in favor of the presence of pathophysiological changes in the eutopic endometrium of patients with endometriosis and make plausible MCP-1 as a key effector cell mediator involved in the pathogenesis of the disease.Intraepithelial leukocytes in endometriosis and adenomyosis: comparison of eutopic and ectopic endometrium with normal endometrium.Intraepithelial leukocytes (IEL) are recognized as an important component of most mucosal surfaces but have received scant attention in the human female reproductive tract. The aim of the present study was to characterize, quantify and compare IEL populations in normal endometrium (n = 30) and in eutopic and ectopic (endometriotic or adenomyotic lesions) endometrium from women with endometriosis (n = 30) or adenomyosis (n = 15) at different menstrual cycle phases in order to assess the role of IEL in these common but poorly understood disorders. IEL populations were examined in formalin-fixed, paraffin-embedded sections using a streptavidin-biotin-peroxidase complex technique and quantified in relation to epithelial cell numbers. IEL in control endometrium and eutopic endometrium in endometriosis and adenomyosis varied during the menstrual cycle, with CD45+, CD43+ and CD56+ cells increasing from the proliferative to the late secretory phase. IEL were elevated in surface compared with glandular epithelium in the proliferative and early secretory phases. Throughout the menstrual cycle there were no significant differences in IEL between eutopic and ectopic endometrium in adenomyosis. Endometriotic foci, however, contained elevated levels of CD45+, CD3+ and CD8+ cells and reduced numbers of CD56 + cells compared with the corresponding eutopic endometrium and these did not vary with menstrual cycle phase. In contrast, ectopic endometrium in adenomyosis showed some cyclical changes with CD56+ cells increasing significantly in the late secretory phase. It is possible these differences may play a role in the pathogenesis of endometriosis and the associated complications.Autoimmune phenomena in infertile patients with endometriosis.To assess the presence of autoimmune factors in patients with endometriosis, endometrial homogenates, peritoneal fluid, and serum were evaluated in 23 patients with endometriosis and 22 control subjects. The methods used were Ouchterlony immunodiffusion, immunoelectrophoresis, polyacrylamide gel electrophoresis, and radial immunodiffusion. The study demonstrated precipitation lines between endometrial homogenates and serum from some endometriosis patients but not from the control subjects. Immunoelectrophoresis demonstrated precipitation lines at beta-globulin position when endometrial homogenates were used against serum of patients with endometriosis and with goat antihuman serum. It is suggested that an antigen, possibly a glycoprotein, is present in the endometrial homogenates. Radial immunodiffusion studies for immunoglobulins (Ig) G, A, and M and complement components C3c and C4 showed significantly higher concentrations of C3c and C4 in serum and peritoneal fluid of patients with endometriosis than the control subjects (P less than .05). There was no significant difference in concentration of IgG, A, M, factor B, and properdin.The role of Foxp3+ regulatory T-cells in endometriosis: a potential controlling mechanism for a complex, chronic immunological condition.Endometriosis is an inflammatory condition, associated with highly dysregulated immune response at both uterine and peritoneal levels. Surprisingly, Foxp3+ regulatory T-cells, which control and suppress a range of immune responses, have not previously been investigated in endometriosis.Immunohistochemical analysis of Foxp3+ cells in 127 eutopic endometrial samples and 59 ectopic peritoneal lesions revealed that these immune cell populations are highly disturbed in women suffering from endometriosis. We showed that Foxp3+ cells remained highly up-regulated during the secretory phase of the menstrual cycle, while at this time their expression is significantly down-regulated in women without endometriosis (P < 0.001). Foxp3+ cells were detected in the stroma of 18 of the 59 peritoneal endometriotic lesions, but not in the surrounding or control peritoneal tissue.We propose that in eutopic endometrium in women with endometriosis Foxp3+ cells decrease the ability of newly recruited immune cell populations to effectively recognize and target endometrial antigens shed during menstruation, allowing their survival and ability to implant in ectopic sites. At these ectopic sites, variable expression of Foxp3+ cells within some peritoneal endometriotic lesions is likely to be linked to the characteristics and stage of individual lesion development and be playing key roles in pathogenesis and progression of this unique condition.microRNAs expression in endometriosis and their relation to angiogenic factors.Endometriosis is a common, multifactorial disease in which angiogenesis may be involved in the growth of endometrium outside the uterus. microRNAs (miRNAs) are 21-22 nucleotide non-coding RNAs that regulate gene expression and play fundamental roles in biological processes. The objective of this study was to analyze several miRNAs related to angiogenesis and the angiogenic factors, vascular endothelial growth factor-A (VEGF-A) and thrombospondin-1 (TSP-1), in endometriotic lesions (ovarian endometrioma, peritoneal lesion and rectovaginal nodule) and eutopic endometrium from women with endometriosis.TaqMan real-time PCR was used to assess the expression of the miRNAs (miR-15b, -16, -17-5p, -20a, -21, -125a, -221 and -222), while VEGF-A and TSP-1 mRNA were assessed by real-time PCR, with SYBR Green I and VEGF-A and TSP-1 protein levels were quantified by ELISA. Included in the study were 58 women with endometriosis and 38 control women.In paired samples, ovarian endometrioma showed significantly lower VEGF-A mRNA (P = 0.02) and protein (P = 0.002) expression than eutopic endometrium and higher expression of miR-125a (P = 0.003) and miR-222 (P <0.001). However, ovarian endometrioma had significantly higher expression of the angiogenic inhibitor TSP-1 and lower expression of miR-17-5p than eutopic endometrium (P < 0.001). Moreover, a significant inverse correlations between miR-222 and VEGF-A protein levels (-0.267, P = 0.018) and between miR-17-5p and TSP-1 protein levels (-0.260, P=0.022) were observed. Peritoneal lesions showed a significant increase in VEGF-A in comparison with ovarian endometrioma (P < 0.01).Expression levels of miRNAs related to angiogenesis were different in eutopic endometrium from that observed in ovarian endometrioma. This could influence the expression of angiogenic factors and play a role in the pathogenesis of endometriosis.Eutopic and ectopic stromal cells from patients with endometriosis exhibit differential invasive, adhesive, and proliferative behavior.To study immunophenotype, differential proliferation capacity, invasiveness, adhesion, and cytokine production in ectopic and eutopic endometrial stromal cells (EESCs and EuESCs) from patients with endometriosis.In vitro study.Academic research center.Patients with ovarian endometriosis (endometrioma) and nonendometriotic controls.None.EESCs and EuESCs from 25 patients with endometrioma and ESCs from 20 nonendometriotic controls (CESCs) were isolated, and their immunophenotype, proliferation, invasion, adhesion, and cytokine production were assessed and compared.Isolated ESCs from all three sources expressed markers specific for cells of mesenchymal origin but were negative for hematopoietic markers. EESCs exhibited a significantly lower proliferation rate in fibronectin-coated plates and less invasive capacity compared with CESCs or EuESCs. Among all stromal cell groups studied, EuESCs showed the highest invasive behavior. EESCs adhered more firmly to extracellular matrix than EuESCs or CESCs in all time intervals examined. The levels of interleukin (IL) -6 and IL-8 production by EESCs were significantly higher compared with those of EuESCs or CESCs.The results of the present study demonstrated that retrograde menstruation alone does not account for the pathogenesis of endometriosis as eutopic and ectopic counterparts of ESCs from patients with endometriosis exhibit differential invasive, adhesive, and proliferative behavior.Abnormal interleukin-1 receptor type II gene expression in the endometrium of women with endometriosis.Interleukin 1 (IL-1) is a major proinflammatory cytokine that is believed to play a central role in the pathophysiology of endometriosis. The IL-1 receptor type II (IL-1RII) is known to bind to IL-1 and to inhibit its biological effects. In our previous studies, we showed that human endometrium expresses IL-1RII, and we observed reduced expression of the protein in women with endometriosis. The aim of this study was to investigate IL-1RII mRNA in the endometrial tissue of normal women (n = 26) and of patients with various degrees of endometriosis (n = 53). In situ hybridization showed that IL-1RII mRNA expression was significantly decreased in endometriosis, particularly during the early stages of the disease (stages I and II). This was quite obvious in both glandular and stromal cells, and it was corroborated by reverse transcription-polymerase chain reaction analysis of IL-1RII mRNA in the endometrial tissue of women with (n = 10) and without (n = 8) endometriosis. The reduced levels of IL-1RII mRNA in the endometrium of women suffering from endometriosis reveals a profound defect in IL-1RII gene expression and, consequently, a reduced capability of endometrial tissue to down-regulate IL-1 activity. Defective IL-1RII gene expression during the early stages of endometriosis (stages I and II) may contribute to the etiology of the disease.Progesterone induction of 17beta-hydroxysteroid dehydrogenase type 2 during the secretory phase occurs in the endometrium of estrogen-dependent benign diseases but not in normal endometrium.In the human endometrium, inactivation of 17beta-estradiol to estrone is catalyzed by 17beta-hydroxysteroid dehydrogenase type 2 (17betaHSD2). Previous studies have shown that the 17betaHSD2 activity in the endometrium is elevated during the secretory phase, as compared with the level during the proliferative phase, and that the elevation is in response to progesterone via the progesterone receptors. Recently, it has been demonstrated that aromatase cytochrome P450, the enzyme responsible for estrogen biosynthesis, is not present in the endometrium obtained from normal menstruating women with cervical cancer in situ showing no other gynecological disease (defined as "disease free"), but present in the endometrium obtained from patients with endometriosis, adenomyosis, and/or leiomyomas (defined as "diseased"). However, the previous 17betaHSD studies have been performed without distinguishing between disease-free and diseased endometria. We, therefore, analyzed 17betaHSD2 distinguishing between disease-free and diseased endometria. During the proliferative phase, the abundance of messenger RNA (mRNA) and activity of 17betaHSD2 were comparable in both disease-free and diseased endometrium. However, during the secretory phase, while the abundance of mRNA and activity of 17betaHSD2 increased 4- to 6-fold in diseased endometrium, the 17betaHSD2 remained unchanged in the disease-free endometrium. Kinetic studies showed that the Km was identical among the four groups of endometria, suggesting that the elevation of 17betaHSD2 simply resulted from increased mRNA transcription. Organ culture of proliferative endometria in the presence of progestins resulted in the stimulation of 17betaHSD2 in diseased endometria via the progesterone receptors, whereas disease-free endometrium was not stimulated by progestins. These results suggest that the previous paradigm that 17betaHSD2 activity in the endometrium is elevated during the secretory phase is confined to diseased endometrium but not to disease-free endometrium and that the estrogen metabolism is altered in the endometria of the patients with estrogen-dependent benign diseases.Nuclear factor kappaB pathway and interleukin-6 are affected in eutopic endometrium of women with endometriosis.In order to investigate the role of the nuclear factor kappaB (NFKB) pathway on gene expression in the eutopic endometrium in endometriosis, and in particular of interleukin-6 (IL6), we evaluated RELA, IkappaB kinase (CHUK), NFKBIA and IL6 expressions and NFKB DNA binding in eutopic endometrium from women with endometriosis. Eutopic endometrium was obtained from 37 women with endometriosis and 42 fertile women during laparoscopy. We analysed RELA, CHUK, NFKBIA and IL6 mRNA levels (RT-PCR); RELA, CHUK and NFKBIA proteins and p-NFKBIA/NFKBIA ratio (western blot); and NFKB binding (DNA shift assay) and IL6 concentration (ELISA) in endometrial explants. Our results indicate that mRNA and cytoplasmic proteins of RELA and CHUK exhibit constant levels in normal endometrium during the menstrual cycle. A dramatic increase (P<0.05) in NFKBIA mRNA expression, RELA nuclear presence and the mRNA and the protein of IL6 during late secretory phase was also observed in this tissue. By contrast, in eutopic endometrium from endometriosis patients, a decrease (P<0.05) in IL6 mRNA and protein (61%), NFKBIA mRNA (46%), p-NFKBIA/NFKBIA ratio (42%), RELA nuclear stromal (68%) and CHUK (48%) proteins were found exclusively during the late secretory phase compared with normal endometrium. In conclusion, the canonical activation of NFKB pathway is deregulated and may have reduced transcriptional function affecting NFKBIA and IL6 expression, genes related local proinflammatory processes. These molecular alterations observed during the late secretory phase in eutopic endometrium from endometriosis patients constitute a NFKB system dysfunction, suggesting that NFKB could be an important factor in endometriosis aetiology.Immunohistochemical study of HLA-DR antigen in endometrial tissue of patients with endometriosis.In order to evaluate the expression of HLA-DR antigen in glandular cells in eutopic and ectopic endometrium in patients with endometriosis, 19 infertile patients with endometriosis were analyzed immunohistochemically by labelled streptavidin biotin (LSAB) method. Nineteen infertile patients without endometriosis were studied as controls. The results showed that the expression of HLA-DR antigen in the glandular cells in both eutopic and ectopic endometrium was increased significantly as compared with that in the controls (P < 0.01). It is likely that aberrant expression of HLA-DR antigen in endometriotic tissue is involved in abnormal immunogenesis of endometriosis.Endometrial pinopode and alphavbeta3 integrin expression is not impaired in infertile patients with endometriosis.To investigate endometrial receptivity in terms of pinopode formation and alphavbeta3 integrin expression in infertile women with endometriosis during natural cycles.We investigated the expression of alphavbeta3 integrin and pinopode formation in the endometrium of 12 infertile patients with stage I or II endometriosis as the only cause of infertility, 12 infertile patients having unexplained infertility, and 12 fertile women who were undergoing tubal sterilization. Two endometrial biopsies (postovulatory day +7 to +8 and 4 days later) were performed during a single menstrual cycle in each subject.No statistically significant difference regarding alphavbeta3 integrin expression and pinopode formation was found between infertile patients with endometriosis and the two control groups.alphavbeta3 integrin expression and pinopode formation are not reduced during the window of implantation in patients with stage I-II endometriosis. Whether these results imply normal endometrial receptivity in such patients or add to the increasing uncertainty about the clinical value of assessing the endometrium with those markers of implantation, warrants further studies.Matrix metalloproteinase-2, membranous type 1 matrix metalloproteinase, and tissue inhibitor of metalloproteinase-2 expression in ectopic and eutopic endometrium.To investigate expression of matrix metalloproteinase-2 (MMP-2), membranous type 1 matrix metalloproteinase (MT1-MMP), and tissue inhibitor of metalloproteinase-2 (TIMP-2) in ectopic and eutopic endometrium from women with and without endometriosis throughout the menstrual cycle.Molecular studies in human tissue.Reproductive immunology laboratory of a university medical center.Fifty-three premenopausal woman (23 with endometriosis and 30 without endometriosis) undergoing laparoscopic surgery. Endometrium and ectopic endometriosis tissue were obtained at the time of surgery.Messenger RNA and protein expression from eutopic and ectopic endometrium was analyzed by using quantitative competitive polymerase chain reaction, zymography, and Western blot assay.Uterine endometrium from women with endometriosis expressed higher levels of MMP-2 and MT1-MMP and lower levels of TIMP-2 than did endometrium from normal women.Eutopic endometrium from patients with endometriosis may be more invasive and prone to peritoneal implantation because of greater expression of MMP-2 and MT1-MMP and lower expression of TIMP-2 messenger RNA, compared with endometrium from women without endometriosis. Thus, increased proteolytic activity may help to explain the invasive factors that result in endometriosis.Lack of varied endometrial expression of proprotein convertase 6 in infertile women with minimal grade endometriosis and idiopathic infertility.Proprotein convertase 6 (PC6) is known to be the key enzyme involved in the transformation of many hormones, cytokines and their receptors into their active forms. Experimental in vitro studies have also proven that lack of PC6 in the endometrium prevents decidualisation. Therefore in our study we have aimed at determining whether infertility in some patients might be attributable to decreased expression of PC6.With the use of RealTime PCR we have studied the expression level of PC6 in receptive phase endometria from 36 idiopathic infertile patients, 26 infertile patients with minimal grade endometriosis and compared those results with fertile, age-matched controls. The endometria were collected 7-9 days after ovulation.There were no statistically significant differences regarding the expression of PC6 in endometria from patients with idiopathic infertility, infertile patients with endometriosis and controls.Since there is no detectable difference in PC6 expression, the decreased expression of PC6 is unlikely to cause infertility.Apoptosis in endometrial glandular and stromal cells in women with and without endometriosis.The aetiology of endometriosis is unknown. Ectopic dissemination of the endometrial cells gives origin to endometriotic lesions, but occurs in women with and without endometriosis. It has been suggested that increased ectopic cell survival facilitates their implantation. The objectives of this study were to evaluate endometrial apoptosis in women with endometriosis according to: (i) cyclic changes, (ii) glandular and stromal contribution, and (iii) stage of the disease.The subjects were women undergoing diagnostic laparoscopy and endometrial biopsies for suspected endometriosis. Spontaneous apoptosis was evaluated using TdT-mediated dUTP-biotin nick end-labelling (TUNEL) assay. Apoptotic cells per 10 mm(2) (apoptotic index) in an area of 10-50 mm(2) in 5 microm endometrial tissue sections were counted and location of these cells was recorded.The apoptotic index in glandular epithelium was lower in endometriosis than controls (26.0 +/- 5.5 versus 51.2 +/- 9.7, P = 0.03) but not in the stroma (36.3 +/- 6.4 versus 48.4 +/- 11.3, NS). In controls, apoptosis was highest during the late secretory/menstrual and early proliferative phases and cyclic variability was apparent. In endometriosis, this cyclic variability was lost. There was a trend toward decreased apoptosis with increasing stage of the disease, but the differences lacked statistical significance.Spontaneous apoptosis is decreased in the endometrial glands in women with endometriosis, especially during late secretory/menstrual and early proliferative phases of the cycle. This may indicate increased viability of endometrial cells shed during menses, facilitating their ectopic survival and implantation.Decreased expression of pigment epithelium-derived factor and increased microvascular density in ovarian endometriotic lesions in women with endometriosis.To determine whether women with endometriosis have altered expression of pigment epithelium-derived factor (PEDF) in ovarian endometriotic lesions as compared to women without endometriosis.Ectopic and eutopic and normal endometrial tissues were sampled from 40 women with ovarian endometriosis and 20 control women, respectively. Endometrial PEDF expression and microvascular density (MVD) using an antibody to von Willebrand factor (vWF) and alpha-smooth muscle actin (α-SMA) were evaluated by using immunohistochemical staining.We detected decreased PEDF expression and increased MVD using anti-vWF and -α-SMA in ovarian endometriotic lesions in women with endometriosis compared with the control group. In women with endometriosis, the MVD using anti-vWF and -α-SMA but not PEDF expression in ovarian endometriotic lesions correlated with the size of ovarian endometriotic cysts and the severity of the disease. Moreover, the MVD using anti-vWF was negatively correlated with PEDF expression in control endometrium but not in ovarian endometriotic lesions.Our results suggest that decreased PEDF expression and increased MVD in ovarian endometriotic lesions might play an important role in the pathogenesis of ovarian endometriosis.Reduced expression of biomarkers associated with the implantation window in women with endometriosis.To evaluate the expression of biomarkers of implantation, glycodelin A (GdA), osteopontin (OPN), lysophosphatidic acid receptor 3 (LPA3), and HOXA10, in eutopic endometrium of women with and without endometriosis.Prospective observational study.Clinical research center.Twenty-four women with endometriosis and 23 healthy volunteers of similar age.Secretory phase endometrial biopsy.Expression of immunohistochemical staining intensity and localization of GdA, OPN, LPA3, and HOXA10 in eutopic endometrium.Endometrial GdA expression was significantly reduced in patients after cycle day 22. The endometrium from women with endometriosis also showed decreased expression of OPN in the late secretory phase and LPA3 and HOXA10 expression in the midsecretory and late secretory phases.The decreased expression of these four biomarkers of implantation may indicate impaired endometrial receptivity in patients with endometriosis, providing one explanation for the subfertility observed even in women with few pelvic implants. Because many of these markers are P dependent, these findings suggest the possibility of reduced endometrial P action in this population.The macrophage stimulating protein/RON system: a potential novel target for prevention and treatment of endometriosis.Our recent DNA microarray analysis using tissue obtained by laser capture microdissection (LCM) identified up-regulation of RON (a tyrosine kinase receptor) during the late secretory phase in eutopic endometrial epithelial cells from patients with deep endometriosis compared with control endometrium from women with macroscopically normal pelvic cavities. In the present study, we further investigated mRNA expression of RON and its ligand, macrophage stimulating protein (MSP), in deep endometriotic lesions, eutopic endometrium from patients with deep endometriosis and control endometrium by using LCM and quantitative real-time RT-PCR. MSP mRNA expression in endometrial epithelial cells was significantly up-regulated in endometriosis patients during the late secretory phase compared with expression in controls. Furthermore, we detected up-regulation of MSP mRNA in ectopic endometrial epithelial cells compared with matched eutopic endometrial epithelial cells within the same patients regardless of the menstrual phase. MSP has an intrinsically dual functional nature through its receptor RON-it is a trophic cytokine preventing apoptosis and a scatter factor promoting invasion, both of which may be necessary for the initial development and growth of endometriosis. The present findings suggest that the MSP/RON system may be involved in the pathophysiology of endometriosis.Interleukin-11, IL-11 receptoralpha and leukemia inhibitory factor are dysregulated in endometrium of infertile women with endometriosis during the implantation window.Interleukin (IL)-11 is essential for embryo implantation in the mouse and evidence suggests it has a role in implantation in humans. This study has evaluated immunoreactive IL-11, IL-11 receptor (R) alpha and leukemia inhibitory factor (LIF) in endometrium of infertile women with endometriosis (I/E) and normal fertile women (controls) during the implantation window. Endometrial biopsies from I/E (N = 7) were timed from the LH surge and were post-ovulatory days (POD) 5-10. Control biopsies (N = 8) from women were between days 19 and 24 of the menstrual cycle. Staining intensity of IL-11, IL-11Ralpha and LIF evaluated using semi-quantitative immunohistochemistry scores. Immunoreactive IL-11, IL-11Ralpha and LIF were present predominantly in glandular epithelium, while luminal epithelium showed patchy staining. All controls stained positively for IL-11, IL-11Ralpha and LIF in glandular epithelium. IL-11 and IL-11Ralpha staining was absent from glandular epithelium in cohorts of I/E. LIF staining intensity in glandular epithelium was significantly lower in I/E compared to controls. The results suggest that reduced endometrial IL-11 and/or LIF may contribute to infertility in some endometriotic women.The impact of leukemia inhibitory factor in uterine flushing on the reproductive potential of infertile women--a prospective study.To determine the value of leukemia inhibitory factor (LIF) assessment for predicting the reproductive outcome.Two phase study. Phase I: assessment of LIF in uterine flushing. Phase II: 1,5 years after examining the last patient, a questionnaire was sent to all participants of the phase I. Phase I: Uterine flushing and endometrial samples were collected during implantation window from infertile patients with stage I/II endometriosis (n = 14), patients with idiopathic infertility (n = 27), luteal phase deficiency (n = 13), and fertile control (n = 21). LIF was assessed in uterine flushings in all patients by ELISA. In endometrium, semiquantitative RT-PCR was performed for LIF mRNA expression. Phase II: questionnaire has been sent to all infertile women taking part in the first phase of the experiment, regarding their reproductive outcome.65.4% patients who had returned the questionnaire did get pregnant. LIF concentration at a cut-off point of 2.31 pg/ml had a 95.7% sensitivity and 81.8% specificity in predicting the reproductive outcome.This prospective study for the first time in literature indicates that the LIF assessment can be used as a predictor of reproductive success.Characterization of periostin expression in human endometrium and endometriotic lesions.To investigate the expression of periostin in the eutopic and ectopic endometrium of women diagnosed as endometriosis and evaluate the role of periostin in the pathogenesis of endometriosis.In this study, the expression of periostin was evaluated in the endometrial specimens from 35 women diagnosed as endometriosis and from 30 healthy women. To assess the presence and localization of periostin throughout the menstrual cycle in both eutopic and ectopic endometrium of women with endometriosis, microscopic evaluation was conducted. It was also subsequently compared with normal endometrium.In the eutopic and ectopic endometrium of women with endometriosis, immunoreactivities of periostin increased compared with those of normal endometrium. We also observed a cyclic variation in the eutopic stromal periostin immunoreactivity throughout their menstrual cycle because higher H score values were observed in the proliferative phase than those in the secretory phase.These findings indicated that periostin may be involved in the pathophysiology of endometriosis.Eutopic endometrium and peritoneal, ovarian and colorectal endometriotic tissues express a different profile of nectin-1, -3, -4 and nectin-like molecule 2.How is the expression of nectins and nectin-like molecules (Necls) detected by immunostaining altered by endometriosis?Our results suggest that Nectin-1, -3, -4 and Necl-2 may contribute to the pathogenesis of endometriosis. Immunostaining of nectins and Necls varies according to the anatomical location of endometriosis.Nectin and Necl molecules are immunoglobulin-like cell adhesion molecules involved in apoptosis, cell proliferation and in metastases. Previous studies have demonstrated the involvement of adhesion molecules in the development of endometriotic lesions but no data exist on immunostaining of nectins and Necls molecules in endometriosis.This retrospective study was conducted in a tertiary-care hospital (Tenon Hospital, Paris, France). Samples were collected from 55 women undergoing endometrial biopsy or surgery for endometriosis and 20 controls having hysterectomy or endometrial biopsy for other reasons; multiple samples were collected from 15 women. We studied the immunostaining of Nectin-1, -3, -4 and Necl-2 in secretory and proliferative endometrium from women with (n = 20) or without endometriosis (i.e. control group, n = 20), and in peritoneal (n = 20), ovarian (n = 20) and colorectal endometriosis (n = 20).Semi-quantitative immunostaining demonstrated that (1) Necl-2 staining was stronger in all types of endometriotic lesions than in the eutopic endometrium from patients with endometriosis (P < 0.0125) and in ovarian endometriotic cysts compared with other locations (P < 0.001); (2) Nectin-3 staining was stronger in the eutopic endometrium of patients with endometriosis compared with controls (P = 0.03) and in all endometriotic lesions compared with the eutopic endometrium from patients with endometriosis (P < 0.0125); (3) Nectin-4, staining was stronger in the eutopic endometrium of patients with endometriosis compared with controls (P = 0.04) and (4) Nectin-1 staining was significantly increased in colorectal endometriosis compared with other locations (P = 0.004).We did not assess the pattern of expression in endometriosis of all nectins and Necl molecules. Indeed, Necl-5 is implicated in many pathophysiological processes such as cell movement and proliferation with potential relevance to endometriosis. GENERALISABILITY TO OTHER POPULATIONS: At present, few data on implication of nectins and Necl molecules in endometriosis exist. Hence, our results should be confirmed by further quantitative studies at protein or RNA levels.No funding source. All the authors declare no conflict of interest.Is the detection of endometrial nerve fibers useful in the diagnosis of endometriosis?Laparoscopy is currently considered to be the gold standard investigation in patients suspected to have endometriosis, but this is an invasive and relatively costly procedure and there may be significant delays in diagnosis. As the eutopic endometrium is recognized to be abnormal in patients with endometriosis, it has been suggested that endometrial sampling could provide an indirect diagnostic approach. In particular, recent reports have suggested that the presence of nerve fibers within the endometrial functional layer could represent a specific and sensitive marker of concurrent peritoneal endometriosis. However, such studies have been performed in select patient groups and using novel sampling and analytic techniques that are not used routinely in clinical pathology laboratories. The present study was performed upon conventional endometrial biopsies from 68 patients who underwent laparoscopy for suspected endometriosis. The biopsies were stained immunohistochemically for the neural marker PGP 9.5 and examined in a blinded manner. Endometrial functional layer nerve fibers were identified in 15 (22%) biopsies overall including 9/47 (19%) cases with histologically confirmed peritoneal endometriosis and 6/21 (29% cases) without endometriosis. There was no correlation between the presence of functional layer nerve fibers and the presenting symptoms, endometrial histology, or current hormonal therapy. In our experience, endometrial functional layer nerve fibers assessment performed using standard immunohistochemical techniques on routine biopsy specimens proved neither sensitive nor specific for the diagnosis of endometriosis. Pathologists and gynecologists considering this diagnostic approach should carefully consider the methodological factors that may influence its reliability.Deficient expression of tumor necrosis factor receptor type 2 in the endometrium of women with endometriosis.Tumor necrosis factor-alpha (TNF-alpha) is secreted mainly during the menstrual phase and has been suggested to play a role in induction of apoptosis in endometrial cells and menstrual shedding. TNF-alpha receptor type 2 (TNF-RII) is believed to play a central role in TNFalpha-mediated cytotoxic, mitogenic, anti-proliferative and apoptotic effects. The aim of this study was to assess whether TNF-RII maybe expressed differentially in the endometrium of women with different degrees of endometriosis.TNF-RII expression in the endometrial tissue of women with and without endometriosis was investigated by immunohistochemical techniques and in situ hybridization.In histological sections, we observed TNF-RII mRNA and the corresponding protein localized mainly in endometrial glandular cells, with only very faint immunostaining in the surrounding stromal cells. Statistical analysis of our data showed a significant decrease in protein and mRNA expression of TNF-RII in endometrial glandular cells of patients with stages I and II endometriosis compared to normal subjects. TNF-RII expression was also found to decrease significantly in the secretory phase of the menstrual cycle in women with early endometriosis stages (I and II).In view of the relevant role of TNF-RII in the modulation of the inflammatory and the proapoptotic effects of TNFalpha, deficient expression of TNF-RII mRNA in the endometrium of women at the earliest stages of endometriosis may play a significant role in the pathophysiology of this disease.Expression of allograft inflammatory factor-1 in human eutopic endometrium and endometriosis: possible association with progression of endometriosis.Allograft inflammatory factor-1 (AIF-1) is a cytokine originally identified in rat cardiac allografts with chronic rejection. AIF-1 is expressed in various human immune-related tissues and is thought to play a role in inflammatory responses and the immune activation and function of macrophages. Expression has also been shown in human placentas and bovine embryos, suggesting that AIF-1 may be involved in reproductive function. Immune factors are thought to be involved in the pathogenesis of endometriosis. High concentrations of activated macrophages and various cytokines have been found in the peritoneal fluid of patients with endometriosis. In the current work we examined the expression of AIF-1 in human eutopic endometrium and endometriosis, and measured AIF-1 in peritoneal fluid samples from women with and without endometriosis. RT-PCR, Western blot analysis, and immunohistochemistry showed that AIF-1 mRNA and protein were expressed both in eutopic endometrium and in endometriotic tissue. In eutopic endometrium, expression was greater in the late secretory and menstrual phases than in other phases of the menstrual cycle (P < 0.01). AIF-1 protein was present in greater amounts in peritoneal fluid from patients with endometriosis than in women without it (P < 0.01), and its concentration correlated with the Revised American Society for Reproductive Medicine score (rs = 0.693; P < 0.0001). Peritoneal macrophages from endometriosis patients secreted more AIF-1 than those from unaffected women (P < 0.05). AIF-1 release from macrophages was stimulated by IL-1beta (P < 0.01) and interferon-gamma (P < 0.05). These results demonstrate for the first time that AIF-1 is expressed in eutopic endometrium and endometriotic tissue, suggesting that AIF-1 is one cytokine in the local network involved in the onset of menstruation. AIF-1 derived from peritoneal macrophages may also possibly play a significant role in the pathophysiology and progression of endometriosis.Immunohistochemical analysis of alphavbeta5 and alphavbeta6 integrins in the endometrium and endometriosis.We performed a case-controlled study to study the immunoreactivity patterns and staining intensity of alphavbeta5 and alphavbeta6 integrins in ectopic and eutopic endometrium from women with endometriosis and compared them with those in normal control endometrium. Forty eutopic and ectopic samples from patients with endometriosis were compared with 12 control endometrial samples. Staining was evaluated using a computerized image analysis system by a blinded, independent observer. The immunoreactivity patterns for both alphavbeta5 and alphavbeta6 were very similar. In eutopic endometrium from women with or without endometriosis, the immunostaining intensity score for both integrins was stronger during the secretory than the proliferative phase. Immunoreactivity in endometriosis was greater than in eutopic endometrium. There were no significant menstrual cycle-related staining differences in endometriosis. The percentage of blood vessels immunolabeled was greater in endometriosis than eutopic endometrium from endometriosis patients and greater in eutopic endometrium from these patients compared with control endometrium. Ectopic tissue from patients with stages I and II endometriosis showed significantly higher staining intensity than ectopic tissue from patients with stages III and IV disease. Determination of the specific functional consequences of the differences observed in alphavbeta5 and alphavbeta6 integrin immunostaining may provide an increased understanding regarding the pathogenesis of endometriosis.Dysregulation of vascular endothelial growth factors and their neuropilin receptors in the eutopic endometrium of women with endometriosis.Despite the importance of neuropilins (NRPs) in a number of processes that are altered in endometriosis, such as angiogenesis and neuronal guidance, these molecules have not been previously studied in the disease. Similarly, potent lymphangiogenic factors, vascular endothelial growth factor C (VEGF-C) and VEGF-D, have not been comprehensively investigated in endometriosis. The objective of this study was to examine their expression in women with and without endometriosis. NRPs and VEGFs were quantified in 79 histologically normal uterine tissue samples (37 control and 42 endometriosis, all menstrual cycle phases) using immunohistochemistry and automated cellular imaging analysis. NRP-1 was significantly reduced in women with endometriosis (P = .004). The normal significant menstrual cyclical variations in endometrial NRP-1, NRP-2, and VEGF-C were absent in endometriosis, and VEGF-D was dysregulated. Dysregulated expression of growth factors and receptors, such as NRPs and VEGFs, likely contribute to altered angiogenesis, lymphangiogenesis, neurogenesis and immune function in endometriosis and may reflect altered hormone signals. Interleukin 1beta, interleukin-6, and tumor necrosis factor-alpha in endometriotic tissue and in endometrium.To compare the levels of IL-1beta, IL-6, and TNFalpha in endometriotic tissue and in endometrium from women with endometriosis and healthy controls.Open.Department of Obstetrics and Gynecology at a university hospital.Twenty-six women with endometriosis and 22 controls operated on for clinical indications.ELISA in homogenized tissue samples collected during surgery.Levels of IL-1beta, IL-6, and TNFalpha in tissue homogenates.The three types of tissue differed significantly with respect to all three cytokines. Endometriotic tissue had significantly higher concentrations of IL-1beta than endometrium from both patients with endometriosis and healthy controls. Both endometriotic tissue and endometrium from patients had significantly higher concentrations of IL-6, and endometriotic tissue had significantly lower concentration of TNFalpha than did endometrium from controls. IL-1beta showed a cycle phase dependence that was significant in endometrium from patients, being higher in the secretory than in the follicular phase. IL-1beta was significantly higher in endometrioma than in lesions of other localizations. Concentrations of IL-1beta and IL-6 were positively correlated in endometriotic tissue and in endometrium from controls. No other significant correlations were found.This study has shown a significant production of IL-1beta, IL-6, and TNFalpha in endometriotic tissue and endometrium, with significant differences between the tissue types, indicating a deviating cytokine pattern in both endometriotic tissue and endometrium from women with endometriosis compared with that from healthy controls.Use of proteomic analysis of endometriosis to identify different protein expression in patients with endometriosis versus normal controls.To use proteomic techniques, including two-dimensional electrophoresis (2-DE), Western blot, and mass spectrometry, to screen and identify proteins that were expressed differently in patients with endometriosis versus normal controls.First, we aimed to find a difference in the way serum and eutopic endometrial proteins were expressed in women with and without endometriosis. Second, we were interested in searching for endometriotic proteins, which were specifically recognized by sera from patients with endometriosis.Collaborative investigation in an academic research environment.Consenting women of reproductive age taking no medications and with laparoscopically proven endometriosis.Surgical excision of eutopic and ectopic endometrial biopsy and phlebotomization of patients with endometriosis and controls.Protein expression.Thirteen protein spots from serum correlated with 11 known proteins and 11 protein spots from endometrium correlated with 11 known proteins were found differently expressed between women with and without endometriosis. Some proteins may be cytoskeletons, and some may be involved in the regulation of cell cycle, signal transduction, or immunological function. Three proteins, which were identified as vimentin, beta-actin, and ATP synthase beta subunit, hybridized significantly differently between endometriosis sera and normal sera.The data help to establish a human endometriosis proteome database and broaden our understanding of the pathogenesis of endometriosis. Further study of the proteins identified herein will assist in the eventual development of new diagnoses and treatments for endometriosis.Downregulation of miR-183 inhibits apoptosis and enhances the invasive potential of endometrial stromal cells in endometriosis.Endometriosis is a common gynecological disease, yet its pathogenesis remains poorly understood. Recent studies have demonstrated that the aberrant expression of certain microRNAs (miRNAs) may correlate with the development and progression of endometriosis. In this study, we profiled several differentially expressed miRNAs in the normal, eutopic and ectopic endometrium by miRNA microarray screening analysis, among which, miR-183 was found to be downregulated in the ectopic and eutopic tissues, and the result was further confirmed by real-time PCR (qPCR). Functional analysis indicated that miR-183 plays a promotional role in endometrial stromal cell (ESC) apoptosis and has a negative regulatory impact on the invasive ability of cells, although it has no effect on ESC proliferation. Ovarian steroids (17β-estradiol and progesterone) and inflammatory factors (tumor necrosis factor-α and interleukin-6) decreased the expression of miR-183 in the ESCs. This regulatory function may further manifest the growth and invasive potential of ESCs by altering the expression of miR-183. These findings suggest that the downregulation of miR-183 expression is involved in the development and progression of endometriosis. The progesterone receptor coactivator Hic-5 is involved in the pathophysiology of endometriosis.Endometriosis is an estrogen-dependent disorder primarily associated with pelvic pain and infertility in up to 10% of women of reproductive age. Recent studies suggest that resistance to progesterone action may contribute to the development and pathophysiology of this disorder. In this study we examined the in vivo and in vitro expression and function of one progesterone receptor (PR) coactivator, Hic-5, in human endometrium and endometrial stromal fibroblasts (hESFs) from 29 women with and 30 (control) women without endometriosis. Hic-5 was highly expressed in stromal, but not epithelial, cells in women without endometriosis, in a cycle-dependent manner. In contrast, Hic-5 expression was not regulated during the menstrual cycle in hESFs from women with endometriosis and was significantly reduced in hESFs from women with vs. without disease. Hic-5 mRNA expression throughout the cycle in endometrium from control women, but not those with endometriosis, correlated with expression of PR. Hic-5 mRNA in hESFs was significantly up-regulated in control but not endometriosis hESFs after treatment in vitro with 8-bromoadenosine-cAMP for 96 h but only modestly after 14 d of progesterone treatment. Hic-5 silencing did not influence cAMP-regulated gene expression but affected genes regulated solely by progesterone (e.g. DKK1 and calcitonin). Together the data suggest that the proposed progesterone resistance in endometrium from women with endometriosis derives, in part, from impaired expression of the PR coactivator, Hic-5, in endometrial tissue and cultured endometrial stromal fibroblasts.Expression of several components of the plasminogen activator and matrix metalloproteinase systems in endometriosis.Endometriosis is considered a benign disease that has the ability to invade normal tissue. As in neoplastic growth, local extracellular proteolysis may take place. The aim of this study is to analyse several components of the plasminogen activator (PA) pathway and the matrix metalloproteinase (MMP) system in endometriotic tissue, endometrium and peritoneal fluid from women with and without endometriosis (controls).Thirty-nine women with endometriosis and 35 controls were studied. In eutopic endometrium of women with endometriosis, the antigenic levels of urokinase-type PA (uPA) and MMP-3 were elevated when compared with endometrium from controls. Ovarian endometriotic tissues had higher antigenic levels of PA inhibitor type 1 (PAI-1) and tissue inhibitor of metalloproteinases type 1 (TIMP-1) than endometrium. The peritoneal fluid from women with endometriosis showed a significant increase in uPA levels compared with controls.The increase in antigenic levels of uPA and MMP-3 in endometrium of women with endometriosis might contribute to the invasive potential of endometrial cells. Once the ovarian endometriotic cyst is developed, an increase in PAI-1 and TIMP-1 is detected and significant proteolytic activity is no longer observed. This increase in inhibitors and decrease in proteolytic activity could explain the frequent clinical finding of isolated endometriotic cyst without invasion of the surrounding ovarian tissue.beta-HCG/LH receptor (beta-HCG/LH-R) expression in eutopic endometrium and endometriotic implants: evidence for beta-HCG sensitivity of endometriosis.Luteinizing hormone (LH) and human chorionic gonadotropin (HCG) target their receptor in gonadal and nongonadal cells to stimulate steroidogenesis and cell growth. The aim of the present study was to investigate the expression of HCG/LH-R in endometriosis to elucidate a possible impact of LH and HCG on this disease.Analysis of HCG/LH-R protein expression in 23 paired samples of ectopic and eutopic tissue of cycling women with endometriosis and in endometrial samples from 22 healthy controls was conducted via immunofluorescence. HCG and HCG/LH-R gene expression in endometriotic lesions was confirmed by reverse-transcriptase polymerase chain reaction.In endometriotic implants, epithelial HCG/LH-R was found in 12/23 samples. No significant differences in HCG/LH-R levels were observed when compared with glands of uterine endometrium from the same patients or healthy controls. Messenger RNA transcripts for HCG were detected in all 12 samples, whereas HCG/LH-R mRNAs were observed in 10 of the 12 endometriotic lesions investigated.Although HCG/LH-R was not found to be selectively upregulated in endometriosis, the mere presence of HCG/LH-R in endometriotic tissue may suggest sensitivity of endometriosis to HCG and LH that target HCG/LH-R.Reduced expression of progesterone receptor-B in the endometrium of women with endometriosis and in cocultures of endometrial cells exposed to 2,3,7,8-tetrachlorodibenzo-p-dioxin.To analyze endometrial progesterone receptor (PR) expression in women with endometriosis compared with disease-free women and to assess the impact of in vitro 2,3,7,8-tetrachlorodibenzo-p-dioxin (TCDD) exposure on PR isotype expression.Controlled laboratory study.University medical center.Healthy volunteers and women with surgically diagnosed endometriosis.None.Analysis of in vivo PR-A and PR-B expression in endometrium from women with and without endometriosis. The impact of in vitro TCDD exposure on PR-B/PR-A ratio and cell-specific matrix metalloproteinase (MMP) expression was also determined.The PR-B/PR-A ratio was lower in endometrial tissues from women with endometriosis compared with normal tissues. A similar ratio was induced in normal stromal cells cocultured with epithelial cells and exposed to TCDD. Disruption of stromal PR expression following TCDD exposure was associated with a failure of P-mediated down-regulation of both stromal-specific pro-MMP-3 and epithelial-specific pro-MMP-7.Our data suggest that reduced progesterone (P) sensitivity in the endometrium of women with endometriosis may be related to an altered pattern of PR expression. The ability of TCDD to selectively down-regulate stromal PR-B expression and increase MMP expression in both stromal and epithelial cells suggests that exposure to this toxin may negatively impact P-mediated cell-cell communication in the human endometrium.Menstrual blood-derived stromal stem cells from women with and without endometriosis reveal different phenotypic and functional characteristics.Retrograde flow of menstrual blood cells during menstruation is considered as the dominant theory for the development of endometriosis. Moreover, current evidence suggests that endometrial-derived stem cells are key players in the pathogenesis of endometriosis. In particular, endometrial stromal stem cells have been suggested to be involved in the pathogenesis of this disease. Here, we aimed to use menstrual blood, as a novel source of endometrial stem cells, to investigate whether stromal stem cells from endometriosis (E-MenSCs) and non-endometriosis (NE-MenSCs) women differed regarding their morphology, CD marker expression pattern, proliferation, invasion and adhesion capacities and their ability to express certain immunomodulatory molecules. E-MenSCs were morphologically different from NE-MenSCs and showed higher expression of CD9, CD10 and CD29. Furthermore, E-MenSCs had higher proliferation and invasion potentials compared with NE-MenSCs. The amount of indoleamine 2,3-dioxygenase-1 (IDO1) and cyclooxygenase-2 (COX-2) in E-MenSCs co-cultured with allogenic peripheral blood mononuclear cells (PBMCs) was shown to be higher both at the gene and protein levels, and higher IDO1 activity was detected in the endometriosis group. However, NE-MenSCs revealed increased concentrations of forkhead transcription factor-3 (FOXP3) when compared with E-MenSCs. Nonetheless, interferon (IFN)-γ, Interleukin (IL)-10 and monocyte chemoattractant protein-1 (MCP-1) levels were higher in the supernatant of E-MenSCs-PBMC co-cultures. Here, we showed that there are inherent differences between E-MenSCs and NE-MenSCs. These findings propose the key role MenSCs could play in the pathogenesis of endometriosis and further support the retrograde and stem cell theories of endometriosis. Hence, considering its renewable and easily available nature, menstrual blood could be viewed as a reliable and inexpensive material for studies addressing the cellular and molecular aspects of endometriosis. Endometrial leptin and leptin receptor expression in women with severe/moderate endometriosis.The leptin system has been implicated in reproductive function, acting at endocrine and paracrine levels. Recently, deregulation of this gene family has been linked to endometrial changes caused by endometriosis. In the present study, we compare the expression of leptin receptor mRNA during the pre-receptive (LH+2) and receptive (LH+9) phases in the eutopic endometrium from patients with severe/moderate endometriosis (n = 30) versus fertile controls (n = 12). In each patient, two endometrial samples were obtained at LH+2 and LH+9 in their natural cycles. When real-time quantitative fluorescent PCR was performed, an up-regulation of OB-RL and all the isoforms investigated was observed at LH+9 versus LH+2 in patients with and without endometriosis. However, no difference was found in the expression pattern of the total leptin receptor OB-RT, or in its long OB-RL and soluble HuB219.3 forms when the eutopic endometria of patients with severe/moderate endometriosis and fertile controls were compared. By means of in situ hybridization, total leptin receptor mRNA was localized in the luminal epithelium and the glands of the endometrium. The immunohistochemical analysis of the long form of leptin receptor was also performed in order to confirm these findings at the protein level. Finally, we have also shown similar leptin mRNA expression in both the control group and patients with endometriosis. In conclusion, we have not identified differences in the endometrial expression and localization of leptin and the leptin receptor when comparing the eutopic endometrium of women with severe/moderate endometriosis and fertile controls.Escherichia coli contamination of menstrual blood and effect of bacterial endotoxin on endometriosis.To test the hypothesis that bacterial contamination of menstrual blood could be a local biologic event in the development of endometriosis, menstrual blood was cultured and bacterial endotoxin was measured in menstrual blood and peritoneal fluid. Our results suggest that compared with control women, higher colony formation of Escherichia coli in menstrual blood and endotoxin levels in menstrual fluid and peritoneal fluid in women with endometriosis may promote Toll-like receptor 4-mediated growth of endometriosis.Up-regulation of endocrine gland-derived vascular endothelial growth factor but not vascular endothelial growth factor in human ectopic endometriotic tissue.To study the expression of vascular endothelial growth factor (VEGF), endocrine gland-derived VEGF (EG-VEGF/PK1), and its receptors (PKR1 and PKR2) in eutopic and ectopic endometrial tissues.A case-control study.University reproduction unit.Infertile women undergoing diagnostic laparoscopy for tubal patency.Endometrial and endometriotic tissue sampling from women with and without endometriosis.Quantitative polymerase chain reaction (PCR) analysis of genes in eutopic and ectopic endometrial tissues. The EG-VEGF protein was studied by immunohistochemistry.In normal endometrium, EG-VEGF messenger RNA (mRNA) expression was 50-fold higher in the secretory than in the proliferative phase, but that of PKR1 was 6-fold higher in the latter than in the former. The PKR2 transcript was detected in the proliferative but not the secretory endometrium. In patients with endometriosis, eutopic endometrial PKR2 transcript level was 4-fold higher in the proliferative than in the secretory phase. No differences in EG-VEGF or PKR1 were found in proliferative versus secretory endometrium in these patients. There were no significant differences in the expression of EG-VEGF in eutopic endometrium of normal women and in those with endometriosis. In the paired laser-captured microdissected eutopic endometrial and ectopic endometriotic samples, a significantly higher EG-VEGF, but not VEGF, transcript level was detected in the ectopic when compared with eutopic samples; whereas the expressions of PKR1 and PKR2 were barely detectable. The H-scoring confirmed that the stroma of endometriotic samples had a significantly higher EG-VEGF protein expression than that in the paired eutopic endometrium.High levels of EG-VEGF expression may play an important role in angiogenesis in endometriotic tissues.mRNA analysis of several components of the plasminogen activator and matrix metalloproteinase systems in endometriosis using a real-time quantitative RT-PCR assay.The plasminogen activator (PA) and matrix metalloproteinase (MMP) systems are implicated in the establishment of endometriosis. The mechanisms by which these systems are involved in the pathogenesis of this disease are not well defined and controversial results have been published. The aim of this study was to analyse mRNA and protein levels of several components of the PA and MMP systems in endometriotic tissue and endometrium from women with and without endometriosis.Real-time quantitative RT-PCR assays were developed to quantify mRNA levels of these components in 57 women with endometriosis and 32 controls. Endometrium of women with endometriosis showed higher mRNA and antigenic levels of urokinase type-PA (uPA) and MMP-3 than endometrium from controls. In these patients, ovarian endometriotic tissue had higher mRNA and antigenic levels of PA inhibitor type 1 (PAI-1) and MMP inhibitor type 1 (TIMP-1) than endometrium.The increase in mRNA and protein levels of uPA and MMP-3 observed in endometrium of women with endometriosis may facilitate the attachment of endometrial tissue to the peritoneum and ovarian surface, as well as the invasion of the extracellular matrix. This process would lead to the formation of early endometriotic lesions. Once the ovarian endometriotic cyst is developed, PAI-1 and TIMP-1 would increase which could explain the frequent clinical finding of an endometrioma without invasion of the adjacent ovarian tissue.Regulation of interleukin-8 expression in human endometrial endothelial cells: a potential mechanism for the pathogenesis of endometriosis.The elevation of the proinflammatory chemoattractant cytokine levels in ectopic and eutopic endometrium of endometriosis implies an inflammatory basis for this disease. The relationship between endothelial cells and leukocytes is likely to be important in the regulation of inflammatory mediators of endometriosis. The aim of this study was to describe the temporal and spatial expression of IL-8 in human endometrial endothelial cells (HEEC) in vivo and to compare the in vitro regulation of IL-8 expression by sex steroids in HEEC from women with or without endometriosis. Eutopic endometrial tissues and endometriosis implants were grouped according to menstrual cycle phase and examined by immunohistochemistry for IL-8 expression. Endothelial cells of endometriotic implants expressed higher IL-8 immunoreactivity compared with endothelial cells of eutopic endometrium from women with or without endometriosis (P < 0.02). For in vitro studies, HEEC were isolated from women with or without endometriosis and grown to preconfluence. The purity of cultured HEEC (90-95%) was confirmed by immunocytochemistry using endothelium-specific markers, CD31 and CD146. The effects of estradiol (5 x 10(-8) m), progesterone (10(-7) m), or both on IL-8 mRNA and protein levels were analyzed by RT-PCR and ELISA, respectively. Sex steroids reduced the expression of IL-8 mRNA and protein in HEEC from women without endometriosis. In contrast, both estradiol and progesterone stimulated IL-8 mRNA and protein expression in HEEC from women with endometriosis. We postulate that the stimulation of chemokine expression by sex steroids in HEEC of women with endometriosis may play a role in the inflammatory aspect of this disease.Clinical usefulness of determination of estradiol level in the menstrual blood for patients with endometriosis.The role of tissue factor and protease-activated receptor 2 in endometriosis.Little is known about the roles of TF and PAR-2 in endometriosis. This article investigated the expression of TF and PAR-2 in ectopic and eutopic endometrium with endometriosis and their relationship with the menstrual cycle.Ectopic and eutopic endometrium tissues from 42 women with ovarian endometrioma and endometrium tissues from 20 women without endometriosis were obtained. All the samples were assessed for TF and PAR-2 protein location using immunohistochemistry and for relative TF and PAR-2 mRNA expression using real-time florescent quantitative polymerase chain reaction (FQ-PCR).Total TF and PAR-2 expression were significantly higher in ectopic and eutopic endometrium of women with endometriosis when compared with controls. Moreover, TF expression in ectopic and eutopic endometrium and PAR-2 expression in ectopic endometrium were significantly increased through the whole menstrual cycle. However, in eutopic endometrium with endometriosis, PAR-2 expression only in secretory phase was higher than its cycle-matched normal controls. There is no such difference in the proliferative phase.The abnormal co-upregulated expression of TF and PAR-2 in eutopic and ectopic endometrium may affect the development and growth of endometriotic lesions and highlighted the pathologic role of TF and PAR-2 in eutopic endometrium in endometriosis.Cyr61, a deregulated gene in endometriosis.Gene expression profiling was performed to identify genes involved in the development of endometriosis. In the secretory phase of the menstrual cycle, several estrogen-regulated genes were up-regulated in endometria of women with endometriosis. The most consistent regulation with one of the highest factors was observed for the Cyr61 gene, which codes for a secreted, cysteine-rich, heparin-binding protein that promotes cell adhesion, migration, and neovascularization. Estrogen responsiveness of endometrial Cyr61 expression was suggested by the higher expression during the proliferative phase and the reduction observed in human endometrial fragments grafted into nude mice subsequently treated with an anti-estrogen. The expression level of Cyr61 was found to be further increased in ectopic endometriotic lesions, as compared to eutopic endometria. In these lesions, an imbalance in expression of the estrogen-converting enzymes 17beta-hydroxysteroid dehydrogenase type 1 and 2 was found, which might explain the elevated Cyr61 level. However, Cyr61 expression was not altered in endometriotic lesions of women treated with a GnRH agonist. These results suggest that Cyr61 may represent a gene characteristic for endometriosis and also play an important role in the development and persistence of endometriotic lesions.Expression of macrophage migration inhibitory factor in human endometriosis: relation to disease stage, menstrual cycle and infertility.The aim of the present study was to compare the expression of macrophage migration inhibitory factor (MIF) in eutopic and ectopic endometria of women with endometriosis and eutopic endometria of women without endometriosis, and to investigate whether such an expression varies according to disease stage, menstrual cycle and infertility status.Forty patients with endometriosis and 15 control women were recruited for the study. Following isolation of total RNA from endometria and reverse transcription, cDNA samples were amplified to quantify the level of MIF expression by real-time fluorescent quantitative polymerase chain reaction. All of the endometriosis tissue and normal endometrium specimens were analyzed using immunohistochemistry.The levels of MIF in eutopic and ectopic endometria in endometriosis patients were significantly higher than in normal eutopic endometria (P < 0.01). Further, when comparing MIF in eutopic endometria (separated by phases) between the endometriosis and control groups, MIF was higher in the former group, both in the proliferative and secretory phases (P < 0.05). In addition, the MIF mRNA level was cycle phase-dependent and increased in the proliferative phase, both in women with endometriosis and the control women, compared with the level in the secretory phase (P < 0.05). There was no significant association between MIF expression and American Fertility Society staging of endometriosis (P > 0.05). However, MIF levels were obviously elevated in sterile women in the endometriosis group compared with women in the endometriosis group who were not sterile (P < 0.05).The expression of MIF was increased significantly in the eutopic and ectopic endometrial tissue of women with endometriosis, and this factor may play a possible role in endometriosis-associated infertility.Combined mRNA microarray and proteomic analysis of eutopic endometrium of women with and without endometriosis.An early semi-invasive diagnosis of endometriosis has the potential to allow early treatment and minimize disease progression but no such test is available at present. Our aim was to perform a combined mRNA microarray and proteomic analysis on the same eutopic endometrium sample obtained from patients with and without endometriosis.mRNA and protein fractions were extracted from 49 endometrial biopsies obtained from women with laparoscopically proven presence (n= 31) or absence (n= 18) of endometriosis during the early luteal (n= 27) or menstrual phase (n= 22) and analyzed using microarray and proteomic surface enhanced laser desorption ionization-time of flight mass spectrometry, respectively. Proteomic data were analyzed using a least squares-support vector machines (LS-SVM) model built on 70% (training set) and 30% of the samples (test set).mRNA analysis of eutopic endometrium did not show any differentially expressed genes in women with endometriosis when compared with controls, regardless of endometriosis stage or cycle phase. mRNA was differentially expressed (P< 0.05) in women with (925 genes) and without endometriosis (1087 genes) during the menstrual phase when compared with the early luteal phase. Proteomic analysis based on five peptide peaks [2072 mass/charge (m/z); 2973 m/z; 3623 m/z; 3680 m/z and 21133 m/z] using an LS-SVM model applied on the luteal phase endometrium training set allowed the diagnosis of endometriosis (sensitivity, 91; 95% confidence interval (CI): 74-98; specificity, 80; 95% CI: 66-97 and positive predictive value, 87.9%; negative predictive value, 84.8%) in the test set.mRNA expression of eutopic endometrium was comparable in women with and without endometriosis but different in menstrual endometrium when compared with luteal endometrium in women with endometriosis. Proteomic analysis of luteal phase endometrium allowed the diagnosis of endometriosis with high sensitivity and specificity in training and test sets. A potential limitation of our study is the fact that our control group included women with a normal pelvis as well as women with concurrent pelvic disease (e.g. fibroids, benign ovarian cysts, hydrosalpinges), which may have contributed to the comparable mRNA expression profile in the eutopic endometrium of women with endometriosis and controls.Relative expression of 1,25-dihydroxyvitamin D3 receptor, vitamin D 1 alpha-hydroxylase, vitamin D 24-hydroxylase, and vitamin D 25-hydroxylase in endometriosis and gynecologic cancers.The authors demonstrate expression of the vitamin D receptor (VDR) and its hydroxylases in the endometrium and ovaries of women with and without endometriosis and endometrial or ovarian cancer. Immunohistochemistry showed strong staining of the VDR in endometriosis and endometrial cancer, with the most intense staining in epithelial cells. The VDR mRNA was significantly increased in patients with endometrial and ovarian cancer compared to the control group. There was a significantly higher 1 alpha-hydroxylase expression in the endometrium of patients with endometriosis compared to healthy controls. The observed differences in VDR and 1 alpha -hydroxylase mRNA levels were maintained at the protein level. The authors found no differences in 25-OH vitamin D levels between the serum of patients with endometriosis (25.7 +/- 2.1 ng/mL, n = 46) and healthy controls (22.6 +/- 2.0 ng/mL, n = 33, P = .31). They hypothesize that vitamin D might influence the local activity of immune cells and cytokines thought to play important pathogenic roles in the development and maintenance of endometriosis.Silencing of cofilin-1 gene attenuates biological behaviours of stromal cells derived from eutopic endometria of women with endometriosis.Eutopic endometria with endometriosis (EMs) differ dramatically from normal endometria, physiologically and biochemically, yet the pathogenesis of EMs remains unclear. Cofilin-1 (CFL1), a critical modulator of the actin cystoskeleton, is associated with tumour progression, cell motility, cell adhesion, cell invasion and angiogenesis. Although eutopic endometria with EMs exhibit many malignant-like behaviours and a higher expression of CFL1 than normal endometria, the effects of CFL1 on the pathogenesis of EMs are unknown. The aim of this study was to explore the role of CFL1 expression in proliferation, apoptosis, adhesion, invasion, angiogenesis and ultrastructure of endometrial cells.We isolated and cultured stromal cells derived from the eutopic endometria of 30 patients with advanced ovarian EMs (ESCs, Stromal Cells of eutopic endometria in Endometriosis patients) and 30 control patients without EMs (NSCs, Stromal Cells of eutopic endometria in Non-endometriosis patients), and evaluated their proliferation, apoptosis, adhesion, invasion and expression of markers of adhesion, invasion and angiogenesis in vitro. In addition, these functions were examined after short hairpin RNA (shRNA) was used to silence the CFL1 gene in ESCs, and pEGFP-N1-CFL recombinant plasmid was transiently transfected into NSCs to up-regulate CFL1 expression.Under basal conditions, CFL1 mRNA and protein were overexpressed in ESCs. Proliferation, adhesion, invasion and markers of adhesion, invasion and angiogenesis were enhanced in ESCs compared with NSCs; in contrast, the apoptosis rate was lower in ESCs than in NSCs. Silencing the CFL1 gene in ESCs markedly attenuated proliferation, adhesion, invasion and expression of the markers, but enhanced apoptosis. Conversely, up-regulation of CFL1 in NSCs increased proliferation, adhesion, invasion and expression of the markers but reduced apoptosis.The overexpression of CFL1 in ESCs is associated with enhanced proliferation, adhesion, invasion and angiogenesis and reduced apoptosis in EMs. These malignant-like behaviours of ESCs in EMs can be attenuated by inducing CFL1 gene silencing with shRNA interference.Identification biomarkers of eutopic endometrium in endometriosis using artificial neural networks and protein fingerprinting.Surface-enhanced laser desorption/ionization time-of-flight mass spectrometry (SELDI-TOF-MS) protein chip array technology was used to detect biomarkers of eutopic endometrium in endometriosis patients. Five potential biomarkers (6,898 m/z, 5,891 m/z, 5,385 m/z, 6,448 m/z, and 5,425 m/z) were found.Increased soluble interleukin-1 receptor type II proteolysis in the endometrium of women with endometriosis.Numerous functional changes were observed in the intrauterine endometrial tissue of women with endometriosis. Our previous studies revealed a marked decrease in the expression of interleukin-1 receptor type 2 (IL-1RII), a decoy receptor known for its ability to buffer IL-1 effects. The aim of the present study was to assess whether post-translational mechanisms such as proteolysis may contribute to the down-regulation of IL-1RII levels. Our data showed that soluble IL-1RII (sIL-1RII) concentrations released by freshly cultured endometrial tissue were significantly lower in women with endometriosis than in normal women (P < 0.01) and further revealed a statistically significant correlation between increased proteolysis and decreased sIL-1RII levels (P < 0.05; r = -0.47). (125)I-labelled soluble recombinant human IL-1RII ([(125)I]srhIL-1RII) was significantly more degraded in culture supernatant of tissues from women with endometriosis compared to normal women (P < 0.05), and natural tissue inhibitor of matrix metalloproteinase (TIMP)-1 inhibited [(125)I]srhIL-1RII degradation. Incubation of srhIL-1RII with active rhMMP-9 resulted in a dose-dependent degradation of srhIL-1RII as analysed by western blotting. Dual immunofluorescence showed an increased immunostaining for matrix metalloproteinase-9 in situ in the endometrial tissue of women with endometriosis compared to normal women and a decreased immunostaining for IL-1RII. The present study showed a reduced release of sIL-1RII by the endometrial tissue of women with endometriosis and revealed a proteolytic post-translational mechanism which may be involved in the down-regulation of IL-1RII levels. This may enhance IL-1-mediated activation of endometrial cells and contribute to the local immuno-inflammatory process observed in endometriosis patients.Immunoproteins in the endometrium: clinical correlates of the presence of complement fractions C3 and C4.The presence of complement fractions C3 and C4 in endometrial tissue was studied in a consecutive series of patients undergoing diagnostic laparoscopy, to determine their specific association with endometriosis. The incidence of complement in eutopic endometrium of patients grouped according to four diagnoses was: endometriosis, 66% positive (23 of 35); active pelvic inflammatory disease, 85% positive (11 of 13); combined endometriosis with pelvic inflammatory disease, 25% positive (one of four); laparoscopically normal pelvis, 67% positive (10 of 15). These differences were not statistically significant. Complement was equally likely to be found in proliferative, secretory, menstrual, or inflammatory endometrium. Endometrial complement was found less frequently in patients with severe endometriosis as compared with those with the mild form. Among patients with endometriosis and infertility, complement was much more likely to be found in patients with primary infertility than in those with secondary infertility (p less than 0.007). In short-term follow-up of these patients, the absence of complement in the eutopic endometrium appeared to be a good predictor of subsequent pregnancies.Phosphatase of regenerating liver-3: a novel and promising marker in human endometriosis.To investigate the expression of phosphatase of regenerating liver-3 (PRL-3) in ectopic, eutopic, and normal endometria and explore its relationship with endometriosis.A clinical retrospective and molecular study.Department of obstetrics, gynecology, and reproductive medicine.One hundred and five women with histopathologically confirmed endometriosis, and 50 women with histopathologically assessed normal endometria.Immunohistochemical staining and Western blot analysis.Expression of PRL-3 protein.As shown by the immunohistochemical analysis, PRL-3 was mainly located in the cytoplasm and membrane. The cells that tested positive for PRL-3 were detected in endometriotic tissues that did not occur in eutopic and normal endometria. Statistical analysis indicated that the expression of PRL-3 was closely associated with the clinical stages and recurrence of endometriosis.Expression of PRL-3 is related to the clinical stages and recurrence of endometriosis, which provides use with a novel marker and promising target in the treatment of human endometriosis.[Expression of interleukin1-alpha, beta and interferon-gamma in macrophages from endometrium of women with endometriosis].To assess interleukin (IL)-1alpha, beta and interferon (IFN) gamma expression in macrophages in eutopic and ectopic endometrium of women with endometriosis.In situ hybridization was used to examine the expression of IL-1alpha and beta and IFN-gamma in macrophages from eutopic and ectopic endometrium of 40 women with endometriosis and 15 control women. Eutopic endometrial samples were histologically classified into proliferative and secretary phases. Cervical polyp tissue was used as positive control.Expression of IL-1alpha and beta in macrophages from eutopic and ectopic endometrium of women with endometriosis were significantly higher than that in the control group (P < 0.05). Both gene expression in macrophages from ectopic endometrium was higher than that in eutopic endometrium of patients with endometriosis (P < 0.05). The expressions of the two genes were significantly increased in secretory phase of endometrium when compared to that in proliferative phase (P < 0.05). There was no difference in IFN-gamma expression in macrophages of endometium between patients with endometriosis and control (P > 0.05). No cycle dependent variation of the gene expression in the macrophages was found either in endometriosis group or in control group.There is a significant increase in the expression of IL-1alpha and beta in macrophages of endometriosis. IL-1 and activated macrophages may play an important role in the development and progression of endometriosis.Effect of GnRH-II on the ESC proliferation, apoptosis and VEGF secretion in patients with endometriosis in vitro.To study the effect of GnRH-II on the cell proliferation, apoptosis and secreting vascular endothelial growth factor (VEGF) of ectopic, eutopic and normal endometrial stromal cells (ESC) from patients with or without endometriosis (EMs) in vitro.The ectopic, eutopic and normal ESC were isolated, cultured and identified, then added 0 M, 10(-10) M, 10(-8) M, 10(-6) M GnRH-II. The growth and proliferation of three ESC were measured by MTT assay; the cell apoptosis were detected with the method of Hoechst staining and Flow Cytometry test; ELISA was used to measure the VEGF concentration change by three ESC secretion.GnRH-II inhibited the proliferation of ectopic, eutopic ESC from patients with endometriosis and normal ESC from control patients, in a dose- and time-dependent manner (P<0.05); GnRH-II increased the apoptotic rate of three ESC in a dose-dependent manner (P<0.05); The concentration of VEGF in three ESC was significantly decreased after the treatment of GnRH-II, in a dose-dependent manner (P<0.01); And these above effects were the strongest on the ectopic than on the eutopic or normal, there were statistical significance (P<0.05); and three was no significantly difference between the eutopic and normal (P>0.05).GnRH-II significantly inhibited the cell proliferation, induced cell apoptosis and decreased the VEGF secreting of ectopic, eutopic and normal ESC in EMs in vitro, and these effects were the strongest on ectopic ESC, which suggested that GnRH-II may become a new effective treatment for endometriosis.Endometrial nerve fibers in women with endometriosis, adenomyosis, and uterine fibroids.To determine whether nerve fibers in the functional layer endometrium are caused by an endometriosis itself or a common symptom of pain, endometrial tissues from 30 women with endometriosis, 40 women with adenomyosis, 41 women with uterine fibroids, and 47 endometriosis women with adenomyosis were stained immunohistochemically using the highly specific polyclonal rabbit antiprotein gene product 9.5 (PGP9.5) and monoclonal mouse antineurofilament protein. We demonstrated PGP9.5-immunoactive nerve fibers in the functional layer of endometrium in women with pain symptoms, but not in women without pain symptoms, whether the women had endometriosis, adenomyosis, uterine fibroids, or endometriosis with adenomyosis, suggesting a role of PGP9.5-immunoactive nerve fibers in the functional layer of the endometrium playing in pain generation in these disorders.Regulation of monocyte chemotactic protein-1 expression in human endometrial endothelial cells by sex steroids: a potential mechanism for leukocyte recruitment in endometriosis.The main aim of this study is to describe the in vivo temporal and spatial expression of monocyte chemotactic protein 1 (MCP-1) in human endometrial endothelial cells (HEECs) and to compare the in vitro regulation of MCP-1 expression by sex steroids in HEECs from women with or without endometriosis. Eutopic endometrial tissues and endometriosis implants were grouped according to the menstrual cycle phase and were examined by immunohistochemistry for MCP-1 expression. No significant difference was observed for MCP-1 immunoreactivity in the endothelial cells of eutopic endometrium of women with endometriosis when compared to endometrium of women without endometriosis and to endometriosis implants. For in vitro studies, the purity of cultured HEECs (90%-95%) was confirmed by immunocytochemistry using endothelium-specific markers CD31 and CD146. The effects of estradiol (5 x 10(- 8) mol/L), progesterone (10(-7) mol/L), or both on MCP-1 messenger RNA (mRNA) and protein levels were analyzed by reverse transcriptase-polymerase chain reaction (RT-PCR) analysis and enzyme-linked immunosorbent serologic assay (ELISA), respectively. Sex steroids did not have significant effect on MCP-1 mRNA and protein expression in HEECs from women without endometriosis. However, we observed that the sex steroid treatment stimulated MCP-1 mRNA and protein expression in HEECs from women with endometriosis (P < .05). We postulate that the stimulation of chemokine expression by sex steroids in the endometrial endothelial cells in women with endometriosis may play a central role in recruiting mononuclear cells, therefore contributing to the inflammatory aspect of endometriosis.Integrin pattern in human endometrium--new diagnostic tool in pelvic endometriosis?The only possibility to diagnose peritoneal endometriosis is laparoscopy or laparotomy with tissue sampling for histology. Women with impalpable endometriosis not visible on ultrasound suffering from infertility or teenagers with pelvic pain, where endometriosis may also be expected, would greatly benefit from an inoperative diagnostic method. A sure and comfortable method of assessing the effectiveness of endometriosis treatment does not exist. The aim of the study was description of the alpha 3 beta 1, alpha 4 beta 1 integrins and beta 1 chain expression in endometrial biopsies in women suffering from endometriosis.Laparoscopy and hysteroscopy was performed in 32 patients because of infertility (n = 23) and/or pelvic pain (n = 11). For histochemical stainings of endometrial biopsy primary and secondary mouse antibodies to human integrins alpha 3 beta 1, alpha 4 beta 1 and beta 1 chain were used (DAKO).In 17 women peritoneal endometriosis was diagnosed by biopsy at the time of laparoscopy. An alpha 3 beta 1 integrin was more common in the glandular epithelium of women with endometriosis and beta 1 subunit was less frequently observed in the stroma of the endometriosis group than in women without endometriosis. The differences were statistically significant.The selected integrins do not yet allow finding a pattern characteristic for endometriosis.CA 125 in serum, peritoneal fluid, active lesions, and endometrium of patients with endometriosis.Ca 125 levels in serum and peritoneal fluid were measured in 39 patients with endometriosis and 18 patients with normal pelvic anatomy at laparoscopy, and the presence of this antigen in endometriotic tissue and endometrial mucosa was also investigated. Serum CA 125 concentrations were elevated in patients with Stage III or IV endometriosis compared with control subjects (32.9 +/- 11.2 versus 16.4 +/- 8.9 U/ml, means +/- SD; p less than 0.001). CA 125 values were greater than 35 U/ml in 36.8% of women with Stage III or IV endometriosis and in none of the control subjects. No significant differences in CA 125 levels in peritoneal fluid were found between patients with endometriosis and control subjects. The immunohistochemical studies found CA 125 in 10% of the endometriotic lesions and 37.5% of the endometrial samples of patients with endometriosis and in 33.3% of the endometrial samples of control subjects.Epithelial cells in peritoneal fluid--of endometrial origin?Our purpose was to examine the immunohistochemical properties of epithelial cells in peritoneal fluid and to compare the staining characteristics with cells of endometrium, menstrual effluent, peritoneum, and endometriotic lesions.Samples of menstrual effluent, endometrium, and peritoneal fluid and biopsy specimens of endometriotic lesions and peritoneum from 16 patients were examined. Monoclonal antibodies against vimentin, cytokeratin 18 and 19, and the monoclonal antibody BW495/36, staining an epithelial marker present in endometrium and absent in peritoneal epithelium, were used.All but one sample of menstrual effluent and peritoneal fluid cells stained positively with antibodies against vimentin and cytokeratin 18 and 19. BW495/36 stained 14 of 16 menstrual effluent samples and nine of 16 peritoneal fluid cell samples. Endometriotic specimens showed staining with all markers. No major differences in staining properties were observed in menstrual effluent, endometrium, and peritoneal fluid cells between patients with or without endometriosis.These results support the contention of transport of menstrual detritus to the peritoneal cavity in women with patent fallopian tubes.Hormonal and immunologic methods in the diagnosis and treatment of patients with benign ovarian tumors and endometriotic cysts.To compare efficacy of various methods for characterizing endometriosis and benign ovarian tumors.Two parallel groups of patients, 54 with endometriotic ovarian cysts and 48 with benign tumors.Central clinic.Patients referred from all regions over a 5-year period.Estrogen Estrogen and progesterone receptor levels of endometrium and endometriotic foci, CA-125 concentration, and estradiol, progesterone, LH, and testosterone blood levels.LH levels elevated during follicular phase in patients; estradiol levels reduced; receptor levels abnormal in endometriosis, but not in benign ovarian cysts.Hormone therapy is adequate treatment for endometriotic cysts. CA-125 is not a reliable indicator for differential diagnosis.Endometrial cells from women with endometriosis have increased adhesion and proliferative capacity in response to extracellular matrix components: towards a mechanistic model for endometriosis progression.Endometriosis, classified as the presence of endometrial cells in ectopic sites, is a debilitating disease causing pain and infertility in approximately 10% of women of reproductive age. It is associated with the aberrant expression of extracellular matrix (ECM) components and their receptors, integrins.We analysed the expression of integrins in stromal cells derived from peritoneal, ovarian and deeply infiltrating endometriotic lesions and from endometrium from women with and without endometriosis in vitro, using quantitative immunocytochemistry. The adhesive and proliferative capacity of each of the cell types in response to ECM components was assessed by in vitro assays of cell attachment and DNA synthesis.We demonstrate that eutopic and ectopic endometrial stromal cells from women with endometriosis exhibit an aberrant integrin profile in vitro compared with stromal cells derived from healthy controls. In addition, the former display increased adhesion and proliferative capacity in response to specific ECM components.We propose that the increased adhesive and proliferative potential of cells from endometriotic lesions may be a key feature in the pathogenesis of endometriosis. Furthermore, the elevated responsiveness of eutopic cells from women with endometriosis may contribute to the predisposition of some women to the disease.[Expression of suppressor of cytokine signaling-3 and caspase-3 in endometriosis and their correlation].To investigate the expression of suppressor of cytokine signaling(SOCS)-3 and caspase-3 and their correlative significance in endometriosis.Immunohistochemical EnVision method was used to detect the SOCS-3 and caspase-3 protein expression in ectopic and eutopic endometrium (n = 32) of patients with endometriosis, as well as normal endometrium (n = 30) of women without endometriosis.SOCS-3 and caspase-3 proteins were expressed in all three groups and not affected by the menstrual cycles. The expression of SOCS-3 in ectopic endometrium (5.54 ± 2.12) was significantly lower than that in eutopic (7.39 ± 1.09, P = 0.001) and control group (7.48 ± 1.26, P < 0.01), but without difference between the eutopic and control group (P = 0.756). SOCS-3 expression in ectopic and eutopic endometrium was significantly lower in III/IV stages than that in I/II stages of endometriosis (P < 0.05). Significantly lower expression of caspase-3 protein was found in ectopic (3.20 ± 1.24) and eutopic endometrium (3.88 ± 1.93) as compared with the control group (6.49 ± 1.85, P < 0.01), however ectopic and eutopic endometrium showed no significant difference (t = 1.66, P = 0.10). There was no significant difference of the expression of caspase-3 in ectopic and eutopic endometrium at different disease stages (P > 0.05). Positive correlation was found between the expression of SOCS-3 and caspase-3 proteins in ectopic endometrium (r = 0.655, P < 0.01).SOCS-3 may be involved in the development of endometriosis through inhibition of apoptosis of ectopic endometrial cells.Expression of human β-defensin-2 in the eutopic and ectopic endometrial tissues in patients with endometriosis.To investigate the expression of human β-defensin-2 (hBD-2) in the endometrium of patients with endometriosis (EMS) and explore the potential role of hBD-2 in the pathogenesis of EMS.Prospective controlled study.50 women including EMS patients undergoing laparoscopic ovarian cystectomy and non-EMS patients undergoing hysterectomy for uterine fibroids.Large university teaching hospital.Patients were divided into EMS and non-EMS groups. The gene expressions of hBD-2, interleukin (IL)-1β and tumor necrosis factor (TNF)-α in the endometrial tissues of each group were detected with real-time quantitative polymerase chain reaction (PCR), and hBD-2 protein expression with immunohistochemical method.The gene expression levels of hBD-2, TNF-α, and IL-1β as well as the positive expression rate of hBD-2 protein in the ectopic endometrium of EMS patients were significantly higher than those in the eutopic endometrium of EMS and non-EMS patients (all P < 0.05). Correlation analysis showed that the gene expression levels of hBD-2 in the ectopic and eutopic endometrium of EMS patients were positively correlated with the gene expression levels of IL-1β and TNF-α (P < 0.01).High levels of hBD-2 gene and protein expressions in the ectopic endometrium of EMS patients may be an important contributor in the pathogenesis of EMS. TNF-α and IL-1β may promote the upregulation of hBD-2 expression.Dendritic cell populations in the eutopic and ectopic endometrium of women with endometriosis.Immune alterations may be involved in the pathogenesis and progression of endometriosis. Dendritic cells (DCs) are potent antigen presenting cells that are highly involved in the initiation of the immune response. The aim of this study was to investigate DC populations in the eutopic and ectopic endometrium of women with endometriosis compared with controls.Hysterectomy samples were obtained from premenopausal women with (n = 33) and without (n = 28) endometriosis. In addition, paired peritoneal endometriotic lesions and uterine curettings were collected from 32 women with endometriosis. Specimen sections were stained immunohistochemically using antibodies for monoclonal mouse antibodies directed against human CD1a and CD83, which are specific for immature and mature DCs, respectively.The mean density of endometrial CD1a+ DCs in the basal layer was significantly increased in women with endometriosis compared with controls during the proliferative phase only (P = 0.001). There was a highly significant decrease in the density of endometrial CD83+ DCs in women with endometriosis compared with controls in both layers of the endometrium across all phases of the menstrual cycle (P = 0.001). The density of CD1a+ DCs was significantly increased in peritoneal endometriotic lesions (P = 0.003) and in the surrounding peritoneum (P = 0.001) compared with paired uterine curettings and peritoneum distant from the lesion.Both CD1a+ and CD83+ DC populations were altered in the eutopic and ectopic endometrium of women with endometriosis compared with controls. Alterations in these cells, which play a crucial role in the coordination of the immune response, may be involved in pain generation and the pathogenesis of endometriosis.Endometriosis is associated with aberrant endometrial expression of telomerase and increased telomere length.In order to test our hypothesis that endometriosis is associated with abnormal expression of telomerase and telomere lengthening in endometrium, we assessed endometrial expression of the human telomerase enzyme and telomere length (TL).This prospective pilot study, included 29 women with symptomatic, surgically diagnosed endometriosis (Group 1) and 27 healthy, fertile, symptom-free women without endometriosis (Group 2, confirmed by laparoscopy). Seventeen women in Group 1 and 15 women in Group 2 had endometrial biopsies taken on Day 21 +/- 2 of the cycle. A further 12 women in each group were biopsied on Day 26 +/- 2. Telomerase and estrogen receptor beta (ERbeta) expression was evaluated by immunohistochemistry. Mean TL was determined by quantitative PCR.The endometria of fertile healthy women showed either weak or no telomerase immunoreactivity throughout the luteal phase. Immunostaining for telomerase was significantly increased during the implantation window and the premenstrual endometria of women with endometriosis (P < 0.0001). This was associated with a loss of stromal and vascular ERbeta immunostaining (P < 0.05). The mean TL were significantly longer in endometria of women with endometriosis during the implantation window (P = 0.005), indicating the biological relevance of our novel finding of telomerase in benign endometrium. There was positive correlation of the circulating estradiol with peripheral blood TL in women.We speculate that aberrant endometrial expression of telomerase mediates alterations in cell fate that enhance proliferation, contributing to the pathogenesis of endometriosis.Diagnosis of endometriosis by detection of nerve fibres in an endometrial biopsy: a double blind study.Diagnosis of endometriosis currently requires a laparoscopy and this need probably contributes to the considerable average delay in diagnosis. We have reported the presence of nerve fibres in the functional layer of endometrium in women with endometriosis, which could be used as a diagnostic test. Our aim was to assess efficacy of nerve fibre detection in endometrial biopsy for making a diagnosis of endometriosis in a double-blind comparison with expert diagnostic laparoscopy.Endometrial biopsies, with immunohistochemical nerve fibre detection using protein gene product 9.5 as marker, taken from 99 consecutive women presenting with pelvic pain and/or infertility undergoing diagnostic laparoscopy by experienced gynaecologic laparoscopists, were compared with surgical diagnosis.In women with laparoscopic diagnosis of endometriosis (n = 64) the mean nerve fibre density in the functional layer of the endometrial biopsy was 2.7 nerve fibres per mm(2) (+/-3.5 SD). Only one woman with endometriosis had no detectable nerve fibres. Six women had endometrial nerve fibres but no active endometriosis seen at laparoscopy. The specificity and sensitivity were 83 and 98%, respectively, positive predictive value was 91% and negative predictive value was 96%. Nerve fibre density did not differ between different menstrual cycle phases. Women with endometriosis and pain symptoms had significantly higher nerve fibre density in comparison with women with infertility but no pain (2.3 and 0.8 nerve fibre per mm(2), respectively, P = 0.005).Endometrial biopsy, with detection of nerve fibres, provided a reliability of diagnosis of endometriosis which is close to the accuracy of laparoscopic assessment by experienced gynaecological laparoscopists. This study was registered with the Australian Clinical Trials Registry (ACTR) 00082242 (registered: 12/12/2007). The study was approved by the Ethics Review Committee (RPAH Zone) of the Sydney South West Area Health Service (Protocol number X05-0345) and The University of Sydney Human Research Ethics Committee (Ref. No. 10761) and all women gave their informed consent for participation.Coexpression of growth arrest-specific gene 6 and receptor tyrosine kinases, Axl and Sky, in human uterine endometrium and ovarian endometriosis.We demonstrated the expression of Gas6, the protein product of the growth arrest-specific gene 6 (gas6) and a member of the vitamin K-dependent protein family, and its receptor tyrosine kinases, Axl and Sky, in human uterine and ovarian endometriotic endometria using RT-PCR-Southern blot analysis and immunohistochemistry. Gas6, Axl and Sky mRNA were detected in all samples analysed. There was no significant difference between the levels of Sky mRNA in normal uterine and endometriotic endometria; however, the levels of Gas6 and Axl mRNA in endometriotic endometria were significantly higher than in normal endometria. These mRNA levels showed no significant alteration during the menstrual cycle. In the immunohistochemical study, Gas6, Axl and Sky were found in endometrial glandular cells and stromal cells in all samples analysed. This study demonstrates the coexpression of receptor tyrosine kinases and their ligand, Gas6, in normal uterine and ovarian endometriotic endometria, and the overexpression of Axl and Gas6 in endometriotic endometria. It is suggested that Gas6 and Axl signal transduction is aberrantly stimulated in endometriotic endometria, and is plausibly related to its growth potential.Differential expression of IGF-I and IGF-II in eutopic and ectopic endometria of women with endometriosis and in women without endometriosis.Factors regulating the development, growth, and differentiation of endometrial cells of endometriotic lesions are poorly understood. To investigate the paracrine-autocrine regulation of ectopic endometrial cell growth, the expression of IGF-I and IGF-II were studied.Tissue specimens of eutopic and ectopic endometria were obtained from eight patients with endometriosis at laparoscopy and from the endometria of 14 women without endometriosis as controls. They were tested for the expression of IGF-I and IGF-II by immunohistochemical analysis.Immunohistochemical study for IGF-I in controls showed a more intense staining during the proliferative phase both in stromal and epithelial cells. In eutopic endometria of women with endometriosis a reduction in the staining was observed, whereas in epithelial cells of fibrotic peritoneal adhesions an intense immunostaining for IGF-I was observed. Immunohistochemical study of IGF-II in controls showed a more intense staining during secretory phase both in stromal and epithelial cells. In eutopic endometria of women with endometriosis, a reduction in the staining was observed, whereas in epithelial cells of fibrotic peritoneal adhesions an intense immunostaining for IGF-I was observed. Immunohistochemical study of IGF-II in controls showed a more intense staining during secretory phase both in stromal and epithelial cells. In eutopic endometria of women with endometriosis, a reduction in the staining was observed, whereas in epithelial cells of ovarian lesions and fibrotic peritoneal adhesions, no immunostaining for IGF-II was observed.In endometriosis there is an alteration of mechanisms regulating cell proliferation and differentiation.Local immune response in infertile patients with minimal endometriosis.To evaluate the role of local immunity in women with minimal endometriosis.Uterine endometrium and endometrial implants were obtained simultaneously from 30 infertile women with minimal endometriosis and examined immunohistochemically using antibodies of T cell, B cell, macrophage, Langerhans cell, immunoglobulin (Ig)G, and complement (C) 3d. Serum IgG, IgA, IgM, C3, C4, antinuclear antibody and anti-DNA antibody were also examined in 24 of the women. Data from uterine endometrium and serum were compared with 10 fertile women without endometriosis as a control.Microscopic examination revealed that the endometrial implants were divided into two groups: group 1 (n = 13) showed lymphocytic infiltration in the endometrial implants and group 2 (n = 17) showed no or slight lymphocytic infiltration. The endometrial implants of group 1 showed significantly more dense T-cell infiltration than those of group 2. Other types of infiltrating cells and deposits of IgG and C3d revealed no significant differences between groups 1 and 2. The immunohistochemical examination of the uterine endometrium and the serum data revealed no significant differences among all three groups. Cumulative pregnancy rates showed no significant difference between groups 1 and 2.The difference of local immune response in endometrial implants did not affect systemic immunity.Expression and possible role of non-steroidal anti-inflammatory drug-activated gene-1 (NAG-1) in the human endometrium and endometriosis.Non-steroidal anti-inflammatory drug (NSAID)-activated gene-1 (NAG-1) is involved in cellular processes such as inflammation, apoptosis and tumorigenesis. However, little is known about the expression and function of NAG-1 in the endometrium. This study aimed to evaluate the expression of NAG-1 in the endometrium and in the absence or presence of endometriosis and to investigate the effect of celecoxib, a selective cyclooxygenase (COX)-2 inhibitor, on NAG-1 mRNA levels and apoptosis in human endometrial stromal cells (HESCs).Eutopic endometrial samples were obtained during surgery from 40 patients with, and 40 patients without, endometriosis. Real-time PCR was used to quantify NAG-1 mRNA levels and immunohistochemistry was used to localize NAG-1 protein in the endometrium. To investigate the effects of celecoxib, HESCs were isolated and cultured with different concentrations of celecoxib or with 100 µM celecoxib at different times. Apoptosis was assessed by flow cytometry.NAG-1 mRNA levels and immunoreactivity showed cyclical changes through the menstrual cycle, increasing during the late secretory and menstrual phases. NAG-1 mRNA and protein levels were significantly lower in patients with endometriosis, compared with the control group. Celecoxib induced NAG-1 mRNA levels and apoptosis in cultured HESCs, with the effects dependent on drug concentrations and duration of treatment. Celecoxib treatment had no effect on prostaglandin E(2) levels in the culture supernatants.NAG-1 may be important in maintaining homeostasis in the normal endometrium and alterations in NAG-1 expression may be associated with the establishment of endometriosis. NAG-1 might be a therapeutic target for endometriosis.Distinct expression of the soluble and the membrane-bound forms of interleukin-1 receptor accessory protein in the endometrium of women with endometriosis.To investigate interleukin (IL) 1 receptor accessory protein (IL1RAcP) expression in the eutopic endometrium of women with endometriosis.Retrospective study.Human reproduction research laboratory.Sixty-six women with endometriosis and 60 healthy women with no laparoscopic evidence of endometriosis.Endometrial tissue samples were obtained during laparoscopic surgery.IL1RAcP protein expression was analyzed by immunohistochemistry, Western blot, and ELISA, and IL1RAcP mRNA expression was analyzed by quantitative real-time polymerase chain reaction.This study showed a significant downregulation of soluble (s)IL1RAcP expression in the eutopic endometrium of women with endometriosis compared to normal women, occurring at the protein or mRNA level. This finding appeared to vary according to endometriosis stage, being more obvious in the earliest (I and II) than the latest (III and IV) stages of the disease. However, the membrane-bound IL1RAcP did not show any noticeable endometriosis-related change, neither at the protein or mRNA level.In view of the wide spectrum of IL-1 inflammatory and growth-promoting effects, downregulation of sIL1RAcP, which is known for inhibiting IL1, indicates a profound defect in the capability of endometrial cells of women with endometriosis to counterregulate IL-1 effects and may represent an important mechanism underlying the ability of these cells to implant and develop into host tissues.Abnormal interleukin 1 receptor types I and II gene expression in eutopic and ectopic endometrial tissues of women with endometriosis.Interleukin-1 (IL1) is believed to play a central role in the immuno-inflammatory process associated with endometriosis. IL1 triggers cell activation via its receptor type I (IL1R1), but its receptor type II (IL1R2) is known instead as a scavenger that buffers the cytokine's effects. Our previous studies have shown increased expression of IL1R1 in active endometriotic implants compared to normal and endometriosis women-derived endometrial tissues, and a simultaneous decrease in IL1R2 expression at the protein level. In the present study, in situ hybridization demonstrated a noticeable decrease in IL1R2 mRNA hybridization score in eutopic and matched ectopic endometrial tissues of women with endometriosis compared to normal women in the stroma (P<0.001 and P<0.001, respectively) and the epithelium (P<0.01 and P<0.05, respectively), whereas IL1R1 mRNA hybridization score was higher only in the ectopic implants, with a statistically significant difference in the stroma (P<0.05). This was corroborated by RT-PCR analysis of IL1R1 and IL1R2 mRNAs in ectopic (P<0.05 and P<0.05, respectively) and matched eutopic (P=0.22 and P<0.05, respectively) endometrial tissues from women with endometriosis compared to endometrial tissues from normal women. The decrease in IL1R2 mRNA levels in eutopic endometrial tissue of endometriosis women, and the concomitant increase in IL1R1 mRNA levels in ectopic implants, reveal a profound defect in IL1R 1 and IL1R2 gene expression which may accentuate the capability of this tissue to respond to IL1 and favor its ectopic growth.DNA microarray analysis of gene expression in eutopic endometrium from patients with deep endometriosis using laser capture microdissection.To investigate differentially expressed genes in epithelial and stromal cells of eutopic endometrium from patients with deep endometriosis and women with normal pelvic cavities using laser capture microdissection and complementary DNA microarrays.Prospective study.University hospital.Patients with deep endometriosis and fertile women who underwent laparoscopic tubal ligation or reversal of tubal sterilization.Endometrial tissue biopsies during the late proliferative phase and early, mid-, and late secretory phases.Genes that were regulated with a change greater than threefold were selected as differentially expressed genes. Validation was performed with real-time reverse transcriptase-polymerase chain reaction (RT-PCR).Microarray analysis identified up-regulation during the late secretory phase (patients with endometriosis vs. controls) of several genes in two important signaling pathways: RAS/RAF/MAPK and PI3K. This included the genes RON, SOS, 14-3-3 protein eta, and uPAR in epithelial cells and KSR and PI3K p85 regulatory subunit alpha in stromal cells; real-time RT-PCR analysis validated up-regulation of all six genes.The RAS/RAF/MAPK and PI3K pathways may be involved in initial development of endometriosis.Estrogen receptor beta and matrix metalloproteinase 1 are coexpressed in uterine endometrium and endometriotic lesions of patients with endometriosis.To evaluate the local matrix metalloproteinase 1 (MMP-1), estrogen receptor (ER) alpha, and ERbeta protein expression in eutopic and dystopic tissue from patients with endometriosis and to compare the endometrial expression pattern in women with and without endometriosis.Immunohistochemical analysis of MMP-1, ERalpha, and ERbeta in paired samples of uterine and endometriotic endometrium from cycling women with endometriosis and in endometrial tissue from 37 healthy women.Research laboratory at a medical school.Thirty-seven matched samples from endometriotic and corresponding endometrial biopsies obtained during the proliferative and secretory phase. Thirty-seven endometrial biopsies obtained from healthy women during comparable cycle phases.Sampling of endometrial and endometriotic tissue.Matrix metalloproteinase 1, ERalpha, and ERbeta protein expression in paraffin-embedded tissue biopsies was measured by IHC.In patients with endometriosis, epithelial and stromal cells from endometriotic lesions both express significantly higher levels of MMP-1 and lower levels of ERalpha than corresponding cells in uterine endometrium. Endometriotic epithelium also expresses higher levels of ERbeta than of ERalpha. In both endometrial glands and corresponding endometriotic epithelium, the distribution of MMP-1 is correlated with ERbeta. No significant differences in endometrial ERalpha, ERbeta, or MMP-1 expression could, however, be detected when patients with endometriosis and healthy controls were compared.We have shown that MMP-1 and ERbeta are coexpressed and up-regulated in endometriotic lesions, whereas local ERalpha expression is down-regulated. The altered ERbeta/ERalpha ratio in endometriotic glands suggests that estrogenic effects on MMP-1 are primarily mediated via ERbeta, and the local control of MMP-1 in eutopic endometrium is not different from that observed in healthy cycling women.Increased expression of c-fos protein associated with increased matrix metalloproteinase-9 protein expression in the endometrium of endometriotic patients.To investigate c-fos and matrix metalloproteinase-9 (MMP-9) expression in the endometrium from women with or without endometriosis throughout the menstrual cycle, and to explore the correlation of c-fos expression with MMP-9 expression and 17beta-E(2) levels in serum.Molecular studies in human tissue.A women's hospital in China.Fifty-five premenopausal women (25 with endometriosis and 30 without endometriosis) undergoing laparoscopic surgery or hysterectomy.Eutopic and ectopic endometrium tissue were obtained at the time of surgery. Peripheral sera were also collected on the same day.Immunohistochemical localization of c-fos in the endometrium, c-fos and MMP-9 protein levels in the endometrium, and 17beta-E(2) levels in the serum.c-fos protein was predominantly located in the nuclei of glandular epithelial cells and stromal cells. c-fos and MMP-9 protein levels in paired eutopic and ectopic endometria from women with endometriosis were significantly higher than those in the endometrium from women without endometriosis. No significant difference in c-fos or MMP-9 protein levels was observed between paired eutopic and ectopic endometria. c-fos protein levels in endometrium positively correlated with endometrial MMP-9 levels and serum 17beta-E(2) levels.Expression of c-fos in the human endometrium may be regulated by 17beta-E(2), and c-fos may be involved in development of endometriosis by promoting MMP-9 gene expression and subsequently the invasive potential of endometrial explants.Paired-box gene 2 is down-regulated in endometriosis and correlates with low epidermal growth factor receptor expression.Paired-box 2 (Pax2) is involved in the development of the female genital tract and has been associated with endometrial pathologies. The expression of Pax2 is induced by epidermal growth factor (EGF) and estrogens. In the present study, Pax2 expression and regulation were investigated in endometriosis.Pax2 protein expression was assessed by immunohistochemistry in the eutopic (i.e. inside the uterus) and ectopic tissue (endometriosis) from 11 patients. Immunoreactivity was high in the endometrium, with strong epithelial and weaker stromal staining. Similar expression patterns of Pax2 were observed in the endometrium of women without endometriosis (n = 12). The mRNA level of Pax2 was assessed by real-time PCR in the eutopic and ectopic endometria of 14 patients and in the endometrium from women without endometriosis (n = 20). Pax2 expression was lower in endometriotic lesions than that in the eutopic endometrium of patients (P< 0.001) and controls (P= 0.007). Three possible mechanisms determining low Pax2 expression were investigated: EGF signalling, CpG DNA methylation of the Pax2 promoter and steroid response. The mRNA level of the EGF receptor (EGFR1) was assessed in the samples used for Pax2 mRNA assessment. A significant correlation between EGFR1 and Pax2 in both eutopic and ectopic tissues was observed (R = 0.58; slope regression line, 0.81; 95% CI: 0.09-1.52 and R = 0.54; slope regression line, 2.51; 95% CI: 0.02-4.99, respectively). CpG DNA methylation was analyzed by methyl-specific PCR in two regions of the Pax2 promoter but they were unmethylated in all samples. Steroid responsiveness was assessed using endometrial explant cultures and Pax2 was not regulated by either 17β-estradiol or progesterone.In endometriosis patients, Pax2 is down-regulated in the lesions compared with the eutopic tissue, possibly due to low EGF signalling.Endometrial and peritoneal expression of aromatase, cytokines, and adhesion factors in women with endometriosis.To examine messenger (m) RNA expression of aromatase, cytokines, and adhesion factors in women with and without endometriosis.Patients with endometriosis were compared with control patients.University Hospital Gasthuisberg, Leuven, Belgium.A total of 35 patients who had laparoscopic surgery during the luteal phase (n = 20) or the menstrual phase (n = 15) were selected for this study based on cycle phase and presence/absence of endometriosis.Tissues of endometrium and macroscopically normal peritoneum were collected during hysteroscopy and laparoscopic surgery, respectively, from 24 women with revised American Society for Reproductive Medicine stage (rASRM) stages I-II (n = 12) and III-IV (n = 12) endometriosis and 11 control patients with normal pelvic. Tissue samples were selected from a tissue bank, based on the phase of the cycle (menstrual or luteal) and the presence/absence of endometriosis.The mRNA levels of aromatase, vimentin, vascular cell adhesion molecule 1 (VCAM-1), alpha(V) and beta(3) integrins, interleukin (IL)-1 beta, regulated on activation normal T-cell expressed and secreted (RANTES), and monocyte chemotactic protein 1 (MCP-1) were evaluated using real-time reverse transcriptase polymerase chain reaction.During menstrual phase, increased endometrial mRNA levels of alpha(V) integrin, combined alpha(V)beta(3) integrins, and increased peritoneal IL-1 beta mRNA levels--but decreased peritoneal MCP-1 mRNA levels--were observed in women with endometriosis compared with control subjects. During luteal phase, endometrial mRNA levels of IL-1 beta and RANTES were increased in women with endometriosis compared with control subjects. Endometrial aromatase mRNA expression was higher in women with endometriosis than in control subjects in combined phases. Women with endometriosis had increased peritoneal mRNA expression of RANTES and VCAM-1 during menstrual compared with luteal phase.Aberrant mRNA expression of aromatase, cytokines, and adhesion factors in endometrium and peritoneum suggests that both tissues are involved in the pathogenesis of endometriosis.Antibodies to endometrial transferrin and alpha 2-Heremans Schmidt (HS) glycoprotein in patients with endometriosis.Identifying the endometrial antigens inciting autoimmunity is important in setting up an antibody assay for a non-invasive diagnosis and clinical monitoring of endometriosis.Two-dimensional gel electrophoresis of endometrial extracts, Western blot analysis, passive hemagglutination and enzyme-linked immunosorbent assay (ELISA), amino acid sequencing and molecular studies were done on chosen antigens. Forty-six women with endometriosis, 4 women with uterine leiomyomata, 4 with pelvic adhesions, 3 with repeat Cesarean sections (conditions that coexist with or predispose to endometriosis) and 46 controls participated.Antigens with molecular weights (MW) of 64 kDa [isoelectric point (pI) of 3.5-4.0] and 72 kDa (pI of 4.5) bound to IgG in all patients with endometriosis, but not the controls. Amino acid sequencing of the proteins revealed that they had homology to alpha 2-Heremans Schmidt (HS) glycoprotein (MW: 64 kDa) and transferrin (MW: 72 kDa). Endometriosis patients had significant antibody levels to these two proteins (predictive value of 80-90%). The analysis of patients' endometrial RNA detected the message for alpha 2-HS glycoprotein and transferrin. Albumin (pI 5.5) and collagen (pI 3.5) failed to elicit antibody responses.Patients with endometriosis have significant antibodies to endometrial transferrin and alpha 2-HS-glycoprotein. We can effectively use an antibody assay using these antigens for diagnosing endometriosis.Vascular endothelial growth factor polymorphisms (-460C/T, +405G/C, and 936C/T) and endometriosis: their influence on vascular endothelial growth factor expression.To analyze three functional vascular endothelial growth factor (VEGF) polymorphisms (-460C/T, +405G/C, and 936C/T) in women with and without endometriosis and their correlation with VEGF expression in endometrial tissue and peritoneal fluid (PF).Case-control study.University-based hospital.One hundred eighty-six women with endometriosis and 180 controls without the disease.Endometrial biopsies were performed by aspiration and PF samples were obtained at laparoscopy.VEGF polymorphisms (-460C/T, +405G/C, and 936C/T) were determined using a polymerase chain reaction (PCR)-restriction fragment length polymorphism assay. Quantitative real-time reverse transcriptase (RT)-PCR assay was used to quantify VEGF-A messenger RNA (mRNA) and VEGF-A antigen levels were quantified by ELISA.Patients with endometriosis showed a higher VEGF 936T allele frequency than controls. However, the distribution of genotypes and allele frequencies in the other two VEGF (-460C/T, +405G/C) polymorphisms was similar in the endometriosis and control groups. Endometrium and PF from women with endometriosis showed an increase in VEGF levels, but no association was found between the VEGF polymorphisms studied and VEGF expression in endometrial tissue and PF.These findings suggest that the VEGF 936C/T polymorphism may be associated with the risk of endometriosis in a Caucasian population, but the increased VEGF levels observed in endometriosis do not appear to be associated with this polymorphism.Laser capture microdissection and cDNA array analysis of endometrium identify CCL16 and CCL21 as epithelial-derived inflammatory mediators associated with endometriosis.Understanding the pathophysiology of chemokine secretion in endometriosis may offer a novel area of therapeutic intervention. This study aimed to identify chemokines differentially expressed in epithelial glands in eutopic endometrium from normal women and those with endometriosis, and to establish the expression profiles of key chemokines in endometriotic lesions.Laser capture microdissection isolated epithelial glands from endometrial eutopic tissue from women with and without endometriosis in the mid-secretory phase of their menstrual cycles. Gene profiling of the excised glands used a human chemokine and receptor cDNA array. Selected chemokines were further examined using real-time PCR and immunohistochemistry.22 chemokine/receptor genes were upregulated and two downregulated in pooled endometrial epithelium of women with endometriosis compared with controls. CCL16 and CCL21 mRNA was confirmed as elevated in some women with endometriosis compared to controls on individual samples. Immunoreactive CCL16 and CCL21 were predominantly confined to glands in eutopic and ectopic endometrium: leukocytes also stained. Immunoreactive CCL16 was overall higher in glands in ectopic vs. eutopic endometrium from the same woman (P < 0.05). Staining for CCL16 and CCL21 was highly correlated in individual tissues.This study provides novel candidate molecules and suggests a potential local role for CCL16 and CCL21 as mediators contributing to the inflammatory events associated with endometriosis.Endometriosis is characterized by an impaired localization of laminin-5 and alpha3beta1 integrin receptor.Endometriosis is an estrogen-correlated benign disease characterized by a marked ability of endometrial-like cells to invade and proliferate outside uterine cavity, resembling for some invasive aspect the cancer growth. The molecular mechanisms regulating endometrial cell invasiveness are mostly unknown, although interactions between extracellular matrix (ECM) proteins and their transmembrane receptors, integrins, are likely to play a central role. In particular, laminin (Ln)-5 could be closely involved, as it is in cancer. We have investigated the expression of Ln-1, Ln-5, and collagen IV (Coll IV) ECM proteins and their receptors, alpha3beta1 and alpha6beta4 integrins, in atrophic, proliferative, and secretive endometrium and in endometriosis. The results show that Ln-5, but not Ln-I and Coll IV, is altered in secretive endometrium as well as in endometriosis tissues. No alterations are observed in atrophic or proliferative endometrium. Consistently, the polarization of both integrin subunits alpha3 and beta1, but not alpha6 and beta4, is altered in secretive endometrium and endometriosis tissues, but not in atrophic and proliferative endometrium. These results seem to suggest that Ln-5 and alpha3beta1 could be involved in the invasive mechanism of endometriosis. The altered expression of Ln-5, by upregulating matrix metalloproteases activity, suggest an invading process similar to that of many cancer processes.MicroRNA expression profiling of eutopic secretory endometrium in women with versus without endometriosis.Endometriosis is a common gynecologic disorder characterized by pain and infertility. In addition to estrogen dependence, progesterone resistance is an emerging feature of this disorder. Specifically, a delayed transition from the proliferative to secretory phase as evidenced by dysregulation of progesterone target genes and maintenance of a proliferative molecular fingerprint in the early secretory endometrium (ESE) has been reported. MicroRNAs (miRNAs) are small noncoding RNAs that collectively represent a novel class of regulators of gene expression. In an effort to investigate further the observed progesterone resistance in the ESE of women with endometriosis, we conducted array-based, global miRNA profiling. We report distinct miRNA expression profiles in the ESE of women with versus without endometriosis in a subset of samples previously used in global gene expression analysis. Specifically, the miR-9 and miR-34 miRNA families evidenced dysregulation. Integration of the miRNA and gene expression profiles provides unique insights into the molecular basis of this enigmatic disorder and, possibly, the regulation of the proliferative phenotype during the early secretory phase of the menstrual cycle in affected women.The relationship between microvessel density, proliferative activity and expression of vascular endothelial growth factor-A and its receptors in eutopic endometrium and endometriotic lesions.Studies were performed to elucidate the possible relationship between microvessel density, proliferative activity and angiogenesis in eutopic endometrium from women with and without endometriosis and peritoneal endometriotic lesions. The question whether changes in these parameters in endometriotic lesions were reflected by the level of vascular endothelial growth factor-A (VEGF-A) in serum and peritoneal fluid was also studied. Biopsy specimens of both eutopic endometrium and peritoneal endometriotic lesions from women with endometriosis (n = 25) as well as eutopic endometrium from women without endometriosis (n = 14) were analysed immunohistochemically regarding microvessel density, proliferative activity, and expression of VEGF-A and its receptors vascular endothelial growth factor receptors 1 and 2 (VEGFR-1 and VEGFR-2) in stroma, glands and blood vessels. The VEGF-A concentration was measured in peritoneal fluid and serum. Secretory phase eutopic endometrium from women with endometriosis had significantly higher microvessel density, expression of VEGF-A in glandular epithelium and VEGFR-2 in endometrial blood vessels than those from women without endometriosis. Endometriotic lesions with high proliferative activity had a higher microvessel density and showed higher vascular expression of VEGFR-2 as well as being accompanied by higher levels of VEGF-A in peritoneal fluid and serum, compared with lesions with low proliferative activity. In conclusion, there seems to be a dysregulation of angiogenic activity in the eutopic endometrium of women with endometriosis and endometriotic lesions with high proliferative activity were accompanied by higher local angiogenic activity and higher levels of VEGF in serum and peritoneal fluid.Increased levels of biglycan in endometriomas and peritoneal fluid samples from ovarian endometriosis patients.In our previous low-density-array gene-expression analysis we found an increased expression of biglycan gene in ovarian endometriosis patients. In the present study we evaluated biglycan expression at the protein level in tissue, serum and peritoneal fluid (PF) from ovarian endometriosis patients, patients with benign ovarian cysts and healthy women. Twenty samples of endometriomas and 27 of control tissues (benign ovarian cysts and eutopic endometrium of healthy women) were obtained laparoscopically or by curettage. Serum and PF samples were collected from 56 ovarian endometriosis patients and 40 controls (patients with benign cysts and healthy women). Tissue biglycan levels and serum and PF biglycan concentrations were determined by Western blotting and ELISA, respectively. Biglycan was detected in endometriomas and in benign cysts tissues but differed in glycosylation levels. The PF biglycan concentrations were significantly increased in ovarian endometriosis patients (mean ± SD=220.3 ± 190.5 pg/mg protein) compared to the whole control group (101.9 ± 94.7 pg/mg protein, p<0.001), while serum concentrations did not differ significantly. Biglycan appears to be involved in ovarian pathologies and probably has different roles in benign cysts as compared to ovarian endometriomas.Endometrial aromatase mRNA as a possible screening tool for advanced endometriosis and adenomyosis.Endometriosis (ENDs) and adenomyosis (ADNs) are estrogen-dependent diseases. The aim of this study was to determine the clinical usefulness of examining endometrial biopsy specimens for aromatase cytochrome P450 (CYP19) as a diagnostic importance for endometriosis and adenomyosis. In general, the RT-PCR analyses of 101 samples revealed increased aromatase mRNA expression in eutopic endometrium in women with endometriosis and adenomyosis compared to healthy controls (p = 0.0002). The highest number of positive cases (93.3%) of CYP19 mRNA expression was detected in women with advanced disease stages. Concrete expression of CYP19 mRNA level in controls was 0.68 compared to patients with ADNs (1.21), ENDsL stage I-II (1.15) and ENDsA stage III-IV (1.65) (p < 0.0001), respectively. The possible influence of increased body mass index on aromatase expression in each group showed in controls an insignificant slight increase of aromatase expression, contrary to cases where this trend was the opposite. The results point to the higher (2.45-fold) difference in aromatase expression in patients with endometriosis stage III-IV compared to controls and provide direct evidence that screening for eutopic endometrial aromatase expression in combination with clinical data could be of discriminative value in the prediction of estrogen-dependent diseases, independent from body mass index.Dysregulated sphingolipid metabolism in endometriosis.In endometriosis, the establishment and subsistence of ectopic lesions outside the endometrium suggest an altered cellular state for pathological hyperplasia. Sphingolipids are bioactive compounds, and their biosynthesis and metabolism modulate a range of cellular processes including proliferation, migration and apoptosis. We demonstrate that aberrations in sphingolipid metabolism occur in women with endometriosis.Targeted mass spectrometry on >120 sphingolipids were measured in the sera (n = 62), peritoneal fluid (n = 63), and endometrial tissue (n = 14) of women with and without endometriosis. Quantitative RT-PCR and immunohistochemistry were performed on endometrial tissues determine the expression levels of sphingolipid enzymes.Sphingolipidomics identified the in vivo accumulation of numerous sphingolipids, including the functionally antagonistic glucosylceramides and ceramides in the serum and PF of women with endometriosis. We found upregulation of specific sphingolipid enzymes, namely sphingomyelin synthase 1 (SMS1), sphingomyelinase 3 (SMPD3), and glucosylceramide synthase (GCS) in the endometrium of endometriotic women with corresponding increased GlcCer, decreased sphingomyelin levels, and decreased apoptosis in the endometrium.Our sphingolipidomics approach provided evidence of altered sphingolipid metabolism flux in serum, peritoneal fluid, and endometrial tissue in women with endometriosis. The results provide new information on how sphingolipids and eutopic endometrium may contribute to the pathophysiology of endometriosis. The results also have implications for the use of sphingolipids as potential biomarkers.Development of a nonsurgical diagnostic tool for endometriosis based on the detection of endometrial leukocyte subsets and serum CA-125 levels.To determine whether the proportion of several leukocyte subsets is modulated in the endometrium of patients with endometriosis and, if yes, whether it can be used for diagnostic purposes.Case-control study.Eight clinical institutions of the Montreal area.Women who underwent laparoscopy or laparotomy between 1997 and 2001, who had regular menstrual cycles and were not under hormone treatment for the previous 3 months were selected. This study included 368 women, 173 with surgically confirmed endometriosis and 195 controls with no surgical evidence of endometriosis.Oxidative cell injury as a predictor of endometriosis progression.There is increasing evidence that oxidative stress is one of the key factors for progression of endometriosis. In this prospective controlled trial, we measured 6 different biomarkers of oxidative stress targeting protein, lipid, and DNA to quantify the severity and progression of endometriosis and establish a diagnostic marker for the disease.A total of 62 consecutive patients were identified and enrolled in this study. After exclusion criteria, 44 patients were allocated to 3 groups: stage I/II (n = 14), stage III/IV (n = 16), and a control group (n = 14). The levels of 8-hydroxy-2-deoxyguanosine (8-OHdG), 8-oxoguanine DNA glycosylase (OGG1), protein carbonyl (PC), lipid peroxidation (LPO), reactive oxygen species (ROS), and total antioxidant capacity (TAC) were accessed in peritoneal fluid and tissue.Significantly higher levels of 8-OHdG and PC were seen in patients with endometriosis, in addition OGG1 expression was found to be significantly lower in patients with endometriosis (P < .001, P = .001, P = .033, respectively); ROS, TAC, and LPO were similar in stages I/II, stages III/IV, and control group. A predictive model was built using multivariable analyses and receiver-operating characteristics curves. The ability to predict and distinguish between patients without endometriosis, stage I/II endometriosis, and stage III/IV was very high. This model was highly discriminatory and had a concordance index of 0.87.In this cohort, higher DNA damage and lower DNA repair activity was related to endometriosis progression. Our results indicate that oxidative stress as a biomarker of cell injury can be used as a reliable quantitative test of endometriosis severity.Apoptosis and expression of Bcl-2 and Bax in eutopic endometrium from women with endometriosis.To evaluate and compare spontaneous apoptosis and Bcl-2 and Bax expression in eutopic endometrium from women with and without endometriosis.Apoptosis and Bcl-2 and Bax expression were examined in eutopic endometrium from women with and without endometriosis.Instituto de Biología y Medicina Experimental-CONICET, Department of Gynecology and Department of Gynecological Pathology, Clínicas University Hospital, Buenos Aires, Argentina.Women with untreated endometriosis (n = 14) and controls (n = 16).Collection of endometrial samples during diagnostic or therapeutic laparoscopy.Apoptotic cells were detected with use of the dUTP nick-end labeling (TUNEL) assay; Bcl-2 and Bax expressions were assessed with use of immunohistochemical techniques.Spontaneous apoptosis was significantly lower in eutopic endometrium from patients with endometriosis, compared with healthy controls (2.26 +/- 0.53 and 9.37 +/- 1.69 apoptotic cells/field, respectively) and was independent of cycle phase. An increased expression of Bcl-2 protein was found in proliferative eutopic endometrium from patients with endometriosis. Bax expression was absent in proliferative endometrium, whereas there was an increase in its expression in secretory endometrium from both patients and controls.Women with endometriosis show decreased number of apoptotic cells in eutopic endometrium. The abnormal survival of endometrial cells may result in their continuing growth into ectopic locations.Differential expression of interleukins (IL)-13 and IL-15 in ectopic and eutopic endometrium of women with endometriosis and normal fertile women.Interleukins (IL) 13 and 15 are key regulators of inflammatory and immune responses, processes that are central to endometriosis and associated abnormalities. The present study examined (1) whether ectopic endometrial tissue expresses IL-13 and IL-15 (2) if their expression differs compared with matched eutopic endometrium and control endometrium from normal fertile women, and (3) if peritoneal fluids (PF) content of these cytokines reflects the disease compared with PF from women with peritoneal adhesions unrelated to endometriosis and those without pelvic pathology.The expression of IL-13 and IL-15 mRNA and protein was determined using quantitative RT-PCR, ELISA and immunohistochemistry.Ectopic endometrium expresses IL-13 and IL-15 mRNA and protein with elevated levels compared with eutopic and control endometrium, irrespective of the phases of the menstrual cycle, with predominance in IL-13 expression. Endometrial epithelial cells were found to be the primary site of IL-13 and IL-15 expression. The PF content of IL-13 and IL-15 show a trend toward higher concentrations in women with adhesion and endometriosis, respectively, compared with fertile control without pelvic pathology.Interleukins 13 and 15 are expressed in ectopic endometrium and present in PF of women with endometriosis and their elevated expression in ectopic endometrium suggests that these cytokines play a key role in local inflammatory/immune responses that are critical in endometriosis-associated abnormalities.High expression levels of cyclin B1 and Polo-like kinase 1 in ectopic endometrial cells associated with abnormal cell cycle regulation of endometriosis.To investigate the possible roles of cyclin B1/cyclin-dependent kinase (cdc2) and Polo-like kinase 1 (Plk1) in the pathogenesis of endometriosis.A case-control study.University hospital.Patients with or without endometriosis were diagnosed by pathological examination or laparoscopy. The patients with the following criteria within the past 6 months were excluded: endocrine or inflammatory diseases, pregnancy or lactation, hormonal therapy, and neoplasm in the uterine cavity.Eutopic and ectopic endometria were obtained at the time of surgery. Blood was collected on the same day as surgery.The mRNA/protein expression and localization of cyclin B1, cdc2, and Plk1 in endometrium, and serum levels of E(2) and P.The expression levels of cyclin B1 and Plk1, but not cdc2, in ectopic endometria were significantly higher than in eutopic endometria. The immunohistochemical staining of cyclin B1 and Plk1 was detected in the nuclei of ectopic and eutopic endometrial cells. Furthermore, ectopic endometrial expression levels of cyclin B1 or Plk1 were positively correlated with serum E(2) levels.Cyclin B1 and Plk1 may play important roles in the pathogenesis of endometriosis by mediating ectopic endometrial cell proliferation under regulation of ovarian hormones.Expression of the gamma 2 chain of laminin-332 in eutopic and ectopic endometrium of patients with endometriosis.Endometrial cells, which are shed by retrograde menstruation, may aberrantly express molecules involved in invasion and migration, leading to endometriosis. The aim of this study was to investigate the expression of the laminin gamma 2 chain (LAMC2) in the tissues of women with and without endometriosis.Endometrial biopsy specimens were collected from healthy volunteers and from endometriosis patients. Biopsy specimens from the corresponding endometriotic lesions were also collected. The expression of laminin gamma 2 chain was evaluated by immunohistochemistry and reverse transcription polymerase chain reaction (RT-PCR).Endometrial tissue from women with or without endometriosis showed constitutive expression of LAMC2 mRNA throughout the menstrual cycle. A higher mRNA level was observed in ectopic endometrium (Ec) from women with endometriosis compared with eutopic endometrium (Eu) from women with endometriosis. Immunohistochemistry revealed a varied pattern of laminin gamma 2 chain expression, with increased epithelial expression in eutopic endometrium from women with endometriosis compared with those without endometriosis.The altered expression of laminin gamma 2 chain in eutopic endometrium from women with endometriosis may provide new opportunities for diagnosis and treatment.Expression and localisation of osteopontin and prominin-1 (CD133) in patients with endometriosis.In this study, we investigated the expression and localisation of the proteins, osteopontin (OPN) and prominin-1 (CD133), as well as the plasma OPN levels in the endometrium of patients with endometriosis. Samples of ectopic endometriotic lesions and normal endometrium were obtained from 31 women with endometriosis and 28 healthy control subjects. The mRNA and protein expression of OPN and CD133 was analysed by real‑time RT-PCR and immunohistochemistry. The plasma levels of OPN were determined by ELISA. Our results revealed that OPN mRNA and protein expression, as well as its release in the blood, was significantly increased in the endometriotic lesions in comparison to normal tissue. Although the presence of CD133+ cells was detected in the normal endometrium, as well as in the endometriosis specimens, a significant quantitative variation of this protein was not demonstrated in the patients with endometriosis. In conclusion, our data indicate that OPN is involved in the development of endometriosis by enhancing the invasiveness, proliferation and survival of endometrial cells in ectopic lesions. CD133 cannot be used as a disease marker for endometriosis, although an involvement of this protein in the pathogenesis of endometriosis cannot be excluded.Endometriosis markers: immunologic alterations as diagnostic indicators for endometriosis.Because endometriosis, a chronic disease affecting 7% to 10% of women, is associated with immunologic aberrations, the authors hypothesize that the presence of specific immune alterations may be diagnostic. Autoantibodies were assayed by Western immunoblotting using antigens derived from the plasma membrane, cytosol, and nucleus from endometrial and ovarian cells. Natural killer (NK) activity was defined by levels of signaling protein zeta and induction of interferon (IFN)-gamma following exposure to patients' sera. Patients with endometriosis exhibited autoantibodies reactive with cellular proteins; endometrial membrane proteins exhibited the greatest reactivity, followed by nuclear antigens. In all subcellular fractions, patients with stage 3 endometriosis exhibited significantly more immunoreactivity than did stage 2 patients, which was greater than that observed in stage 1 patients. The stage-associated increased reactivity resulted from both recognition of additional proteins and enhanced reactivity with shared proteins. Patient sera suppressed NK zeta expression, which resulted in suppression of NK IFN induction. Alterations in autoreactivity and NK activity are observed in endometriosis and may be useful as diagnostic markers, even in early stage disease.Tyrosine receptor kinase B (TrkB) protein expression in the human endometrium.Tyrosine kinase receptor B (TrkB) gene expression, a neurotrophic factor receptor expressed in the brain and ovary, has recently been identified in deep infiltrating endometriosis by gene array. TrkB is thought to be important in resistance to anchorage independent apoptosis (ANOIKIS) and thus could be important in the pathogenesis of endometriosis. However, TrkB protein expression in the eutopic endometrium of women with and without endometriosis is unknown. Therefore, we examined TrKB protein expression in the endometrium by Western blot (n = 50) and immunohistochemistry (n = 17). Immunoblots of endometrial biopsies were prepared from women with endometriosis (n = 21) vs. healthy controls (n = 29) undergoing benign gynecological surgery at McMaster University Medical Centre. TrkB protein expression was significantly higher in immunoblots from women with endometriosis compared to women without endometriosis. In samples of archived paraffin-embedded endometrial tissue TrkB was localized to the cytoplasm of epithelial cells of the eutopic endometrium from women with endometriosis (n = 7) and without endometriosis (n = 10). We conclude that TrkB protein is expressed in human endometrium. Our results also suggest that TrkB expression may be greater in women with endometriosis compared to women without endometriosis.Expression of interleukin-8 and monocyte chemotactic protein 1 in women with endometriosis.To investigate the expression and localization of interleukin-8 (IL-8) and monocyte chemotactic protein 1 (MCP-1) in women with and without endometriosis.Comparative immunohistochemical study.Academic medical center.Ectopic (n = 24) and homologous eutopic endometrium (n = 24) from women with endometriosis and endometrium from women without endometriosis (n = 27) were used for immunohistochemical analysis of IL-8 and MCP-1.Tissue sections were immunostained with antihuman IL-8 and MCP-1 antibodies.Microscopic evaluation to assess the presence and localization of IL-8 and MCP-1 throughout the menstrual cycle in both eutopic endometrial and endometriotic tissues of women with endometriosis and comparison with normal endometrium.In normal endometrium, secretory phase samples expressed higher levels of epithelial IL-8 than in proliferative phase samples. Epithelial MCP-1 expression was similar in both proliferative and secretory phases. Proliferative phase samples showed higher epithelial IL-8 and MCP-1 expressions in eutopic endometrium of women with endometriosis compared with that of normal women. Immunoreactivities of both chemokines were significantly increased in the epithelial cells of ectopic endometrial tissues compared with those of normal endometrium.These findings suggest that IL-8 and MCP-1 may be involved in the pathogenesis of endometriosis.Expression of interleukin-8 receptors in endometriosis.Although the etiology of endometriosis is not well understood, chemokines and their receptors are believed to play a role in its pathogenesis. Therefore, we aimed to investigate the expression and localization of interleukin-8 (IL-8) receptors CXCR1 and CXCR2 in eutopic and ectopic endometrial tissues of women with endometriosis, and in endometrium of women without endometriosis.Ectopic (n = 27) and homologous eutopic endometrium (n = 25) from women with endometriosis and endometrium from women without endometriosis (n = 27) were used for immunohistochemical analysis of CXCR1 and CXCR2.In normal endometrium, epithelial CXCR1 and CXCR2 immunostaining intensities were similar in the proliferative and secretory phase. Stromal CXCR1 expression was less then epithelial expression and did not show cyclical difference. No stromal CXCR2 expression was observed. In eutopic endometrium of women with endometriosis compared to endometrium of women without endometriosis, there was a significant increase in both proliferative and secretory phases for epithelial CXCR2 expression, and in proliferative phase for CXCR1 expression (P < 0.05). Both receptor immunoreactivities were significantly increased in the epithelial cells of ectopic endometrial tissues compared to that of normal endometrium (P < 0.05).These findings suggest that IL-8 and its receptors may be involved in the pathogenesis of endometriosis.Changes in the T-helper cytokine profile and in lymphocyte activation at the systemic and local levels in women with endometriosis.To estimate regulatory cytokine synthesis and lymphocyte activation in the peripheral blood and endometrial tissue of patients with endometriosis.Controlled clinical study.Medical center.Fifteen women with laparoscopically diagnosed endometriosis; 20 gynecologically healthy women with previously documented fertility (control group).Peripheral venous blood sampling; laparoscopic collection of ectopic and matched eutopic endometrium.Messenger RNA (mRNA) for interleukin (IL)-2, IL-4, and IL-10 expression in peripheral and endometrium lymphocytes was assessed by real-time reverse transcriptase polymerase chain reaction; intracellular synthesis of these cytokines and lymphocyte phenotype profile were established by flow cytometry.Both mRNA expression and intracellular synthesis of IL-4 and IL-10 were sharply increased in peripheral lymphocytes. The same changes were observed for IL-4 in ectopic endometrium of women with endometriosis. Simultaneously, elevation of the amount of pan-B cells, CD20+CD5+ B-1 cells, and activated HLA-DR+CD20+ B lymphocytes was observed in endometriosis lesions. Only an enhanced amount of B lymphocytes was seen in eutopic endometrium.Endometriosis development is accompanied by the activation of a T-helper type 2 immune response at the systemic and local levels. Our results support the hypothesis regarding the autoimmune nature of endometriosis and can explain the high level of autoantibody production in patients with endometriosis.Imbalance in the expression of the activating type I and the inhibitory type II interleukin 1 receptors in endometriosis.The ectopic establishment and progression of endometrial tissue is dependent upon its interaction with and responsiveness to the stimuli present in its new environment. Immune cell-derived cytokines, such as interleukin 1 (IL1), may alone or in concert with estrogens enhance the capability of ectopic endometrial cells to implant and develop into the host tissue. The objective of this study was to further evaluate the expression and significance of IL1 receptor type I (IL1R1), the signalling receptor that mediates cell activation by IL1, and IL1 receptor type II (IL1R2), a potent and specific down-regulator of IL1 action, in normal compared to endometriotic/endometrial tissues.Techniques included immunohistochemistry, immunofluorescent staining, ELISA, western blotting and endometriotic cell culture transfection.Our study showed an imbalance in the expression of IL1R1 and IL1R2 in eutopic, and particularly in ectopic, endometrial tissues of women with endometriosis. Actually, a decreased IL1R2 expression is predominant in the eutopic and ectopic endometrium of women with endometriosis when compared with normal women, whereas a concomitant increase in IL1R1 expression occurs in ectopic endometrial tissue in comparison to eutopic endometrial tissue of normal or endometriotic women, particularly in the initial and most active implants. Transfection of endometriotic cells with a cDNA coding for IL1R2 resulted in a significant decrease in IL1-induced secretion of vascular endothelial cell growth factor and monocyte chemotactic protein 1.IL1R1/IL1R2 imbalance may amplify endometrial cell responsiveness to IL1 and represent a key mechanism underlying the ability of these cells to implant and develop into host tissues.Semi-quantitative analysis of HOXA11, leukemia inhibitory factor and basic transcriptional element binding protein 1 mRNA expression in the mid-secretory endometrium of patients with endometriosis.HOXA11 and leukemia inhibitory factor (LIF) and basic transcriptional element binding protein1 (BTEB1) are expressed in endometrium throughout the menstrual cycle and show a dramatic increase during the mid-luteal phase at the time of implantation. In this case-control study, the expression pattern of these mRNA was evaluated in patients with endometriosis at the time of implantation. We also describe a semi-quantitative RT-PCR protocol optimized in our laboratory.Eight patients with endometriosis were considered as our case and 8 fertile women as control group. Expression levels of HOXA11, LIF and BTEB1 mRNA were measured in endometrium during the mid-secretory phase using semi-quantitative RT-PCR.We describe the detailed procedure for the analysis of HOXA11, LIF and BTEB1 mRNA levels. Endometrial HOXA11 and LIF mRNA expression levels (normalized to beta-actin expression) were significantly decreased in endometrium of infertile patients with endometriosis compared with healthy fertile controls at the time of implantation (P < 0.05). A similar trend was seen in BTEB1 mRNA expression.The results suggest that the alteration in expression pattern of the some genes could account for some aspects of infertility in endometriosis.L1 cell adhesion molecule (L1CAM) as a pathogenetic factor in endometriosis.Endometriosis is a benign and progressive disease with a high prevalence. Women with endometriosis, especially with atypical endometriosis, have a higher probability for developing ovarian cancer compared with women without endometriosis. The L1 cell adhesion molecule (L1CAM) is over expressed in ovarian and endometrial carcinomas and is associated with a bad prognosis. Here, we have analysed L1CAM expression in endometriosis.In our study with the samples from 79 patients with, and 37 patients without, endometriosis, we found that endometriosis cell lines and short-term cultures of endometrium from women with endometriosis expressed L1CAM at the mRNA and protein level. Quantitative RT-PCR analysis showed that L1CAM was expressed at significantly higher level in the epithelial compartment from patients with endometriosis compared with healthy controls (P = 0.0126). By immunohistochemical staining, 15 of 31 ovarian endometriotic lesions (48%) were shown to have L1CAM-positive staining. Of these 15 L1CAM-positive samples, 13 were atypical endometriotic lesions. Soluble L1 present in the conditioned medium of epithelial endometrium cultures from women with endometriosis was able to stimulate neurite outgrowth as measured in a chicken ganglion assay.We propose that L1CAM could promote endometriosis development by increasing enervation and aggravation. L1CAM expression is higher in atypical endometriosis compared with normal endometriosis.In vitro CA-125 secretion by endometrium from women with advanced endometriosis.To determine if the endometrium of women with endometriosis is a potential source of the elevated serum concentrations of CA-125 associated with endometriosis.Secretion of CA-125 by the endometrium in tissue culture was documented and measured in response to treatment with progesterone (P), 17 beta-estradiol (E2), and progesterone and estradiol (E2+P). Sequential biopsies of the endometrium from the early and late luteal phase were obtained from women with laparoscopically documented normal anatomy or moderate to severe endometriosis.Division of Reproductive Endocrinology, Department of Obstetrics and Gynecology at the University of Vermont, College of Medicine, Burlington, Vermont.Secretion of CA-125 by endometrium in vitro was determined by radioimmunoassay in spent media using a commercially available kit (Centicor CA-125 Kit; Centicor, Malvern, PA).Secretion of CA-125 by endometrium in vitro is inhibited by the presence of P and E2+P in both the early and the late luteal phase. The amount of CA-125 secreted increases significantly from the early to the late luteal phase in all treatment groups. When compared with controls, the endometrium of women of with endometriosis secreted two to four times more CA-125 in all treatment groups, in both the early and late luteal phase.When compared with control endometrium, the endometrium of women with advanced endometriosis secretes significantly more CA-125 and represents a potential source of the elevated serum levels of CA-125 seen in these women.Intercellular adhesion molecule-1 and hepatocyte growth factor in human endometriosis: original investigation and a review of literature.Defects in the cell-mediated immune system may play a role in the pathogenesis or progression of pelvic endometriosis. Possible mediators include macrophages, interleukins-1 and -6, and tumor necrosis factor-alpha. More recent work points to the involvement of adhesion molecules and growth factors. To clarify the pathogenesis of endometriosis, we compared the characteristics of soluble intercellular adhesion molecule-1 (soluble ICAM-1) and hepatocyte growth factor (HGF) in women with and without endometriosis. We found that, in patients with endometriosis, the concentrations of soluble ICAM-1 in peritoneal fluid increased and interfered with the activity of natural killer cells. We also found that HGF secretion was significantly increased in cultured endometrial stromal cells, and that HGF stimulated the proliferation and migration of, and morphogenic changes in, endometrial epithelial cells. HGF and ICAM-1 play important roles in the initiation and regulation of endometriotic lesions on the microenvironment level. The increased secretion of HGF by eutopic endometrial stromal cells may contribute to the pathogenesis of endometriosis, whereas the increased levels of soluble ICAM-1 may impair natural killer cell activity and accelerate the progression of the disease.Interleukin 1alpha and tissue-lytic matrix metalloproteinase-1 are elevated in ectopic endometrium of patients with endometriosis.Matrix metalloproteinases (MMP) play an essential role in tissue remodelling and menstruation and appear to be regulated by cytokines such as interleukin-1alpha (IL-1alpha). In order to investigate their role in the pathogenesis of endometriosis, the aim of the present study was to compare the protein localization of matrix metalloproteinase-1 (MMP-1) and of its main stimulatory cytokine IL-1alpha in eutopic and dystopic endometrium of patients with endometriosis.MMP-1 and IL-1alpha protein localization was analysed retrospectively in paired paraffin-embedded tissue biopsies obtained simultaneously from the endometrial cavity and from endometrial lesions of 37 patients with peritoneal or ovarian endometriosis and in cycling endometria from 37 women without endometriosis. Protein localization was demonstrated by immunohistochemistry; antibody specificity was confirmed by western blot analysis.MMP-1 and IL-1alpha protein staining in women suffering from endometriosis was significantly more pronounced in endometriotic lesions than in eutopic endometrium. This held true for both epithelial MMP-1 and IL-1alpha staining (P < 0.006 and P < 0.001), and for stromal MMP-1 and IL-1alpha staining (P < 0.001 and P < 0.001). Furthermore, stromal MMP-1 and IL-1alpha were significantly co-expressed in dystopic endometriotic tissue (P = 0.045). Endometrial MMP-1 and IL-1alpha protein expression pattern in eutopic endometrium from women suffering from endometriosis, however, did not differ significantly from the pattern seen in healthy women.The increased expression of both matrix-degrading MMP-1 and its major stimulatory cytokine IL-1alpha in endometriotic lesions and the selective co-expression in the stroma of endometriotic foci clearly suggests their involvement in the pathogenic mechanisms leading to local invasion and tissue destruction.P27Kip1 is down-regulated in the endometrium of women with endometriosis.To evaluate p27 protein expression in the endometrium of women with endometriosis.Transversal case-control study.Endometriosis Unit, Federal University of São Paulo, Brazil.Thirteen patients with stage I/II endometriosis, five with stage III/IV endometriosis, and 11 control subjects.Endometrial biopsies were obtained from patients with proven endometriosis and women without disease at laparoscopy. P27 protein was immunolocalized in the biopsy tissues and quantified by light microscopy.Immunostaining scores of glandular and stromal cells in endometrial biopsies obtained from patients with confirmed endometriosis compared with those of healthy control women with normal pelvis at laparoscopy. The staining scores of stage I/II and stage III/IV patients and of both patient groups and the control group were compared.The level of p27 protein expression observed in the control group, both in the stroma and in the endometrial glands, was significantly different from that observed in the endometriosis patient groups. Significant differences in p27 protein expression levels in the glandular epithelium and stroma were not observed among groups of patients with endometriosis.The decreased level of p27 protein in the endometrium of women with endometriosis suggests that cell cycle alterations in the endometrial mucosa may be involved in the pathogenesis of this disease.VCAM-1 on peritoneum and α4β1 integrin in endometrium and their implications in endometriosis.The objective of the study is to investigate vascular cellular adhesion molecule-1 (VCAM-1) expression on peritoneal mesothelial cells and α4β1 integrin on eutopic endometrium as possible mechanisms in the pathogenesis of endometriosis. It is a case-control study carried out at an academic medical center. Participants are patients with (n=9) and without (n=15) endometriosis. The main outcome measures included VCAM-1 expression on peritoneal mesothelial cells and α4β1 expression on eutopic endometrium using immunohistochemistry and flow cytometry, respectively. Patients with endometriosis were more likely to express VCAM-1 on peritoneal mesothelial cells, both in areas with and without macroscopic disease, compared with patients without endometriosis (9/9 vs. 3/15, P<0.001). No differences were found between cases and controls in regards to eutopic endometrial expression of α4β1 integrin. The presence of VCAM-1 on peritoneal mesothelial cells is associated with endometriosis. This field effect, in addition to the similarity found with regards to the expression of α4β1 integrin in eutopic endometrium between cases and controls, may implicate the expression of VCAM-1 in the peritoneum, and not changes in the eutopic endometrium, as a contributor to the pathogenesis of endometriosis. Expression of Th1 and Th2 cytokine-associated transcription factors, T-bet and GATA-3, in the eutopic endometrium of women with endometriosis.The objective of the present study was to evaluate the expression of T-box expressed in T cells (T-bet) and GATA binding protein 3 (GATA-3) in the eutopic endometrium from women with endometriosis. Endometrial tissues were collected from 20 women with laparoscopically confirmed endometriosis and 20 women without endometriosis. T-bet and GATA-3 expression was measured by quantitative real-time PCR (qPCR), immunohistochemistry and Western blot analysis. Eutopic endometrial tissues from patients with endometriosis expressed lower levels of T-bet mRNA and high levels of GATA-3 mRNA, leading to a significant lower T-bet/GATA-3 mRNA ratio (P<0.05). Western blot analysis showed that the T-bet/GATA-3 protein ratio in endometriosis group was also statistically lower than that in the control group (P<0.05). These results suggested that T-bet and GATA-3 may act as cytokine regulatory genes, and the Th2-specific transcription factor, GATA-3, probably plays an essential role in the immune response and the development of endometriosis.Chemokine CCL2 enhances survival and invasiveness of endometrial stromal cells in an autocrine manner by activating Akt and MAPK/Erk1/2 signal pathway.To clarify the role and mechanism of CCL2 in regulating the biological functions of endometrial stromal cells (ESCs).The CCL2 effect on the viability, proliferation, and invasion in the eutopic ESCs from endometriosis.Research laboratories.Patients with endometriosis aged 23-47 years.None.Signal transduction and downstream molecules from CCR2.We have found that the secretion of CCL2 by the eutopic ESCs from endometriosis is higher than that of healthy ESCs without endometriosis. The CCL2 can enhance the viability, proliferation, and invasion of ESCs in a dosage and time-dependent manner. Anti-CCL2 neutralizing antibody and CCR2 antagonist can completely abolish the increase in viability, proliferation, and invasiveness of ESCs induced by CCL2. The CCL2 can increase the expression of proliferating cell nuclear antigen, survivin, and matrix metalloproteinase 2, and decrease the expression of tissue inhibitor of metalloproteinase 1 and 2, and promote the viability, proliferation and invasiveness of ESCs by activating Akt and MAPK/Erk1/2 signal pathway, but not p38 and JNK signal pathway.CCL2 might play an important role in regulating the functions of ESCs through Akt and MAPK/Erk1/2 signal pathway, and overexpression of CCL2 in ESCs and peritoneal fluid (PF) would lead to onset and development of endometriosis.The expression of human leukocyte antigens class I and II in women with endometriosis or adenomyosis.The human leukocyte antigen (HLA) system has been implicated in the aetiology of endometriosis. We aimed to compare the HLA class I and II expression in endometrial specimens from women with endometriosis or adenomyosis.We studied the HLA class I and II expression in endometrial specimens from 16 women with endometriosis and 15 with adenomyosis which were compared with 15 specimens from women without endometriosis or adenomyosis. Immunohistochemistry was performed using mouse antihuman IgG2a monoclonal antibody for HLA I and IgG1 for HLA II.Women with endometriosis had significantly higher HLA I and II expression in stroma (100% and 87.5% vs. 66.7% and 40%, p < 0.02 and p = 0.007, respectively) and glands (87.5% and 56.3% vs. 46.7% and 20%, p < 0.02 and p = 0.04, respectively) compared to controls, while in the adenomyosis group the expression of HLA I was comparable with controls and the HLA II expression was increased in stromal cells (73.3% vs. 40%, p = 0.03) and decreased in glands (6.6% vs. 20%, p = NS).Women with endometriosis had a significantly higher expression of HLA molecules whereas in adenomyosis there was a tendency of lower expression of these molecules. This could explain the suppression of cellular immunity in the peritoneal cavity.Characterization of WNT7A expression in human endometrium and endometriotic lesions.To characterize the expression of WNT7A in human eutopic and ectopic endometrium.Experimental study using real-time polymerase chain reaction, laser microdissection, in situ hybridization, and immunofluorescence.University-based laboratory.Patients with and without endometriosis undergoing surgery for benign indications.None.Relative expression values compared with housekeeping genes using real-time polymerase chain reaction. Detection of positive cells by immunofluorescence and in situ hybridization.In endometriosis, statistically significant higher WNT7A mRNA expression was observed compared with eutopic endometrium. Expression of WNT7A was found in the luminal and glandular epithelial cells as well as stroma cells in endometrium and endometriosis by immunofluorescence, in situ hybridization, and polymerase chain reaction of laser microdissected tissue.The results of the present study suggest that WNT7A plays a role in the pathophysiology of endometriosis.Expression of leptin receptor in human endometrium and fluctuation during the menstrual cycle.Leptin is secreted by adipocytes and regulates appetite through interaction with hypothalamic leptin receptors (OB-R). Accumulated evidence shows that leptin is involved in the stimulation of reproductive functions and that local expression of leptin and OB-R in the ovary, oocyte, embryo, and placenta plays a role in early development. To investigate the role of leptin in implantation, we examined the expression of OB-R and leptin in the human endometrium. Northern and Western blot analyses and RT-PCR showed that the long form of OB-R (OB-R(L)) messenger ribonucleic acid (mRNA) and protein were expressed. In contrast, leptin mRNA or protein was not detected. All of the splice variants of OB-R (OB-R(T)) and OB-R(L) transcripts were expressed in 90% and 84% of the cases, respectively. OB-R mRNA expression peaked in the early secretory phase. Decidual tissue of early gestation also expressed OB-R(T) and OB-R(L). Their incidence and abundance were comparable among endometria with benign uterine diseases and disease-free endometria and were not related to a body mass index within the normal range. The present results indicate that OB-R, but not leptin, is expressed in the human endometrium.Activin A stimulates interleukin 8 and vascular endothelial growth factor release from cultured human endometrial stromal cells: possible implications for the pathogenesis of endometriosis.Activin A is an endometrial secretory product involved in inflammation and angiogenesis. The present study aimed to evaluate the effect of activin A and its antagonist follistatin on interleukin (IL)-6, IL-8, and vascular endothelial growth factor (VEGF) expression and release from cultured human endometrial stromal cells (HESCs) from women with and without endometriosis.The HESCs were collected from women with endometriosis (n = 6) and controls (n = 6). Primary cultures were treated with activin A at different doses or activin A plus follistatin. The IL-6, IL-8, and VEGF messenger RNA expression was evaluated by real-time polymerase chain reaction and protein release was evaluated by enzyme-linked immunosorbent assay.Unstimulated HESC from women with endometriosis secreted more IL-6 and IL-8 than controls. The addition of activin A increased IL-8 and VEGF secretion in HESC from controls and decreased IL-6 and IL-8 secretion in HESC from women with endometriosis. These effects were counteracted by follistatin.Activin A regulates the expression and secretion of IL-8 and VEGF in cultured HESC, and this mechanism appears to be disrupted in eutopic endometrial cells from women affected by endometriosis.Endometrial immunofluorescence associated with endometriosis and pelvic inflammatory disease.Anti-immunoglobulin G (anti-IgG) staining in the endometrium by immunofluorescence has been associated with endometriosis. To investigate this phenomenon further, we took endometrial samples from 42 patients who underwent laparoscopy or laparotomy, which were tested for immunofluorescence. Fluorescein-labeled anti-IgG was incubated with tissue samples. Of 18 patients with documented endometriosis, 16 had positive immunofluorescence (89% sensitivity). Of 24 patients with no evidence of endometriosis, 9 had false-positive immunofluorescence and 15 had negative immunofluorescence. Of the 9 false-positive samples, 8 had evidence of old pelvic inflammatory disease. In the absence of this condition, there was only one false-positive study for immunofluorescence. The implications of these findings in terms of the pathophysiology of endometriosis-associated infertility is that it may be an immune-mediated process. With regard to diagnosis, the high predictive value of endometrial immunofluorescent IgG may be a useful tool in indicating early laparoscopic examination of the infertile period.Elevated levels of gremlin-1 in eutopic endometrium and peripheral serum in patients with endometriosis.To examine the expression of gremlin-1 (GREM1) on the levels of messenger RNA (mRNA) and protein in eutopic endometrium and its serum level in patients with endometriosis.Prospective, experimental study using reverse-transcription polymerase chain reaction, Western blot, immunofluorescence, and ELISA.Gynecological oncology laboratory in a department of obstetrics and gynecology in a medical college in China.Thirty-five patients with endometriosis and 23 healthy control women.During surgery, the eutopic endometria and peripheral serum were obtained from the patients with endometriosis and the control women.The cellular compartment location of GREM1 expression was examined by using immunofluorescent double staining. The expression levels of mRNA and protein for GREM1 were determined by reverse-transcription polymerase chain reaction and Western blot, respectively. The serum level of GREM1 was measured by indirect ELISA.The expression of GREM1 was defined within endometrial blood vessel endothelium exclusively, with the concomitant expressions of GREM1 and CD146. The expression of GREM1 on the levels of mRNA and protein was significantly higher in eutopic endometria of patients with endometriosis than in those from healthy control women. According to the ELISA established in our laboratory, the concentration of GREM1 in peripheral serum that was collected during the follicular menstrual phase of patients with endometriosis was significantly higher than that in serum from healthy control women.Gremlin-1 plays a role to some extent in the aberrant angiogenesis of eutopic endometrium in patients with endometriosis. It is possible that the peripheral serum level of GREM1 is a prospective serum biomarker of endometriosis.Transcriptional expression of type-I interferon response genes and stability of housekeeping genes in the human endometrium and endometriosis.Endometriosis is a painful chronic female disease defined by the presence of endometrial tissue implants in ectopic (Ec) locations. The pathogenesis is much debated, and type-I interferons (IFNs) could be involved. The expression of genes of the type-I IFN response were profiled by a specific PCR array of RNA obtained from Ec and eutopic (Eu) endometrium collected from nine endometriosis patients and nine healthy control women. Transcriptional expression levels of selected IFN-regulated and housekeeping genes (HKGs) were investigated by real-time quantitative reverse transcriptase PCR (qRT-PCR). Stably expressed HKGs for valid normalization of transcriptional studies of endometrium and endometriosis have not yet been published. Here, seven HKGs were evaluated for stability using the GeNorm and NormFinder software. A normalization factor based on HMBS, TBP and YWHAZ expression was suitable for normalization of qRT-PCR studies of Eu versus Ec endometrium. In the endometrial cell lines HEC1A, HEC1B, Ishikawa and RL95-2, HMBS and HPRT1 were the most stably expressed. The IFN-specific PCR array indicated significantly different expression of the genes BST2, COL16A1, HOXB2 and ISG20 between the endometrial tissue types. However, by correctly normalized qRT-PCR, levels of BST2, COL16A1 and the highly type-I IFN-stimulated genes ISG12A and 6-16 displayed insignificant variations. Conversely, HOXB2 and ISG20 transcriptions were significantly reduced in endometriosis lesions compared with endometrium from endometriosis patients and healthy controls. In conclusion, appropriate HKGs for normalization of qRT-PCR studies of endometrium and endometriosis have been identified here. Abolished expression of ISG20 and HOX genes could be important in endometriosis.Aromatase expression in endometriotic tissues and its relationship to clinical and analytical findings.To study the relationship between aromatase expression in endometriotic tissues and clinical and laboratory findings.Prospective basic and clinical research.University hospital.Sixty-two women with endometriosis, and 12 without endometriosis.Conservative surgery, or hysterectomy and adnexectomy, along with an immunohistochemical study of aromatase in endometriotic and nonendometriotic tissues.Symptoms of the disease, ultrasound and surgical findings, values of tumor markers, steroids and immunoglobulins, and recurrences after surgery.We observed positive immunohistochemical expression for aromatase in endometriotic tissues from 38 patients (61.3%). Aromatase expression was negative in the rest of the tissues studied and in the 12 cases without endometriosis. Aromatase-positive patients had a higher number of endometriomas, more bilaterality, and more moderate-to-severe chronic pelvic pain. Also, infertility and associated leiomyomas were more frequent in these patients, though without significant differences. There were no differences in recurrence of the disease 1 year later. Estradiol and PRL levels were significantly higher, and IgG values lower, than in aromatase-negative patients. High values of blood sedimentation rate were more frequent in aromatase-negative patients.Molecular alterations such as the presence of aromatase in endometriotic tissues could be involved in the development or maintenance of endometriosis. Our findings suggest major severity, activity, and chronic pelvic pain in patients with aromatase in endometriotic tissue.Increased peritoneal and endometrial gene expression of biologically relevant cytokines and growth factors during the menstrual phase in women with endometriosis.To examine differential messenger RNA (mRNA) expression of relevant cytokines, metalloproteases, growth and adhesion factors in endometrium and peritoneum from women with endometriosis when compared with women without the disease during menstrual and luteal phases of the cycle.Patients with endometriosis were compared with control patients.University hospital.A total of 35 patients (20 patients during the luteal phase and 15 patients during the menstrual phase) were selected for this study on the basis of cycle phase and presence or absence of endometriosis.In this study, endometriosis was laparoscopically and histologically confirmed in 24 women with endometriosis of revised American Society for Reproductive Medicine (ASRM) stage I-II (n = 12) and revised ASRM stage III-IV (n = 12), and the presence of a normal pelvis was documented by laparoscopy in 11 control patients. The macroscopically normal peritoneum tissues were collected from lateral wall left or right, near the colon ascendens or descendens.The expression levels were determined as ratios between the target molecules and beta-actin as housekeeping gene.In women with endometriosis, peritoneal mRNA levels of matrix metalloproteinase (MMP)-3, transforming growth factor-beta, interleukin (IL)-6, and intercellular adhesion molecule-1 and endometrial mRNA levels of MMP-3, tumor necrosis factor (TNF)-alpha, and IL-8 were significantly higher during the menstrual phase when compared with luteal phase. During the menstrual phase of the cycle, both endometrial expression of TNF-alpha, IL-8, and MMP-3 mRNA levels and peritoneal expression of transforming growth factor-beta, IL-6, and intercellular adhesion molecule-1 mRNA levels were significantly higher in women with endometriosis when compared with controls. Immunohistochemical staining confirmed the presence of TNF-alpha in peritoneum and endometrium in both women with endometriosis and controls.Increased endometrial and peritoneal cytokine mRNA expression during menstruation may contribute to a pelvic inflammatory microenvironment favoring the development of endometriosis.Endometriotic stromal cells lose the ability to regulate cell-survival signaling in endometrial epithelial cells in vitro.In normal endometrium, stromal factors regulate the growth of epithelial cells. However, epithelial cells in endometriotic lesions display increased proliferation and decreased apoptosis. This work tested the hypothesis that in endometriosis stromal cells lose the ability to regulate survival signaling and cell growth in epithelial cells. Primary normal, endometriotic eutopic and ectopic epithelial cells were cultured in the presence of medium conditioned by normal, eutopic and ectopic endometriotic endometrial stromal cells. Endometriotic epithelial cells showed higher Survivin expression than normal epithelial cells. Conditioned medium (CM) from normal or eutopic endometriotic stromal cells significantly inhibited the Survivin expression and AKt phosphorylation in normal or eutopic endometriotic epithelial cells. However, CM from ectopic endometriotic stromal cells did not have an inhibitory effect on normal or ectopic endometriotic epithelial cells. Inhibition of AKt phosphorylation and Survivin expression in normal or eutopic endometriotic epithelial cells in the presence of stromal factors from normal or eutopic endometriotic stromal cells was enhanced by progesterone, whereas progesterone had little effect in the presence of stromal factors from ectopic endometriotic stromal cells. The inability of ectopic endometriotic stromal cells to regulated PI3K/AKt/Survivin signaling and mediate the progesterone response in endometriotic epithelial cells may facilitate epithelial cell proliferation in endometriosis and promote the survival of endometriotic lesions.Increased expression of importin13 in endometriosis and endometrial carcinoma.Importin13 (IPO13) is a novel potential marker of corneal epithelial progenitor cells. We investigated the expression and localization of IPO13 in endometrial, endometriotic and endometrial carcinoma tissue.IPO13 expression in endometrial, endometriotic and endometrial carcinoma tissue was examined by immunohistochemistry, qPCR and Western blot.Immunohistochemistry studies showed that IPO13 protein was expressed mainly in cytoplasm of glandular epithelial cell and stromal cells. The rate of importin13-positive cells in proliferative phase endometrium was higher (by about 6-fold) than that in secretory endometrium (P<0.05) and the rate of importin13-positive cells in endometriosis and endometrial carcinoma was higher than that in normal secretory phase endometrial tissues (by about 4- and 9-fold, respectively). Immunofluorescence microscopy revealed co-localization of IPO13 with CD34, CD45, c-kit, telomerase, CD90 and CD146. QPCR revealed significantly increased IPO13 mRNA in endometriosis and endometrial carcinoma versus secretory phase endometrium (by about 2- and 10-fold, respectively). Western blot analysis showed that IPO13 protein is enhanced in endometriosis and endometrial carcinoma versus secretory phase endometrium (p<0.05).These results demonstrate an increased expression of IPO13 in endometriosis and endometrial carcinoma, which could be involved in the pathogenesis of endometriosis and endometrial carcinoma; IPO13 can serve as an endometrial progenitor/stem cell marker.IL-22 in the endometriotic milieu promotes the proliferation of endometrial stromal cells via stimulating the secretion of CCL2 and IL-8.Interleukin-22 (IL-22) is a member of the IL-10 cytokine family and plays critical roles in inflammation, immune surveillance, and tissue homeostasis. However, whether IL-22 regulates the growth of endometrial stromal cells (ESCs), and participates in the pathogenesis of endometriosis remain unclear. In this study, we found that the expression of IL-22 and it receptors (IL-22R1 and IL-10R2) in eutopic endometrium and ectopic lesion of women with endometriosis was higher than that from healthy control. Recombinant human IL-22 (rhIL-22) stimulated the proliferation of ESCs in a dosage-dependent manner. On the contrary, anti-human IL-22 neutralizing antibody inhibited the proliferation of ESCs in vitro. The stimulatory effect of IL-22 on the proliferation of ESCs could be reversed by inhibitor of STAT5, ERK1/2 or AKT signal pathway. However, blocking STAT3, JNK or P38 signal pathway had no these effects. By Enzyme-linked immunosorbent assay (ELISA) and flow cytometry assay, we demonstrated the rhIL-22 not only stimulate the secretion of CCL2 and IL-8, but also significantly up-regulate the expression of IL-8 receptor CXCR1 on ESCs. Meanwhile, STAT5, ERK1/2 and or AKT signal inhibitors could abrogate the increase of CCL2, IL-8 and CXCR1 levels induced by rhIL-22. However, rhIL-22 had not similar influence on CCL2 receptor CCR2. Our current results suggested that the higher level of IL-22 and it receptors in eutopic endometrium may stimulate the expression of CCL2, IL-8/CXCR1, and further promote the growth of ESCs possibly through activating STAT5, MAPK/ERK1/2 and or AKT signal pathways, which may be involved in the occurrence and development of endometriosis. G protein-coupled estrogen receptor (GPER) expression in normal and abnormal endometrium.Rapid estrogen effects are mediated by membrane receptors, and evidence suggests a role for both a membrane-associated form of estrogen receptor alpha (ESR1; ERα) and G-protein coupled receptor 30 (GPER; GPR30). Considering estrogen's importance in endometrial physiology and endometriosis pathophysiology, we hypothesized that GPER could be involved in both cyclic changes in endometrial estrogen action and that aberrant expression might be seen in the eutopic endometrium of women with endometriosis. Using real-time reverse transcriptase-polymerase chain reaction (RT-PCR) and immunohistochemical analysis of normal endometrium, endometrial samples demonstrated cycle-regulated expression of GPER, with maximal expression in the proliferative phase. Eutopic and ectopic endometrium from women with endometriosis overexpressed GPER as compared to eutopic endometrium of normal participants. Ishikawa cells, an adenocarcinoma cell line, expressed GPER, with increased expression upon treatment with estrogen or an ESR1 agonist, but not with a GPER-specific agonist. Decreased expression was seen in Ishikawa cells stably transfected with progesterone receptor A. Together, these data suggest that normal endometrial GPER expression is cyclic and regulated by nuclear estrogen and progesterone receptors, while expression is dysregulated in endometriosis.Increased nuclear expression of nuclear factor kappa-B p65 subunit in the eutopic endometrium and ovarian endometrioma of women with advanced stage endometriosis.We evaluated whether the expression of NF-кB p65 subunit is increased in the eutopic endometrium and/or in the ovarian endometrioma of women with advanced stage endometriosis, and ascertained in vitro effects of proinflammatory cytokines on the expression and DNA binding of NF-кB p65 subunit in endometrial cells.Immunohistochemistry was performed to compare the nuclear NF-кB p65 subunit immunoreactivity between women with and without advanced stage endometriosis. The nuclear NF-кB p65 subunit expression and DNA binding were also analyzed in endometrial cells treated with tumor necrosis factor-alpha (TNF-α) or interleukin-1beta (IL-1β) utilizing Western blot analysis, enzyme-linked immunosorbent assay, and electrophoretic mobility shift assay.The immunoreactivity of the nuclear NF-кB p65 subunit was significantly increased in the eutopic endometrium as well as in the ovarian endometrioma of women with endometriosis compared with the controls. In vitro treatment of endometrial cells with TNF-α and IL-1β led to a significant increase in nuclear NF-кB p65 subunit expression and DNA binding.The nuclear expression of NF-κB p65 is increased in the eutopic endometrium and ovarian endometrioma of women with advanced stage endometriosis, which strongly suggests that NF-кB signaling plays a crucial role in the pathogenesis and/or pathophysiology of endometriosis.Immunohistochemical localization of granulocyte-macrophage colony-stimulating factor in matched endometriosis and endometrial tissues.Murine endometrial granulocyte-macrophage colony-stimulating factor has been related to macrophage recruitment and activation and postulated to mediate reproductive events. This study was designed to determine whether granulocyte-macrophage colony-stimulating factor is present in normal human endometrium or endometriosis.Granulocyte-macrophage colony-stimulating factor was immunohistochemically evaluated in matched endometrial and endometriosis biopsy specimens (n = 19) and endometrial biopsy specimens from disease-free patients (n = 8). Staining differences were determined with McNemar's, Fisher's, and Wilcoxon's tests.Granulocyte-macrophage colony-stimulating factor was primarily localized in endometrial and endometriotic epithelial cells. Expression (p = 0.71) and staining intensity (p = 0.37) was similar in matched proliferative-phase endometrium and endometriosis. Matched secretory-phase endometrium and endometriosis also expressed granulocyte-macrophage colony-stimulating factor in similar proportions (p = 0.12), but staining intensity was enhanced in secretory endometriosis compared with secretory endometrium (p = 0.05). Endometrial granulocyte-macrophage colony-stimulating factor did not vary throughout the menstrual cycle, but endometriotic expression (p = 0.013) and staining intensity (p = 0.008) were significantly greater in the secretory phase.Granulocyte-macrophage colony-stimulating factor is localized in endometrial and endometriotic epithelial cells with increased expression in secretory-phase endometriosis. Granulocyte-macrophage colony-stimulating factor may elicit migration, proliferation, and activation of endometrial and peritoneal macrophages.Integrin adhesion molecules in the endometrial glandular epithelium in patients with endometriosis or adenomyosis.To assess the role of beta 1-integrin and E-cadherin molecules in the eutopic glandular epithelium in patients with endometriosis or adenomyosis.Twenty-four patients with endometriosis, and 22 patients with adenomyosis diagnosed histologically were selected as subjects. The controls consisted of 29 fertile women. Eutopic endometria were obtained by curettage or immediately after the operation. The samples were immunohistochemically examined for the expression of very late activation antigen-2 (VLA-2), VLA-3, VLA-4, VLA-5, VLA-6, and E-cadherin.The expression of each VLA molecule and E-cadherin except VLA-4, VLA-5, and VLA-6 was significantly increased throughout the menstrual cycle in endometria in both the endometriosis and adenomyosis groups. In contrast, the expression of VLA-4 in the adenomyosis group was significantly reduced in the secretory phase.Altered expression of beta 1-integrins and E-cadherin was observed throughout the menstrual cycle in patients with endometriosis and adenomyosis, suggesting the defective microenvironment of the endometrium.Endometrium from women with endometriosis shows increased proliferation activity.Examination of 631 infertile women, including 434 women with endometriosis and 197 without endometriosis, revealed an increasing incidence of endometrial polyps, especially in the test subjects with endometriosis, and advanced stages of endometriosis. Expression of Ki-67 and Bcl-2 proteins and MTT assay results were significantly higher in endometrium of patients with endometriosis than in patients without endometriosis. These showed increased proliferation activity and cell proliferation markers not only clinically but also pathologically.HOXA-11 mediated dysregulation of matrix remodeling during implantation window in women with endometriosis.To investigate the Homeobox genes HOXA-10 and HOXA-11 mediated endometrial molecular defects during implantation window in endometriosis-associated infertility cases.Endometrial biopsies were obtained during implantation window from 31 infertile women with endometriosis (age < 35 years) and 26 age and BMI-matched infertile women without endometriosis were included in the study for comparison purposes. Endometrial expression of HOXA-10 and HOXA-11 genes, MMP-2, -9, α(v)β(3) integrin, leukemia inhibitory factor and surface characteristics including average roughness and topology were assessed.A significantly lower expression of HOXA-10 and HOXA-11 were observed in endometriotic women compared to non-endometriotic controls. Further, a significantly higher endometrial expression of MMP-2 and -9 were observed in women with endometriosis when compared with controls. Interestingly, endometrial surface were observed to be grossly affected in terms of average roughness and topology in women with endometriosis compared to controls.The findings suggest that aberrant expression of HOXA-10 and -11 genes adversely affects endometrial remodelling and expression of receptivity markers.Activin A, activin receptor type II, nodal, and cripto mRNA are expressed by eutopic and ectopic endometrium in women with ovarian endometriosis.Activin A is a dimeric protein that regulates endometrial functions by signaling at its receptors, namely type I (ActRI) and type II (ActRII). Nodal is an activin competitor that requires the coreceptor cripto to assemble its signaling pathway through ActRI and ActRII. In the current study, we evaluated the expression of activin A, ActRII, nodal, and cripto in eutopic and ectopic endometrium collected from women with ovarian endometrioma (n = 15) and in eutopic endometrium of healthy participants (n = 15). Eutopic endometrial samples were evaluated according to the stage of menstrual cycle. Total RNA was extracted from tissue homogenates and analyzed by real-time polymerase chain reaction (PCR). Activin A messenger RNA (mRNA) expression in eutopic endometrium of patients with endometriosis was significantly higher than in controls (P < .001) with a 10.2-fold and 7.3-fold increase in the proliferative and secretory phases, respectively. ActRII and nodal mRNA expression were found to be similar in patients with and without endometriosis, while cripto mRNA was markedly lower in eutopic (fold change = 0.03 at proliferative phase, P < .001) and ectopic endometrium (fold change = 0.14, P < .001) of women with endometriosis compared with eutopic endometrium from healthy controls. In conclusion, the altered endometrial expression of activin A and cripto during the menstrual cycle and the differences observed in the endometriotic tissue support the involvement of the activin system in endometrial changes of women with endometriosis.Neuroendocrine cells in eutopic endometrium of women with endometriosis.Endometriosis is a common gynaecological disease, but the pathogenesis of endometriosis and pathophysiological basis for endometriosis-associated painful symptoms are still uncertain. Little is known about neuroendocrine (NE) cells in the uterus.For this study, 38 premenopausal women with histologically diagnosed ovarian endometrioma or peritoneal endometriosis and 24 women without endometriosis were selected. Biopsy samples from eutopic endometrium were used for immunohistochemical staining to detect synaptophysin (SYN) and neuron-specific enolase (NSE) expression in women with and without endometriosis.There were substantially more NE cells of eutopic endometrium stained with SYN and NSE in women with endometriosis than in those without endometriosis (3.8 +/- 1.8 versus 0.5 +/- 0.7/mm2, P < 0.001, and 2.8 +/- 2.1 versus 0.4 +/- 0.6/mm2, respectively, P < 0.001). These cells were scattered in the epithelium of endometrial glands. At all stages of the menstrual cycle, the densities of NE cells stained with SYN and NSE were greater in women with endometriosis than in those without endometriosis (P < 0.05).These results suggest that NE cells in eutopic endometrium probably play some role in the pathogenesis or symptoms of endometriosis.Augmented cell survival in eutopic endometrium from women with endometriosis: expression of c-myc, TGF-beta1 and bax genes.Endometriosis is a common gynaecological disorder characterized by the presence of endometrial tissue outside of the uterus. The fragments in normal menstruation are composed of necrotic and living cells, which do not survive in ectopic locations because of programmed cell death. The aim of this study was to evaluate if the balance between cell proliferation and apoptosis is changed in eutopic endometrium from women with endometriosis throughout the menstrual cycle by studying bax (pro-apoptotic), c-myc (regulator of cell cycle) and TGF-beta1 (involved in cell differentiation) genes.Eutopic endometrium was obtained from: 30 women with endometriosis (32.8 +/- 5 years) and 34 fertile eumenorrheic women (36 +/- 5.3 years). We analyzed apoptosis (TUNEL: DNA fragmentation); cell proliferation (immunohistochemistry (IHC) for Ki67); c-myc, bax and TGF-beta1 mRNA abundance (RT-PCR) and TGF-beta1 protein (IHC) in endometrial explants.Cell proliferation strongly decreased from proliferative to late secretory phases in glands, but not in stroma, in both endometria. Positive staining in glands and stroma from proliferative endometrium with endometriosis was 1.9- and 2.2-fold higher than control endometrium, respectively (p < 0.05). Abundance of c-myc mRNA was 65% higher in proliferative endometrium from endometriosis than normal tissue (p < 0.05). TGF-beta1 (mRNA and protein) augmented during mid secretory phase in normal endometrium, effect not observed in endometrium with endometriosis. In normal endometrium, the percentage of apoptotic epithelial and stromal cells increased more than 30-fold during late secretory phase. In contrast, in endometrium from endometriosis, not only this increase was not observed, besides bax mRNA decreased 63% versus normal endometrium (p < 0.05). At once, in early secretory phase, apoptotic stromal cells increased 10-fold with a concomitant augment of bax mRNA abundance (42%) in endometria from endometriosis (p < 0.05).An altered expression of c-myc, TGF-beta1 and bax was observed in eutopic endometrium from endometriosis, suggesting its participation in the regulation of cell survival in this disease. The augmented cell viability in eutopic endometrium from these patients as a consequence of a reduction in cell death by apoptosis, and also an increase in cell proliferation indicates that this condition may facilitate the invasive feature of the endometrium.Vascular endothelial growth factor (VEGF) in endometriosis.Angiogenesis is likely to be involved in the pathogenesis of endometriosis. According to the transplantation theory, when the exfoliated endometrium is attached to the peritoneal layer, the establishment of a new blood supply is essential for the survival of the endometrial implant and development of endometriosis. From the known angiogenic factors, vascular endothelial growth factor (VEGF) has emerged as a pivotally important regulator of normal angiogenesis and pathological neovascularization. The VEGF protein was evaluated immunohistochemically in the eutopic endometrium of 10 women without endometriosis (group I) at laparoscopy and the eutopic endometrium and peritoneal endometriotic lesions of 43 women with endometriosis (group II). VEGF histological scores were 9.7 +/- 4.3 and 4.0 +/- 2.6 respectively in the epithelium and stroma of the eutopic endometrium of group I women, and 10.3 +/- 2.3 and 3.6 +/- 2.3 respectively in women of group II. In red lesions, the VEGF scores were 11.1 +/- 3.0 in the epithelium and 5.1 +/- 3.0 in the stroma, and in black lesions were 8.6 +/- 2.7 and 1.6 +/- 1.6, respectively. Significantly lower values were observed in black lesions as compared with eutopic endometrium and red lesions, the values of which were similar. Scores were also evaluated according to the phase of the cycle. In eutopic as well as ectopic endometrium, no significant cyclic variations were observed throughout the cycle. However, VEGF content was found to be higher in the eutopic glandular epithelium of women with endometriosis during the late secretory phase, possibly suggesting a more likely tendency to implant. In contrast, significantly higher VEGF content was noted in red lesions as compared with black lesions. During all phases of the cycle, the VEGF content in stromal cells of red lesions was higher than in black lesions. Similarities in VEGF content were observed in the glandular epithelium of the eutopic endometrium of women with endometriosis and red lesions, suggesting that endometriosis probably arises from the peritoneal seeding of viable endometrial cells during retrograde menstruation and that red lesions can be considered as the first stage of implantation. After the attachment phase, the high VEGF levels could provoke an increase in the subperitoneal vascular network and facilitate implantation and viability in the retroperitoneal space. Lower VEGF levels in black lesions explain the decrease in both stromal vascularization, followed by fibrosis and inactivation of the implant.[Expressions of matrix metalloproteinase-9 and tissue inhibitor of metalloproteinase-1 mRNA in endometriosis].To investigate mRNA expression of matrix metalloproteinase (MMP-9) and tissue inhibitor of metalloproteinase (TIMP-1) in ectopic endometriosis tissue and uterine endometrium from women with and without endometriosis.Thirty-eight women with endometriosis (Revised American Fertility Society classification, RAFSI-IV) were selected as study group. Thirty-eight specimens of ovarian endometrioma (ovarian chocolate cysts, OCC), 16 red peritoneal endometriotic lesions (RPL), and 35 matched eutopic endometrium (Eu) were collected from them simultaneously at the time of surgery. Twenty specimens of endometrium from reproductive women undergoing laparoscopic surgery without endometriosis were obtained as control group. The mRNA expressions of MMP-9 and TIMP-1 were detected by reverse transcription polymerase chain reaction (RT-PCR).Expression of TIMP-1 mRNA was detected in all samples. The level from endometriosis patients and control group was similar (2.31 +/- 1.21, 2.40 +/- 0.89). However, ectopic endometrium expressed significantly fewer TIMP-1 mRNA (OCC 1.67 +/- 0.79, RPL 1.45 +/- 0.68) compared with eutopic endometrium from both endometriosis and endometriosis-free patients (P < 0.05). The positive expression rate of MMP-9 mRNA was not distinctively different among all samples. The density of MMP-9 mRNA expression in endometrium (0.49 +/- 0.28) from endometriosis patients was similar to that in ectopic endometriosis (OCC 0.46 +/- 0.22, RPL 0.33 +/- 0.12), but was significantly higher compared with endometrium (0.29 +/- 0.12) without endometriosis (P < 0.05).An increase of MMP-9 mRNA expression of eutopic endometrium with endometriosis might enhance the endometrial implantation ability, thus facilitate the ectopic implantation of endometrium. Ectopic lesions express significantly less TIMP-1 mRNA, indicating they have increased invasive ability, which might facilitate the development of endometriosis.Mild endometriosis and luteal function.The luteal function of 27 patients with mild endometriosis and infertility was compared with that of 50 infertile patients without endometriosis. The incidence of endometrial luteal phase deficiency was similar in both groups of patients. Luteal phase length and plasma levels of progesterone (P), estradiol (E2) and prolactin (PRL) in infertile patients (both groups) were similar to those in a group of 10 fertile women. We conclude that luteal phase defects should not be considered as a primary cause of infertility in mild endometriosis.Indoleamine 2,3-dioxygenase-1 (IDO1) enhances survival and invasiveness of endometrial stromal cells via the activation of JNK signaling pathway.Evidence for an immunosuppressive function of indoleamine 2,3-dioxygenase (IDO) has been accumulating. However, the unusual distribution of IDO1 in gynecologic cancer cells suggests that modulating immunity may not its only function. To clarify the physiological importance of IDO1 in endometriosis, a tumor-like benign disease, we have investigated the potential mechanism by which IDO1 modulated endometrial stromal cells (ESCs) proliferation and invasion. ESCs were obtained from 16 control women (normal) and 14 patients with ovarian endometrioma, then the normal ESCs were treated with plasmid pEGFP-N1-IDO1 or SD11-IDO1 short hairpin RNA (shRNA) alone, or in combination with c-Jun N-terminal kinase (JNK) inhibitor (SP600125), and subjected to cell viability, proliferation, apoptosis assay and Matrigel invasion assay. IDO1 mRNA expression was evaluated by quantitative real-time reverse transcription-polymerase chain reaction (real-time PCR), and protein levels of IDO1, survivin, protein 53 (p53), matrix metalloproteinase (MMP)-2, MMP-9, tissue-inhibitor of metalloproteinase-1 (TIMP-1) and cyclooxygenase-2 (COX-2) in IDO1-overexpressing and IDO1-deficiency ESCs were analyzed by in-cell Western. We found that IDO1 expression was higher in endometriosis-derived eutopic and ectopic ESCs, compared with endometriosis-free normal ESCs. As a result, IDO1-overexpression in ESCs was markedly linked to reduction of apoptosis and p53 expression, and upregulation of survival, proliferation, invasion, as well as expression of MMP-9, COX-2 expression, rather than expression of survivin, MMP-2 and TIMP-1. Reversely, JNK blockage could abrogate these alterations of ESCs in IDO1-overexpressing milieu, suggesting that JNK signaling pathway was indispensable for ESCs survival, proliferation and invasion enhanced by IDO1, which may contribute to the pathophysiology of endometriosis.Unique transcriptome, pathways, and networks in the human endometrial fibroblast response to progesterone in endometriosis.Eutopic endometrium in endometriosis has molecular evidence of resistance to progesterone (P(4)) and activation of the PKA pathway in the stromal compartment. To investigate global and temporal responses of eutopic endometrium to P(4), we compared early (6-h), intermediate (48-h), and late (14-Day) transcriptomes, signaling pathways, and networks of human endometrial stromal fibroblasts (hESF) from women with endometriosis (hESF(endo)) with hESF from women without endometriosis (hESF(nonendo)). Endometrial biopsy samples were obtained from subjects with and without mild peritoneal endometriosis (n = 4 per group), and hESF were isolated and treated with P(4) (1 μM) plus estradiol (E(2)) (10 nM), E(2) alone (10 nM), or vehicle for up to 14 days. Total RNA was subjected to microarray analysis using a Gene 1.0 ST (Affymetrix) platform and analyzed by using bioinformatic algorithms, and data were validated by quantitative real-time PCR and ELISA. Results revealed unique kinetic expression of specific genes and unique pathways, distinct biological and molecular processes, and signaling pathways and networks during the early, intermediate, and late responses to P(4) in both hESF(nonendo) and hESF(endo), although a blunted response to P(4) was observed in the latter. The normal response of hESF to P(4) involves a tightly regulated kinetic cascade involving key components in the P(4) receptor and MAPK signaling pathways that results in inhibition of E(2)-mediated proliferation and eventual differentiation to the decidual phenotype, but this was not established in the hESF(endo) early response to P(4). The abnormal response of this cell type to P(4) may contribute to compromised embryonic implantation and infertility in women with endometriosis.Plasminogen activators in ectopic and uterine endometrium.To investigate the expression of the plasminogen activator (PA)-plasmin system components in ectopic endometrium and in uterine endometrium from women with and without endometriosis.Plasminogen, PAs (urokinase and tissue plasminogen activator), and PA inhibitors (1 and 2) were detected by immunohistochemistry using a alkaline phosphatase staining method.No differences in staining were found between uterine endometrium of women with endometriosis and women without endometriosis with any of the antibodies used. However, we did find differences between uterine and ectopic endometrium. Although the expression of the components of the PA-plasmin system reflected the cyclic changes in the hormonal levels in uterine endometrium, ectopic endometrium maintained a very high level of plasminogen and urokinase in every sample. We were unable to detect the presence of PA inhibitors in either uterine or ectopic endometrium.There is no evidence that uterine endometrium from women with endometriosis is originally more able to implant than that of women without the disease because of an increase in their PA expression. The high levels of urokinase and plasminogen in ectopic endometrium may reflect a more invasive nature of the endometriotic implants in the peritoneal cavity.Immunoexpression of hepatocyte growth factor and c-Met receptor in the eutopic endometrium predicts the activity of ectopic endometrium.To investigate the mitogenic and angiogenic activity of the eutopic and ectopic endometrium throughout the menstrual cycle and to examine whether the activity of the eutopic endometrium is useful to predict greater activity of the ectopic endometrium.Controlled clinicopathologic study using intact tissue.Nagasaki University School of Medicine, Nagasaki, Japan.Fifteen infertile women with pelvic endometriosis and 10 women without endometriosis undergoing laparoscopy.Biopsies from the ectopic endometrium and the corresponding eutopic endometrium were collected. Immunohistochemical staining was performed using respective antibodies, and a computer analyzed modified quantitative-histogram (Q-H) score was used to quantify immunostaining.The immunoreactions of hepatocyte growth factor (HGF), its receptor, c-Met, vascular endothelial growth factor (VEGF), proliferating cell nuclear antigen (PCNA), and von Willebrand factor (VWF) in eutopic and ectopic endometrium were examined, and their relation with different revised American Society for Reproductive Medicine (r-ASRM) stages and the morphology of endometriosis was evaluated.The immunoexpressions of HGF and c-Met were significantly higher in the eutopic endometrium of patients with endometriosis than in that of controls. The Q-H scores of HGF, c-Met, VEGF, PCNA, and microvessel density (MVD) were markedly higher in red peritoneal lesions when compared with other lesions. The Q-H scores did not reveal r-ASRM stage-dependent variation in any of these markers. We observed a significant correlation between the immunoexpressions of HGF, c-Met, and PCNA or microvessel counts. When we combined the Q-H scores of the glandular epithelium and stroma, we found that increased activity of the eutopic endometrium as measured by the immunoreaction of HGF, c-Met, VEGF, PCNA, and MVD was similar to highly active red lesions and was significantly higher than that of controls and other lesions.Immunoexpression of HGF and c-Met in the eutopic endometrium of patients with pelvic endometrioisis is possibly useful to predict greater activity of the ectopic endometrium.Evaluation of endometrial biomarkers for semi-invasive diagnosis of endometriosis.To test the hypothesis that specific proteins and peptides are expressed differentially in eutopic endometrium of women with and without endometriosis and at specific stages of the disease (minimal, mild, moderate, or severe) during the secretory phase.Patients with endometriosis were compared with controls.University hospital.A total of 29 patients during the secretory phase were selected for this study on the basis of cycle phase and presence or absence of endometriosis.Endometriosis was confirmed laparoscopically and histologically in 19 patients with endometriosis of revised American Society for Reproductive Medicine stages (9 minimal-mild and 10 moderate-severe), and the presence of a normal pelvis was documented by laparoscopy in 10 controls.Protein expression of endometrium was evaluated with use of surface-enhanced laser desorption/ionization time-of-flight mass spectrometry. The differential expression of protein mass peaks was analyzed with use of support vector machine algorithms and logistic regression models.Data preprocessing resulted in differential expression of 73, 30, and 131 mass peaks between controls and patients with endometriosis (all stages), with minimal-mild endometriosis, and with moderate-severe endometriosis, respectively. Endometriosis was diagnosed with high sensitivity (89.5%) and specificity (90%) with use of five down-regulated mass peaks (1.949 kDa, 5.183 kDa, 8.650 kDa, 8.659 kDa, and 13.910 kDa) obtained after support vector machine ranking and logistic regression classification. With use of a similar analysis, minimal-mild endometriosis was diagnosed with four mass peaks (two up-regulated: 35.956 kDa and 90.675 kDa and two down-regulated: 1.924 kDa and 2.504 kDa) with maximal sensitivity (100%) and specificity (100%). The 90.675-kDa and 35.956-kDa mass peaks were identified as T-plastin and annexin V, respectively.Surface-enhanced laser desorption/ionization time-of-flight mass spectrometry analysis of secretory phase endometrium combined with bioinformatics puts forward a prospective panel of potential biomarkers with sensitivity of 100% and specificity of 100% for the diagnosis of minimal to mild endometriosis.The roles of thioredoxin and thioredoxin-binding protein-2 in endometriosis.Oxidative stress is considered to be involved in the establishment and development of endometriosis. Thioredoxin (TRX) is an endogenous redox regulator that protects cells against oxidative stress, and TRX-binding protein-2 (TBP-2) is a negative regulator of TRX in the biological function and expression. The aim of this study was to investigate the roles of TRX and TBP-2 in the pathophysiology of endometriosis.A total of 35 patients with histologically confirmed endometriosis and 31 patients without endometriosis participated in this study. Real-time polymerase chain reaction was used to quantify TRX and TBP-2 mRNA levels, and immunohistochemistry (IHC) was used to assess TRX and TBP-2 protein localization in the endometrium. Serum and peritoneal fluid levels of TRX and TBP-2 were measured using a specific commercial ELISA.There were no significant differences in TRX mRNA levels in the endometrium of patients with endometriosis and the control groups. However, TBP-2 mRNA levels in the endometrium were lower, and the TRX to TBP-2 ratio was higher in patients with endometriosis than in the control group. In particular, the TRX to TBP-2 ratio was significantly higher during late secretory and menstrual phase in patients with endometriosis compared with the control group. IHC studies also showed the decreased TBP-2 immunoreactivity in patients with endometriosis compared with the control group. There was no correlation between TRX and TBP-2 mRNA levels in patients with endometriosis, whereas TRX mRNA levels were positively correlated with TBP-2 mRNA levels in the control group. There were no significant differences between the two groups in TRX and TBP-2 levels in serum or peritoneal fluid.Aberrant expression of TRX and TBP-2 in the endometrium may be associated with the establishment of endometriosis.Bone marrow-derived cell populations in uterine and ectopic endometrium.Uterine endometrium contains numerous bone marrow-derived cells. The spectrum of cell types is different from that of any other tissue, and the differences in endometrium from women with endometriosis may reflect a different endometrial phenotype in these women. The cell types of bone marrow origin found in ectopic endometrium may indicate the degree of differentiation of the tissue. It was found that, in normal endometrium, the CD45+ cell population comprised T cells, macrophages, CD56+ large granular lymphocytes, some CD16+ cells and a few B cells. Changes in these cell populations during the menstrual cycle were similar in endometrium from both controls and patients with endometriosis, and resembled that reported previously by others. In ectopic endometrium, the frequency of CD45+ cells remained within the same range as that of uterine endometrium but without any obvious pattern of change during the menstrual cycle. CD56+ large granular lymphocytes, an immune cell type characteristic of uterine endometrium, were also found in ectopic endometrium. Our results indicate that ectopic endometrium, as well as comprising both glandular and stromal cells, contains bone marrow-derived cell populations similar to those of uterine endometrium. This suggests that the same processes of cell migration and/or differentiation occur in ectopic and uterine endometrium.MiR-199a attenuates endometrial stromal cell invasiveness through suppression of the IKKβ/NF-κB pathway and reduced interleukin-8 expression.MicroRNAs have recently been identified as regulators that modulate target gene expression and are suggested to be involved in the development and progression of endometriosis. This study was undertaken to analyze the expression level of microRNA-199a (miR-199a) in paired ovarian endometrioma and eutopic endometrium from women with endometriosis, and to investigate the contribution of miR-199a to the invasive capability of endometrial stromal cells (ESCs). Cell adhesion, migration and Matrigel invasion assays were carried out to measure the invasiveness of ESCs. Bioinformatics prediction, reporter gene assay, PCR, western blotting and ELISA were performed to identify miR-199a targets and related signaling pathways. The results showed that the expression level of miR-199a was lower in the eutopic endometrium from women with endometriosis, and even lower in the paired ovarian endometrioma, compared with the expression in normal controls. Moreover, ectopic expression of miR-199a attenuated ESC adhesion, migration and invasiveness. MiR-199a targeted and inhibited IkappaB kinase beta (IKKβ) in ESCs. Accompanied by IKKβ reduction, miR-199a suppressed nuclear factor-kappa B (NF-κB) pathway activation and interleukin-8 (IL-8) production in ESCs. All these findings suggest that miR-199a, down-regulated in endometriosis, attenuates the invasive capability of ESCs in vitro partly through IKK/NF-κB pathway suppression and reduced IL-8 expression. In conclusion, miR-199a could be involved in the pathogenesis of endometriosis.Hexane extract of aged black garlic reduces cell proliferation and attenuates the expression of ICAM-1 and VCAM‑1 in TNF-α-activated human endometrial stromal cells.Increasing evidence indicates the potentially crucial roles of intercellular adhesion molecule-1 (ICAM-1) and vascular cell adhesion molecule-1 (VCAM-1) in the pathological process underlying endometriosis. The present study aimed to investigate the effects of a hexane extract of aged black garlic (HEABG) on the proliferation and expression of ICAM-1 and VCAM-1 in tumor necrosis factor-α (TNF-α)-activated human endometrial stromal cells (HESCs) isolated from patients with endometriosis. HESCs were isolated from endometriotic tissues obtained from women with advanced endometriosis who underwent laparoscopic surgery for ovarian endometrioma (n=18). Cell proliferation and cell cycle analysis were assessed by WST-1 assay and flow cytometry, respectively. The expression of ICAM-1 and VCAM-1 was measured by flow cytometry, immunofluorescence staining, immunoblotting and quantitative reverse transcriptase-PCR. The secretion of interleukin-6 (IL-6) was determined by enzyme-linked immunosorbent assay (ELISA). The activation of nuclear factor-κB (NF-κB) and activator protein-1 (AP-1) was detected by electrophoretic mobility shift assay (EMSA) and the activation of c-Jun N-terminal kinase (JNK), extracellular signal-regulated kinase (ERK) and p38 MAPK was analyzed by immunoblotting. Cell proliferation and cell cycle progression were significantly suppressed by HEABG in the TNF-α-induced HESCs through the inhibition of the ERK and JNK signaling pathways. Remarkably, the treatment of the HESCs with HEABG potently suppressed the TNF-α-induced ICAM-1 and VCAM-1 transcript and protein expression by inhibiting the activation of NF-κB and AP-1 transcription factors. Our results suggest that HEABG may be effective in the prevention and treatment of endometriosis in humans.[Expression of hepatocyte growth factor and its receptor c-met gene in the endometrium of women with endometriosis].To study the role of hepatocyte growth factor (HGF) and its receptor (c-Met) in the pathogenesis of endometriosis.In situ hybridization and immunohistochemistry method was used to examine HGF mRNA and protein expression in eutopic and ectopic endometrium obtained from 54 women in reproductive age with endometriosis confirmed by laparoscopy and histological examination (including 28 cases of stages I/II and 26 of stages III/IV) and from the endometrium of 24 healthy fertile women.In patients with endometriosis, the positivity rate of HGF/c-Met expression was similar in the eutopic and ectopic endometria, but the number of positive cells and expression intensity were much higher in ectopic endometrium. The positive expression rate varied little between the proliferative and secretory stages of the endometrium. Compare with the healthy controls, patients with endometriosis of stages I/II and III/IV had significantly elevated positivity rate of HGF and c-Met expressions in either eutopic and ectopic endometrium, but without significant difference between the two patient groups (P<0.01). The rate of strong c-Met protein expression was significantly higher in III/IV endometriosis than in the controls, without statistical difference between other groups.The expressions of HGF and c-met gene are correlated with the pathogenesis of endometriosis, which is preceded by eventful changes in the biological behavior of the eutopic endometrium.Molecular evaluation of proliferative-phase endometrium may provide insight about the underlying causes of infertility in women with endometriosis.To determine if endometrial gene expression is different in women with endometriosis-related infertility and fertile women.Prospective study of mid-follicular phase endometrium in 47 subjects in two phases: microarray study of 10 infertile women with endometriosis and five fertile controls, and a quantitative real-time PCR (qRT-PCR) study of 27 infertile women with endometriosis and 15 fertile controls. Gene expression was determined by DNA microarray, and qRT-PCR used for 12 "promising" genes based on the microarray analysis.Compared to fertile controls, women with stage I-II endometriosis had 23, and women with stage III-IV had 35 genes that were significantly up- or down-regulated by microarray. However, using qRT-PCR, only chemokine ligand (CXCL) 13 was significantly down-regulated and somatostatin was significantly up-regulated with early endometriosis, and only CXCL 14 was significantly down-regulated with advanced endometriosis compared to fertile controls.Our findings indicate that the pattern of gene expression in proliferative-phase endometrium is different when comparing tissue from patients with endometriosis versus fertile controls. Recognition of these endometrial alterations could be helpful to diagnose and stage endometriosis, and may provide insight to explain why conception rates are low in women with endometriosis.c-fos gene and protein expression in pelvic endometriosis: a local marker of estrogen action.Endometriosis is an estrogen-dependent disease, causing pelvic pain and infertility. c-fos is an early transcription factor that has been reported to be related to estradiol-dependent cell proliferation. The aim of the present study was to assess the c-fos gene and protein expression in pelvic endometriotic implants in comparison to normal endometrium from infertile women. An open, prospective and controlled study included 15 infertile women with endometriosis and 19 control infertile women. Endometrial and endometriotic biopsies were performed at the follicular phase and the samples were processed for RT-PCR and immunohistochemistry. ERalpha mRNA levels were similar in the endometriotic implants/eutopic endometrium from women with endometriosis and in normal tissue (P = 0.649). The aromatase gene, however, was not expressed in the eutopic endometrium from either control or endometriosis groups, and was only expressed in 50% of endometriotic implants (P = 0.044). c-fos gene expression was higher in endometriotic implants (1.32 +/- 0.13; P = 0.011) than in eutopic endometrium from patients with endometriosis (0.97 +/- 0.11) or from the control group (0.91 +/- 0.05). In addition, immunohistochemistry showed a more abundant distribution of c-Fos in the stroma of endometriotic tissue compared to eutopic endometrium. These data suggest that c-fos may play a role in the molecular mechanisms of estrogen action on the induction, promotion or progression of endometriosis.Immunohistochemical characterization of stromal leukocytes in ovarian endometriosis: comparison of eutopic and ectopic endometrium with normal endometrium.To compare stromal leukocyte subpopulations in different phases of the menstrual cycle in eutopic and ectopic endometrium from women with ovarian endometriosis and in control endometrium.Retrospective immunohistochemical study.Department of Pathology, Royal Victoria Infirmary, Newcastle-upon-Tyne, United Kingdom.Paraffin-embedded tissue blocks from 30 patients with endometriosis and 30 control blocks from patients undergoing hysterectomy for nonendometrial pathology were retrieved from archive files.Quantitative assessment of defined stromal leukocyte subpopulations in eutopic, ectopic and control endometrium at different stages of the menstrual cycle.In the proliferative and early secretory phases, ectopic endometrium contained elevated numbers of CD45+, CD3+, and CD43+ cells but reduced percentages of CD68+ macrophages. The proportions of granulated cells were reduced in ectopic endometrium throughout the cycle. No differences were noted between eutopic endometrium from women with endometriosis and control endometrium.Differences between eutopic and ectopic leukocyte subpopulations with the exception of large granular lymphocytes may be due to the lack of cyclicity demonstrated by endometriotic lesions.